Hello there, hello there.
Is something wrong?
My wife and I found him lying dead in the yew alley,
Face downward.
What did you do then?
I hurried across the moor, to fetch the doctor.
Dr. Mortimer.
He was at dinner with Ms.
Stapleton and her brother.
Very well, Barryman, that's all.
Yes, sir.
Dr. Mortimer,
To what do you attribute the death of Sir Charles?
Heart failure, sir.
I might add that for sometime,
Sir Charles was in a highly nervous state.
Worried.
Something was preying on his mind.
Did he confide to you what was preying on his mind?
Well...
No.
Well, what about those footprints, Dr. Mortimer?
As though Sir Charles had been tiptoeing back toward the house.
I examined them myself, and as a man of science..
So did I, Mr. Stapleton, more likely Sir Charles was running.
Running? Running from what?
If you please, gentlemen, one at a time.
Why don't you tell the truth, all of you?
Tell all you know.
Silence, Mr. Franklin, you've already testified.
You were not there, no nothing whatever of this matter
Nevertheless, I insist he was murdered.
Murdered I tell you.
That will do, sir that will do
There were no marks on the body of any kind, Dr. Mortimer?
None.
Then as his physician what would you say was the cause of Sir Charles' death?
Most empathically, a heart failure, sir.
Such then Gentlemen is the verdict of this Coroner's court.
Call it what you like,
Sir Charles was murdered, there's more than one person in this room knows I speak the truth.
I am blessed if I know why on earth you want all these clippings. about this Baskerville fellow.
I have an idea Watson that young Sir Henry isn't destined for a very long existence in this world.
What?
My conjecture is that he'll be murdered!
Murdered?
It will be very interesting to see if my deductions are accurate.
Oh, Mr. Holmes!
While you out a Gentleman called to see you and left this.
He asked you to give it to me?
Oh no, he just left it there by mistake I imagine.
Dr. Mortimer.
He didn't leave his name, sir.
No, it's here on the stick,
Mrs. Hudson.
Oh is it, I didn't notice.
Do you know any Dr.
Mortimer, Watson?
No, what did he want?
He didn't say, sir.
What do you make of it, Watson?
Why should I make anything of it?
The fellow came to see you.
What kind of a fellow?
Let me hear you reconstruct him.
From his walking stick.
By our usual method of elementary observation.
I should say that Dr.
Mortimer is a successful man, well esteemed.
Good, excellent.
I should say that he does a great deal of his visiting on foot because the iron fellow is worn down.
Perfectly sound.
Let's have a look at this inscription.
"From his friends of the C.C.H."
I should say that is something about a hunt.
Really, Watson, you've excelled yourself.
Has anything escaped me?
Most everything my dear fellow.
A person to a Doctor is more likely to come from a Hospital than a hunt, and when the letters 'CC' appears before the Hospital, the name "Charing Cross Hospital" rather obviously presents itself.
Well, you may be right.
Furthermore, I'd say that Dr. Mortimer had a small practice in the country and was the owner of a dog.
How can you tell that?
Quite simple, from the teeth marks.
Look you can see for yourself.
A rather large dog, I'd say and unless I'm mistaken,
Dr. Mortimer will call on us again in a few moments.
Rubbish, Holmes, rubbish
How the devil can you deduce that?
Well, as his left his stick,
Isn't reasonable to presume that he'll come back and get it?
Dr. Mortimer, sir.
Mr. Holmes?
Yes, come in Dr. Mortimer.
I took the liberty of calling upon you.
And left your stick.
Oh, so I did.
Thank you so much.
A presentation I see?
Yes sir, from Charing
Cross Hospital.
This is my friend
Dr. Watson.
Of course.
How do you do, sir?
Mr. Holmes, you're the one man in all England who can help me.
Won't you sit?
Thank you.
A friend of mine is in grave danger.
May I enquire his name?
Sir Henry Baskerville, heir to the estate of Baskerville Hall.
I am in mortal fear
Sir Henry's life will be snuffed out
Why what makes you think that?
I have information which leads me to believe that for centuries past every Baskerville whose inherited the estates has met with a violent and sudden death.
But as I recall it, Sir Charles died from natural causes, heart failure.
Apparently, that was the verdict of the Coroner, in which
I, Sir Charles
Physician concurred but there was one point which I kept back from the police, from everybody.
Yes?
About fifty yards from where
Sir Charles fell dead were footprints.
A man's or woman's?
Mr. Holmes, they were the footprints of a gigantic hound!
A hound?
Why didn't you report it?
Not a soul would have believed it.
During the night it rained and in the morning the marks were completely obliterated.
But I saw them.
As clearly as I see you and then a few days ago as one of the executors of the estate
I found this:
This old document.
Legend of the hound of the Baskervilles.
Let me read it to you, Mr. Holmes.
It's quite short, I won't bore you, I promise.
Yes, please go on.
In the time of the great rebellion about 1650,
Baskerville Manor was held by Hugo of that name.
A profane and Godless man.
One Michaelmas this Hugo stole down upon a neighbouring farm and carried off the daughter of the house.
He locked her in an upper chamber. and while Hugo and his friends were carousing as was their nightly custom
Such a cuddlesome little winch never existed before I swear.
Cheeks soft as velvet and a form so wondrously rounded...
- Tell us more
- What happened then?
Where was I?
The form you were saying.
No need to cry out I told her
Hugo will not hurt you.
With that I whisked her up on the saddle I covered with me cloak and we were off like the wind.
You brought her here?
- to the manor?
- Where is she?
Go fetch her, Hugo.
Easier said than done hey, Hugo?
How will he fetch her if she isn't here?
Ah, she isn't eh?
Come on, I'll show you.
You think she's really in there?
Yes, he did.
May we come in my sweet?
These drunken sots will give Hugo...
There is no girl!
Gone.
Now he says she's gone.
Out of my way.
What ails him?
Tim, Gary.
- Yes, Sir Hugo
- What's wrong sir?
She's gone. The winch.
Well, don't stand there gaping go bring my mare.
Yes, sir.
What's wrong?
I've never seen him in such a rage.
Where's he gone?
- Let's follow him.
- Let's go Roderick
Very well.
Come on Matthew?
Hold the stir you blockhead.
I'll give my soul to the devil for that winch.
Hear how he thinks he'd sell his soul to the devil for that winch.
Well may he find her and wed her then the devil will have his soul.
On and on they rode until suddenly they came upon the body of the girl.
Dead.
Then from just over a rise they heard sounds so hideous that the blood froze in their veins. and, looking up, they beheld
Before we could get at him
Sir Hugo was dead his body literally torn to shreds.
Such is the history of the hound that has cursed the
Baskerville family ever since.
Many having been unhappy in their deaths, that have been sudden, violent and mysterious.
Well Mr. Holmes?
Interesting, very interesting.
What do you think?
I don't know.
But Sir Henry is arriving from
Canada tomorrow.
Please understand my dilemma, my responsibility
I was Sir Charles' best friend
My duty is to protect that boy.
If I should take him down there to Baskerville Hall and if anything happened to him...
What I suggest, Dr. Mortimer, is when Sir Henry arrives you bring him here.
Oh, thank you, thank you, Mr. Holmes,
You don't know what a load you have taken off my mind.
Good night, Dr. Watson.
Good night, sir.
You left your stick again.
Oh, thank you.
By the by, Dr. Mortimer,
Do you have a dog?
I have no dog.
Then how do you account for these marks?
Evidently the teeth marks of a dog.
I used to have a dog, a small Spaniel, but it died.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Well Holmes, what do you make or it?
Do you think there is anything in it?
Good heavens you are not going to start scratching on that infernal thing are ya?
Dear old Watson!
Good bye, Sir Henry.
If you ever go back to Canada be sure you sail with us.
Thanks, you've all been wonderful.
The very best of luck, sir.
The same to you.
This way, Sir Henry.
Thank you, Sir.
- and you and you.
- Thank you sir.
Sir Henry, it's too bad it's all over... just when you and Betsy Ann were really getting to know each other.
Oh, but we are going to see one another in London, aren't we Sir Henry?
Oh, I should love to but I have to go down to the country, unfortunately.
To your ancestral estate how exciting
Perhaps Betsy Ann if you are very good Sir Henry will ask us to visit him.
Of course, yes.
We are staying at the Savoy.
- Don't forget.
- I won't
- Bye
- Good bye.
Sir Henry?
Yes
I am Dr. Mortimer, your uncle was my best friend.
How do you do?
Thank you for coming to get me.
Not at all, my dear boy,
You have a pleasant trip?
Splendid, thank you.
I've taken rooms for you at the
Northumberland Hotel, where I'm stopping.
Fine.
I assume you will be staying in London for a few days.
Yes, I haven't seen it since I was a boy.
Thank you, sir.
Northumberland Hotel.
Sir Charles' death was a great personal loss to me.
I was more than his doctor...
What's this?
What are those words?
"As you value your life or your reason keep away from the Moor"
You mind, Sir Henry.
No, not at all.
What do you make of it, Mr. Holmes?
Why do you thing that last word is printed in ink?
Oh, that's simple enough the words have been snipped from the London Times, that's evident from the typography.
But the word 'moor' is an unusual word
Your correspondent evidently couldn't find it in the newspaper.
You'll admit Dr. Mortimer, there is nothing supernatural about this?
Supernatural?
Tell me Sir Henry has anything else unusual happened to you today? since your arrival in London?
I can't think of anything, unless you say that losing one of your boots is unusual.
You lost one of your boots?
Yes, brand new ones too never had them on.
I put them outside the door to be cleaned and when I went to fetch them there was only one there.
Brand new boots and you put them out to be cleaned?
They were tanned ones, Dr. Watson.
It prevents them from scratching to have them polished first.
Now will you please tell me what this is all about?
Dr. Mortimer bringing me here to see you? this letter?
It's about you, Sir Henry, your inheritance and Baskerville Hall.
Dr. Mortimer thinks that it might not be safe for you to go down there.
Safe?
On account of a hound.
A wild, supernatural monster that has cursed you Baskerville's for the last two or three hundred years.
Ah, ho, that sounds grand a family ghost eh?
Why didn't you tell this before, Dr. Mortimer?
Well, Mr. Holmes... suggested.
He is going to tell you about it now, Sir Henry.
Take him back to the hotel, Dr Mortimer
Show him that old document
Tell him everything, the whole business.
I'll join you a little later.
Come on we'll stroll back, you can tell me on the way.
This is not something to joke about, Sir Henry. Believe me.
See you presently.
Good night.
What's up?
Come on, Watson.
What's up now?
Where are we going?
You'll see soon enough.
Not a moment to lose.
Newspaper.
Get your evening paper!
Keep your eye on that Hansom.
This letter dates back to about 1650.
Paper,
Get your evening paper!
Evening paper, sir.
Get your evening paper? tells all the latest news.
Thank you sir.
Evening paper.
A dissident, drunken fellow.
Look out stop!
Whip up cabbie, whip up.
Very good, sir.
Who was it?
I don't know but it is just as I expected.
Haven't we better hurry on and warn them?
No, no, no they are not in any danger now.
Here is the number of that Hansom.
Find out from Scotland
Yard who the cabbie is and if you can fetch him along to the hotel.
I'll do my best.
"Northumberland Hotel"
Well, now that Dr. Mortimer has told you everything...
What have you decided?
To go there, of course.
Good that's what I thought you'd say.
If Dr. Mortimer will only guarantee that this supernatural hound of his will really appear,
I'd go already.
Don't say that my boy.
Sounds like a bogey story they tell kids to frighten them at night isn't it, Mr. Holmes?
Yes, rather.
It might interest you to know however that you were shadowed from my house.
Shadowed?
Yes, and probably have been ever since you arrived in London.
By whom?
I don't know.
A man in a Hansom.
He must have seen me run after him and had the cabbie dash off.
By the by, did you ever discovered your mislaid boot?
No, hello?
The browns ones here but one of the black ones is gone.
I'll ring for the Chambermaid perhaps she can explain.
Yes, do.
Now why should anyone want to take an odd boot? and then exchange a brand new one for an old one?
Can you explain it Mr. Holmes?
No, I can't.
Come in.
Did you ring, sir?
Yes about that boot of mine?
Oh, I have not found it yet, sir.
I've made enquiries all over the hotel.
Well it's back the brown one, but now one of my black ones is gone.
Oh, sir, that is odd!
Who else except yourself has access to this apartment?
Only the housekeeper, sir and she wouldn't do a thing like that
No, no, of course not.
I'm terribly sorry, sir.
I'll do my best to find your boot.
Okay, thanks.
Good evening, gentlemen.
Good evening, Dr. Watson.
I've got him!
Come on in Clayton. Come this way.
This is John Clayton, number 2704.
- How do you do?
- How do you do Clayton?
Won't you sit down?
I won't keep you long.
It's good of you to come
Thank you, sir.
Now, Clayton I wish you would tell us who your fair was that watched a certain house on Baker Street this evening and later followed these two gentleman.
Well I'll tell you you know as much as I do, sir.
Not quite as much I hope.
The gent said he was a detective, sir.
Oh he did?
Yes, sir.
How would you describe this gentleman, Clayton?
I suppose... about 35 years of age, sir and dressed like a toff and a small black beard.
And the color of his eyes?
I can't say, sir.
I see.
When did he tell you that he was a detective?
At the station, sir.
When he gave me the 2 guineas, of what he promised me.
Did he tell you his name?
Yes, sir.
What did he say it was?
Sherlock Holmes.
What?
It's the name what he gave me, sir.
Sherlock Holmes.
Well, whoever it is, at least has a sense of humour.
Here Clayton, here is something for your trouble.
Thank you, thank you kindly, sir.
Is there anything else I can tell you, sir?
Nothing at all I think.
All right, sir. Good day, sir.
Good day, gentlemen.
Well Mr. Holmes, have we progressed.
Do you think?
Perhaps.
Tell me, Sir Henry, when were you planning to go down to Dartmoor?
Immediately, tomorrow.
I am really awfully keen to see the old place.
You will accompany us, Mr. Holmes?
I would like to very much, Dr. Mortimer, but unfortunately I have some rather pressing business here in London.
Of course, there is no need.
Please don't think me ungrateful,
Dr. Mortimer
I do appreciate your concern for me, but this story of the hound is nonsense.
As for that silly letter and all the rest of it I am sure it can all quite easily be explained.
I quite agree with you, Sir Henry,
All the same if you don't mind,
I'd like to ask Dr. Watson to go down with you.
What's that?
If you don't mind, Dr. Watson
Gladly, if you care to come.
Of course, I'd be delighted.
Good. Well, thank you Dr. Watson, and thank you, sir. and we'll stalk the hound together.
Don't take it too lightly, Sir Henry.
Well I must be going.
Mr. Holmes?
Yes, Dr. Mortimer.
About that person calling himself Sherlock Holmes?
Very interesting, Dr. Mortimer
Keep me posted, Watson.
Write me daily reports.
To the smallest detail, Holmes.
Fine, I give him into your care, Sir Henry.
Guard him well. Good night.
Guard me well, I like that!
God!
Here we are, Sir Henry, on famous Dartmoor and what a history it has.
You see those rocks over there?
Actually they are stone houses built by Neolithic man
50 or 100,000 years ago.
You don't suppose the Baskervilles go back that far.
And over there, beyond that hill, those dark spots
That's the great Grimpen Mire.
As treacherous a morass as exists anywhere.
Thousands of lives have been sucked down into its bottomless depths.
Cheerful little spot.
Fascinating.
Oh, it is, Sir Henry and mysterious!
No wonder the people about here have such odd beliefs.
Some will tell you that nothing ever really dies upon the Moor. and after a time one gets to believe it.
Really?
You believe that?
Of course not.
If I believe all the legends about this place
I wouldn't live here.
I wouldn't have the courage.
And now if you'll look
Baskerville Hall, the home of your ancestors, Sir Henry.
How are you, Barryman?
Very well, thank you, sir.
Thank you.
This is Barryman, the butler,
Sir Henry and Mrs. Barryman.
Welcome, Sir Henry.
Welcome to Baskerville Hall.
Thank you.
Barryman was with your
Uncle most of his life as was his father before him.
Well I hope you will be just as happy with me.
Thank you, Sir Henry.
Baskerville Hall.
Just as it has always been,
Sir Henry.
Your uncle did some modernizing upstairs. but down here nothing has been added or taken away since Sir Hugo's time.
Well I wouldn't say it was the most cheerful spot I have ever seen.
I beg your pardon, sir what time do wish dinner, sir?
Early I think.
Dr. Mortimer has to drive home.
Tell the Coachman to have the carriage ready after dinner.
I'll tell him, sir.
Now I suppose you'll like to freshen up there is hot water in your room, sir.
I'll show the way.
Thank you.
Be careful, sir, these steps are a bit in need of repair.
My dear Holmes - we arrived tonight shortly after dark
Dr. Mortimer stayed for dinner.
I wish I could describe the dreadful eeriness of this place
I didn't want to startle you,
I thought you might be asleep.
What is it?
Come quickly someone's prowling around.
What are you doing, Barryman.
Oh, nothing sir, it was the window.
The window?
Yes, sir I was just seeing that it was fastened.
What does it matter whether it is fastened or not?
A window on the second floor.
I go around every night seeing that they are fastened.
Sir Charles always insisted upon it.
Well that sounds reasonable enough.
Well if it is properly fastened now, Barryman
You can get back to bed.
Yes, sir, thank you.
Do you see anything?
Nothing
Nothing, except a pinpoint of a light a long way off, over there by the Craggs.
Well, keep your eye on that point of light and tell me what happens.
Do you see anything now?
It's gone now.
There it is again. and there it goes.
Just as I thought.
Barryman was signalling someone.
Come on get some clothes we'll find out.
It's still there.
Yes
Try not to lose sight of it.
Crouch down here, whoever it is may come back.
What about getting a little further away from that light?
Up there.
Good idea.
Stop.
Are you mad.
Whoever it is, knows his way among these rocks, we don't!
Who the devil can it be?
You were right about Barryman.
Yes, but what connection can there possibly be between that horrible creature and Barryman?
You know I have a half a mind to fire the fellow in the morning.
Then notify the police, and let them shadow him.
No it's the last thing Holmes would want us to do.
Our job is to watch, Barryman watch him like a hawk.
Come on, let's get back.
What do you think it is?
What does it sound like, to you?
Well... if we were back in
London, this would seem ridiculous.
Let's get on.
Look here doctor, you don't believe that nonsense do you?
Of course not.
No more than you do.
"What was it? That's what we must find out the wind? a bird?
Or was it the hound?"
Good morning.
Good morning, Sir Henry.
So that's our famous moor, eh?
Yes, sir.
Come in.
Where's Sir Henry?
He went out, sir.
Where?
Across the moor.
Didn't I tell you to let me know immediately if Sir Henry ever ventured out there alone.
I know but I only just found out from my wife.
"Sherlock Holmes Esq. 221 B
Baker Street, London"
Hello there!
Oh, forgive my shouting at you, Dr. Watson.
My name is Stapleton, live just across the moor.
But how did you know my name, sir?
From Dr. Mortimer, one or our neighbours.
Ah, yes.
How is, Sir Henry?
He is very well, thank you.
We were a bit worried that he might decide not to come here after the rumours that followed the sad death of Sir Charles.
Has Mr. Holmes come to any conclusion yet?
I really can't say.
Is he going to honour us with a visit?
I haven't the slightest idea.
Well if I can be of any help I do hope you will call upon me.
I know this place pretty well.
Thank you but I don't think I shall be needing any help.
Wonderful place this moor.
From a Scientist point of view there is nothing like it.
Vast, barren, mysterious
Do you see those bright green spots over there?
It seems a little more fertile than the rest.
Fertile? That's the great Grimpen mire.
One false step means death
While only yesterday one of the moor ponies wondered into it.
Turn me sick with horror to see it struggling and the sound of its screams...
What's that?
Oh, that. The people around here say it is the hound.
Surely you don't believe such rut.
Bogs make queer noises.
Or perhaps it's a Bittern booming.
A Bittern?
Yes, a very rare bird, practically extinct...
If anything is extinct on the moor.
Stop! Stop!
Look out, stop!
That was a voice, a woman's voice.
Thank heavens you heard me.
Another few yards you would have been into that mire.
It looks innocent doesn't it?
But only yesterday a little moor pony got into it and that was the end of it.
Well, thank you for shouting at me.
You're Sir Henry?
Yes
I suppose I should say welcome, Sir Henry. but I'm afraid it wouldn't be sincere.
Oh that's understandable.
A stranger coming here and taking the place of someone you were fond of.
Oh, it's not that.
No, tell me what it is it?
Sound silly I know, but...
Oh it's not that ridiculous hound legend?
I never used to believe those things until I came to live down here.
But you do now.
You're rich, you can go anywhere you want to.
There's so many other places to live in the world, interesting places.
Just now I find this place very interesting.
Why hello, Beryl!
Hello!
Dr. Watson, my step-sister
Miss Stapleton.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
Hello, Doctor.
And this I'm sure must be...
- Sir Henry, my brother.
- How are you?
I was just telling Dr. Watson, how delighted we are you decided to come here
I am here and to stay.
Well that's splendid, you know it has been quite dull down here since the halls been closed.
It's wide open now, especially to friends of my Uncle.
You must both come and dine with me.
You must come to us first.
Yes, what about tomorrow night?
You and Dr. Watson
Will invite the neighbours over to meet you.
Of course you already know, Dr. Mortimer the only other one is old Mr. Franklin.
Who's he?
Oh, wait until you meet him, Sir Henry
He'll bring suit against you,
I warn you.
What on earth for?
He'll find something.
Suing people is a passion with him.
I look forward to meeting him.
All right tomorrow night.
Thank you.
And thank you again for rescuing me.
Goodbye.
"There is something about this fellow Stapleton I don't like.
However, his charming step-sister has invited us to dine with them at their house, across the moor, near the village"
And were it not a personal insult to Sir Henry, I would never of come here this evening
Oh but why, Mr. Franklin?
I is a stickler for convention
I'm not in the habit of breaking bread with my host. on the eve of persecuting him.
Great heavens!, What crime have I committed now?
A most gruesome one, Mr. Stapleton.
That of body snatching.
What?
You're a body snatcher, sir. a ghoul, a despoiler of graves!
Oh, come, come Mr. Franklin, that is a very serious charge!
Beryl, re-fill Mr. Franklin's glass will you?
Thank you, my dear.
And an excellent vintage it is too but if you're implying that I am tipsy, sir.
Oh, of course he's not.
Tell us more Mr. Franklin,
Whose body has
Mr. Stapleton been snatching?
According to my evidence, Sir
Mr. Stapleton was seen digging among the old stone huts in the moor and removed from there a skull.
Oh, that!
A most interesting relic, Sir
Henry of Neolithic man.
I'll show it to you after dinner.
50,000 years old, if it is a day.
Nonetheless, sir you removed it from the grave without the consent of the next of kin and according to British law, that constitutes body snatching.
Deny that if you can.
But what good will it do you to prosecute Mr. Stapleton?
None, sir
I have no interest in the matter.
I act entirely from a sense of public duty.
If you care to drop by my house some day and take a tippler of wine with me
I'd be glad to tell you a thing or two about everybody here.
About him
Prowling the Grimpen mire at night.
And why he takes her with him.
Oh, there is no secret about us
As you know, I dabble a bit in the Occult.
Mrs. Mortimer has very strong mediumistic qualities.
She finds the old caves in the moor particularly conducive to psychic phenomena
Very interesting.
Have you ever tried to communicate with my uncle since his death?
Oh, yes, on several occasions.
With no success.
But if my wife would consent to a séance tonight while you, Sir Henry, are present, we might...
No, no, James not tonight, please.
Perhaps some other time.
Shall we have coffee in the drawing room?
If you and Dr. Watson would care to see my little collection...
- Oh, yes, the skull. - Yes, well in here.
- I would like to very much.
Quite a museum.
Oh, a very modest little collection.
But this one really is quite a treasure.
You will observe its unusual cranial index
Gentlemen, gentlemen, my wife has consented, she's agreed to a séance.
Splendid!
Please, come at once.
Now then if you will all get chairs arrange yourselves naturally, comfortably here by the fire
As Shakespeare says,
"You can call spirits from the vasty deep, but will they answer"
I don't answer scoffers or sceptics.
If that's your attitude, Mr. Franklin perhaps you wouldn't mind leaving us.
Oh, I am sure Mr. Franklin didn't mean to doubt.
Of course I doubt, and I ask you to keep a civil tongue in your head, Dr. Mortimer.
Ordering me out from under the roof of my host is grounds for a very, nasty, little lawsuit.
Oh, come now, Mr. Franklin, sit down by me.
Now, tonight we may communicate with Sir Charles.
Find out what he feared so greatly.
What he was running away from.
Now Jennifer you sit here, please.
Sir Henry here.
Oh, would you please put out those lights?
Certainly.
Stapleton, that light, please.
Dr. Watson.
Now, if you all keep quiet, sit quite naturally.
Sir Henry, your hand please
Sir Charles can you speak to us?
Let us know if you're present.
There are things that only you can explain.
Speak to us, Sir Charles if you're here.
There are things only you can tell us.
Sir Charles, can you speak to us?
Let us know if you're present.
There are things that only you can tell us.
Speak to us, Sir Charles, if you are here.
There are things that only you can explain.
That sound I have heard it before.
It's nothing, nothing but the wind.
Or a Bittern, I was telling Dr. Watson only yesterday about it.
Sir Charles,
What happened that night?
What is it you feared?
Tell us, Sir Charles.
Of all the weird terrible things that have happened on the moor.
Listen, there it is again.
I can't stand it, will someone put on the lights, please.
I tell you it is nothing.
Nothing but the wind.
Mr. Franklin,
What do you think it was?
The hound, of course.
The Hound of the Baskervilles.
Any fool would know that.
James, get my cape, take me home.
Very well, my dear.
Dr. Watson, can I give you and Sir Henry a lift?
No thank you, we have our own carriage.
You're trembling.
That wasn't the wind we heard;
I've heard that sound before, often that's what I tried to tell you yesterday on the moor.
That's why I wish you hadn't come here.
But sounds can't hurt you.
It doesn't matter what they are or where they come from
You don't know.
Oh, you have got to get all that nonsense out of your head, Beryl!
I wish I could.
You're going to. I am going to make it my business to see that you do.
You have been alone too much there's nothing to do down here
That's the trouble.
I am going to change all that..
If you let me. will go fishing together, riding...
You like riding?
Yes, I do.
Good, will start tomorrow, shall we?
Yes, thanks.
Fine.
I'll ride over for you in the morning.
Are you coming, Sir Henry?
Right, Doctor.
- Good night.
- Good night.
"My dear Homes - Nothing to report except that I am quite convinced that that Sir Henry is head over heels in love with...
Hello!
Hello Beryl.
Well, where shall we go today?
There's one place we haven't been
- High Tor.
- Fine.
That's where all the old ruins are.
You know Jack says they are all 50,000 years old.
That sounds interesting.
And you can still see the remains of their stone huts.
All right, good.
Those flattish stones over there are graves.
Oh, those huge bronze monoliths, are remains of their temples.
Doesn't anybody know who they were... or what they look like?
Jack has some theory about them.
But anyway they must be very primitive.
Living on roots and dressing in skins.
But still laughing and dreaming just as we do.
I wonder how many times some young savage brought his bride to this very hut? said "take your hat off darling, this is home"
You know this is probably where she cooked his first meal for him.
What a yell he must of let out when she burnt it up.
And now they are quite forgotten.
Just as we will be too, one day.
Do you suppose when a man met a girl that he liked he had to wait a respectably long time before he dared tell her? or are things like that sudden, natural?
I would like to think things were like that.
Beryl, that's the way they are with me.
Oh, but we've only known each other such a little while.
There you see, convention, custom.
We can't even be ourselves when we want to be.
Why is that?
You know I used to come down here quite often and explore these old caves when Jack and I first came to live here.
I didn't have a fear of the moor then.
And you've none now, that's all gone.
When I'm with you it's gone. I seem to forget it, laughing and talking.
But when I am alone it all comes back to me.
At night I still wake up trembling as if in my sleep
I could hear those awful noises... then it get's bad as ever.
Oh, I think of you and I wish you weren't here.
Oh, don't say that!
I wish you were in
London or in Canada.
But even if I wanted to go back to London or Canada, I couldn't.
Why not?
You know why.
You must know why.
I can't go anywhere now unless you come with me.
Oh, Henry!
Would you mind pausing for a minute.
I am afraid I have lost my way.
Hello, Doctor, Sir Henry and I were just...
We were, getting engaged.
Engaged, splendid!
May I congratulate you both!
- Thank you.
- Thank you.
Who is that?
It seems we didn't pick a very secluded spot.
What do you want?
Just crossing the moors, sir.
Just crossing the moor
I be
I be peddling my wares, sir.
I must having something here would interest you, sir.
How about a nice mouth organ, sir?
No, thank you.
Here is something an old squire like you could use, sir.
A whistle.
A whistle for calling your sheep dog.
Calling my what...?
Sheep dog, sir.
A regular charmer, sir.
You'll hear it for miles around, sir.
Take it away and yourself with it.
How about some scent for the Lady, sir?
That will do, be off and about your business.
All right, all right,
I ain't doing no harm.
I ain't' doing no harm.
You know that's what
I hate about this moor.
There is always something strange.
Look, he's limping on the other foot now!
"Dr. Watson- if you want to hear something to your advantage come at once to the stone hut southeast edge of the Grimpen mire"
Barryman.
Yes, sir.
Who delivered this note?
No one, sir.
I found it slipped under the front door.
Thank you.
Barryman, is Sir Henry home?
No, sir. He has gone across the moor.
Oh, sorry I missed him. Did
Dr. Watson go with him?
No, sir.
Oh, thank you, Barryman.
I'll tell Sir Henry you called, sir.
Yes, do.
"Sit down and make yourself comfortable"
Was it you who sent me that communication?
I did, sir.
Out with it.
Whatever it is you want me to hear?
I only want you to hear this zither, sir.
Zither?
They don't come no finer, sir.
What blasted impertinence.
Getting me out here...
Look here my man
You're up to something.
I, I only ask you to try it, sir.
Be careful! This thing is loaded.
Who are you?
Well, I might ask the same of you, sir.
Trawling around the moor, spying out on everybody.
That's my business, to spy.
Oh, it is, is it?
Yes, and if you want to know who I am,
I'll tell you.
Who are you?
I am Sherlock Holmes.
Sherlock Holmes, the detective?
Yes, and now perhaps you realize why I can't be hoodwinked.
Oh, sir, sir, that changes everything.
Now who are you? Quick.
Well in that case, sir my name must be Watson.
Holmes.
How are you, my dear fellow?
A fine detective you are, calling yourself Sherlock Holmes.
So you have been down here on the moor all the time.
That's a fine way to treat me, I must say!
Send me down here, let me think you are in
London, working on that blackmail case... let me sit up half the night, writing those blasted reports
Here are the reports my dear
Watson and very valuable they were to.
I made arrangements to have them forwarded onto me.
A dirty trick which I'll not forget. ah but a very necessary trick
If I'd come down here with you and Sir Henry, every movement of mine would have been watched while in this way only you and
Sir Henry have been watched and I have been free to work.
That's all very well, making a fool of me.
Sit down, Watson, do sit down.
Perhaps a little supper will help you get over your huff
Huff? I'm in no huff!
Here try some of these sardines.
It's a pity I didn't know you were coming,
I would have provided a brace of pheasants.
It's a pity you didn't think of bringing down that infernal violin of yours. to regale me with some of your enchanting music.
I did my dear Watson.
Anything to oblige.
Well, if you've had enough to eat Watson... and are feeling of better spirits
I think we better be getting along.
Getting along where?
If I am not prying.
I'm returning with you to Baskerville Hall.
There are still some gaps to be filled in, but all in all... things are becoming a little clearer
Not to me I assure you.
Still a hopeless jumble.
Mr. Franklin, Dr. Mortimer, the Barryman's...
Put it all together and what have you got?
Murder, my dear Watson.
A refined cold blooded murder.
Murder?
There is no doubt about it in my mind, or perhaps I should say in my imagination that's the way crimes are conceived and where they are solved, in the imagination.
But there has been no murder unless you mean, Sir Charles. and the facts clearly indicated that he died from heart failure.
That's why so many murders remain unsolved, Watson.
People will stick to facts, even if they prove nothing
Now, if we go beyond facts use our imagination as the criminal does, imagine what might have happen to him and act upon it as I have been trying to do in this case... we usually find ourselves justified.
Then you know?
Another day or two at the most and I will know.
My one fear is that the murderer will strike before we are ready.
In that case...
What's that?
Where is it coming from?
There.
No, no there.
The hound!
Come on Watson, quick
Look.
Sir Henry.
Must have run along that ridge and fallen over the cliff.
He's dead?
Skull crushed in.
- The convict, thank heavens.
- What?
That's the man I shot at the night we arrived.
The man Barryman was signalling to.
Who is it?
The Notting Hill murderer.
He escaped from prison last month.
Hiding on the moor ever since.
The Notting Hill murderer?
You mean he is responsible for all this?
That remains to be seen.
But he is wearing
Sir Henry's clothes.
Yes, yes, that accounts for it.
Accounts for what?
For the hound. These clothes were the cause of that poor devils death.
You mean that the hound was after Sir Henry.
Yes, and mistook the convict for him because the scent of the clothes
Do you remember that missing boot, Watson?
Why do you suppose the brown one?
The one that had never been warn? was so mysteriously replaced and the black one taken?
Why?
Because a boot that had never been worn wouldn't have the scent of the owner and the black one had.
But how did this convict come to be wearing Sir Henry clothes?
Oh, well that's simple enough.
Why Dr. Watson, is somebody hurt?
Who is this?
The convict who escaped from Princeton.
Oh, it's terrible!
I heard a cry that's what brought me over here.
What's your theory about it, Mr. Holmes?
Your quick at identification.
Everybody knows you, sir.
As a matter of fact we have been expecting you down here.
My names Stapleton.
How do you do?
You came in time to see a tragedy.
Yes, yes, a most unpleasant remembrance for me to take back to London tomorrow.
Oh, must you go so soon?
I have been looking foreword to meeting you.
Yes, yes I am afraid I must.
We were hoping, Mr. Holmes, you may be able to shed some light on the occurrences that have puzzled us down here.
Yes, but an investigator needs something more than legends and rumours.
Quite so.
Give me a hand will you, Watson, we better put this poor fellow in one of these huts until the morning.
Let me give you a hand.
Oh, I think we can manage all right thank you.
Where is Sir Henry, Barryman?
In the library, sir.
Now, Barryman, is your wife still up?
Will you tell her Mr. Sherlock
Holmes would like a word with her?
Sherlock Holmes?
Yes
Yes, sir.
Thank you.
Sir Henry.
Holmes.
I am glad to see you so well,
Sir Henry.
Why didn't you tell me Mr.
Holmes was coming?
Well, I...
He didn't know, we across each other in the village.
I am glad to see you.
What is Barryman?
I asked to see Mrs. Barryman, if you don't mind, Sir Henry.
Of course not.
Come in, Ms. Barryman.
I think you better sit down.
Thank you, sir, I prefer to stand.
I am afraid I have some rather bad news for you.
What is it?
Well it's going to be a bit of a shock.
Oh, they've caught him?
Your,
Your brother.
They will hang him for sure!
No, Mrs. Barryman.
He is beyond the law now.
He is in more merciful hands.
We came upon the poor fellow as we were crossing the moor.
He must have missed his footing and fallen over the cliff.
No further need, Barryman to signal to him from the window or take food out to him or give him Sir Henry's discarded clothes.
Oh, Sir Henry, it is all my doing.
Barryman here wanted to tell you all along so as you could notify the police. but he was my kin, my own kin even though he was never any good.
We understand.
You won't hold it against
Barryman? Oh, yes, sir.
Of course not.
Now take her along and see that she is all right.
Thank you, sir.
Thank you, Sir Henry.
Well, it's nice to get that end cleared up for their sake as well as mine.
It clears up everything,
I think Sir Henry.
That poor devil must have been completely demented.
And that accounts for those dreadful noises that we have been hearing from time to time.
Exactly.
Your troubles are over, Sir Henry.
I really am most grateful, Mr. Holmes.
Oh, not at all I've done little enough.
But you can sleep peacefully in your bed now and commence to lead the life of a happy country squire.
Well, not for a little bit I am afraid.
I'm off to Canada again.
Canada?
Beryl, Miss. Stapleton and I are going to be married.
Miss. Stapleton?
A very charming young lady,
Congratulations!
Everything is arranged.
Her brother is giving us a farewell party tomorrow night.
We'll be married in London the following day. and then off to a honeymoon in Canada.
My congratulations too, Sir Henry.
Thanks.
What luck you're here.
You and Dr. Watson will be with us tomorrow night
No, I am sorry I afraid I can't
I must hurry back to London and so should you too, Dr. Watson.
You'll have to report to the police here about that convict in the morning but there is a train living early in the afternoon.
Oh, what a pity, Beryl will be dreadfully disappointed.
Now will remedy that when you come up to London.
You must...
You must dine with us before you sail
Well, there's the old boy himself
Sir Hugo, Hugo the
Beast of the Baskervilles.
Not a bad bit of brushwork.
By Ransome, one of the minor painters.
Oh, I don't imagine it's very valuable.
I can't quite agree with you, Sir Henry.
One day, it might prove to be of the greatest value.
Well, we must be going.
There are still one or two little points Holmes, that I can't for the life of me reconcile with your theory. about that poor demented convict.
One or two little points?
Surely, you can't mean he was in London three weeks ago? sent that letter, stole that boot?
Of course not.
Then who the devil did?
The same person who was responsible for the death of that convict last night. and will try again to murder,
Sir Henry tonight.
Tonight?
Unless my imagination has run away with itself and I don't think that it has.
Then why are we rushing up to London?
Leaving, Sir Henry entirely unprotected?
We're not my dear, Watson.
We're just giving the impression of rushing up to London.
In a minute now we will be in
Okehampton, there we'll catch a train back to Dartmoor. and if my surmise is correct we will nab out man in the act.
If you know who it is why all this running about rigmarole?
Why don't you have him arrested?
Because I have no case, not a shred of evidence that would hold in any court.
The only way is to catch him red-handed.
To catch him in such a way there is no escape, no alibi.
That means gambling with Sir Henry's life.
But you can't possibly...
Gambling to save his life!
But we got to take that chance.
Otherwise, the shadow of sudden death will be forever hanging over his head, and sooner or later...
Here we are Okehampton.
And may you both spend the rest of your years together,
- in happy content.
- hear, hear
Thank you, thank you.
And now I want to thank you all for the kindness that you have shown a stranger and when Beryl and I return,
I want you to know that you'll always be welcome at Baskerville Hall.
- Thank you.
- Thank you, Sir Henry
It's going to be lonely for you
Mr. Stapleton with Beryl gone.
Yes, indeed it will, Mrs. Mortimer
I should be more dependant than ever upon you, my neighbours.
Don't count upon me, sir.
In my opinion you're a body snatcher.
And until the courts have decreed otherwise.
I want nothing what so ever to do with you.
Oh, Mr. Franklin!
I say driver, can't you go a little faster?
I'm doing the best I can, sir.
You idiot! We said go faster, not break our necks!
How far is it to
Baskerville Hall?
It's 5 miles by road, sir.
But if you want to cut over the moor it's only about three.
Here you are.
Come on, Watson, quick!
It's been a wonderful evening, Stapleton.
Well, glad you could be with us, Mortimer.
Take this broach my dear and wear it on your wedding dress.
It belonged to my great-grandmother.
Something old, something new, you know.
Oh, that's so sweet of you
Mrs. Mortimer! Thank you, so much.
And come back to us soon, both of you.
We will.
May I offer you a lift, me lad.
It's such a beautiful night, Mr. Franklin,
I think I'll walk, thank you.
Merely, a gesture of hospitality, reject it, if you like.
You're not going to cross the moor alone, Sir Henry.
Why not? There's nothing to fear anymore.
We can't be sure.
Oh, but I have Sherlock Holmes own word for it.
Come along, James.
Good night, Sir Henry.
Good night, Mrs. Mortimer.
And the best of luck to you both.
Thank you, thank you.
- Good night.
- Good night.
I wish you would let Mr. Franklin drive you home.
I wanted to stay and say good night to you.
This is our last good night.
From tomorrow on there won't be anymore, ever.
Tomorrow we will be away from this place.
I wish it were now.
So do I.
Oh, now don't be silly
Good night, Beryl.
Good night, dear.
Well was it a nice party?
Wonderful, everything and most of all you.
Jack, I haven't said very much about going away but...
You know how I feel.
Yes, of course, it had to be.
You won't be too dreadfully lonely will you?
Well I should have my work.
Henry and I will be back before you even know it.
Yes, of course you will.
Well, you better go to bed now.
You got a big day ahead of you tomorrow.
Good night, Jack.
Good night, dear.
Over there.
We'll head him off.
Jack.
Where are you?
He's coming too.
You'll be all right old man.
Watson?
Yes, ole chap.
Mr. Holmes?
Yes.
What, what was it?
We've got to get him home, quickly.
Can you manage him alone?
- Yes.
- Cause I got things to do.
Help, get his arm around my shoulder.
I'm all right.
It's pretty painful, I know.
But it won't take much longer.
Go on, it doesn't hurt.
Now, Mrs. Barryman some gauze, please.
I just heard the dreadful news.
Thank heavens, you're safe.
Is he all right?
Well, now we know for certain this is no legend.
No myth, there really is a hound.
Was a hound?
Yes, Mr. Holmes told me.
I ran into him across the moor.
He asked me to send you to him at once.
It's a matter of great importance.
He said he would wait for you at the spot where the beast was killed.
I must finish here first.
This poor boy has taken a terrific beating.
Well, I could carry on for you, Doctor
I'm a bit of a doctor myself, you know.
Do you think you could manage?
Yes, I'm sure I could.
I think you really ought to go, Dr. Watson
Mr. Holmes was most urgent.
Oh, really?
I should need some hot water,
Mrs. Barryman.
Oh, I want it boiling, please.
Yes, sir.
Must have been a terrifying experience, Sir Henry.
Terrifying.
It was.
It was indeed.
Yes, I can see you are still weak from loss of blood.
I can't say I feel any too well.
Here drink this, Sir Henry.
You will feel much stronger.
I'll see to your other bandages after.
Oh, it may taste a little bitter but don't mind that.
Sir Henry...
Well, feeling better?
Yes, thanks.
I say that's uncomfortably close to your eye isn't it?
All along this side... well, well.
Oh, I am terribly sorry, that was clumsy of me.
It was only a bit of a tonic.
Sir Henry, has lost considerable blood.
- Yes.
- Henry
Henry!
I'm all right, darling.
Oh no, you're not.
We hear those dreadful noises on the way home.
It's a mercy he's alive.
I owe you an apology, Sir Henry, for jeopardizing your life.
Jeopardizing?
But you saved my life.
But there was no possible way for me to fore tell the plot.
And I must also apologize to for deceiving you last night when I told you that your troubles were over
I knew that they weren't.
But if I hadn't cleared out, the crisis which came tonight would have indefinitely been postponed. with the shadow of death hanging over you... and over you too
Miss. Stapleton.
You knew this was going to happen?
How could you know?
The person who wanted to snuff out your life, Sir Henry, was the same one who plotted to kill your Uncle.
He wanted to get you both out of the way.
So, he could lay claim to this place, to the whole Baskerville estate.
In tracing back his lineage.
He discovered not only that he was the next of kin.
But also learned of that old legend about the hound.
So he brought the hound to life.
By the simple expedient of buying the most savage dog that he could find and hiding it on the moor until he needed it.
If he had succeeded tonight the blame would have fallen on the legendary monster. and no possible suspicion would have been attached to him.
A most ingenious device.
And I am quite sure that he would have had no difficulty in proving his claim to Baskerville
Hall and all that goes with it.
The most amazing instance of a throw back that I have ever seen.
And you can see for yourself.
Stapleton.
One move and I'll shoot!
Jack.
You two, stay where you are.
You're under arrest Stapleton, for the murder of Sir Charles Baskerville, the murder of a convict and the attempted murder of Sir Henry.
You can't arrest me, Holmes.
Now one move from any of you and
I will blast you all to kingdom come.
So, sorry old boy.
What's the matter, old man?
What's the matter?
That's our man.
Stapleton, a murderer.
He won't get very far.
I've posted Constable's on both the roads and the only other way, is across the Grimpen mire.
I'm so sorry, Miss Stapleton.
I wish I could have spared you this.
Well, that officially closes the case, Sir Henry.
And a very interesting case for your annals Watson.
An ordinary dog and a genius criminal.
And a more ingenious detective.
I owe you a tremendous debt of gratitude.
Oh, we all do, Sir Henry!
Mr. Holmes, we have admired you in the past as does every Englishman.
Your record as our greatest detective is known throughout the world.
But this, seeing how you work knowing that there is in
England such a man as you.
Gives us all a sense of safety and security.
God bless you, Mr. Holmes!
Thank you, Dr. Mortimer, thank you.
Now, if you don't mind, I have had a rather strenuous day
I think I'll turn in.
Of course.
Good night, good night.
Good night, Mr. Holmes.
Good evening, sir.
Oh, Watson. The needle.
[Villagers singing mournful tune]
[Praying in foreign language]
Hyah! Hyah! Hyah!
Hyah! Hyah! Hyah!
Aah!
Aah!
Ugh!
Ugh!
Ugh!
Aah!
[Wolf howls]
I'm sorry, gentleman and lady, but it will be best for you to stay here tonight.
Come now, my good man.
You can't frighten us.
We've been over your foul roads before.
Please, you do not understand.
It is not the road.
It is the darkness.
Here our doors are protected with bat thorns.
What is all this bat Thorn business?
It keeps them out.
They're afraid of it-- the demons of the castle.
[Knocking]
[Knocking furiously]
Oh, uh, good evening.
It's a lovely even...Ing.
Ahem.
Well, doctor, for one who is not afraid of the dark, you have been pushing your horse pretty fast.
Well, you know horses.
Once they get started for home, there's no stopping them.
Oh, I admit, I was a bit impatient--
I mean, hungry--for one of your wonderful meals.
Yes. The vampires are hungry, too, for their supper.
Oh! Tut-tut.
Nonsense. Rubbish.
Vampires. Nonsense.
I won't keep you waiting.
I'll be right out for my supper.
He can tut-tut all he likes about vampires, but I'd hate to be on a farm needing his help tonight.
What is all this about vampires?
Yes, and this castle?
That's where they live-- in their coffins, and they come out at night and drink people's blood.
Ha ha!
Ha ha ha!
Silly superstition.
You would not laugh if you lived in these mountains.
Fancy, Ronny, vampires in the 20th century.
Ripping. They'll never believe that at the club.
[Speaking foreign language]
She says please do not mock because if the vampires should hear you, they will take their revenge on all of us.
[Speaking foreign language]
Woman: Did you find out what was the matter?
Man: Baron Otto is coming.
Baron Otto: One minute.
I have something to say to you.
I'm the bearer of very sad tidings.
Last night your master, sir karell, was murdered.
[Servants murmur]
There's no cause for alarm.
Get up on your feet.
Police inspector neumann from Prague is upstairs now with the body.
He'll be down here shortly to question all of you.
Now, tell him the truth, and nothing can happen to you.
That's all. You can go back to your work.
In the university of Prague, there are records, documents that prove the existence of these creatures.
Dr. Doskil, I'm not interested in your old wives' tales.
I'm trying to find the cause of sir karell's death.
But you have it right here-- these little wounds on his throat are the bite of the vampire.
Jan, you said--
I have seen such marks in these parts.
Sir karell dismissed you at 9:15 last night.
Yes, Mr. Inspector.
Yes.
Then what were you doing down here this morning at 3:30?
I don't know.
I couldn't sleep.
A bat was fluttering against my window, and I felt something was wrong.
A bat made you feel that way?
Yes, sir--no, sir.
I don't know.
Now, you...
Why didn't you come to the castle at once when jan telephoned?
Because jan told me sir karell was already dead.
Does your medical license admit jan to certify to the death of your patients?
No, no.
Of course not.
But it was night, and I realized there was nothing I could do.
Oh, I see. You're no moonflower.
You're a morning glory.
Now, if there's enough daylight to bring out the physician in you, make a thorough examination of the body for the cause of death-- real, not supernatural.
Here, jan, give the doctor a hand.
[Softly]
Why, the idea!
I'll get your wrap, my dear.
We'll step over to my place.
You've eaten nothing.
Oh, the very thought of food. I couldn't.
But, irena, you must conserve your strength.
Man: Yoo-hoo!
It's fedor.
I'll tell him.
No. No, thanks.
Fedor: Yoo-hoo!
Yoo-hoo!
Oh! Where have you been?
I've been making enough noise to raise the dead.
Oh, don't, fedor.
Don't.
Well, what's wrong, dear?
What's happened?
Fedor, father...
Father!
Oh, you poor darling.
This young man, tell me something about him.
Who? Fedor?
Miss borotyn's fiance,
Mr. Vincenty from Prague.
His family--wealthy?
Moderately. Why?
With sir karell out of the way, miss borotyn will come into quite a bit of money.
Surely you can't suspect fedor.
What are miss borotyn's immediate plans?
Why, naturally she'll be moving next-door to my place,
I being her guardian.
Oh. Her guardian.
Why, yes.
And being her guardian, naturally you'll be the sole executor of her estate.
Yes. Why?
What's wrong?
Oh, I see.
I'm under suspicion, too.
In such cases, everyone's under suspicion.
The idea of talking to me as though I were one of his common policemen!
Old wives' tales!
Look for the cause of death-- real, not supernatural.
Why...
Aah! What?
Look!
Well, doctor.
What have you found?
Inspector, the examination fully confirms my diagnosis.
Those marks are the only sign of violence.
Had sir karell been ailing of late?
No. On the contrary, he enjoyed good health, except for a slightly sluggish heart.
You prescribed for that?
Naturally.
Ah. Well, I shall want an autopsy.
Of course that will be done, but I am positive the cause of his death is told by those little wounds.
Surely, doctor, a man of your learning does not believe in vampires.
Then how do you account for his body being drained dry of blood?
Yes, Mr. Coroner, and tonight farmer narotni was found dead in the road.
Count mora and his daughter were seen again near the castle.
Oh. Piffle!
Superstitious twaddle!
Dr. Doskil.
Yes.
You have examined the body of this farmer, too.
I did. Ahem.
The corpse was drained of blood.
There were the same marks that I found on sir karell's throat.
And you have seen this count mora and his daughter?
No, sir.
When I saw them, they was in form of bats.
These poor, deluded creatures believe that vampires change themselves into bats and back again into human form.
How versatile.
Really, Mr. Coroner.
"Poor, deluded creatures."
Oh, I must protest.
I hold a degree from the medical faculty sit down.
Of the univers-- do you want to make your township and this court ridiculous?
Forget your absurd old superstitions.
This is 1934.
Ladies and gentlemen,
I think that under existing circumstances, the decision of this inquest must be that sir karell borotyn met his death from cause or causes unknown.
[Women singing]
Darling, they're doing all this for you.
Doesn't it make you happy?
Why...
Why, dear, you're crying.
Bars, please drive on.
I'm sorry, dear.
I didn't mean to make you sad.
Forgive me, fedor, for being so moody, but seeing them all dancing suddenly brought it all back...
How father used to tell me that at my wedding feast, all the villagers and peasants from miles around would come, and they'd sing and dance.
Oh, fedor...
He had it all planned.
Now he isn't here.
Darling, I'll always try to make you as happy as your father wanted you to be.
The villagers and peasants would be quite satisfied with wine of the country.
It is just what sir karell would have done.
Yes, sir, but for one thing.
What's that?
He would have had the wedding feast at the castle.
Come, jan.
Do you think miss irena could bear to go back there after that dreadful tragedy?
I suppose not, sir, but it's heartbreaking to see the place neglected, rain and sleet entering through the broken windows.
I know how you feel.
Recheck your list.
Be sure we've got enough of everything.
But you must remember, life goes on, my dear.
Your father wouldn't want these days of all days to be clouded for you.
I know. I feel ashamed of the way I acted with fedor last night, but it all seemed to sweep over me again.
Well, no more of that, young lady.
If I remember correctly, we have a wedding to prepare for.
Irena: Fedor!
Fedor! Oh, darling, what's the matter?
Annie, some water, quick!
What is it, fedor?
What happened to you?
I don't know.
I can't remember.
I was running to the train, and then by the castle
I fell.
I...i must have struck my head.
Oh, you poor dear.
Here. Drink this.
Fedor, you say you fell by the castle?
When I came to, it was dawn.
I was too weak to move.
I just lay there.
It seems...
It seemed hours before I was able to...
To drag myself here.
Irena: Annie, the doctor, quick.
Dr. Doskil.
Fedor, those wounds-- like father's!
Annie: Aah! Vampires! Vampires!
Let me out of here!
[Soft, ghostly moaning]
[Bats squeaking]
Man: Hyah!
Hyah!
Woman:
Aah! Slow down!
Slower!
Are you trying to kill me?
Let go. Let go.
Slow down! Slow down!
I'm not going to be upset in no ditch!
And I'm going to tell the baron how you've been beating his horse.
It's all your fault, taking so much time over your beer.
I told you we had to get home before sunset.
Why afraid of the dark?
The darkness won't hurt us.
If you wake up dead in the morning your body drained dry of blood, you'd be afraid of the dark.
Afraid of the dark.
[Woman screams]
Oh! Oh!
Heaven--heaven protect us!
Oh, heaven!
I've been a good girl.
I've been a good girl all my life.
Don't let her get me.
[Branch cracks]
Aah!
Giddy-up!
Woman: We must see him.
Jan: But you can't disturb him now.
Woman: He must be told what we saw!
Jan: Once and for all, you cannot disturb him now!
What is this?!
The castle, sir!
It's haunted, sir!
Dead people.
Shh! Jan, close the door.
We saw them.
Yes, we did, sir.
Keep quiet.
I'll explain.
Some real-estate brokers from Prague-- no, no. We saw a woman, a dead woman in her grave clothes.
That's enough.
What you probably saw was one of the brokers' clients inspecting the castle.
The place is being shown for rent.
Excuse me, sir.
I'm new here.
Otto: I want no more disturbances in this house, understand?
Yes, sir.
Miss irena has gone through enough excitement.
No, sir. Yes, sir.
I'll keep my tongue.
[Clock striking]
[Woman screams]
Jan: What is it?
What is it, sir?
[Woman screams]
[Screaming]
Otto: What happened to her?
Woman: I don't know.
I couldn't find her.
What happened?
I don't know!
I felt her deadly cold breath on my throat.
I must have fainted.
I knew no more.
Colleague, your diagnosis is correct.
Professor zelen.
Gentlemen, I've spent my life in the study of, uh...
Uh, miss borotyn, will you excuse us, please?
May we continue our talk in another room?
Maid.
Yes, sir? Yes, sir?
Go to miss borotyn.
Stay with her.
Under no circumstances leave her.
No, sir.
Professor zelen, why all this secrecy?
I broke off my sentence for miss borotyn's sake.
There is no more foul or relentless enemy of man in the occult world than this dead-alive creature spewed up from the grave.
True, true.
This attack by a beautiful woman on miss borotyn goes far to confirm the legend of the castle.
Who else could it have been but-- the daughter of count mora.
Exactly.
My very own conclusion, professor.
What is your advice?
We can't undo what's been done.
Miss borotyn is in danger of repeated attacks.
[Knock on door]
[Knocking]
Come in, please.
It's inspector neumann.
Excuse me.
Uh, baron Otto, I must speak to inspector neumann before he leaves.
Maid: Please. You should be lying down.
Miss borotyn! [Gasp]
You must come away from there.
I'm afraid you treat me like an invalid.
Maid, quick, the doors. The windows.
I want everything closed and fastened securely.
Every moment counts.
Run along, now.
Yes, sir.
Yes, sir.
Oh, Dr. Doskil.
There's a certain thorny weed that grows in these parts.
Yes, yes.
Bat Thorn.
That's it.
That's it.
I want you to get me some, if you will, please.
We'll have to work fast.
The sun will soon be down.
Yes.
Very good, sir.
With my permission, a broker in Prague leased the castle.
Look. Look at the signature of the tenant.
Karell borotyn. Hmm.
Some relative, no doubt.
No, no.
It's karell himself.
What's wrong with you, man?
Sir karell's been dead for a year.
It's his signature,
I tell you. I know it as well as my own.
Zelen: Ah, inspector neumann!
Your arrival is providential.
Baron, we need his help in the worst way.
Inspector, miss borotyn has been attacked by a vampire.
Well, I suppose coming from you this is no joke.
But you know
I don't believe in such things.
Why have you sent for me?
Why were you instrumental in bringing me down here?
Please, professor.
No argument.
I can't stand any more of this.
I'm too excited.
I beg your pardon, baron.
Sorry, baron.
I'll tell you why
I brought you here, professor.
I thought you'd help me uncover the truth.
Why, the facts speak for themselves.
There have been
3 attacks.
Sir karell is dead.
Miss borotyn and her fiance lie within the shadow of worse than death.
The vampire is a pestilence that grows.
Each victim that it kills itself becomes a vampire.
A corpse by day, at night it leaves its coffin to sustain its unnatural life on the blood of the living.
Inspector, we must protect this house with bat Thorn to prevent their entrance.
Baron, I have sent for a supply.
If you will pardon me,
I'll see if it's arrived.
Inspector, do you really think-- zelen: Miss borotyn, you should not be down here.
You must not disregard my warnings.
But I heard a voice...
Outside, calling me.
It's your weakened condition, child.
No. No, it sounded like father.
Father's voice.
Come. I'll take you back to your room.
Did you hear what she said?
Her father's voice.
Hysteria.
I place no stock in it.
His signature...
His signature on that lease.
Now, don't you start believing that nonsense.
Dead people don't leave their graves.
But, inspector, we must make sure that sir karell's body is still in its coffin.
Irena: Fedor, you're not well enough. You promised me not to come tonight.
Fedor: What are you trying to keep from me?
Who is this man?
Oh, I'm sorry.
Professor zelen.
Professor,
Mr. Vincenty.
You've been so ill, dear, we thought it best not to let you know, but now that you're here-- please, please.
You'll overtax your strength.
Mr. Vincenty, miss borotyn must be spared all excitement.
She's passed through a terrible ordeal.
Like you, she was attacked by the vampire.
The vampire?!
Zelen:
She must have rest.
Fedor: She'll get rest.
I'm taking her away from here tonight--now.
Mr. Vincenty, if you interfere with my plans, if you disobey me, my work will be destroyed, for...it's not only your lives, your souls are at stake.
We must all die.
There's nothing terrible about death.
But to live on after death, a soul earthbound-- a vampire-- you don't wish any such fate for your beloved.
Fedor: No.
Of course not.
Of course not.
Then you must leave with me.
I'm not leaving here.
Please, dear.
Do as he says.
I'm so tired.
Good night.
Zelen: Maid! Maid!
Come here, please.
Yes, sir? Yes, sir?
I want you and the Butler to place some of this bat Thorn in every room on this floor, you understand?
Yes, sir. Yes, sir.
Go along.
Come, young man.
Aah! Don't do that.
He wants some of this put in every room in the house.
Yes. You.
No. We.
The vampire's power prevails during the hours between sunset and sunrise, when it leaves its coffin--
[door opens]
Otto: Professor...
We've just come from sir karell's tomb.
Inspector:
The coffin was empty.
[Jan babbling]
[Maid screaming]
[Banging on door]
Aah!
Fedor:
Irena! Irena!
Fedor! Fedor!
Fedor: Darling, what happened?
Irena: Oh, my dear!
Stop gibbering.
What are you trying to say?
Maid: It was terrible!
It was awful!
Zelen: Quiet, please.
One at a time.
Speak up.
Tell me what happened.
Yes. We were told to put some of the bat Thorn in every room.
We'd just come out of that door and started down the hall...
It's a horrible business.
I wish he'd hung the beastly stuff up himself.
We'll get it over with--
[Maid screams]
H-he was there, coming towards us!
Yes, yes! He had a white face...
A dead-white face with burning eyes and a ghastly wound on his head.
Zelen: It was count mora.
Yes! Yes!
Have you been drinking?
No. No, sir.
If I have,
I hope to choke on the next one.
This is no time for levity.
The vampire, he is still somewhere within this house.
Young man, place some bat Thorn at this door and lock it securely.
Fedor: Yes, sir.
Maid, Butler, search the rooms at that end of the house.
You mean...
G-go into those rooms?
Zelen:
Yes, you idiot!
Inspector: Hurry!
Baron Otto, we must drive him out of here.
Quick, inspector, we must search the rooms at this end.
Zelen: In that room, baron.
Quick, inspector.
We've no time to lose.
[Gunshot]
Jan: Maria, don't leave me!
[Gunshot]
Otto: Inspector, what is it?
He got through the window.
Zelen: Baron! Inspector!
Come here.
Please. Quick.
Inspector: What is it, professor?
What is it?
Zelen: Look.
Was that he...
The last one?
Who?
Sir karell-- her father.
Her father?
Why, yes.
Didn't you find his coffin empty?
No, no. I can't believe that.
I won't believe that.
Inspector, please hurry.
Place this at these doors.
I'll attend to the others.
Otto: Professor.
Baron, a moment.
Baron, there are things going on in this house that I don't like.
What do you mean?
This weed. The way the professor's acting.
I don't like it.
And I'm bewildered.
I no longer know what to think.
Irena: I'm afraid, fedor...
Afraid to close my eyes.
Fedor: There's nothing to be afraid of.
We'll be here with you watching over you.
No, no, no.
We must go.
We can't remain here.
She must have quiet.
She must have sleep.
Her exhausted body demands it.
Miss borotyn, the maid will be here with you.
But I dread every moment between now and morning.
Dismiss all fear from your mind.
The room is quite safe now.
[Bats squeaking]
[Somber organ music playing]
The organ.
That music. He was always at the organ.
Sounds like it comes from the dead.
This window.
It's sir karell.
Are you sure?
Are you sure it's sir karell?
Yes.
Midnight will soon be spent and nothing accomplished.
Are we going to sit here and think, or are we going to do something?
Incredible.
Incredible.
Inspector: Oh!
If sir karell--
I still maintain miss borotyn's the only one who can influence her father.
Are you mad?
Good heavens, no!
Can't you understand?
She mustn't even know her father's there.
Of course not!
Vampires or no vampires,
I'm going to-- what are you going to do?
Call headquarters for help.
Yes. Surround the place.
Set fire to it.
Fire.
An army of police, a hurricane of bullets would do no good.
You seem to forget that during the hours of darkness, the vampire can't even be harmed, let alone destroyed.
If they can't be destroyed, then we're wasting time.
I didn't say they couldn't be destroyed.
They can.
By day, the vampires must return to the ground in which they were buried-- or else find shelter in some accursed retreat.
It is then they are powerless.
Otto: Then we must leave at daybreak.
It's our chance to get away from here.
What? And leave these monsters here to continue their work of destruction?
It would be cowardice.
Inspector:
What else is there to do?
Search for them.
Find their corpselike bodies.
It is in that state, and that state only, they can be destroyed.
Their heads must be severed with one clean stroke and a sprig of bat Thorn placed within the gaping wound.
Otto: We would be crazy to attempt what you're planning.
I'll never do it.
Never.
In the morning, we're leaving.
I agree with you.
Yes? Yes.
In 3 hours, it will be daylight.
Oh, thank heaven the house is well-protected for the night.
Come, gentlemen, let's go to bed and get some rest.
[Door closes]
I had gone to bed as you said.
I laid here for hours trying to go to sleep, but I was restless.
I couldn't.
Then I heard Maria leave the room.
Why did you leave the room?
You had your orders.
To get some coffee to keep me awake.
Ah, you fool.
But after Maria left the room, then what happened?
I heard a sound, like wind at the casement.
I felt a draft.
Then I saw her, just as she was on the terrace.
I fought to keep my eyes open, but they closed.
I felt again that deadly cold breath.
The horror of it...
Made me feel faint.
There, there, my child.
That young man-- go to him. Hurry.
That cross
I told you to wear.
Maid, get it immediately.
Put it about her neck.
Wake up!
Come on!
What? What's the matter?
What's wrong?
Fedor, are you all right?
Something's wrong. Irena!
What's happened to her?
Mr. Vincenty, quiet, please.
Fedor, irena, she's been-- zelen: Shh!
Miss borotyn is asleep.
Quick, inspector, close that door, please.
Fedor: W-why are you here?
We've been watching through the night, but now the dawn is here.
We wanted to be sure that you were safe before we retired.
I--i feel drowsy.
I must have fallen sound asleep.
Sound? You were in a stupor.
We had to shake you.
Stupor?
Tell me.
Uh, this deep sleep, did it refresh you?
Why, yes.
Why do you ask?
What are you doing?
I just wanted to look at the wounds on your neck.
That deep sleep was unnatural.
Fortunately, he wasn't harmed.
When the maid screamed out to us, it must have frightened the monster away.
Gentlemen, we must face the truth, the horrible truth.
Miss borotyn is in their power.
To save her, we must break the spell.
If we don't succeed in destroying those monsters by sundown, we may be too late.
Quick, get into your clothes.
Come, baron!
Otto: Professor?
Inspector:
Professor zelen.
Uh, in here, inspector!
Have you searched thoroughly above?
Yes.
Not so much as a Mark on the dust-covered floor.
It's the same over there at the organ, where you saw sir karell playing.
The dust lies thick and undisturbed.
That's what makes it so difficult to find the vampire's hiding place.
Well, don't let's stand here talking.
Let's go on looking for them.
You're quite right, inspector.
Have you some matches?
Here.
Oh, look.
No, no, no, no, no!
Up there on the rod.
[Squeaking]
Stop, you fool!
Would you destroy what might give us a clue?
Inspector: Smash it!
Take no chances.
No, that would do no good.
It's only in its own corpselike state that it can be destroyed.
Now...
We must search the vaults beneath the old ruins.
Come. We have not much time left before sunset.
You have the matches, inspector?
Yes, professor.
[Animal squeaking]
[Squeaking]
[Door closing]
[Squeaking]
Professor zelen, are you all right?
Otto: Professor!
Professor zelen!
Here. Please, hurry!
Quick, inspector.
Get the candle.
We must find the others.
No, no. Don't leave!
Destroy him first!
Inspector: Drop it!
Zelen: Have you gone mad?
One more stupid act, and we'll be lost!
Otto: Please! Please don't leave him like this.
And expose ourselves to the vengeance of the others?
Why, their fury would follow us to the ends of the earth.
No. We must destroy them all together.
Come.
Inspector, put a Mark on that door so we'll know his hiding place.
Ah!
Oh, quick. Matches.
Inspector:
Right here.
Zelen: Ugh!
We'll be trapped in here. Hurry!
The sun is going down.
I'm staying here until you come with me.
I won't leave you.
Fedor, you must go.
If you love me, please do as I ask.
Inspector!
Inspector!
Ah! The fool!
Oh, fedor, we're being silly.
Don't let's argue, darling.
We'll just forget all about it.
Now, you run along downstairs.
I want to get out of this negligee.
I haven't had a dress on for ages.
Irena, i--i don't understand you.
Silly boy.
What's wrong?
Last night you were terrified, and tonight you're...You're gay and cheerful.
Are you sorry because I'm happy?
[Knock on door]
Yes? Come in.
Maid: Those doors! Those doors!
They shouldn't be open.
They should be closed.
The bat Thorn!
Oh, miss, you know the professor said that you-- go away, Maria.
Leave us alone.
Fedor:
It's all right,
Maria. You can go.
I'm with her.
Maria: But, mister-- fedor:
Run along.
What's the matter with everyone, worrying about a silly weed?
Irena, I've got to know why you're acting like this.
What are you hiding from me?
Don't ask me, please.
But I have a right to know.
There's something wrong with you.
You're not yourself.
Irena...
Look at me.
Irena, I...I feel that I'm losing you.
Fedor, forgive me.
Forgive me for what I'm doing.
Darling, tell me.
Tell me.
Fedor, I...
No, no. No! No!
Irena!
Irena!
Irena!
Inspector neumann!
Zelen:
Inspector neumann!
Be brave, my child.
I'll try.
Man: Then go with Luna.
[Somber organ music playing]
Otto: No, no!
Don't go up.
But don't you see, if sir karell was, in life, the kindly, benevolent person you describe-- your lifelong and devoted friend-- you could go to him.
You could appeal to him.
No, no. I can't!
[Glass shatters]
[Hiss]
Irena: Go away, fedor!
Go away! Go away!
Fedor: Irena!
Irena!
Ahh!
Everything is getting cloudy.
Getting cloudy.
You understand?
Getting cloudy.
You're going upstairs.
You understand?
You're going upstairs.
No, no!
I can't do it.
But, miss borotyn.
I can't go on!
But you must.
You wouldn't fail us now.
Inspector:
Miss borotyn!
Inspector.
Inspector neumann.
I can't go through with it.
He looks so much like father-- even his voice.
I've been willing to do all the other things you've asked of me, but this...This is more than I can endure.
But don't you see this is our last chance?
Everything else has failed.
But you both said baron Otto would break down and confess if we confronted him with this gentleman pretending to be my father.
I know.
We all thought our vampire scheme was so simple, so certain of success.
We never thought we'd fail.
I'm sorry.
But, miss borotyn.
After the attack on Mr. Vincenty, it was you who first suspected the baron of the crime.
We're positive you are right, but we lack definite proof.
If you fail us now, we will never know.
But to live through those moments again, to act as if you were my father alive and with me.
Don't you see the horror of it?
It's one year ago.
One year ago.
You understand?
One year ago.
You're going to see sir karell.
You understand?
You're going to see sir karell.
[Door opens]
Miss borotyn, get ready.
Baron Otto will be here any moment.
I'm afraid you can't count on me.
Oh, no, no, no, my dear child.
You must be courageous.
I admit what we're trying to do is only an experiment, but I feel certain now that we have the baron hypnotized, he will reenact his crime if he's guilty.
Jan: Baron Otto's at the door, sir.
Zelen: Oh, please.
Without you we're helpless.
I'll do my best.
Inspector.
Jan, I want you to do exactly as you did the night of the murder.
You understand?
Omit nothing.
Let him in.
[Organ playing]
Good evening, jan.
Good evening, baron.
How is your rheumatism?
It's gone, sir, thanks to the fine weather we're having.
Otto: That's good.
Now we'll soon know if my theory is correct.
I hope you're right.
I'm anxious to know how he drained that body of its blood.
Irena,
I've never seen you more lovely.
Irena: Thank you, dear baron.
No, karell,
I'm only staying a moment.
It will do me good to stop for a smoke.
Speaking of smoke, that reminds me.
Those pipes I ordered from London have come.
Yes, they came this afternoon, and they are beautiful.
Now...
Any 3 of them are yours.
3? I'll be satisfied with 1.
That's like the one you gave me
2 years ago.
Now, father, don't work too late, and don't forget your medicine.
I won't.
She knows you, karell.
I know you both.
Good night, father.
Good night.
Good night, baron.
Put it here on the desk, jan.
Jan, 3 drops of this in a glass of water.
Now, what about the third one?
There, there, there.
Now...
Karell, I was surprised when irena told me this afternoon.
I thought you weren't going to consent to a marriage to that boy.
Now, if I weren't here, you'd be her guardian.
What would you have done?
I would have said no.
I never would have given my consent.
I've always hoped that we had other plans.
What do you mean,
"other plans"?
Well...
That she would marry someone more worthy of her, someone nearer her station in life who could give her what she's accustomed to.
Why, you know she'll always have more than enough.
Haven't I arranged for that?
How soon is the wedding?
Within a fortnight.
A fortnight?
Karell, will you let me have irena's
Ruby necklace?
There may be time to have bracelet and earrings made to match.
And you would have said no?
Why, you...
You've spoiled her since the day she was born.
Jan, help me here.
Now, where did I put that...
Ah!
There it is, my good friend.
Thanks, karell.
I've been keeping you from your work long enough.
No. I'm glad you came over.
Good night.
Good night.
Good night, jan.
Good night, sir.
Quick, get through one of those rooms and watch the window on the terrace.
Well?
He thinks he's drugged your wine.
I know. I saw him.
Jan, come here.
Tell me, did sir karell drink the wine before he dismissed you?
Uh...no.
No, sir.
You're positive?
Quite.
Drink it, collapse, and then we'll see what happens.
All right.
Put these pipes in my room, jan.
I don't think I'll be wanting anything more tonight.
Very good, sir.
Good night, sir.
Good night.
Inspector: Cut!
Don't move, baron!
Zelen:
Look at me. Look me in the eye, baron.
That's it.
Everything is getting cloudy.
Cloudy.
You understand?
You are returning...
Returning to the present.
You understand?
You are returning...
To the present.
Zelen: Baron Otto, you're under arrest for the murder of sir karell borotyn.
You were very clever in concealing the motive of your crime.
We never dreamt it was miss borotyn you were after.
Franz, take him out to the car.
I don't get the idea of his heating the glass.
Why, to cup him with.
To cup him of his blood.
That hot glass over the wound creates a powerful suction.
Hmm.
Forgive me, fedor, but they wouldn't let me tell you.
They were afraid that you wouldn't let me go through with it.
This vampire business, it has given me a great idea for a new act.
Luna, in the new act,
I will be the vampire.
Did you watch me?
I gave all of me.
I was greater than any real vampire.
Luna: Sure, sure.
But get off your makeup.
Yes, and help me with some of this packing.
Music
<b>THE PHANTOM LIGHT
Yeah, yeah.
Here, missus, where do I get a car to the village?
[speaking Welsh]
What?
[speaking Welsh]
Alright. Alright. Alright.
[speaking Welsh]
Same to you.
Huh, nice place, Wales.
God, blimey.
Whose there?
Hello... -Beg pardon?
I'm sorry, miss. Nice evening.
What's nice about it?
I've been here for hours.
Oh, you don't happen to know where
I could find a car, I suppose.
That's just what I'm waiting for. -Well, isn't anybody about?
Only the old station woman, and she only talks Welsh.
Funny sort of place.
Oh, here's a porter.
Oi, taffy, come here.
Do you speak English? Well,
I want a car, see. -A car.
A car to take me to the village. -Both of us.
Car. -Alright, alright,
I heard you, cook.
God bless me soul. Another white man. How did you get here?
Transferred from Clapham Junction.
-Huh.
Now listen, I've got a job of work to do, see.
I'm reporting for duty tonight.
I'm taking over at the North
Stake Lighthouse. -Oh, are you?
Yeah, any complaints? -Plenty.
-Well, go on then, spit it out.
Well, down here they say the lighthouse is haunted, and what's more, blokes go mad and kill their selves.
Oh, do they? -Have they? -Yes, miss. The last bloke done himself in or somebody done him in.
People say it's ghosts.
-Who told you that?
Well, the whole blinkin' village.
-Ah, don't you listen to him, miss.
He's been so long from a fried fish shop he's gone batty.
Oh, be quiet, this is interesting.
Well, I'm sorry interrupt, miss, but you see I'm late as it is.
Now then, old sport, what about that car?
Right-o, cook. I'll go and have a look down the road.
Uncle Percy of the Children's Heart.
You know, I think you're wonderful, mister...
Higgins. -Higgins.
The way you don't seem to mind about ghosts and murders and things.
Oh, a lot of nonsense. -Well, it didn't seem like nonsense to me.
Oh, didn't it? -No.
You know, you surprise me, Mr.
Huggins. -Higgins. -Higgins.
I always thought lighthouse keepers were grim and grisly with yellow teeth and scars.
You know, sort of human gorillas.
I never realized they were good looking like you.
Well, there are two in the service handsomer than me.
Now then, miss, what's your little game?
Take me with you to the lighthouse. -What?
Well, don't look at me like that.
-Oh, so that's your game, is it?
Well, you can put that idea out of your head.
There's nothing of that sort of thing goes on in lighthouses.
What sort of thing? -Well, that sort of thing. -How dare you!
Well, ain't that what you meant?
-Of course not. -What did you mean?
Mr. Higgins, I'm going to tell you the truth.
I live nearby in a small village.
Life in a small village is very dull, Mr. Higgins.
Not with you there, I'll lay a pound to the sausage.
Of course, I do all I can.
I belong to a psychic society.
Wales is full of folklore, you know. -Is it? -Didn't you know? -No.
Now, I've heard this legend about the phantom light, and I mean to investigate it for my society.
Well, I'm very sorry, miss, but you can't do it on my lighthouse.
You see, I've got me instructions, and though they mention there's a lot of funny things they don't mention no women.
We've got work to do on the lighthouse, and females is tattoo.
Now how good looking am I?
This is the station's car.
It looks it.
Oh, it lools to beatup to put anybody in.
I suppose there's somewhere
I can sleep tonight.
I expect they'll put you up at the pub, miss.
This is the pub, miss. -Well, thank God we've got here.
Where are you off to, mate?
-Harbormasters. Do you mind?
Well, you better walk the rest. It's safer.
I believe you. How do I get there?
Down the street, follow the stream, then take the steps 'round the cliff.
-Right-o. -You'll see it by the harbor.
Here you are, mate. Here's my share of the damage.
Goodnight, miss. -Goodnight. -So long, cook. See you at the funeral.
So long, misery. I'll be in the front carriage.
Not there, miss. That's the bar.
You're the Bottle and Jug.
Well? -Is this the Bottle and Jug?
YES. -I want a bed.
[Crosstalk]
Nice evening. -Maybe.
[Singing in Welsh]
I tell you that nobody may visit the lighthouse without the permission of
Trinity House. Nobody at all.
It is the regulations. Nobody.
Not at all. -But if I was to go -
When I tell you it is the regulations,
I tell you it is the regulations.
Don't you understand me when I speak English?
Name of Higgins, chief lightkeeper.
Reporting for duty at the
North Stake Lighthouse.
Good evening, lightkeeper.
We have been expecting you.
Now that's off my chest.
Oh, thanks very much.
So he did, did he? -Yes, 50 times did I tell him he could not go, but he would stand there and argue. -Funny, ain't it?
You know, there's lots of folks like him.
They think there's something romantic about lighthouses.
Romantic. A couple of months out there in winter weather, that would learn him.
Pork and beans, pork and beans.
And you're lucky if you find the pork.
By the way, where is this here lighthouse?
Marked in the chart. -Over there?
I see. Half a mile from the shore around the inland.
So if I got a bit of skirt in the village I can't wave to her.
Mr. Owen,
-Yeah.
What about a boat to the lighthouse?
-My brother Griffith will take us over.
The boat is ready. It is the others we are waiting for.
It is time Dr. Carey was here, David.
Late he is and we must go out on the ebb tide. -Aye.
Is it him we're waiting for? -And Sergeant Jones.
They have to make a report on poor Jack
Davis, the lightkeeper who was killed.
Drowned wasn't he? Poor devil.
He just disappeared.
Disappeared like the other lightkeeper before him.
Well, I hope it ain't catching.
What's the doctor coming for?
For poor Tom Evans. It is him we will be bringing off from the light tonight.
What, the other lightkeeper? I wasn't told this. What's his trouble?
His poor brain got twisted by what he saw the night Jack Davis died. -Cuckoo?
Only yesterday we knew it. There were signals from the light.
Very rough it was. Hardly the relief boat get out to the light.
But whose in charge out there now? -Claff Owen. -Owen?
My brother. -Let's get this straight.
There's you two Owens here right now, then there's Claff Owen at the lighthouse now.
Then there's the Owen who drove me down in the car. That makes four.
Anymore Owens?
Well, there is John Owen in the coal and William Owen, the gas.
They are the cousins of
Owen and Owen at the post.
And there is Iva Owen at the farm and Trevor Owen.
Owen, Owen, Owen, ain't anybody paying?
That's not bad.
There will be a sea getting up before long, Griffith. -Yeah.
Wasn't there a big wreck around here last year? -Yes, indeed.
One of the Fern line, it was. My son Emerus was in her, whatever.
It was a lot of men from this country.
It was the North Stake light that drowned them all.
You'd better be careful what you're saying. I mean, this is serious, this is.
You'd better not let Trinity House hear him. How could the light drown him?
But he is right, lightkeeper. It was the light that drowned them all.
Everybody knows it is a haunted light.
And when a ship comes into the channel, suddenly out goes the light and another light comes up onto the cliffs, and the ship goes on to the rocks over there.
A phantom light, I tell you.
Oh. So this is a good place for wrecks, is it?
Well, now, I'm going to tell you something.
It ain't going to spoil my sheet.
I've been in the service now for 25 years come Michaelmas, and I've never had me light go out yet.
Hello, David. -Dr. Carey, this is Mr.
Higgins, the new chief lightkeeper.
Good evening, Mr. Higgins.
-Good evening, sir.
I suppose they've been chilling your blood to begin with, eh?
Well, they've been doing the best, sir.
They tell me the Merry
Fern signaled up channel.
Claff Owen will be pleased. His son's the chief officer on board.
What ships that, sir? -The Merry Fern.
-But I thought she was wrecked last year.
Oh, no, no, that was her sister ship. -Oh.
Yes, it hit the village pretty hard too.
Most of us are small shareholders.
Oh, by the way, David, where is Sergeant Jones?
You will find up to the public house, Dr. Carey, courting Mrs. Owen.
Well, we better go down there and find him.
I don't suppose you'll object,
Higgins? -Lead me to it, sir.
Here. Did you say Mrs. Owen? -The name Owen is not uncommon in Wales.
God blimey, it must be half the blinkin' directory.
How's the sea? -It looks like a bit of a chop come in, sir.
We'd better have a look at the glass.
Yeah, it don't look too good, do it? -No.
By the way, Sam. -Yeah. -You don't believe all those old women stories about Jack Davis' death and the men after him, do you?
Well, I don't know, sir.
It seems a bit odd to me.
Oh, pure coincidence.
Don't let them frighten you.
Well, it's the only bed I've got.
Take it or leave it.
Oh, I'll - I'll take it.
You were quite right about that mattress.
I said it was a flop mattress.
-I thought you said rock.
Your health?
She is staying whatever?
These skinny bits of girls from London do not know when they are well-off indeed.
Aye, it is not everyone who is as good a judge as you, Sergeant.
Perhaps it is because I am used to looking at a really fine woman, Mrs. Owen.
YES.
Hello, chum. -Good evening, Dr.
Carey. -Evening, Evans. Evening, Mort.
Good evening, doctor.
Good evening, sergeant.
Mrs. Owen, I want a couple of good tarts of rum.
It is rum, isn't it, Higgins?
-Thank you, sir. Doubles.
Sergeant, they shall want you directly.
This is the new lightkeeper Mr. Higgins.
Good evening. -So you've come to take poor Jack Davis' place.
Well, his place where he was, not where he is.
Ha-ha. Joke.
-I hope it's the right one.
Well, cheerio. -Cheerio.
Same again? -I should say so. -Single.
You blokes, what about having one with me?
No.
Well, it isn't many fisherman would care to drink with the man that has his fate on him.
Well, perhaps I better pay before I pop off.
We're all ready now, doctor.
-Oh, right David. Sergeant?
Yes, doctor, Whenever you're ready.
We'll need to be getting right away on the tide, doctor.
Even now it will be dark before we get to the North Stake rocks.
You got a special rig for Tom Evans?
That's what I just came up to show you. -Right.
You will follow Higgins. -As soon as
I've got my rations, sir. -Good night.
Slowdown, young man.
You're in a hurry, aren't you?
Sorry.
Whiskey and splash, please.
Planning for a rough night? -Bloody rough.
I want a word with you, lightkeeper. Have one?
Well, I don't mind if I do.
Doubles.
Cheerio. -Here, here.
Going out to the lighthouse now?
-Yeah. -I'd like to come with you. -No.
YES. -No! -Have another.
Well, um... -Doubles.
Now listen, do you think that if I could - now, look here.
You heard what the harbormaster said, didn't you?
That nobody could go out to the lighthouse under no conditions.
No.
No.
You're a reporter, ain't you?
How'd you guess that? -You're so ready free with your office money.
Chin-chin.
Does anybody here got a motorboat
I can hire? -There is Tim Morgan.
Where can I find him? -Well, he lives at the grocers down the street.
Say you'll come from me. He'll want paying in advance, young man.
It's a very old boat he has, and the coast is very dangerous.
I know the coast.
Gin and soda, please.
Not much gin.
And soda? -Not much.
Good evening. -Good evening.
-Nice evening, isn't it?
Yes, very.
I know what that is. That's a map.
I've got one at home.
An awfully nice map.
What did you say?
-I didn't say anything.
It is a nice evening, isn't it? -Yeah.
-Lovely evening to go out in a boat.
Is it? -Oh, I'd love to go out in a boat tonight. -Would you?
Do you know what I'd do if anybody asked me to go out in a boat? -No.
Well, just ask me and you'll see.
Well, of course I would not go out with you now if you begged me to.
Thanks very much. -But you are going to beg me, aren't you? I know you are.
Anything else you know? -Yes. You want to go out to the lighthouse.
Oh, do I? -Yes, and you've hired a motorboat. -Have I?
Yes. I heard you when
I was around there.
I see. -Well, what about it?
-Why do you want to go out there?
Well, I want to go because you're... to be with you... -Goodbye.
No, but... no, no, listen. Wait. Wait.
Listen, I'm going to tell you the truth.
Oh no, you're not.
Use the tressel.
God blimey, King Kong.
Well, Higgins, how do you like your new quarters? -Oh, they're all cozy, sir.
Especially the loony ward.
Oh, thanks.
When was the last attack? -This afternoon, Dr. Carey. About teatime.
Well, he looks as quiet as a lamb now.
Get off of me.
[Fighting]
There, there now.
Larry? -Yes, Dr. Carey? -We must have a word about this.
It's impossible to get him away in this condition. -What sent him that way?
Who knows. Perhaps it was
Jack Davis dying so suddenly.
No, David, he's certainly not fit to be moved.
Well, he's fit enough to all but murder you, sir, and chance it.
It's out of the question,
Higgins.
Any sudden shock might be very dangerous to the poor fellow.
Well, no offense, sir, but
I'm in charge here, you know?
And if me and king - I mean, if me and Claff Owen and the boy have to look after the light and take on his nibs in all his resting as well.
He's not to be moved, Higgins.
-Well, look here, Sergeant -
You heard what the doctor said, lightkeeper. That's enough now.
Dr. Carey surely ought to know what you should be doing.
Uh-huh.
Well, I've made me protest.
That's all I've got to say.
If anything happens it won't be my fault.
Here, how do you know it wasn't him what done to these blokes before me?
Do you know who that poor boy is, Mr. Higgins?
My sister's son. He's a good lad when he is normal.
Ah, when he is normal.
But he ain't normal.
I mean, he has these come-and-go fits.
When they come, somebody goes. -Aren't you talking rather wildly, Higgins?
Well, as I said before, sir, I'm in charge here.
You've said that many times. We know it now. -Well, I am, ain't I?
There's no need to worry, Higgins.
-Oh, I'm not worrying, sir.
But if I'm found tomorrow morning at the bottom of the sea with my throat cut
I'll know who is responsible.
Well, I'll know then that you have done your duty.
Oh, I have no doubt it's very funny because I'm busting my sides.
The tide is on the turn, doctor. We should be going.
Oh, alright,
David, I'm coming.
There's nothing we can do here tonight.
I'll need the three of you to look after him.
I'll come over first thing in the morning. -For the body?
Well, he's not going to die.
-Oh, I didn't mean his body.
What's going to happen the next time he goes off the deep end?
These will keep anybody quiet. If one isn't enough give him a couple.
Don't worry, he's only a bit unhinged. -Yes, I've noticed that.
Goodnight. -Goodnight, sir. -Sleep well.
He seems peaceful enough now.
God blimey! Now, now, now, look here.
I've got two things to put you to bye-n-byes and one of them is this.
Who leaves spinners about?
Yeah. Pressure's alright.
Come on.
This is Bob, isn't it? -Yes, sir.
-You've got a nice face.
How did that happen?
Isn't she a beauty?
Not a half. -It wasn't me who left the spinner.
Oh, forget it, old timer.
We'll be having it up and forth before long.
You'd better taking your observations.
I see the log book as I come up. -Aye-aye, skipper.
But why did this man want to come down here?
Reporter - newspaper reporter.
Can you beat it? -Yeah.
There's a lot I don't know, as the farmer's daughter said to the squire, but there's one thing I do know, and that's how to cook a sausage.
Look at them. None of your smooth bananas here, my boy.
Every one with a split stomach.
You can have that one.
It's a beauty. The king his self would be proud to eat that sausage, though I said that it shouldn't.
YES.
Well, to resume.
Bread please.
Thanks. Pepper.
About this reporter bloke, he takes a bundle of notes out of his pocket, see, and he says, “Mate, one night on the lighthouse and you can have the lot." Tried to bribe me.
Me, with 25 years service come Michaelmas.
Then he takes out a lot more, bundles and bundles of notes, all spread out before me.
Pound notes or ten shillings?
-Pound or ten, what's it matter?
What about the honor of the service?
Then at the station there was a girl. What a peach.
You know, lovely beauty parlor lips, film star eyes.
"Take me with you", she says. Just like that.
What did you do?
Do? I give her a look like the one you got now. That settled to her.
Claff? Claff?
Yeah. -Are you aware that I've been talking?
I've been listening. Do you hear anything? -No.
What is it? -Footsteps.
Soft footsteps like Bob and me heard last night. -You've got the rhets.
Sometimes I think of the ships passing to and fro in the storm, and I listen to the gulls beating against the glass and breaking their little wings.
It's then I realize the lives that are in my hands.
Suppose I let that light go out?
I'd have all those drowned souls on my conscience, beating their wings against my window like the birds.
The phantom light. That's what you and me's go to think about.
The phantom light.
-Some of you blokes... well, sure, you'll make me believe it myself before long.
Of course, you know what your trouble is, don't you?
Listen.
Did you hear anything?
I could have sworn.
Last night when Bob and me heard the steps,
I ran downstairs and shouted, but the only answer I got was a scream from poor Tom Evans.
In his bunk he was lying with his face hidden in the pillow and babbling about
Jack Davis and the light and God knows what besides.
All over the floor was the marks of wet feet leading from the bedroom down the stairs.
So down I go to the bottom, and the outer doors are opened
Open. And the wind is whistling in, and the spray from the waves wets my face.
The feet led to those open doors.
It was the spirit of Jack
Davis up from the sea, mangled maybe by the rocks below.
YES.
Poor Jack Davis, back from the dead with the water streaming from his hair.
Oh, God, the phantom light. The phantom light. I don't know...
Now's the time for his sleeping drought.
-No, wait 'til he gets real violent.
Oh, he ain't been real violent yet?
Well, I'm going to get a bit of a rope, see, and tie him down.
There's no need. I know Tom.
My sister's boy, poor fellow.
Well, personally, not being one of the Owen's,
I'd feel safer if your sister's little boy was tied down, see.
Ahoy.
Lighthouse ahoy.
Ahoy below. -Hello...
Mr. Higgins, there's a motorboat off the lighthouse.
Right-o. Standby the searchlight.
AYE-Bye, sir.
Ahoy below. Who are you?
Motorboat drifting, running out of petrol.
Throw us a line. -You can't land here. How much juice you got?
Almost gone. I've got to land. -Alright.
Claff!
Tom - Tom Higgins, ahoy, Sir.
Hello. -Come back. It is against the regulations.
No one must land here.
Come back.
Come on, give us a hand.
Come on!
Come on, hurry up.
Here, catch hold of this.
Good God, sir, it's a weight.
And this.
How many more? -Look out, I'm going to abandon her. -Alright.
Oh no, you don't. -Eh?
Hello... -What the hell are you doing here?
You swear at me later. I don't want to drown now, even if you do.
Here, grab hold of this.
No, don't do that.
Here, give it to me.
Now, when I say jump, jump-
I don't think I can. -You've got to. Now then, jump.
Here now. Catch hold of this.
Go on, quickly. There you are.
Give her a hand.
There you are.
Oh, it's cold.
I couldn't help it.
-Here hand on to this.
Oh, wait 'til I get across.
Don't.
How do you expect us to get up here out of a little boat up to this great, big high place?
What are following me about for, anyway?
Well, I wouldn't have followed you if you had you spoken to me nicely, but the way you shouted at me, what do you expect?
Oh, come on, for God's sake.
Jabber, jabber, jabber.
I've never heard anything like it.
In there, you. You'd better change quick before you make any more puddles.
Yeah, I bet you can do it.
Me best trousers.
Oh well, it can't be helped. Now look here, that's my Sunday clobber.
Now you got easy on em', see?
Well, what are you doing? You'll crease them.
What's in there? -Nothing. You caring about my clothes just as if you... now come on, off with those things of your'n.
It's went enough outside as it is.
Come in.
Here. Help, miss.
Help. They've tied me.
What's up? -There's a man over there. -Oh, him.
Oh, don't mind him, miss.
That's the one, old man.
Now you go to bye-bye, see.
You see, miss, he's batty. He's always seeing things. Anyway, he's tied down.
But I can't undress with a man in the room.
God bless you, there's no worrying about his feelings.
What if he do happen to see you with nothing on?
He'll think he's seeing the fairies.
Well, what was she yelping about? -Oh, nothing.
She just met one of our prize exhibits.
Well, now, perhaps you ought to tell me why you joined up with that bit of trouble.
I didn't. She's a stowaway.
-Stowaway, me foot.
A ruddy girl in a respectable lighthouse.
You wait 'til old Claff has a talk with you. -Who is he, chief lightkeeper?
What him?
Don't make me laugh.
I'm chief here.
Ever heard of King Kong?
You are always saying you are chief here, Sam Higgins.
No one is disputing it.
It is your responsibility this man and woman are on the lighthouse against all regulations. -Well, we couldn't leave them to drown, could we?
This is the reporter bloke I was telling you about. -Mr. Higgins?
Oh, brace them up.
Don't let them drag like that.
I've braced them up and braced them up so much that my feet hardly touch the ground.
Well, go on and roll them up then. Tuck a leaf in them. Here.
God blimey. Tuck your shirt in, can't you? Put it in these here tapes.
Oh, do what you like with them. I ain't your nanny.
Females.
So we've got you on our hands tonight, I suppose. -Uh-huh.
And you didn't know she was with you? -Nope.
Must have followed me and hid under the tarpolean.
Can't these journalists tell them?
You tried to bribe me, didn't you, so that you could give your paper an eyewitness account of life at a lighthouse.
Or had you another idea in coming here? -Aye, speak the truth, man.
Or maybe you'll leave this lighthouse the way others have left it before.
Oh, steady on. It ain't a capital offense, you know.
Mr. Higgins?
-What the... do you mean to say you went and cut my...
Well, you told me I could do what I liked with them, and I think I made a very good job of it.
My Sunday trousers.
You ought to be ashamed of yourself.
Go on, now. Sit on there.
Now, we'll do avail of me Sunday trousers.
What's your little game?
Mr. Higgins, you know I wouldn't have done it -
Oh, for goodness sake, don't turn on the tap.
Here.
Mr. Higgins, I'm going to tell you the truth.
I'm an actress, hiding from the police.
What, you act as bad as all that?
There was a man. He fell in love with me, terribly in love with me, and then there came another man, and he fell in love with me.
And they fought. -What for? -Me. Poor little me.
They fought as cavemen fight for their mates. Oh, it wasn't horrible. I fainted.
And then one reached for a knife and I fainted again.
And then the other reached for a knife, and I ran and ran and ran.
And the next thing I remember I was in a train, and I fainted again.
When I came to there was a man sitting opposite me.
I smiled at him. -And he fainted?
No. I said, "Where am I?"
He said, "Telebuch."
You do believe me, don't you, Mr.
Higgins? -So the police are after you.
They ain't in love with you too, are they? -Oh, please don't make fun of me.
You've got such a kind face. -Hmm, what was the show you was in, Eastland?
Cheerful, ain't it?
So now you know. Of course, personally speaking I don't believe it.
But old Claff - well, here he is.
He'll tell you.
So you believe in the phantom light, Mr. Owen?
Yes, sir, I reckon I do believe in the phantom light.
So will you if the Lord ordains you see the sunrise tomorrow.
The prime minister of mirth.
This thing you heard, opening and shutting doors, do you really believe it was a ghost?
Pretty strong, your ghost.
What was that? -Oh, nothing.
Ain't you had enough excitement already?
Me, excitement? Oh, yes.
Of course, you know you'll be having ghosts after you as well as police if you're not careful.
Are you sure there was no one about when you heard those steps?
No, there was not until Tom Evans let out a terrible, great scream.
It's Davis!
Fetch it quickly. Quickly.
That was a near shave. -Yeah.
I wonder - he's tied up alright.
I'm almost beginning to believe -
Sam. Sam!
What the - what the blinkin' -
They are open, like they were last night, wide open.
Have you searched the place?
Nothing here?
Listen, I've been waiting for a chance to see you alone. -Have you?
You're a frightful liar. -Am
I? -And a fearful nuisance.
Am I really? -Uh-huh. -Then you don't care for me a little bit? -No.
You know, nobody ever hated me before like you.
Really? Isn't that grand? But all the same, I want you to help me.
Opens the door with invisible hands and vanishes.
Don't be silly. How could you vanish if you're invisible?
If you're invisible you're vanished before you started. Ridiculous.
I'm going up to talk to Bob.
Lord protect us.
Lord protect us.
So he tied you up, my own flesh and blood tied up so that you can't move hand nor foot.
Well, we'll soon see about that, Tom, my boy.
We'll soon see about that.
Well, I think it's the most thrilling thing I've ever heard. -Good.
Now, the first thing you've got to do is to keep Sam Higgins out of the way.
Well, I can easily do that. -I'll tell you what, get him to show you the light, him and the other fellow.
-Do you want me to them there?
Yes, as long as you can. Let them go on thinking I'm a reporter.
I'm going down to the storeroom to fix my box of tricks.
It's all wired. It's only got to be connected up.
Bolshies.
Claff!
I thought you was going up? -Claff, they ain't what they said they was.
I just overhead them talking.
You know what they're going to do?
They're going to blow up the lighthouse.
What? -Communists, that's what they are. A couple of ruddy Bolshies.
Now, listen, we've got to act quick and don't interrupt.
I did not interrupt. -No, but you was going to. -I was not.
What if you know. Shut up.
Now listen, you go and take the young lady upstairs and show her the light.
That I won't.
It's against the regulations.
You'll do what you're told.
Who is boss here, you or me? Me.
Then it's unanimous. Now come on.
Come along. Show her the light.
Suppose she doesn't want to see the light.
Hello, Mr. Higgins. -Ah, nasty night, don't you think? -YES.
Still, I suppose you'd rather be in here since the cops are after you.
You won't give me away, will you? -Oh no.
But wouldn't you be better off if you went to some foreign clime?
Foreign slime?
-Yeah.
I knew a bloke who was in trouble just like you. -Oh?
But you know what he done? He grew along beard and went to Russia.
Ever been to Russia?
-Nope, nor grown a beard.
Mr. Higgins, what's up there?
Oh, that's where we keep the light.
Would you like to see it? -Just what I was going to ask you.
Claff, take this young lady up and see the light.
Now, go on and do what I tell you.
Take this young lady up and see the light.
But Mr. Higgins, you're coming too. -No, thanks very much.
I think I'll turn in if you don't mind.
Please.
Wait for me, Mr. Claff. Is it much higher? -We're there now, miss.
Oh, if I had known there were so many steps I might have changed my mind.
Lighthouses aren't built for fun, miss.
What an interesting room. Oh, good evening. -Evening, miss.
Can't I stay here a little while?
-Well, no need to hurry, miss.
What do you do up here? -This is the service room. See this?
That's hollow. It goes right down to the bottom where there's a cupboard holding the weights that works the clockwork.
Why's that so thick all the way down and so narrow in the living room?
There's only a cable passing through it in the living room.
This way, miss. -What's this? -Oh, this is a clinomter, miss. -This way, miss.
Oh.
Oh, hello.
Hello? God bless me soul.
I must have dropped off.
That's funny. -Do you usually go to sleep with your boots on?
Oh, I couldn't sleep a wink without them, chum.
Just habit, you know. -Hmm, not even trouble to slip off your clothes either.
Well, it ain't necessary. You see,
I could sleep anywhere, any hour.
It's in the family.
Same with my father.
He used to go to bed with his hat on. Just his hat and his socks.
You wouldn't believe it, would you? -No.
-That's a fact. Same with my grandfather.
Even on his wedding day they had to wake him up to say I will.
Hello... Oh, by the way, I wanted to ask you something.
Yes?
Have you ever been to Russia? -No.
-Why ask? -I don't know. Just an idea.
Been to Switzerland, if that's any good. -No. -Oh. -Just a moment.
You know, I've took rather a fancy of you.
Now, what was your idea in pretending to be a reporter, eh?
Well, aren't I? -You know ruddy well you ain't. Come on now, what's your game?
Game? -Yeah. -Game.
-Come on, now.
Can't I sail a boat if I want to? -Nice night for it.
I like sailing at night. -Oh, you do? -I like everything at night.
I was born at night. -And the girl? -Never set eyes on her before.
I don't know who she is.
I don't know where she's from.
I don't know how she got into my boat. I don't know a single damn thing about her.
Oh, blimey, you talk as if you was married to her.
Bob.
Hello... -Getting a bit thick out there, isn't it?
Yes, Claff. -Better get the fog signal going.
Aye-aye.
Hello? -Oh, it's you. See
Higgins on the way down? -No.
Well, if you do, keep an eye on him.
He suspects us.
Here, hang on to this.
Oh, Lord, hang on to it. And nip up to the loony hatch. -Where?
The bedroom, play it out of the window.
Leave 6 foot in the room and then shut the window down tight.
It's the aerial.
Everything hangs on it.
And don't fall out. -I won't.
But I promise if I do I won't hang on the aerial.
Hang on to this a minute. Have any trouble?
No.
Did you see anyone? -No. I can't think where they've all got to.
Oh, it doesn't matter. I'll have this ready in a minute.
Oh, no you won't.
Hey, put that down.
This ain't Chicago, you know.
Claff? -And if you shut up a minute I'll tell you something.
Lord, blimey, I've done so much ruddy listening tonight I've got corns on me ears.
Well, come on now, make it short. -Right.
I'm a naval officer. My brother is skipper of the Merry Fern.
Ever heard of that ship?
-She's due in tonight.
Now, all this funny business here, these Wreckers. -Go on.
They're after the
Merry Fern tonight.
They expected her the night Jack Davis disappeared but she was held up at Havre.
I don't like your mate's stories. -Claff?
Oh, Claff's alright. He ain't a ray of sunshine, but he's alright.
Are you sure of that? -What's it got to do with you anyway?
Just you keep on dodging the cops and minding your own business.
I mean, ain't you done enough harm cutting up my best pair of trousers?
Just you mind your own business, see?
But it is my own business, see.
Mr. Higgins, I'm going to tell you the truth. -What, again?
I'm a detective from Scotland Yard.
I was told to join up with Lieutenant Pearce.
And you ain't an actress no more? -Oh, actress?
Oh, of course I couldn't trust you before, but I do now.
Blimey, you a detective.
What is the force coming to?
No wonder the cops wear top hats to set their blinkin' handkerchiefs.
Here, what was you saying just now about wreckers?
Do you mean to tell me they want to sink the Merry Fern? -Mm-hmm.
What for? -Ever heard of insurance? -Yeah.
Well, the Merry Fern's heavily insured, just like the ship that sank last year.
And most of the shares are held by local people.
God love a duck. -You see? Now perhaps you won't be so stupid.
Oh, stupid am I?
Well, I'm not so stupid to believe that you're a real tick anyway.
If you are, produce your papers or your badge or whatever it is.
My, my, my... -Alright, lightkeeper
I'll answer for this lady. She's alright.
Well, if it comes to that, what about you, sir?
How do I know you're a real naval officer?
Alright, sir. Sorry.
Well, let's get busy.
Yes, but what at? -I'm going to talk to the Merry Fern. -Huh?
Oh, I see.
You're going to warn them.
Mm-hmm.
-Good for you, sir.
I can't place the
North Stake lighthouse.
The sound seemed to come from over there.
It's getting thicker, Mr. Owen.
We ought to be beside them by now.
Call Captain Pearce. -Yes, sir.
Both on duty?
Yes, sir. I didn't think it was worthwhile when we were docking in a couple of hours.
Just as well, Mr. Mason.
Cigarette? -Yes, sir.
We haven't sighted the
North Stake light yet.
I want you both to keep a sharp lookout. I'm beginning to wonder.
Excuse me, sir. There's something coming through.
It's a call for us, alright, sir. perhaps it's the station.
Take their message. It may be important. -Yes.
Well? -Mr. Owen's compliments, sir.
Would you please come up on deck?
Mason, bring that message to me on deck.
-Yes, sir.
Young Bob will be done in a moment.
What are you going to do about him? -That's your lookout.
You keep an eye on him. -Very good, sir.
Got them. -Great.
-Yeah, come again.
That's the captain's brother, isn't it?
Put an extra lookout forward, another in the crow's nest.
Very good, sir. Below there. -Aye-aye, sir.
Got an extra man in the crow's nest and an extra man forward.
Get on to it. -Funny. I wonder why Bob hasn't come down.
Bob? Are you there, Bob?
Bob?
Hey, Bob?
Claff?
Another light on the cliffs.
What? Just a minute.
Look.
Oh my God. -It's the phantom light, the one they all talk about.
Then it's true, it's really true.
Don't be a fool.
That's not the phantom light.
That's the wrecker's light, and we've got to put it out.
Get Sam Higgins, quick.
Gone.
-Damn.
Sam, the phantom light's on the cliffs. -What?
Come on.
He's coming.
Oh, are you alright?
Get this, quick.
-What?
Blimey, it's locked.
It's from my brother. Is this all?
-Yes, sir. I couldn't get him back.
God! It's us. Our light's out.
Bob? Bob?
Can you hear me?
Silly roust.
Good luck, sir. -Thanks.
Take the strand. -Right away, sir. -All set? -Yes, sir.
Good luck.
Got it? -Yeah.
Now steady, sir. Slowly.
-Right. Alright let her go.
Yeah.
Here. Don't worry about him, miss. He won't be found ground.
Come on, let's have another go. Come on.
Quick, shove your shoulder a bit.
Lighthouse. Starboard bow, sir.
That's better.
Mr. Owen, ring below.
Tell MrCarthy we've sighted the north stack then head her up.
Very good, sir.
What is it? What is it? -The light.
North Stake light is out.
The North Stake light, out?
Tell the coast guard.
The phantom.
Ahoy.
Ahoy.
You are sure it was on the cliffs that you saw the phantom light, the cliffs up there? -Yes, hurry.
On to the lifeboat.
That is on the cliffs nearby where the coast guards are.
Ahoy.
Hurry you there. Yes, it is the phantom light I tell you.
Stay you there a moment, sir.
Nice lightkeeper I am. -You can't help it. -Can't help it?
Best excuse we all make when we fail.
If a man's worth his salt, he oughta help it.
And here's me with 25 years service come Michaelmas.
Sitting here while a gang of Wreckers plays tag in me own lamp room.
What am I doing, I ask you? Twiddling my thumbs.
I wish I could twiddle them for you, Sam.
Give me his gun.
What is it? -Whatever it is.
Claff!
My God.
They've smashed it.
Where are they?
Where's Bob? Go and see if you can find them.
Don't let them see you.
Here, take this gun.
I've got to get the emergency tanks going. I must get the lights going.
Listen, he's not far off now. -I can't see anything.
Neither can they, thanks to this fog. -Carey, I don't like it.
Why not? -These others. -Ah, halfwits.
It's dangerous.
What about my 50 quid?
You'll get it when the Merry
Fern is on those rocks.
Carey, how did he get here?
I'll tell you I'll pay you when the company collects the insurance.
Company be damned, you're the company.
You promised me my money tonight.
Close the door quietly. Don't let them see you. Don't let them hear you.
I've got to fix the lamp.
[Yelling]
Light's gone out. -Pull her stern. Warn the starboard
Those guys have done it.
They've got that light out.
Wait.
Higgins?
-Mr. Higgins, quick.
What's up? -Higgins?
Hello... -Higgins, I want this door opened. -Oh, you do, do you?
I'm not in the habit of being kept waiting.
Well, what are you going to do about it? -I've got the boy here.
Helpless, and very near the edge.
Don't mind me, Mr. Higgins.
Don't you open that door.
I'm a merciful man, Higgins.
My profession makes me so.
But if you don't open this door in five seconds -
Alright, wait a minute.
Quickly. You go and light the lamp. -Me? -Yes.
It lights like an oil burner.
Turn up the jet at the side.
Quickly,
Alright, sir, just come in.
Alright.
It's a bit stiff this here lock.
-Higgins?
Alright, sir, just coming.
Now then, hands up?
Pull her stern; hard at starboard.
Where the devil are we?
Wait a moment, Mr. Owen. We're just off the North Stake Branch.
Bring us around again.
Warn the engine room.
That was a near one.
-You're right, sir, it was.
So you thought you'd got me, didn't you?
Give me that gun. -Let go. Let go, I tell you.
Damn you.
They must be in the lamp room. Come on. -Aye'.
They're up there. -Where's Alice?
Stop him. Stop him.
Carey?
Come out, Carey, it's no use. I know what you've done, but you can't escape.
You'd better give up.
Carey?!
Signal the lighthouse. Say all is well. -Very good, sir.
Hey, you, wipe your nose and get back to duty.
The Captain says it's alright now.
I bet you got the wind not fogs, didn't you?
Blimey, what a night.
The End
Sync and corrections: Lemonzoo www.prijevodi-online.org
[ Mid-tempo orchestral music plays ]
[ Tempo increases ]
Woman:
Just drive down state street.
I'll tell you where later.
Alice, can't you at least tell me where you're going?
It's business, darling.
Don't worry.
I'll either call you or be back by half past 10:00.
Give me miss markham, please...
Alice markham.
No, markham! Markham!
"M" like in...
Like in "Minneapolis."
Well, that's absurd!
She couldn't have checked out!
I was... hello?
Hello?
[ Doorbell buzzes ]
Telegram,
Mr. winthrop.
Oh, thank you.
That was in Chicago over a year ago.
It's driving me crazy, dal.
I can't find a trace of her anywhere,
And I've got to find her.
I won't believe she's dead.
She's probably married and settled down and has eight kids by now.
Oh, I beg your pardon. That was only a year ago, wasn't it?
Oh, be serious, dal.
I'm asking you for help.
Nothing doing.
I've got enough trouble with my own women.
No cocktails, swayne.
No, sir?
No.
Very good, sir.
Don't you understand, dal?
I'm still in love with her.
But, Tim, I'm not a detective, and I don't want to be.
I'm a lawyer and a very good one.
Just because
I happen to have more fun
Solving cases than trying them,
My friends all seem to think that I'm a combination
Of Charlie chan, philo vance, and the sphinx
All rolled in to one.
Yeah, but you help so many people out of scrapes.
That's the least you could do for a friend.
Well, I'll tell you what I'll do.
If, in my communings with the spirits, astral or liquid,
I receive any message or omen,
I'll let you know.
How's that?
Thanks, dal.
What makes you think she's in New York?
Oh, I don't know.
Seems to me that if I wanted to lose myself,
New York would be the easiest place to do it in.
You've been reading too much o. Henry.
Now, I said no cocktails, swayne.
You know we're dining at the coreys'.
Yes, sir, quite.
But if I might suggest...
We're having cocktails, Tim.
Yes, sir.
I-i think it best.
The gin at the coreys' is not, uh, authentic.
Thank you, swayne.
[ Laughs ]
Why the third glass?
Miss mantin phoned, sir,
And said that she'd stop for you on her way to the coreys'.
[ Telephone rings ]
I was afraid of that.
You'll like this kid, Tim.
She's quite a character.
I've known her since she was 10.
She ran away from home when she was 11.
They found her in my apartment.
She announced that she had decided to marry me.
I'll be careful of her.
You could go a lot further and do a lot worse.
It's Mr. tennant, sir, returning your call.
Hello, tennant.
I thought we'd agreed
That my name wasn't to appear in your column anymore.
Your name's news, dalzell.
Well, I never bit a dog in my life,
And I don't want my name in your column again.
Is that understood?
Wait a minute.
Mary, get the mantin story.
Hold the line, will you?
All right.
Hello, swayne.
Hi, dal.
Hiya, mantin.
Donna mantin,
Tim winthrop.
How do you do?
Delighted to meet any friend of dal's.
You must come and see us often when we're married.
Tim, the woman is a shameless hussy
And a fact distorter.
Have a drink.
Thanks.
Yes, I'm still here.
Here's my lead for tomorrow.
"Bad news for New York debutantes.
"Clay dalzell will quit playing the field
To be led to the altar by Donna mantin."
Where'd you get that?
Some dame called up and gave it to me.
Is it true?
Wait a minute.
Did you tell Tommy tennant that we were gonna be married?
Certainly.
Hmm.
Well, you can't get ruled off for trying.
There's not a word of truth in it.
Okay, then I can use this...
"Donna mantin, wealthy young socialite,
"Was seen having tea with Jim kinland,
"Alleged public enemy number 3, yesterday afternoon.
What does this tnt for two mean?"
You can't print that.
[ Chuckles ]
Why not?
Because I'll trade you a better one.
Well, listen to this anyway.
Your hunch about my connection
With the van duzen divorce case is right.
You're a white man, dalzell.
The story's dead.
Anything else on your mind?
Yes.
Cut your throat...
An honorable ending to a risky career.
Swayne, more cocktails.
And make them strong.
Dal, may I have a few words with you... Privately?
If you'll excuse us,
Tim.
The lady has no manners.
Well?
Dal, I need help.
I'm in a jam.
I know... kinland.
How did you know about that?
Tennant.
I just managed to kill the story.
Keep on. You'll get yourself splashed all over the front pages.
I know. I should have thought about that.
Well, how about starting to do a little thinking now?
Well, that's just what I am doing.
You see, there are some letters.
Oh, I get it.
Good old dal...
He can get the letters back
From the nasty gunman... And get killed doing it, probably.
Oh, no, you won't, dal.
You're too smart.
Yes? If I were, I'd boot you out of here right now,
Let you do your own worrying about your letters.
Dal, please.
Mm.
Say, mind you, if I do go into this,
I'm only doing it because of your mother.
She's a nice woman.
Must be terrible for a woman to have a daughter like you.
My mother just adores me.
She'd be more to the point if she spanked you.
I have a mind to do it myself.
Well, this will be new.
Well, you asked for it.
Hey, that hurt!
He really does love me.
He just kicked me.
A sure sign.
Oh, swayne, uh...
Get Mr. kinland on the phone for me, will you?
Mr. Jim kinland, sir?
That's right.
Don't you think dal ought to marry me, Mr. winthrop?
I'd have lots of money.
And I'd have lots of headaches.
Always belittling.
Why don't you tell the man the truth?
When I was 10 and he had a mustache,
He said I was his sweetheart and he'd wait for me to grow up.
And now...
I shaved off the mustache.
Mr. kinland is not at home, sir.
Oh.
Well, you leave word for him to call me
Just as soon as he comes in,
Either at the coreys' or at the prince theater later.
I'll leave my seat number at the box office.
Are we going to the theater?
Yes, ma'am.
Say, Tim, have you seen this Mary Smith?
No, but I want to. Does she wear that mask all the time?
Well, I don't know.
They say she's never seen around the theater without it,
And after the show, she just disappears into the night.
Now, there's something to conjure with.
Now, a woman like that captures the imagination...
Mysterious.
Mysterious, my eye.
Your masked marvel
Probably has a wart on the end of her nose.
Meow.
To the mysterious
Mary Smith.
[ Mid-tempo orchestral music plays ]
Kinland?
My apologies to the hostess.
Oh, dal, don't go. I didn't realize what I was asking.
Stay here.
Give my love to Mary Smith.
Tell her I went to my death with a smile on my face.
I tell you, ohlman,
I can do you a lot of good.
You're in bad company,
Abe.
Hiya, dalzell.
How's business?
Capacity, night after night.
That Smith girl is something every producer dreams about.
Yes.
If it wasn't for these newspaper fellas coming in,
Asking foolish questions all the time, why...
Well, we know something that they don't know, hmm?
Clay!
Well, bless me.
Jerry.
You haven't forgotten me.
What do you mean?
You've heard me speak of Clay dalzell, dear.
Oh, yes.
How do you do?
Oh, how do you do,
Mr. Burton?
Oh, no, my dear. I divorced
Mr. Burton four years ago.
Since then,
I've been Mrs. crandell and...
Oh, I'm so sorry,
Mr. crandell.
No. I'm now Mrs. classon.
This is Mr. classon.
Oh.
Don't be embarrassed,
Mr. dalzell.
I run into that sort of thing all the time.
[ Laughs ]
Well...
[ All laugh ]
That dalzell never turned a hair.
Why should he?
That's Roger classon, the
Chicago lawyer, and his wife.
Well?
She and dalzell were once...
Oh.
We're at king Charles.
Do look us up.
I'll do that.
Good night.
Good night, Jerry.
Good night.
Good night, Mr. crasson...
Uh, clandell. Uh...
[ Big-band music playing ]
All right?
Very good, sir.
I'll tell Mr. kinland you're here.
Thank you.
You dalzell?
Yeah.
I'm Jimmy kinland.
How do you do?
What's on your mind?
Miss mantin asked me to get some letters from you.
Beat it.
When I get the letters.
Beat it, I said, while you're still healthy.
Very well.
Oh, uh, by the way...
[ Chuckles ]
There was something funny that I wanted to ask you about.
In 1929, you made
A total-gross income-tax return of $65,000.
What's that to you?
But you were given one check alone for $120,000.
Actual total-gross income...
How many pennies am I off the exact figure?
[ Music continues ]
[ Volume increases ]
Radio is awfully loud.
I want it that way.
Oh.
Where did you pick up that tax deal?
From the man who paid you the $120,000.
The canceled check is in my safety-deposit vault,
Where the police will find it if anything happens to me.
That check is six years old.
Why'd you hold out till now?
I'm not a federal man.
How much do you want?
The letters.
[ Volume decreases ]
There's lots of things we don't like that we have to take.
The reason I'm alive today
Is because I'm smart enough to know when to take it.
Here you are.
Thank you.
Good night.
Oh, wait a minute.
What about the check?
Oh, I'll keep that, if you don't mind.
You can trust me.
It ain't exactly business, is it?
Strictly business.
That check is the lock
That keeps the mantin matter a closed book.
And we closed it just in time.
I have to stop tennant
From printing a story about you and the lady.
He's too nosy, that guy.
Maybe he ought to be rubbed out.
Isn't that sort of thing, uh, against the law?
Man: Flash from the news-radio bureau.
The prince theater tonight was thrown into confusion
At the end of the first act
When Mary Smith, the star of "midnight,"
Suddenly disappeared.
We will now return you to
Nick price and his orchestra.
Well, there's a story for tennant.
The mysterious Mary Smith disappeared,
Or kidnapped, maybe.
What do you know about that?
I don't know anything about it!
Now, I was here all night, and I can prove it!
My friend, the question was purely academic.
Good night.
Sleep tight.
[ Light switch clicks ]
Swayne.
Swayne, I want a drink.
[ Doorbell buzzes ]
Swayne...
There's someone at the door.
[ As swayne ]
"I'm very sorry, Mr. dalzell.
I'll attend to it immediately."
Dal, I found her!
I found her!
[ Normal voice ]
Good.
But it's a worse mess than ever.
She's disappeared again.
My boy, you're not in love with a girl.
You've fallen for a card trick.
But you don't understand.
Alice is Mary Smith.
And you're mahatma Gandhi, and there's the Brandy.
How's that?
But she is, dal!
She is!
I realized it the moment she stood on the stage.
The minute I saw her,
I shouted, "Alice!"
That must have helped the show along. She see you?
Well, she must have.
She got all upset.
She had to start her number over again. No, thanks.
I waited till after the act was over, and then I rushed backstage to see her.
She'd already gone, huh?
Yes. People were chasing each other around...
Detectives, newspaperman.
Then someone spotted me
As the fella that had shouted,
"Alice," so I beat it.
Timothy, I can't work out a Jigsaw puzzle
If you're going to keep some of the pieces in your pocket.
What do you mean?
I mean that you haven't told me
All you know or at least suspect
About her disappearance from Chicago.
Now, how about it?
Do I get the other pieces?
Well, I...
[ doorbell buzzes ]
Could anyone have followed you?
I don't know.
Perhaps you better go into my den and wait.
Right.
Ah, brother tennant.
Where's winthrop?
Well, if it's off the record,
He was at the prince theater seeing "midnight."
There isn't anyone seeing "midnight."
The Smith girl has disappeared.
No.
Disappeared and given me
The greatest story a newspaperman ever had.
Have a drink.
Thanks.
How's this for a setup?
The show's going on, lights blazing, music blaring,
The girls dancing their heads off.
Smith makes her entrance.
A guy in the third row jumps up and yells, "Alice!"
Smith almost drops in her tracks.
She has to start all over again.
A guy races up the aisle and through the lobby, and I'm right behind him.
And what's more...
I stay right behind him.
I tell you, dalzell, this is sheer drama.
That girl had to wear a mask.
Then it wasn't just publicity?
No. In your wildest dreams, you could never imagine the real reason.
This is the story of the year, and I'm cracking it.
Well, that's swell, but where do I come in?
I'm gonna play ball with you, dalzell,
And I want you to play ball with me.
I'll tell you everything I know,
But you've got to do the same.
Yes, but I don't know anything.
Okay,
I'll take a chance.
Look, I trailed this guy and picked up plenty.
Mary Smith is not really Mary Smith.
Her name's Alice markham.
She comes from a little jerkwater town in Ohio.
She disappeared from Chicago about a year ago
Just as completely as she did tonight.
Tennant, I apologize.
You're good.
Where'd you pick up all this?
That's nothing.
I found out
The greatest double cross that's ever been pulled.
This guy was pretending to...
[ gunshot ]
[ Gunshot ]
Tim.
Tim?
[ Light switch clicks ]
[ Clicking ]
Stick 'em up!
Higher!
Turn around!
What's the matter, sir?
Where have you been?
To the theater, sir.
Come in here.
What's happened, sir?
Tommy tennant's been shot.
Some Brandy, swayne.
Never mind, swayne.
Uh, get me police headquarters, please.
Are you hurt, sir?
Only grazed, I think.
Who did it?
I don't know.
Uh, let me have, uh, inspector doremus, please.
[ Telephone ringing ]
"Acme arch supporters will give tired feet new life
"And take away that pain almost immediately,
Or your money back."
[ Ringing continues ]
Inspector doremus.
Huh?
Murder?
What's that address?
Yeah.
Yeah.
Now, listen, don't touch a thing.
I'll be right over.
Can you picture that?
Tommy tennant's been plugged.
Tommy tennant?
Yeah.
[ Whistles ]
Fulton, I want you to go to Tommy tennant's office
At the star, start pumping his secretary,
And find out everything you can about him
Since he cut his first tooth.
He's been bumped off.
Franklin, you go with him.
Your job is to find out where he was
And what he did every minute of the day until the murder.
Brady and Jones, you're to snoop around tennant's apartment,
See what you can see.
Now, beat it, all of you.
Wait a minute.
Lewis, cleary, you're to come with me to Clay dalzell's.
That's where the body is.
Get a party to come along for fingerprints
And also notify the coroner's office.
Okay, inspector.
And, Lewis, you're to go to 125 west 34th street
And get me a pair of acme arch supporters.
Right.
Okay. I don't think the hip will trouble you a bit.
Dal: Good. I'm very much obliged to you, doctor.
You're welcome.
Just a few more questions,
Mr. dalzell.
So long, doc.
See you at the inquest.
Good night, doctor.
Good night.
Good night, gentlemen.
You're something of a criminologist, ain't ya?
Well, I've read all of Edgar Wallace.
Doesn't it strike you kind of funny
That the murderer left his gun behind?
Do murderers usually do that?
This one did.
Sure that ain't your gun?
Quite. My gun is in the cabinet beside my bed,
Where it always is.
It had your fingerprints on it.
Naturally.
I told you I picked it up.
You didn't like tennant, did you?
Not particularly, no.
Ever have an argument with him?
Frequently.
What about?
Things he wrote in his column.
What was tennant gonna print in his column about you tomorrow?
Nothing.
How do you know?
Because he told me so.
No, he didn't. He didn't do nothing of the kind.
I'll tell you why you know.
You killed him before he had a chance to do it.
Ain't that it, dalzell?
Tennant came here to get a story confirmed.
You denied it.
He didn't believe you, said he was gonna publish it anyhow.
You had an argument.
He wouldn't give in.
And the only way you could stop his printing it
Was to murder him.
Ain't that what happened?
You got too much water in that one.
Hmm?
Oh.
Say, what is this...
A cross-examination or a band rehearsal?
I beg your pardon, sergeant.
Let's see.
Where were we?
Oh, yes.
I just shot Tommy tennant.
Well, sergeant, to, uh, continue
Your interesting, if somewhat amusing, theory,
I suppose I shot myself in the hip.
Well, that ain't impossible, either!
[ Telephone rings ]
Sergeant, you're right.
That ain't impossible either.
I'll take it, swayne.
Hello?
Where are you?
I'm in the Bronx at a pay station.
Are you all right?
Sure.
How'd you get there?
I don't know.
I was in your den when suddenly two men appeared.
Before I could cry out, they knocked me cold.
When I woke up,
I was in van cortlandt park.
You've been reading scenarios.
What?
Uh, listen, I'm, uh, awfully busy right now, really.
I'd like to talk more, but I can't.
Uh...
Oh, no, no, no.
I-I wouldn't come up if I were you.
It might be embarrassing for you.
Uh, just a minute.
Sergeant, don't you think you could hear better
If you plugged that in?
Huh?
Give me a ring sometime tomorrow.
Or better still,
I'll ring you.
Good night.
Who was that you was talking to?
No one you know.
I'm afraid we'll have to know,
Mr. dalzell.
This is a murder case.
I beg your pardon.
Do you know Ms. Donna mantin?
Sure. I've seen her picture in the rotary viewer.
You have nice taste.
[ Doorbell buzzes ]
Thanks.
You mean you was talking to miss mantin?
Sergeant, I bow to your powers of deduction.
Well, I guess that's all for tonight.
Come on, cleary.
Donna: I'm sorry, dal.
I didn't know you had callers.
Gentlemen, this is... Miss mantin.
Inspector doremus, sergeant cleary.
How do you do?
How do you do?
Come on, cleary.
Wait a minute.
Did he say, "mantin"?
Nice-looking girl, ain't she?
I ain't worrying about her looks.
Dalzell lied.
Sure, he lied.
Let's go back and drill him.
Look, cleary, you're a good cop,
But you've got to be a lot smarter
Before you'll make a good detective.
What do you mean?
You can't break him with words.
Words are his business.
He's a lawyer.
Now, just let him alone and let him do the work for us.
Come on.
All of which makes me a first-class murder suspect.
That's terrible.
Poor fellow.
And my walking in didn't help you any, either, did it?
No. However,
I'll overlook that
If you'll whip me up a little drink.
By the way, there are your letters.
Oh, thank you, dal.
I'm really terribly grateful.
All right.
Don't let me catch you getting mixed up
With such people again.
Who was really on the phone when I was supposed to be?
Well, I suppose
I've got to mix my own drink.
Answer my question.
Hello? Hello, Anita?
You can quit worrying.
I've got your letters.
Oh, that's all right.
How?
Oh, it was very simple.
But you get mixed up with any of that kind of foolishness again,
And I'm going to tell your husband.
All right.
Goodbye, dear.
[ Chuckles dryly ]
Well, I certainly went for that one, all right.
Now, now, boy scout, you did your good deed.
Somebody had to do something for the poor girl.
Oh.
Come on. Who was really on the phone before?
You know I take more whiskey than that.
Dal, I'm not asking to be curious.
But don't you see the police have caught you in a lie
And it may put you in a spot?
I'm already in a spot.
Sergeant cleary insists that I killed tennant.
Did you?
No, inspector,
I did not.
Well, who did?
I don't know.
I've got a hunch, but I'm not sure.
Say, this is swell.
Home murder mysteries.
Why go out for thrills
When you can have them in your own parlor?
Come on.
Who did it?
Do you wear a long black mustache?
Have you a strawberry mark on your left knee?
I refuse to testify.
Your hot-water bottle, sir.
What's that for...
Rheumatism?
Oh, no, miss.
He was shot in the...
Hip.
Well, why didn't you tell me?
Madam, this is my wound.
Swayne, lay out Mr. dalzell's pajamas and fix the bed.
Yes, miss.
Oh, and he better have a hot bath, too!
Yes, miss.
This is probably none of my business,
But just what do you think you're doing?
Staying here to nurse you back to health.
Donna...
Donna, this...
This touches me.
No, this is... this is really as nice a gesture
As you could possibly make.
I-I-i scarcely know how to thank you.
I'm almost, uh...
Nonplussed.
Where are we going?
We're not going anywhere.
You're going home!
Good night, mantin.
[ Knocking on door ]
Dal!
Dal, you big bully!
I'll get even with you for this!
Eh!
[ Thud ]
Swayne!
Orange juice.
Coffee.
Don't spare the horses.
[ Door opens ]
Good morning...
Or, rather, good afternoon.
What are you doing here?
I thought I kicked you out last night.
Oh, that's all right.
We nurses are used to our patients' eccentricities.
They often get violent.
Haven't you been home?
Were you here all night?
Certainly.
You know me...
The Florence nightingale of park Avenue.
How's your, uh, shoulder?
Splendid.
How's yours?
Well, I guess I brought that on myself.
Which would you rather have first... coffee or bandages?
Coffee.
What?
Two lumps of sugar and a dash of bitters... oh, cream.
What a sap you were to sit up all night.
Who sat up?
I slept in swayne's bed.
What?
Swayne tried the divan.
He reports it's none too comfortable.
Your parents will be utterly charmed by all this.
Oh, I told them
I was here.
[ Chuckles ]
Good girl.
Your father's probably on his way over here now.
Don't be vulgar.
Drink your coffee.
You'll need your strength.
Why?
The police department awaits without.
If you think I'm going to ask
"without what?"
You're meshugga.
All right, all right.
Anyway, "without an idea" is the answer.
They been there long?
Oh, yes.
We've been discussing the murder,
And I've convinced them that you're the guilty man.
That's mighty nice of you.
Would you ask them to come in?
You may come in, gentlemen.
He's ready to confess.
Good morning, inspector, sergeant.
I must apologize for... it's okay.
We're in no hurry.
We want to talk to Mr. dalzell in private.
Oh, by all means.
Swayne, we are not to be disturbed.
Now...
Gentlemen, my head is never quite clear in the morning
Or in the afternoon, either, for that matter,
Until I've had my shower.
Do you mind? You can ask questions there just as well.
It's okay.
Oh, that will be fine.
We can get everything cleaned up at once.
All right, gentlemen, make yourselves at home.
Swell bathroom you got here.
Yeah.
[ Music box plays, stops ]
Up at my place, the tub and shower's all in one.
Those are very dangerous. You're likely to slip in the tub.
Yeah, so I found out.
You know, we've been doing a little checking up.
You'll have to speak a little louder, inspector.
Saw quite a bit of tennant last night, didn't you?!
I thought we'd covered all that.
Yeah?
How about admitting you were at the theater with him.
Well, all right.
I was at the theater with him.
Sergeant, would you mind passing me a cake of soap?
Why didn't you tell us?
I didn't think it mattered.
Thank you.
Say, what was in that note
You got at the show last night just as the show started?
[ Chuckles ]
Inspector, I beg your pardon.
I've been belittling you...
In my mind, I mean.
That's okay. What did you say was in the note?
I didn't say.
Come on, dalzell!
Who was it from?!
A friend of mine.
Sure it wasn't from tennant?
What?
Sure it wasn't from tennant?!
You don't have to shout now.
Water's off.
I know!
I mean, I know.
Would you mind passing me a towel, please?
Sure.
No, the note was not from tenant.
[ Loudly ]
Sure it didn't...
[ normal voice ]
Sure it didn't tell you
To leave the theater and meet tennant someplace?
Well, what would be the sense of that?
You just told me that I was talking with him at the theater.
You know, I understand
The show "midnight's" a pretty swell show.
Yes, so I hear.
Ain't seen it, then?
No.
Why didn't you stay last night?
Well, I thought
I'd rather take a walk.
[ Chuckles ]
That's why you took a cab?
[ Chuckles ]
You're quite right, inspector.
I have been lying to you.
Yes, I know.
Most people do.
Don't misunderstand me,
Mr. dalzell.
We ain't trying to trip you up.
Frankly, I don't think you killed tennant,
But your fingerprints were on that gun.
Unless you come clean,
You're gonna be hooked up with this murder.
Inspector...
What I'm refusing to tell you
Has no bearing on the murder of Tommy tennant.
Now, whether or not you choose to take my word for that,
Of course, is up to you.
Well, I guess
I'll have to.
However, mind you, this may be of no help,
But I have a theory.
What's that?
The murder of Tommy tennant
And the disappearance of Mary Smith are related,
In one way or another.
Ah, for Pete's sake,
The disappearance of Mary Smith is a publicity stunt!
We're working on a murder case!
Well, that's the only hunch
I've got.
Well, thanks, anyway.
Come on, cleary.
Goodbye, inspector.
I'll be seeing you.
Oh, yeah, sure. We'll be seeing each other... often.
You know, I wonder.
What?
I wonder what the tennant killing
And the Smith girl's disappearance
Did have to do with each other.
Oh, pardon me.
See that guy?
Yeah.
He's gonna have arch trouble in a couple of years,
Walking on his heels like that.
Don't be so stubborn.
What were they asking you?
They wanted to know what you were doing here, and so do I.
Oh, I could have told them that myself.
I'll bet you could.
Dal...
I had to see you.
I couldn't stand it.
Oh, hello, Tim.
Dal, I had to find out what happened here last night.
Was it true?
Hello.
Hello.
Dal, tell me what happened.
Was it really...
Nurse, how about a little tonic for your patient?
When?
When.
Sure you're not trying to get rid of me?
Oh, Donna.
Now, when swayne leaves us, we'll be alone.
Dal, tell me what happened.
[ Music box playing
"pop! Goes the weasel" ]
Why all the mystery?
Why can't you tell me what happened?
Tim, it's not usual for my guests to take potshots at me,
And, frankly,
I don't care for the custom.
Suppose you explain things.
Don't you think you owe me the truth?
I have told you the truth.
[ Music continues ]
Now, listen, Tim...
You're free, white, and 21.
You can do as you choose.
There's a fellow investigating this case
By the name of doremus.
Although he doesn't look it, he's as smart as a whip.
Sooner or later, he's going to find out
Who was in this apartment when tennant was killed,
And he's gonna put two and two together,
And when he does, you're gonna be the answer.
Now, don't you think it'd be much better if you told me the truth?
But, dal, I tell you...
What did you tell tennant last night after the theater?
What are you talking about?
I never spoke to tennant in my life.
Then why did you kill him?
I didn't kill him, dal.
I don't know anything about it.
Dal, you don't think
I'd take a shot at you?
All right, my lad.
You know, they say
The weather is fine in Miami this time of year.
Why don't you run down there for a while?
Why?
You should know the answer to that one.
I'm not going anywhere.
I'm gonna stay right here and find Alice markham.
All right, Tim.
Good luck.
Alice, where art thou?
Did you ask something, sir?
Oh. [ Chuckles ]
Yes.
Where is Mary Smith?
I don't know, sir.
No.
Of course you don't.
It's obvious that there's some connection
Between the disappearance of Mary Smith
And the murder of Tommy tennant.
But what has Tim winthrop to do with it all?
If neither he nor Mary Smith is involved,
Then why is he lying to me?
I, uh...
He said that he never spoke to Tommy tennant in his life,
Yet tennant told me
That just after Tim got up and shouted, "Alice,"
He left the theater.
Tennant followed and stumbled on a great story.
Now, what's the answer?
Did Mr. tennant specifically say, sir, that he...
That's it!
Swayne, that's it.
Tennant didn't tell me that it was the same man.
Tennant followed somebody else!
But that isn't what I was going to say, sir!
Don't quibble, swayne.
Donna!
Donna!
Coming, sire.
Mantin, we're going to solve the disappearance of Mary Smith
And the murder of Tommy tennant.
How do you like that?
Okay, Sherlock.
Where do we begin?
At the cab stand of the prince theater.
I want you to go right down there
And check up on all the cabs
That left there last night between 9:00 and 10:00.
Find out who hired them and where they went.
Swayne!
You got that clear, Watson?
On my way, Sherlock.
Swayne, you want to be a detective, don't you?
No, sir.
That's fine.
I want you to get Abe ohlman on the phone
And ask him to meet me at the king Charles bar at 4:00.
Then I want you to go to the prince theater
And check up on how many men left there last night
During the first act...
Who they were, where they went,
Any other information you can get. Understand?
How do I find that out, sir?
Swayne,
I haven't the faintest idea.
Abe... Where did you first meet her?
Did she come to you for a job?
She did not.
I picked her up at the club Rio.
Oh, she was singing there?
No.
No, she wasn't.
She was a guest...
Alone, mind you.
Out of a clear sky, she jumps up and begins singing
While the orchestra's playing.
And was she terrific.
What do you mean?
Without being asked, she just got up and started to sing?
Why?
I found that out later.
She was broke.
She blew her last 10 bucks
On a bottle of mums for one good fling.
Well, that's not so bad.
This mask business...
Does she wear it all the time?
Oh, no.
No, only on the stage.
That was her idea.
When I offered her a job, she insisted on that condition.
So, you signed her up for buttons, huh?
Well, I thought I did.
I gave her the usual minimum guarantee and a percentage.
We haven't had an empty seat.
She's been drawing
1,500 bucks a week.
Which isn't a bad figure.
Pardon.
Pardon me.
Where does she bank?
Search me.
She was paid in cash.
She wouldn't take a check.
Well, that doesn't get us anywhere.
Does she have any friends?
I don't know.
Does she get any mail at the theater?
Mnh-mnh.
Uh... Did she have any visitors there?
No, not what you'd call
"visitors."
Oh.
The only one who ever came to see her was tennant.
Tennant?
Well, I guess that was professional.
That's interesting.
Where'd she live?
That's one thing I do know.
At the warman.
Abe, you're improving.
That's something, anyway.
Well, I'm sure glad
You're interesting yourself in this business.
If there's one man in the world can find this girl, it's you.
Now, abie...
Now, on the levels.
Hey, didn't you find that married girl
When the rest of the world gave up?
That was luck.
Well, call it anything you like,
But please call me when you find her, will you?
Mm.
Another drink,
Mr. dalzell?
Yes. Make it two...
One for miss mantin.
Quiet, you rat.
I'm in a disguise.
So I see.
You just wait till tomorrow.
I'm having some beautiful false whiskers made.
Yeah?
You're gonna be a lot of help on this case.
I thought you were checking taxis for me.
I did.
Oh.
Oh, the taxi business is picking up.
It's, uh...
Wait a minute...
20% better this month than it was this month last year.
Well, isn't that splendid?
I've been getting my information from Frankie Allen.
He's number y7229
And is an interesting addition to any social group.
Writes poetry.
[ Chuckles ]
Listen to this.
"Life is what you make it.
"You can't duck life.
You've got to take it.
"It don't pay to frown.
You've got to grin.
"And no matter what happens, just keep your chin... Up.
"And then you will find in this world full of strife
You come out on the top in this battle of life."
Now, isn't that a lovely little...
8 sidecars, 10...
There ain't nobody can come in miss Smith's room now.
The police are here.
It's all right, belinda.
Mr. dalzell is a friend of the management.
He wants to look around a bit.
Yes, sir.
Thanks, Allen.
I'll see you later.
The man from headquarters...
Where is he?
Ain't no "he."
It's a she.
In there, looking at miss Smith's clothes.
All right, Watson, come out.
Well, what detained you?
[ Chuckles ]
Any clues?
No, just clothes.
Were these all the clothes that miss Smith had?
Yes, sir.
That's all.
[ Knock on door ]
Police.
Greetings, gentlemen.
Doremus:
Hello, miss mantin.
Hello, inspector.
Say, what are you doing here?
Well, Abe ohlman asked me to have a look around.
Oh.
I'm surprised to find you here.
Oh, you're likely to run in to me anywhere, Mr. dalzell.
Evidently, my theory about this case did interest you.
No.
The commissioner's got me running in circles.
I was going great on the tennant case
When he asked me to find an angle
On this publicity-stunt disappearance.
If you don't mind,
Mr. dalzell,
We've got a couple of questions we'd like to ask the maid.
Go right ahead.
We're, uh, just leaving.
Come, Donna.
Goodbye, inspector.
Goodbye.
What do you make of all of this, Mr. Holmes?
[ Door closes ]
Hey, I told you there was something phony about this.
Why did she call him
"Mr. Holmes"?
[ Chuckles ]
[ Whistle blows ]
Uh, king Charles hotel.
Well, how'd you do?
Say, inspector, you ain't taking this case serious enough.
That guy dalzell...
He's doing all right, cleary.
He's doing all right.
Now, look, you go back and question that maid
And find out what he asked her.
Hey, where are you going?
First I'm going to drop corbett here at the king Charles bar
To shadow dalzell
24 hours a day,
And then I'm going to 125 west 34th street
To sock the guy in the nose that sold me these arch supporters.
They're killing me.
Go ahead.
I'll meet you at the king Charles bar in 15 minutes.
Good afternoon, colonel.
Good afternoon.
I'm interested in Mary Smith.
You know anything about her?
Yes, sir.
That's fine.
What?
She disappeared from the show last night
After the first act.
No.
Yes.
Life is what you make it.
You can't duck life.
You've got to take it.
But that isn't all I know, sir.
What else?
Oh.
I beg your pardon.
She used to leave the hotel
Every morning at 7:45 exactly
And then walk over towards 5th Avenue.
Yes?
Yes.
Well, what else?
That's all.
You practically solved the disappearance.
Practically.
I beg your pardon?
Keep your trap shut and keep moving.
Get in the car.
I got your invitation.
Sit down.
Look, friend,
I'm your pal.
And if you want me to see that you get a big funeral, okay,
But give me the check first.
What are you talking about?
You're fooling around with some mighty tough people.
You?
Me? No.
I'm one of the nicest fellas you ever met in your life.
And these boys are just taking care of you.
But there's a couple of other guys on your trail
That are different kinds of people.
How do you know that?
Look, dalzell, let's you and me quit kidding each other.
Didn't you say if anything happened to you
The law would get that check?
And don't that mean that I got to keep you healthy?
Well...
That's what me and my boys have been trying to do.
But it ain't no cinch, with you running all over town,
Sticking your nose into a lot of things
That ain't none of your business.
Such as?
Murders and, uh... Kidnappings.
I see.
Who did you say these gentlemen following me were?
I didn't say.
Mm. They mixed up in the tennant murder?
Who do you figure will cop the pennant this year?
Well, with the kind of team we've got,
I don't think the other fellas stand a chance.
Don't be too sure of that.
Now, just keep your nose clean, dalzell.
Leave the tennant murder
And the Smith girl's disappearance
For the cops to worry about.
They don't concern you none.
There are two different schools of thought on that subject.
However,
I get your point.
Toodle-oo.
Coming, boys?
What kept you this time?
Did you get mixed up with some other woman?
Martini, please.
Keep it dry, will you?
And... Three olives.
Oh, hello, madam.
Am I an orphan?
Two Martinis.
I'll take the same...
Two Martinis.
What did you think of that Mary Smith's room?
Hors d'oeuvres, sir?
Swell.
I'm starved.
She must have been a very peculiar girl.
You feel like a stuffed egg?
Thanks.
You know, if I or any of the girls I know
Lived in a hotel room for a week,
We would have accumulated so much junk
That it would have taken a maid four hours to get things packed.
Fishy?
No, Martini.
Thanks-y.
But not Mary Smith. She was the neat new england type.
Why, you could have stripped that room bare
In about three minutes.
Say that again.
I said you could have stripped that room bare
In about three minutes.
What was that for?
Mantin, you're a bright girl but dumb.
You don't know a good idea when you see it.
Listen... Mary Smith had a room at the warman,
But she didn't live there.
And I'm going home and go to bed.
Well, that makes sense.
Mary Smith didn't live at the warman,
So you're going home to bed.
Well, it isn't even 8:00 yet.
All my life, I've said good night to the milkman.
Tomorrow
I'm going to say good morning.
Check, please.
Come on. I'll take you home.
At this hour?
I should say not.
Clay dalzell, are you giving me the runaround?
Donna, don't you trust me?
Yes, but
I'm probably wrong.
Which proves that you're not so dumb.
Have you seen that new trick with the 10?
No.
Now watch.
Well, what's the answer?
Eight sidecars.
[ Laughs ]
Good night.
Now, uh...
You better run home
And get a good night's rest, officer,
'Cause we're going to get a very early start in the morning.
I'm sorry, madam, but Mr. dalzell has retired.
Is he sick?
No, madam.
He just retired early, that's all.
Well, times have changed.
Tell him Mrs. classon is calling, will you?
But, madam,
I said that Mr. dalzell...
Lovely apartment...
Perfectly lovely.
Let me see.
This must be
Mr. dalzell's bedroom?
No, madam.
That is his bedroom.
Oh, thank you.
[ Knock on door ]
Who is it?
It's Jerry...
Jerry classon.
Will you come out, or shall I come in?
I-I'll come out!
Well...
This is a surprise.
I expected you to call me at the hotel today.
Oh, Jerry, as a matter of fact,
I intended to,
But I've been so rushed to...
Will you have a little drink?
No?
[ Chuckles ]
Strange bumping into you at the theater last night, Clay.
Wasn't it?
Brought up a lot of old memories, hmm?
You know,
I've always felt rather badly
That we drifted apart.
Well, Jerry, those things happen.
Water under the bridge, you know.
How are you, anyway?
Just the same, Clay.
The embers are still...
Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh.
You're Mrs. classon now.
Oh, that.
Oh, sorry.
What sort of time are you having in New York?
Very disappointing.
Yeah?
I find you treating me like an old friend.
The night I go to see the hit show in town,
The star disappears on me.
I'm frightfully intrigued by it.
Tell me, Clay, what happened?
Have you any idea why she disappeared, where she is?
Search me.
Come, now, Clay.
It's common gossip that you're looking for her.
Are you going to find her?
Or have you already found her?
Now, Jerry, you're the wife of a lawyer.
You should know better
Than to ask a witness leading questions.
[ Door opens ]
And what is the meaning of this?
I'm sure I don't know.
And who is this?
I am Mrs. dalzell.
Who are you?
So, this is why you bundled me off into the spare room!
Your cold was worse!
How dare you do such a thing?!
And after we've been married for only two weeks,
You having a rendezvous with another woman,
Me right in the same house!
My dear, I assure you...
Oh, I'm not blaming you.
I know how he is with the women.
How could you be so sordid?
I knew your past wasn't all that it might have been,
And I was willing to forget and forgive...
Oh, Donna, for heaven's sake!
You're a very silly child, my dear.
You'll never hold a husband with this kind of scene.
Good night, Clay.
I'm sure your marriage is going to be very happy.
Oh, it'll be all right,
Jerry.
Good night.
Where did you get that creation?
Swayne.
And where did you get that woman?
Thanks, swayne.
I'll do as much for you someday.
[ Laughs ]
All right, boy scout.
You've done your good deed for the day.
Now, how about tripping homeward?
No.
Yes. I'm on my way to bed.
It's no gag.
Not on your life.
I'm taking no more chances.
No?
No.
Mr. mantin, will you please come over here
And get your daughter and take her out of my apartment?
And you better bring your shotgun, daddy.
We may need it.
Dal...
What?
You really didn't know that woman was coming here?
No.
I knew it.
Now I'll let you get some sleep.
How did you know that I wanted to get rid of her?
I didn't.
Well, anyway, good night.
And thanks.
Good night, and don't mention it.
[ Clock chiming westminster quarters ]
Exactly.
Well, I'm all in, inspector.
This guy's doing
The first sensible thing he's done all day.
He's down here in the king Charles bar having a drink,
Which is what I'm gonna do right now.
It's funny.
I get just so far, then smack...
Right into a stone wall.
I finally found a bus driver
Who remembered picking up a girl of her description every morning
And taking her to Washington square.
What happened after she got off the bus?
What do you say we give up this detecting business
And go in for some plain or fancy matrimony?
Can't get the thing out of my mind.
It's got so many queer angles.
What'll it be... a church wedding or a quiet one at home?
For instance, how did
Jerry, uh, what's-her-name
Know that I was looking for Mary Smith?
Do you talk in your sleep?
She said it was common gossip.
That's ridiculous.
'Cause if you do,
I could wear earmuffs.
Hmm?
Did you say something?
No.
What's the matter...
You tired?
Dal, there's a man at the end of the bar
Who's staring at you.
I thought I recognized you.
How are you, Mr. dalzell?
Oh!
Yes, yes, of course.
I hope
I'm not intruding.
No, not at all.
This is miss mantin.
Mr. uh...
Classon.
Classon.
How do you do?
How do you do?
Sit down, won't you?
Oh, thank you.
I was hoping
I'd find you here.
Sorry if I've kept you waiting.
I usually get here earlier.
Yes. You see,
Mr. dalzell,
You and I are both interested in the same woman.
We're both trying to find
Mary Smith...
Or, rather, Alice markham.
Oh.
Yes.
That's why I sent Mrs. classon to call on you last night.
I was using her as a sort of private detective,
Though it didn't do me much good.
Do you mind telling me
Why you're so interested in Alice markham?
My best friend is facing the electric chair, Mr. dalzell,
And the only chance
I have to save him
Is to find Alice markham.
Well, that's interesting.
John marone is awaiting trial in Chicago
For the murder of Fred Dexter.
He didn't commit that murder,
Mr. dalzell,
Because when it happened, he was in his own apartment,
And Alice markham was with him.
And he can't prove that without her.
She's his only alibi.
If she hadn't disappeared that night,
John would be a free man now.
Why did she disappear?
I don't know why she disappeared in Chicago
Any more than I know why she disappeared in New York.
But if it's humanly possible,
I'm going to find her and find out.
Message for you,
Mr. dalzell.
Oh, thank you.
Thank you, sir.
Pardon me.
Uh, do you mind my asking you, uh...
How you discovered that
Mary Smith was Alice markham?
Well, I wish I had something mysterious to tell you,
But it's really quite simple.
I attended the performance of "midnight."
You remember.
I met you there.
Someone stood up and shouted, "Alice!"
Then, suddenly, everything became clear to me.
What did you do then?
I immediately went to the lobby
And phoned my partner in Chicago
To tell marone the good news.
When I got back to my seat,
There was no performance and no Mary Smith.
I'm afraid you're a bit of a disappointment to me.
Yes, sir.
We'd regarded you as a pretty suspicious character.
Yeah.
Well, seems pretty hopeless.
But I promise you this...
If we, my partner and I,
Do find any trace of Alice markham,
We'll let you know.
That's very kind of you.
Dal, we'd better be going.
Why?
Swayne.
All right.
Well?
Well, sir, there...
There seems to have been
Several people who left the theater during the first act,
But I only was able to get an accurate check on one of them.
[ Voice shaking ] He... he behaved in a suspicious manner
And aroused the curiosity of one of the ushers,
Who happens to be studying to be a private detective...
One of those correspondence-school courses.
That's the man who left the theater... what about him?
Well, sir, he... he got up just after the act started
And slipped out of the theater.
He stopped in the lobby for a moment
And mumbled something about
Mary Smith to another man,
And then he rushed on out and got into a taxi.
That's the man!
Did the Usher get his name?
Does he know where he went?
He didn't get his name, sir, but he knows the taxi driver,
And he found out where the man went.
Well?
The Usher wouldn't tell, sir, without getting a reward,
So I ventured to bring him around.
He's in the den.
Now, now, now, swayne, pull yourself together.
Here, bring him in.
Looks like we're getting warm.
[ Chuckles ]
Hot, I should say.
Come in, young man.
How do you do?
Sit down, won't you?
No, no, no, no.
Let me out of here.
I'm no squealer.
I wouldn't have come here if I'd have known!
I-I'm sorry, mister.
Honest, I don't know a thing about it.
I wouldn't have got mixed up with this.
Let me out of here, please.
Hey, wait a minute.
Wait a minute.
There's nothing for you to worry about.
Well, come here.
Just sit down.
Let's see.
There was something said about a reward, I believe.
Oh, no, no, no. Never mind.
I don't want that.
Oh, yes, yes.
There you are. How's that?
Now...
This man who left the theater...
Who was he?
Where did he go?
All right.
He went out of the theater
And he got into a cab
And he went to a gangster's place.
We've got him.
Who was the gangster?
Jim kinland.
But that's me you're talking about.
Yes, sir.
[ Laughing ]
Nice going, Sherlock.
Oh...
Swayne, his hat and coat.
Oh.
He's got them on.
Let him out.
[ Laughing ]
[ Notes play ]
[ Laughing continues ]
Shut up.
[ Clears throat ]
Swayne, bring me six bottles of scotch,
Four bottles of vichy, two glasses, some cracked ice,
And a lot of aspirin.
What are you going to do?
Get drunk.
Watson, you can put away your needle
And throw your fingerprint outfit out the window.
What's the matter,
Sherlock?
Aren't we going to play detective anymore?
No.
When I've got to pay a reward
To a correspondence-school detective
To find out that the most promising suspect
In a murder case
I'm investigating is myself,
I'd better quit.
I don't want to hear any more about Mary Smith, Tommy tennant,
Murders, or anything else.
I guess I wasn't cut out to be a detective in the first place.
You weren't cut out to be a very good liar either, dal.
What do you mean?
That isn't the reason why you're quitting.
Well, you're right, Donna.
The reason I'm quitting is because the further I go,
The more obvious it becomes to me
That the only man who could have killed Tommy tennant
Is Tim winthrop.
I can't find a sign that points to anybody else...
Motives, suspicious behavior, opportunity.
Tim's the only man.
Tim's my friend.
And if I'm not careful,
I'm gonna trip myself
And spill the beans right into Mr. doremus' lap.
I don't know, but it doesn't seem to me
That Tim is the type of chap that would...
Well, I'll get him out of town for a while.
Meanwhile, we can catch up with our night life.
Here's how.
[ Clears throat ]
Well, if this is a start,
It's going to be a short life, if a merry one.
Say, am I drunk already,
Or is that picture really cockeyed?
No, you're still sober.
Well.
Well, what do you know about that?
What is it?
That, my fair young friend, is a dictograph.
Congratulations, doremus, but I'm signing off.
Well, that should win some sort of medal for dumbness.
I'm quick to protect him,
Then turned around and shouted in doremus' ear
That I'm convinced he's guilty.
Who are you calling?
Jim kinland.
I'll bet you'd do better with the phone connected.
Oh.
[ Chuckles ]
[ Dialing ]
He doesn't know it, but Mr. kinland
Is about to become the victim of a blackmail plot.
Hello, kinland?
It's Clay dalzell.
I want you to do me a favor.
No, nothing serious.
There's a boy named winthrop,
Tim winthrop,
Living at the maltby.
Yes, I want you to pick him up and hide him somewhere,
Will you?
And it's going to be a race.
You've got to find him before the police do.
Well, that's too bad,
Jim.
I was hoping you'd be able to find him.
Well, I couldn't.
My boys have been scouring the town for six hours.
Why, of course you couldn't.
It's as plain as the nose on your face.
I said it was going to be a race, and doremus has won.
Tim's in jail.
That's fine.
I suppose all you want me to do now
Is go down and get him out of there.
Well, let me tell you right now,
Check or no check, the deal's cold.
Police headquarters.
Hey, wait a minute.
Inspector doremus.
Now, you keep me out of this, dalzell.
Hello, doremus?
Dalzell.
Congratulations.
I understand you solved the tennant killing.
Well, uh,
I haven't arrested anybody yet.
Oh, that's funny.
I understood...
Hey, inspector, can I ask you a straight question?
Go ahead.
I've got nothing to hide.
Did you put a dictograph in my apartment?
No.
But it ain't a bad idea.
Thanks.
[ Doorbell buzzes ]
I wonder if doremus is lying.
Doremus don't do much fooling around.
This the guy?
What happened to him?
Thought I told you no rough stuff.
Man: We didn't do it.
That's the way we found him.
Take him in the bedroom, boys, will you?
Swayne, get the bed ready and call the doctor.
Somebody sure gave him a nice going over.
He's in considerable pain.
I've given him an opiate
That will make him feel pretty groggy.
Is it, uh, all right to talk with him?
Perfectly. You'll find him quite rational for periods,
But don't tire him too much.
Good night.
Good night, doctor.
Thank you very much.
Tim.
Tim.
Tim.
Tim, it's dal.
Do you understand?
Dal?
What happened?
Dal, find her.
Find her.
They'll kill her!
You've got to find her!
Find Alice!
They've beat me to find out...
Who?
Tim, who?
I don't know.
Tim, listen to me.
Tim...
What did Alice markham have to do with marone?
Marone?
Alice hated him, dal.
He... he ruined her father.
He...
It... it killed him.
Tim, Tim.
What was it marone did?
Find her, dal.
Find her.
Find her.
You know, that's a very funny gag.
Well, I don't see anything funny about it.
They might have killed the boy.
Oh, I wasn't talking about him.
I was talking about what he said.
Now, look...
Marone meets her old man,
Tells him he's a big-shot banker,
Gets the old man's dough to invest and goes South with it.
Well, the shock kills the old man,
And the girl comes to Chicago to see marone.
He has her come to his apartment.
Well, knowing the kind of a guy marone is,
It don't take no blueprint to tell me what happened there.
At the same time, over on the South side,
Fred Dexter's busy getting himself bumped off.
Now, the cops know Dexter and marone are on the outs,
So they pinch marone.
Now, this markham dame...
She don't like marone,
First, for what he did, or tried to do, to her
Up in his apartment.
Second, because she blames her old man's death on him.
Now she's his only alibi.
So, she disappears to get even,
And marone, who's committed murder all his life
And gotten away with it,
Is gonna burn for a murder he never committed.
Now, don't tell me that's not very funny.
How do you know all this?
You heard what the kid said same as I did.
All adds up, that's all.
Hmm.
Well, thanks, kinland.
You know, this is the first time
This case has made any sense to me at all.
Oh, that's nothing.
Oh, I don't suppose
You want to let me have that check right now?
I don't suppose.
No,
I didn't think so.
[ Laughs ]
Good night.
Dal, did you find him?
Oh, hello, Mr. kinland.
I haven't had a chance to thank you for those letters.
That's all right.
Night.
Uh, good night, kinland.
What happened, dal?
Did you find him?
Yes, we found him, all right.
Oh, am I glad.
I got so excited,
I just couldn't stay home.
Madam, you don't know nothing.
Things have been happening around here so fast,
I can't keep track of them.
Young man, have you had your dinner yet?
Well, no, now that you mention it.
Well, you can talk just as well while you're eating
And vice versa.
Come on.
You know, the funniest part of it all is...
[ Telephone rings ]
Thanks.
Jim kinland knows
All about what happened to Alice markham in Chicago.
Hello?
Yes.
No, Mr. dalzell is not at home.
[ Receiver clicks ]
Who was it?
Mrs. classon, sir.
Swayne, you mind my asking you
Just why you take it upon yourself
To tell Mrs. classon that I'm not here?
I'm very sorry, sir.
Miss mantin's orders.
Oh. So, you're busy running my life again, huh?
I'm sorry, dal.
I forgot to mention it, but I decided Mrs. classon
Is nobody for you to play around with.
Oh. Mantin, you're a swell gal,
But the next time you stick your nose into my business...
Now, don't take that attitude.
A girl has to be careful
About the reputation of the man she's going to marry.
And yours certainly can't stand being mixed up with that woman.
Let me amaze you with a list of the lady's boyfriends
Since her marriage to Mr. classon.
First, there was a gentleman named Howard Smith,
Who was rapidly succeeded by a Mr. Steve stanislaw,
A truck driver by profession.
And next came a gentleman...
Since deceased, as you already know... one Fred Dexter.
And then there was a brief in the married world
With a Mr. John marone
And then a lovely little...
Wait a minute.
Wait a minute.
Did you say
Dexter and marone?
Numbers 3 and 4.
How did you get this?
For the neat little sum of $14.60
For a long-distance call to Chicago,
On your telephone, by the way.
First Dexter and then marone?
No, third Dexter and fourth marone.
And it was common gossip?
Known to the man on the street.
Mantin, that's as silly a thing as you've ever said.
That's covering a lot of ground.
If Mrs. classon was carrying on with marone
And it was common gossip, then classon must have heard it.
And if he knew that,
He certainly wouldn't be defending marone, would he?
And if you don't know the answer to that one, I'll tell you.
It's "no."
[ Gunshot, glass shatters ]
Wait here.
What is it?
Is he dead?
Here, give me a hand.
Tim?
Tim?
What was it?
What happened?
At the window.
At the window, someone with a gun.
I found yours and fired.
Did you recognize him?
Who was it?
It was a woman.
Donna: "Although a week has elapsed since the murder",
"Inspector doremus, in charge of the investigation,
"Refused to make any statement other than the customary one
That the police are investigating the case."
Clay "Sherlock Holmes" dalzell
Is just about as Gabby as the inspector.
His assistant,
Dr. Donna "Watson" mantin,
Is completely in the dark as to his plan.
Swayne!
Swayne:
Yes, sir?
Are you sure no packages have come for me?
No, sir.
Nothing, sir.
All right.
Do you want a drink, dal?
No.
I wonder why that stuff doesn't come.
What is it, dal?
What are you waiting for?
Mary Smith.
In a package?
[ Laughs ]
Just about.
[ Doorbell buzzes ]
I'll get it!
Ah, boy. I thought you were never gonna get here.
Well, it took longer than we expected,
But I hope it'll be satisfactory.
Thanks. Your hopes are as nothing compared to mine.
Good night.
Mantin, come on!
Come on where?
You and I are going to rent an apartment.
Swell! Now we're really getting somewhere!
Well, it isn't exactly what I would have picked,
But it's probably better than niagara falls.
* midnight in Manhattan
* turns night into day
* life starts in old Manhattan *
* when the rest of the world's tucked away *
* Manhattan...
Maybe I had the wrong idea about this whole thing.
* ...Whispers good night
* when dawn's peeking through
* no man wakens at midnight... *
I have now come to a conclusion.
One of us is crazy.
* ...Manhattan...
That's great.
If you're referring to that record, it's terrible.
[ Record scratches, music stops ]
Isn't that
Mary Smith's voice?
That's right.
I didn't know she made a record without an orchestra.
Police headquarters.
There are a lot of things you don't know.
For instance?
Inspector doremus.
You're going to get your fingers burned.
Oh, inspector.
Dalzell.
Get this...
I'm at 188 macdougal street, apartment "f."
That's right.
Will you, uh, hurry over here, please, alone?
The murderer of Tommy tennant
Is going to be here in a very few minutes.
No.
Yes.
Who?
I don't know.
Well, then, how do you know he's going to be here?
There's a list of the suspects.
Mr. winthrop, please.
"Tim winthrop,
Horatio swayne,
"Mrs. classon,
Abe ohlman,
"Roger classon,
Jim kinland,
Donna min..."
Clay dalzell!
Shh.
Hello, Tim?
Dal.
Now, keep your shirt on,
But if you want to see your Alice,
Hurry right over to my apartment.
I'll have her there in 30 minutes.
Oh, no, she's now at
188 macdougal street,
Apartment "f,"
But she's going to my place.
Meet her there.
188 macdougal street?
Thanks.
In 30 minutes?
Yes, sir.
Found her?
Really?
I knew you'd find her.
I'll be there.
Well, that is good news.
Thank you.
No kiddin'?
That should start something.
Dal...
I've been in love with you all of my life,
And this is the first time you've ever disappointed me.
Now, it's all right to fool the rest of those people,
But Tim's heart's going to be broken
When he walks into your apartment
And finds you haven't got
Mary Smith there.
That is not funny.
Good girl, and you're right...
Unless Tim is the murderer.
Oh.
I hadn't thought of that.
Well, now what are we going to do?
Sit down.
Shuffle those.
And, uh, what are the cards for?
Casino.
$5 a game.
Now, dal, that just doesn't make sense at all.
First you tell doremus that tennant's murderer will be here,
And then you tell those other people that Mary Smith is here,
And now you want to play casino.
That's right.
Well, you're just plain loony,
Unless you're the murderer and I'm the girl.
Or vice versa.
Look,
Tommy tennant was killed
Just as he was going to tell me something about Mary Smith,
Right?
Right.
The murderer didn't want that something told.
Now, who else would know that something?
Mary Smith.
Exactly.
So the murderer will never let her get to my apartment.
The innocent ones will go there.
The guilty one will come here to stop her.
Oh.
And that victrola record is Mary Smith.
Very neat.
And if I'm right,
Any minute now the murderer will walk through that door.
[ Knock on door ]
You go in there and start that record.
Yeah.
* LA da da da
* turns the night
* da da da
Garbage?
No. No, thanks.
* ...When the rest of the world's tucked away... *
All right, Donna.
[ Record scratches, music stops ]
Got him?
Not him... them.
Who?
The jitters.
[ Siren wails ]
That'll be doremus sneaking up on the murderer.
Well, I don't mean to hurt your feelings,
But I'm going to feel a lot more comfortable
With that rock of Gibraltar here.
I'll let you in on a little secret.
I'm gonna be a lot happier myself.
Dal...
Huh?
Suppose the murderer is Mary Smith.
Now, that's a comforting thought.
Well, your record gag isn't going to be much good then, is it?
[ Knock on door ]
You'd better start it anyway.
All right.
* midnight in Manhattan...
Ah, come in.
All right, Donna.
It's the inspector.
Well, Mr. dalzell...
[ Music stops ]
Oh, hello, miss mantin.
Got that murderer for me?
Not yet, but he's on his way.
I'm afraid you folks
Put yourself through a lot of trouble for nothing.
We've got the murderer.
You what?
Who is it?
Search me.
Cleary phoned he'd nailed him in yonkers.
He's on his way to headquarters with him right now.
[ Chuckles ] I'm afraid cleary must be mistaken, inspector.
He can't have the right man.
I know that.
I understand,
Mr. dalzell.
It's kind of disappointing to have a hunch go sour on you,
But policing and amateur sleuthing
Is two different things.
[ Chuckles ]
Better luck next time.
You're not going?
Sure. Got to be at the office when cleary gets there.
Now, wait a minute, inspector.
I don't know who cleary has picked up,
But I do know that he's wrong.
The real murderer is on his way here now.
He'll be here any minute.
[ Chuckles ]
I'm telling you, you'd better stay.
Now, Mr. dalzell,
You ain't gonna tell me my business, are you?
Good night, folks.
* Manhattan...
Oh, no, you don't.
I'm not leaving.
Oh, yes, you are.
Donna, I shouldn't have brought you here in the first place,
But I never thought you would be in any danger.
I was counting on doremus to stay.
Now, out you go.
Nothing doing!
Please, don't argue.
There isn't time.
Whoever's coming here has already committed one murder
And won't stop at another.
Now, I'm not going to have...
[ Click ]
What is it?
Raise your hands, Mr. dalzell, and don't move.
Who are you?
I've come for Mary Smith.
* ...In Manhattan...
She's in there.
So I hear.
Tell her to come out.
What do you want of her?
Tell her to come out.
Don't move.
Call her from where you are.
[ Record skipping ]
[ Music stops ]
That's a very interesting trick,
Mr. dalzell...
Very interesting.
Now, where is Alice markham?
What do you want with her?
Silence.
The same kind of silence that you got from Tommy tennant?
Exactly.
And the same kind
I'm going to get from you
And for the same reason.
You know too much.
I don't know anything except...
Except that you'd better go back where you came from
And keep out of trouble.
I didn't come here for advice.
I came here for information.
Now I'll give you just
15 seconds to start talking.
All right.
I'll talk.
[ Gunshots ]
[ Thudding ]
Well?
Well, we got her,
Mr. dalzell.
Oh, it's you.
Oh, where is...
Donna?
Donna?
Is she dead?
You all right?
Yes, I'm all right.
Is she dead?
No, I just slugged her.
Doremus,
I owe you an apology.
I went for that act of yours...
Entrance, exit, and story.
Well, I thought someone might be listening or watching.
We'd have a better chance if they thought I wasn't around.
Who is she?
Say, could she be Mary Smith?
She could be, but she isn't.
I don't know who it is.
Well, why don't you take her mask off and see?
Mask?
What mask?
Mr. classon!
Well, what do you know?
Where do you suppose he got that idea?
Probably from Mary Smith.
Well, wherever he got it, I heard him say he killed tennant,
And that's good enough for me.
Come on, boys.
Take him down to headquarters.
Well, that's a hot one.
What?
I had the answer all the time and didn't know it.
Inspector...
Classon not only killed
Tommy tennant,
He also bumped off Fred Dexter in Chicago.
Donna, you were right
About Mrs. classon's affairs with Dexter and marone.
That's why classon killed Dexter
And then fixed the blame on marone.
And that's what Tommy tennant meant
By "the greatest double cross ever pulled."
For although classon was marone's lawyer,
He was trying to do away with marone's alibi, Alice markham,
And that's why she disappeared from the prince theater.
It wasn't Tim's shout that frightened her.
It was seeing classon sitting in the second row.
She blamed marone for her father's death.
Her mask, her disappearances,
Were all because she hated marone and wouldn't testify.
And if Mr. classon had only known that,
Well, he could have saved himself considerable headache.
Dal, you took the words right out of my mouth.
Dal.
Where's Alice?
What's happened to her?
Oh, Tim,
I'm so sorry.
W-where is she, dal?
Where is she?
I've been waiting and waiting.
I know. Tim, I didn't mean to worry you.
Now, I think you'd better run along with the inspector.
Oh, this is the fella?
Come along, son.
But what for?
W-where is she, dal?
She's at the inspector's house.
Dal, you didn't find her?
Sure.
Well, it may not have been a big wedding,
But it certainly was a noisy one.
And I think they ought to be very happy.
I like Tim, and I think Alice is a very nice girl.
Very.
I'm glad we found her.
By the way, how did we find her?
Well, don't you remember?
The villain had tied her to the subway tracks.
Just then, the Bronx express came thundering through...
Now, dal, stop clowning.
I asked you a serious question.
And you'll get a serious answer.
Now, look...
If you earned $1,500 a week,
What would you do with it?
Spend it.
[ Chuckles ] That's right.
You would.
But she didn't.
She put it in the bank.
Well?
Shh.
To open a bank account, you have to give a name.
Well?
When you give a name, even though it isn't your own,
You have to give an address.
Well?
Well?
Was it as simple as that?
It was as simple as that.
Dal, you're wonderful.
Donna, that's common gossip.
To the newlyweds.
To the newlyweds.
Bottoms up.
Well, I don't know what you're going to do,
But I'm going to bed.
Oh, dal,
I've forgotten something.
Yes? What?
Hello? Daddy?
I-I won't be home tonight.
No. I'm staying at dal's.
[ Telephone ringing ]
Yes?
Yes, daddy.
Yes.
Yes, of course it's all right.
We were married this afternoon.
Your daughter is here, Mr. Wynant.
Mr. Wynant.
Haven't you got any more sense than to shout at me like that?
- I'm sorry, but...
- Two weeks' work gone for nothing!
- I just wanted to tell you...
- I don't care!
Get your things and get out!
You're through!
- Yes, I'm going.
- Get out!
It's a good thing I'm going away.
No peace, no quiet.
Everybody interrupting me.
- Can I come in? Did you tell him?
- I didn't get a chance.
Dad.
Why didn't somebody tell me you were here?
I'm sorry to interrupt your work, darling.
Look at you. But this really is important.
How are you?
- Another young man?
- It's the same one.
It's been the same one for three months.
- Forgive me. How are you?
- How do you do?
Take a good look at him, Dad, and try to remember him, because... he's going to be your son-in-law.
- That is, if it's all right with you, sir.
- And if it isn't?
He's still going to be your son-in-law.
You see how much we have to say.
But, Dad, this is really what
I wanted to talk to you about.
- Do you mind if I look around?
- Help yourself.
Tom, show this...
- Where are you going?
- Home.
- Home?
- I'm fired.
- Who fired you?
- You did.
Forget it.
Will you show this gentleman around?
- Yes, right this way, sir.
- Thank you.
Dad, Mother's planning on a big church wedding.
Yeah, she would.
I hate all that fuss.
But I'll do it on one condition... that you're there to give me away, darling.
- What would your mother say to that?
- It's my wedding, isn't it?
But wouldn't it be embarrassing, all of us there...
- your mother and me, your stepfather?
- He can stay home.
Please, Daddy, won't you?
- If you think it will be all right.
- You lamb.
Now, wait a minute.
When is it gonna be?
I'm leaving town tonight.
Where are you going?
That's a secret.
I can't even tell you, my dear.
I've got an important idea to work on.
What is it, a new invention?
Yes, and I don't want somebody to steal it from me.
But we were planning on being married right after Christmas.
I'll be home before Christmas.
- Is that a promise?
- That's a promise I won't forget.
- All right!
- Where's MacCaulay? It's time I started.
- How's your brother?
- He's all right.
I'd like to see him.
Why don't you bring him down?
You know how it is, Daddy.
He's sort of under Mother's thumb.
Yes, I know.
You're not missing much. He's cuckoo.
Like all the rest of us?
Has this fellow...
Has he seen the whole family?
Yes, and he still wants to marry me.
- He's a brave man.
- Yes.
Thanks a lot, old man.
- You have an interesting plant here.
- Didn't I tell you?
I didn't know you invented that smelting process, Mr. Wynant.
This is the first metal that came through, three kinds of ore:
Gold, silver, copper.
Isn't that interesting?
- Daddy, does that still bother you?
- Only in bad weather.
- It isn't bad weather now.
- You better get home before it is.
All right. Goodbye, darling, and don't forget, December 30.
- Goodbye, boy.
- Goodbye.
Take good care of Dorothy.
Show her that there is such a thing as a happy marriage.
I'll do my best, Mr. Wynant.
- Goodbye, sweetie.
- Goodbye, dear.
Is it all settled?
Grand.
Why did your mother divorce him?
I think he's swell.
- It seems he has a secretary.
- I'll do my own typing.
Dad's a good barometer. Here's a taxi.
- Hello, Mr. MacCaulay.
- How are you?
- Get under this.
- No, we're taking your cab.
- Is your father still in there?
- Yes, he's waiting for you.
- Did he tell you where he was going?
- He wouldn't say.
- Goodbye, Miss Wynant.
- Goodbye.
Here's your change, boss.
You wouldn't drive slowly, so you don't get a tip.
That's okay, sweetheart, I got it anyway.
- Mr. Wynant.
- Hello there. Did you get my money?
- I wish you'd tell me where you're going.
- I'm not telling anyone.
Suppose some business should come up?
That's just why I'm going.
There's $100, $200, $300...
- Here, never mind.
- I wish you'd count it.
- There's $1,000 there.
- I trust you.
Isn't there anything else I can do for you?
Have you bought your ticket?
- No.
- Let me do that for you.
Yes, you might do that.
You might get me a ticket for...
No, you don't.
Thanks and goodbye.
What'll I do if something comes up?
Settle it yourself.
What have I got a lawyer for?
- Is Julia going with you?
- No.
- What if you need more money?
- I've left instructions with Julia.
She'll get it from you. Goodbye.
You don't tell me a thing.
I don't know where you're going,
I don't know when you're coming back.
I don't know how to reach you if any business comes up.
- Hello, Tanner.
- Mr. Wynant.
My daughter's going to be married,
Tanner.
Nice young man. She just brought him in.
Congratulations.
I'm gonna make her a wedding present.
Thought I'd better do it now before I forget it.
I can drop them on the way...
That's funny.
- Where are those bonds?
- Bonds, sir?
I know I put them in there.
Maybe Miss Wolf has them, sir.
Yes, maybe she has.
- Joe?
- Yeah.
- How do you like yours?
- Straight.
You women sure take a lot of punishment.
You're in the wrong place, buddy.
Am I?
What's on your mind? What do you want?
- Who is it, Joe?
- That's what I want to know.
- We're just having a little drink.
- Yeah, so I see.
See you later, Joe.
Sorry, didn't know I was talking to the boyfriend.
- So long.
- So long, Joe.
Who's that man?
He isn't anybody.
Just a fellow I used to know.
I thought you'd given up that sort of friend.
It's the first time I've seen him in years.
I didn't want him to think
I was high-hatting him.
You know how I feel about that sort of thing.
Don't worry. You won't see him again.
Tell me, did you change your mind about going?
No, I just came back for a second.
I want to get those bonds.
Bonds?
What bonds?
The government bonds.
The ones you took from the office safe.
Oh, yes.
You told me to sell those a long time ago.
I'd never tell you to sell those.
I bought those for my daughter.
- Don't you remember?
- See here, Julia... you're counting too much on my absent-mindedness.
You've been taking a little here and there for some time... without my saying anything about it.
But this is $50,000.
Do you realize you're accusing me...
No one else had the combination to that safe.
You took them.
What did you do with them?
What if I did take them?
I'm tired of seeing you hand out thousands of dollars to your family.
That's my business.
Supporting a gang of loafers that don't care a darn about you.
A wife that kicked you out the first time your foot slipped.
None of them would help you.
And I've given my whole life to you.
If you kicked off tomorrow, where would I be? Out in the gutter.
Certainly I took those bonds.
Who has a better right?
I want that money now, or I'll hand you over to the police.
Go ahead!
They'll be pretty rough with you, with your record.
That's a fine thing to say to me after what I've been to you.
Hello, give me...
Well?
All right, I'll give it to you.
$25,000, that's all I've got.
You're gonna return every cent of it.
I can't! I haven't got it!
- What did you do with the rest?
- I never had it.
Then there was someone in with you.
Who was it?
I'll answer that.
Hello.
You don't need to tell me.
I have a pretty good idea.
What are you going to do?
Honey, stop worrying about your father.
He'll turn up all right.
Yes, but, Tommy, today is Christmas Eve.
He's just forgotten.
You know how he forgets everything.
No, he never forgets a promise to me.
I'm worried.
I know something's happened to him.
What could happen to him, darling?
Will you stop worrying?
You see, the important thing is the rhythm.
You should always have rhythm in your shaking.
A Manhattan you shake to a foxtrot.
A Bronx to two-step time.
The dry martini you always shake to waltz time.
- What is it?
- Just a minute.
Now, mind you, there's a still more modern trend...
Let me have... Thank you.
Certain people have...
- Hello, there.
- Hello.
Another glass. How are you?
You know, we do know each other.
Of course we do.
We've known each other for years.
- Aren't you Nick Charles?
- Yes.
You don't remember me.
I'm Dorothy Wynant.
- Not that scrawny, little bit of...
- Yes.
How did you ever remember me?
You used to fascinate me, a real live detective.
You used to tell me the most wonderful stories. Were they true?
Probably not.
Tommy, this is Nick Charles.
- Hi, Tommy.
- How do you do?
- Let's have another glass.
- He once worked on a case for my father.
Yeah, some nut wanted to kill him.
How is your father?
That's what I came to ask you.
He's disappeared.
Now, don't say that, darling.
He's just away somewhere working.
I can't find him. I've tried everything.
I thought you might know.
I don't know anything. I've been in California for the last four years.
What about his lawyer?
Used to be some bird by the name of...
- MacCaulay?
- Herbert MacCaulay.
- I've tried him once.
- Why don't you try him again?
- All right.
- Here's a nickel.
Thank you. I'll be right back.
You know, she's got me worrying, too.
You mustn't worry about him.
Mind you, he's a great guy, but screwy.
Madam, I'm very sorry, but no dogs.
You cannot take your dog in there.
I'm not taking him, he's taking me.
- Are you hurt, madam?
- No.
Women and children first, boys.
What is the score, anyway?
- So it's you he was after!
- Hello, sugar.
He's dragged me into every gin mill on the block.
- I had him out this morning.
- I thought so.
- This is Tommy. My wife.
- How do you do?
I don't usually look like this.
I've been Christmas shopping.
- I'm afraid we shall take the dog out.
- It's all right, Joe. It's my dog.
And my wife.
You might have mentioned me first on the billing.
The dog's well-trained, he'll behave himself.
It might bite somebody.
No, he's all right. Look. Lie down!
Stand up!
- Any luck?
- Yes, he's just around the corner.
- Your father?
- No, MacCaulay.
I'm just going to go and see him.
My wife. This is Dorothy Wynant.
How do you do?
I'm sorry we have to rush.
We're stopping at the Normandie for a couple weeks.
Drop around and see us.
- We'd love to. Thank you. Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
Sit down, sugar.
- Leo.
- Yes, sir?
Two cocktails.
Pretty girl.
- Yes. She's a very nice type.
- You've got types?
Only you, darling.
Lanky brunettes with wicked jaws.
Compliments of the season.
Who is she?
Darling, I was hoping
I wouldn't have to answer that.
Come on.
Dorothy is really my daughter.
You see, it was spring in Venice, and I was so young...
I didn't know what I was doing.
We're all like that on my father's side.
- By the way, how is your father's side?
- It's much better, and yours?
How many drinks have you had?
This will make six martinis.
All right, will you bring me five more martinis?
- Leo, line them right up here!
- Yes, ma'am.
What hit me?
The last martini.
- How about a little pick-me-up?
- No.
I can't lie here.
I've got to get up and trim that darn Christmas tree.
What's the idea of pushing me?
Who's that?
Probably Santa Claus.
- How are you?
- Hello, MacCaulay. Come in.
Dorothy told me you were here.
I was going to telephone, but...
That's all right. Sit down, won't you?
- What are you drinking?
- Nothing, thanks.
That's a mistake.
I wanted to see you.
What's Mimi up to, Mr. Charles?
Dorothy's mother.
- Does she have to be up to something?
- She usually is.
Trying one way or another to get money out of Wynant.
I wanted to find out if you were sleuthing for her.
- I haven't been a detective in four years.
- Is that so?
My wife's father died and left her a narrow gauge railway... and a lumber mill and... several other things.
I'm taking care of them.
Say, what's the fuss about?
Is he in hiding?
You know as much about it as I do.
I haven't seen him in three months.
No word at all?
He sends word through his secretary,
Julia Wolf, when he wants money.
I give it to her and she gives it to him.
That's still on?
Excuse me.
Hello?
Just a minute.
For you.
Is there a Mr. MacCaulay in the house?
Pardon me.
Yes? Just a moment.
My wife.
- How do you do?
- How do you do?
What were you saying?
He is? Where is he now?
Very well.
Excuse us.
He's back in town. Wynant.
Yes. He's waiting for me now.
Forgive me, Mrs. Charles, but I've been so upset.
You know, it's no joke working for a man like that...
I guess I'd better be off.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
Goodbye.
- Merry Christmas.
- Same to you.
The next person that says
"Merry Christmas" to me, I'll kill him!
I'm going to telephone that poor child.
At least she'll be glad to know that he's alive.
Asta.
Hello?
How are you?
I'm Mrs. Jorgensen now.
Dorothy? No, she isn't here.
Is it something about her father?
Perhaps I can take the message.
Here she is now.
Hello.
I just wanted to relieve your mind.
He's alive and he's all right.
Thank goodness!
What is it? Has he found him?
Do you know where he's living?
At least I'm glad he's all right.
Thank you for calling. Goodbye.
- What is it?
- Nothing.
That isn't true. It's something about your father. Where is he?
- He's all right, isn't that enough?
- No.
You just want money and you haven't any right to any more.
He made a big settlement on you.
That's gone long ago. I've got to find him!
Where is he?
I won't have you hounding him for any more money!
I can tell you, Mother.
You've been listening on the extension again!
Of course. What's an extension for?
That's right, Gilbert.
Tell Mother. What did he say?
He said Father's in town.
He's been seeing Julia right along.
- That woman!
- She can tell you where Father is.
You couldn't do that.
You wouldn't go to her.
I didn't say I would, but we've got to have money.
Did it ever occur to you that Chris might work?
Now you've hurt his feelings.
You know, you have an Oedipus complex and you won't admit it.
- Please, Gilbert.
- Your trouble is you won't face facts.
I know I have a mother fixation, but it's slight.
- It hasn't yet reached the point of where...
- Stop it, Gilbert!
Don't mind what she says, Chris.
How can I help but mind?
I'm constantly humiliated because I haven't money.
- I'll get some.
- You've said that for weeks.
Why don't you see Julia?
She handles his money.
All right.
- I couldn't go near that woman.
- I said all right.
- Chris, what are you going to do?
- Just what I said I'd do!
- You wouldn't do that.
- Wouldn't I? Just watch me.
Get me Miss Wolf at the Clarkson Apartments.
Hello? Miss Wolf?
This is Mrs. Jorgensen...
- I wonder if I may see you?
- Yes, of course.
Thank you.
- Miss Wolf's apartment, please.
- 9A.
Who's calling, please?
Never mind, Miss Wolf is expecting me.
Miss Wolf.
Quick!
Send somebody up here right away!
Something terrible has happened!
- Julia Wolf, 145 West 55th Street.
- That's me!
Here you are.
- What is it?
- Woman murdered.
Where you been?
- Out making money.
- Let's see it.
I haven't got it yet but I'll get it.
Come on, girls, give out.
Shake the bodies a little. Get the rhythm.
Keep it up. I can't hear any rhythm.
Come on, shake your feet.
Hello, Morelli.
Hi, Studsy.
Didn't you know Julia Wolf?
Yeah. Why?
Somebody just bumped her off.
I thought maybe you'd like to know.
- Yes?
- Telephone, Mr. MacCaulay.
- Who is it?
- The police.
Hello?
Murdered?
Yes, I'll be right over.
- What are you gonna tell them?
- I'm gonna tell them everything!
- You don't think Mr. Wynant...
- I don't think anything... but I heard an awful fight in there a while ago.
- All right, girls.
- Yes, sir. Come on.
When was the last time you gave her money for Wynant?
Yesterday. I gave her $1,000.
- Seen any signs of that, Bill?
- No.
Perhaps it was a robbery.
And her with that sparkler on her finger, and $30 in her purse?
Looks to me like Wynant came to collect and ran into a little trouble.
They haven't seen him downstairs in three months.
There's a lot they don't see around this place.
You haven't seen or heard from him?
I said he hadn't written me.
Then you've heard from him.
- Well...
- Well what?
- He telephoned me today.
- He did?
I wasn't in.
My secretary took the message.
He left word for me to meet him at the Plaza.
- What time was that?
- About 3:00.
- Did you go?
- Yes, but he didn't show up.
His house and shop are closed, and he ain't at any hotel.
So, you seen your duty and you done it, huh?
You gonna stop at that?
No, sir.
I know he'll turn up when he sees this in the papers.
You can't think he did it.
He's not the kind of man...
Do you know what they fought about that night he went away?
I didn't know they had a fight.
Thanks. We'll get in touch with you when we need you again.
- Can I go?
- Yeah, go ahead.
Mr. Guild? Come here.
Here's something very interesting.
There she was lying on the floor, dead.
The police said she'd been killed about 10 minutes before I got there.
I thought you weren't going there.
- You said...
- Never mind.
Did they find any clues?
A gun or fingerprints or anything?
- Not a thing.
- Was there much blood?
Gilbert, don't be so horrible!
Nonsense, she got just what she deserved.
- Did you kill her?
- Gilbert!
Why not?
You had a perfectly good motive.
I hope you won't talk like that when the police get here.
You said they'd finished with you.
They said they'd finished for the present.
I've got my alibi, I was at the public library. Where were you?
Children, I want to speak to Chris alone.
Will you go into the next room?
I'll go.
I'll be in my room.
- Is Mrs. Jorgensen in?
- Yes, come right in.
Mrs. Jorgensen, there are a few points I'd like to clear up.
- Yes, won't you sit down?
- Thank you.
You were in the room with the body from the time it was found until we came?
Why, yes.
Did you...
Did you see anything in Miss Wolf's hand?
No.
Are you sure that at no time you left the room for a moment... that a maid or bellboy mightn't have slipped in and been alone with the body?
I don't think so.
You see, I was so upset,
I hardly knew what I was doing.
The medical examiner seems to think... that the body had been touched.
That someone had forced open the girl's hand after she'd been killed.
Moreover, we found that she had in her possession $1,000 the night before.
I'm sorry I can't help you.
That's quite all right. We'll be going along.
- Thank you.
- Goodbye.
Goodbye.
Could I come and see the body?
I've never seen a dead body.
Why do you want to?
I'm studying psychopathic criminology and I have a theory.
Perhaps this was the work of a sadist or a paranoiac.
If I saw it, I might be able to tell.
Yeah, that's a good idea.
But don't you bother to come down.
We'll bring the body right up to you!
What have you got there?
None of your business.
- You took that money from her hand.
- I didn't.
Then what are you hiding?
A piece of evidence worth a great deal more than that.
- Hand it over to the police.
- I'll do nothing of the sort.
- Very well, then, I will.
- I don't think you will.
It's your father's.
I don't believe you. You're lying!
There!
Now, will you believe me?
After all, I can look at a pretty girl, can't I?
I mean, it's not against the rules that I can't admire them.
Ammunition?
- Come on, stock up.
- No. Let this one ride.
- You better, hard times may get you.
- Who are these amazing people?
Just a lot of old friends.
Romans, countrymen, what do you say?
It's like old times. Remember the fun we had when we were flat broke?
- Don't I?
- Those were the good old days.
Don't kid yourself.
These are the good old days.
I think your wife is great!
Thanks, I wanted you to see her, and I wanted her to see you.
Want to buy a piece of this pug?
I'll sell you 25% of him for $5,000.
- Is he good?
- He's knocking them cold lately.
Ain't afraid of nobody.
Put that down or I'll slug you.
I'll take a large piece of him.
- Having a good time?
- Swell.
Here's that man again.
Ammunition? Very welcome.
Highballs and cocktails.
The long and short of it.
That's a pun.
And punsters should be punished.
For tomorrow may bring sorrow
So tonight let us be gay
More cocktails?
Thank you very much.
I certainly think your husband's great.
I'm glad somebody does.
- Have a cocktail?
- Thanks. Nick Charles here?
- You're his wife?
- Yes. Hey, Nick.
Nice guy. Sent me up the river one time.
Hi, Nick.
Hello, Face.
- Long time, no see.
- Long time.
- I needed the rest.
- Was he a good detective?
I wouldn't know.
The time he caught me was an accident.
- I led with my right.
- Come on, shed the chapeau.
Divest yourself of raiment and join the Yuletide revelers.
Hey, revelers.
I want you to know Face Peppler.
All you got to do is find out who they are.
Don't bother to announce anyone.
Just send them all up.
It's all right. They're all his friends.
Here's the latest on the Julia Wolf murder.
Police found out the secretary was once a gangster's girl.
They're now looking for him.
Wynant, her employer, is still missing.
Can't you fellows ever think of anything but business?
Good case for you, Nick.
Haven't you heard the news?
I'm a gentleman now.
Nick, reporters.
- Salutations, boys.
- You're just the man I want to see.
- I'm from the American...
- I'm from The Mirror.
We want a statement. We hear you're here on the Julia Wolf case.
- I know nothing about it.
- Give us a break, will you?
Listen, I never try to kid reporters.
I'm telling you the truth.
Then why are you in town?
My wife's on a bender.
I'm trying to sober her up.
Waiter, drinks, please.
Into the kitchen, son, and thaw out some ice.
Grandma, what large glasses you have.
- Is he working on a case?
- Yes.
- What case?
- A case of Scotch. Pitch in and help him.
- I've got to order some food.
- Isn't it a waste of energy?
That sounds like an interesting case.
Why don't you take it?
I haven't time.
I'm too busy seeing you don't lose the money I married you for.
Room service, please.
Sounds like a good case.
Girl mysteriously murdered.
Nobody knows who did it.
They haven't found any clues.
No gun, no fingerprints.
I'll bet you dollars to dog biscuits that they never thought of...
I don't want to hear anything about it.
Is that my drink over there?
- What are you drinking?
- Rye.
Yes, that's yours.
Send me up a whole flock of sandwiches.
I'd like to telephone my mother and wish her a merry Christmas.
- Why don't you?
- I haven't got any nickels.
Forget the nickels, there you are.
Go ahead.
Thank you.
Have a hunka?
- I'll have two hunkas.
- Attaboy.
Hello, give me long distance.
I want to talk to San Francisco.
Nick, I've got to see you. Alone.
Hello there, beautiful.
- Come on, I'll take you.
- Look what's come to our party.
Let's cross the ice and get away from the wolves.
- Who's the brunette?
- I used to bounce her on my knee.
Which knee? Can I touch it?
Well, baby, what's on your mind, if any?
- You heard about Julia Wolf?
- Yeah.
There! Nick, you're hurting me.
Of course. That's what I intend to do.
- Are you trying to tell me you did it?
- Yes, I killed her.
Sit down.
I hated her for coming between my mother and father.
She kept me from seeing my father.
I went down to ask her where he was, and she wouldn't tell me, so I shot her.
- How many times?
- Once or twice.
- Where did you hit her?
- I hit her in the heart.
- What did she do?
- She fell over.
- Did she scream?
- Yes.
Which way did she fall?
She fell over backwards.
- Whom are you trying to protect?
- Oh, Nick...
Now, wait a minute.
She was shot four times, fell on her face... she couldn't have screamed, because she was killed instantly.
- Who do you think did it?
- I don't know.
- Where did you get this gun?
- In a pawnshop.
- Is that another lie?
- No, Nick, that's the truth.
Nick.
I'm sorry.
- Don't be silly. Take this drink.
- No, thank you.
- Want to powder your nose?
- Make her take that.
- Where did you get that?
- She brought it in.
- Trying to make me believe she did it.
- What will you do with it?
Nothing, until I find out if it's the gun
Julia Wolf was killed with.
Keep her in here.
Don't let the reporters get to her.
They may believe her.
Isn't that Dorothy Wynant?
Yes. Wait a minute.
She doesn't know anything about it.
- And you said you weren't on the case.
- I'm not.
- Hello, Ma!
- Here, give me that, will you?
- Wait, it's San Francisco. Hiya, Ma.
- Get off the wire, I want to talk business.
Operator, give me Drydock 4-8000.
Don't do that. Don't tell your paper
I'm working on anything, because I'm not.
He's just working on that little girl.
I want to talk to my mother.
- Welcome to...
- Oh, Nick.
I want to talk to you about something very important.
- I know, it's a convention. Come in.
- No.
- Got your roller skates on?
- What?
Let's get rolling.
I'll take you right...
No, here, let's... If you don't mind...
Just step in here.
Well...
I'm sorry, Mimi, it's the only place we can be alone.
Won't you sit down?
Hello, Mr. Wynant.
- Come in and have a drink.
- I don't drink.
Clyde Wynant is absolutely crazy to stay away at a time like this.
No wonder the police think he has something to do with it.
- What do you think?
- I know he hasn't.
But I want awfully to see him.
I want to tell him something important.
And MacCaulay won't help a bit.
He thinks I just want money.
Don't you?
You're always teasing.
- I beg your pardon.
- We're just chatting.
Nick, you will help me find Clyde, won't you?
There are a thousand detectives in New York. Why not hire one of them?
But he knows you.
All you need do is get in touch with him.
Tell him Mimi says everything is all right, but that I've got to see him.
Again, I don't want any part of it.
Now, you take Dorothy home...
- Dorothy. Is she here?
- Yes, she's in there with my wife.
What did you tell them?
- Wait a minute.
- Be quiet.
- Too bad you didn't bring your whip.
- She didn't tell us a thing.
I was so excited.
I didn't realize what I was doing.
Come on, Dorothy, we'll go home.
She doesn't have to go if she doesn't want to.
You can stay here, we'd love to have you.
That's sweet of you. No, thanks, I'll go.
- Where's Gilbert?
- Gilbert? Is he here?
We might as well be living in the lobby.
There's a physiological and psychological angle... in my father's relationship with Julia that the police overlooked.
I think it settles the whole question.
You see, my father was a sexagenarian.
- He was?
- Yes, he admitted it.
A sexagenarian?
But we can't put that in the paper.
- Why not?
- You know how they are. Sex?
- Just say he was 60 years old.
- Is that what that means?
Of course.
Hey, that's my hat!
Come and get it, while it's hot.
Come on, give us a break.
- You owe me after that.
- I swear I don't know anything about it.
Telephone, Nicky.
I thought it was the door.
Hello.
Mr. Charles?
I'd like to lay a proposition before you.
I can't discuss it over the telephone... but if you'll give me a half-hour of your time...
It's about Julia Wolf.
Hello?
What is it?
Some guy trying to sell me insurance.
- Where's Miss Wynant?
- She's gone.
- Which way did she go?
- Out the back door.
- You mean the little brunette?
- Yes.
I'm sorry.
Thanks, I'm engaged for this one.
Face, no, don't do that.
I want to talk to Ma.
So you think you're a fighter?
So what?
So listen, worm.
Oh, Nicky, I love you.
Because you know such lovely people.
What?
- You asleep?
- Yes.
Good, I want to talk to you.
That's jolly.
Wouldn't you like to do a little detecting once in a while just for fun?
- Can't you get to sleep?
- No.
Maybe if you took a drink it would help.
No, thanks.
Maybe it would help if I took it.
Everybody says you're a grand detective.
They were kidding you.
I'd like to see you work.
Tomorrow morning, I'll get you a whole lot of detective stories.
I know, but that girl's in a tough spot.
There's nothing I can do to help her.
She thinks you can. It wouldn't hurt you to try and see if you could.
Darling, my guess is...
Wynant killed Julia and Dorothy knows about it.
The police will catch him without any help from me.
I think I would like that drink.
My darling...
I'll give you your Christmas present now, if you'll give me mine.
- At breakfast.
- It's Christmas now.
Breakfast.
What're you gonna give me?
I hope I don't like it.
You'll have to keep them anyway.
Because the man at the aquarium said that he wouldn't take them back.
Did you hear a knock?
Yes.
It might be something important.
I'm sure it is.
- Is Mr. Charles here?
- Yes.
I gotta talk to him, that's all, but I gotta do that.
All right, come in.
You wait here, I'll tell him you're here.
- What in the name of...
- Someone to see you, dear.
That's good.
I was afraid I'd have to go to sleep.
Get up out of bed. Let me straighten this up. You're worse than an infant.
Funny, those blankets must be a little cockeyed.
Right, Asta?
There.
You've got the funniest look on your face I ever saw in my life.
Hurry up, go on out there.
That man's waiting for you.
I gotta talk to you.
I want you to tell me something, and give it to me straight. Get me?
Would you mind putting that gun away?
My wife doesn't care, but I'm a very timid fellow.
You idiot.
Asta, come here.
All right, shoot. I mean... what's on your mind?
You don't have to tell me you're tough.
I heard about you. I'm Joe Morelli.
- I've never heard about you.
- I didn't knock Julia off.
All right, you didn't.
I ain't seen her in three months.
We was all washed up.
Why tell me?
I had no reason to hurt her.
She was on the up and up with me.
But that dirty Nunheim got sore with her because I clicked and he didn't.
And he put the finger on me.
This is all swell, but you're peddling your fish in the wrong market.
I've got nothing to do with this.
Studsy Burke says you used to be okay, that's why I'm here.
How is Studsy?
I didn't know he was out of stir.
He's all right, he'd like to see you.
What's the law doing to me?
Do they think I did it or is it just something else to pin on me?
If I knew I'd tell you.
I don't know anything about it.
Ask the police.
That'd be about the smartest thing
I ever did.
I put the police captain in a hospital for three weeks over an argument.
They would like for me to come in and ask questions.
They'd like it down to the end of their blackjacks.
I comes to you on the level.
Studsy says you're on the level.
Why don't you be on the level?
I am on the level.
If I knew anything I'd be...
- What's that?
- I don't know.
That makes this your party.
- Open up! Police!
- Why, you two-timing...
Okay, Bob.
Nora.
- Give me that bottle.
- What knocked her out?
I did. She was in the line of fire.
Somebody call a doctor.
Here, baby. Sweet.
- Help me up on the bed with her, will you?
- All right.
Are you all right?
You darn fool.
You didn't have to knock me out.
I knew you'd take him, but I wanted to see you do it.
There's a girl with hair on her chest.
- Nicky.
- What?
- Are you hurt?
- No, he just grazed me, that's all.
- You are. Somebody get a doctor.
- There's one called already.
- Get into bed. Are you all right?
- Sure, I can't even feel it.
I'll get some towels.
Pretty close.
- Have a shot, will you?
- There you are. But you'll be okay.
- Tough luck!
- Shut up!
- Here, darling, use this.
- Now, baby, it's only a scratch.
- Do you want a drink?
- What do you think?
How did you people happen to pop in here?
We hear this is getting to be a meeting place for the Wynant family.
We figured we'd stick around just in case the old boy himself should show up.
Then we see this bird sneak in, and we decide to come up.
And lucky for you we did.
- Yeah, I might not have been shot.
- You know this monkey?
- That dirty little rat Nunheim...
- Shut up!
- Is he a friend of yours?
- I never saw him before.
What did he want with you?
He wanted to tell me that he didn't kill Julia Wolf.
- What's that to you?
- Nothing.
What did he think it was to you?
Ask him.
I'm asking you.
Keep on asking.
- Frisk the dump.
- Not without a warrant.
So you say! Go on, Bob.
Tough?
Now look here, Charles, the both of us are going about this in the wrong way.
I don't want to get tough with you.
I'm sure you don't want to either.
Just one more question I want to ask you.
Are you willing to swear to a complaint for this guy's plugging you?
That's another one I can't answer now.
Maybe it was an accident.
What's that man doing in my drawers?
Here you are, Lieutenant.
You got a pistol permit?
No.
- Ever heard of the Sullivan Act?
- That's all right. We're married.
- This gun yours?
- No.
- Whose is it?
- I'll have to try to remember.
Okay, we got plenty of time.
I guess I'll have to ask you a lot more questions than I figured.
We'll come around tomorrow when you're feeling better.
All right, come on, boys.
Where's Asta? Asta.
Come here.
You're a fine watchdog.
He's got more sense than you have.
I'm glad you're not on this case.
On it? I'm in it, they think I did it.
Well, didn't you?
I hope you're satisfied.
Where am I?
You're not in a shooting gallery!
But, sugar, this is the nicest
Christmas present I've ever had.
You act as though it were the only
Christmas present you ever had.
Where did you get that wristwatch?
It's a Christmas present.
- Yeah? Who gave it to you?
- You did.
You must admit I've got pretty good taste, haven't I?
Have you finished with this?
Yes, and I know as much about the murder as they do.
I'm a hero.
I was shot twice in the Tribune.
I read where you were shot five times in the tabloids.
It's not true. He didn't come anywhere near my tabloids.
Bull's eye!
Hello. Who is it? Send him right up.
Who was that?
Mr. MacCaulay.
The Mallorys.
Oh, dear, I forgot all about them.
Aren't you hot in that?
Yes, I'm stifling. But it's so pretty.
The Kirbys.
Is that another Christmas present?
- Did I give it to you?
- Yes.
I'm spoiling you.
Why, Nicky, this is from Clyde Wynant.
He says, "Will you take charge of investigation on Julia Wolf murder?
- "Communicate with Herbert MacCaulay."
- Let me see.
- Where's it from?
- Philadelphia. Well, then, he didn't do it.
I don't know.
He wouldn't ask you to handle it if he were guilty, would he?
Your guess is as good as mine, baby.
Nicky, take the case.
You take it. I'm too busy.
- How do you do?
- Good morning.
I'm afraid this isn't a very merry Christmas for you.
- He's all right.
- Good.
- How are you, MacCaulay?
- I'm fine.
- Sit down.
- You're coming along better than I am.
- I hope you're not seriously hurt.
- No, just a scratch. I've forgotten it.
- What a delightful toy.
- That's Asta's Christmas present.
I got word from Wynant this morning.
So did we, I mean, Sherlock here.
- Darling, will you...
- Pass you your drink? Yes.
Thank you.
What are the chances of getting you to do what he wants?
- Slim.
- Oh, Nick.
Well, would it help if I could persuade him to meet you?
It might.
He gave me a code message to insert in the Times... in case I wanted to get in touch with him.
- I don't suppose it would hurt to put it in.
- I've done that already.
He should appear, you know.
It doesn't look well, his staying away at a time like this.
- Police.
- For me?
Hello.
Where?
Allentown?
Yes.
When is the next train?
Right. I'll get that.
Wynant's tried to commit suicide.
They want me to go down and identify him.
I guess this changes the whole story, doesn't it?
That looks like an admission of guilt.
And I had such hopes.
I thought if you got on the case you'd be able to clear him.
I thought that Mimi, the way she acted,
I was sure that...
Oh, well.
There's no use thinking about that now.
I'm sorry to have wasted so much of your time.
Goodbye. Have a merry Christmas.
Thank you. Same to you.
- Bye-bye.
- Goodbye.
Asta, is your balloon busted? So is mine.
- What's the matter with you?
- The mystery's all gone.
- I was hoping you'd find out who did it.
- Maybe I will.
- If Wynant...
- I don't believe he did it.
- Why don't you?
- No reason, just a hunch.
But I'm going to find out.
I'm tired of being pushed around.
Come on, Dr. Watson, let's go places.
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
Excuse me.
Not a nice trick you're trying to pull, running out like this... when I was giving you time to rest before I questioned you.
What? About the gun?
That never was a gun.
Don't waste time talking about that.
Look here, man to man, are you working on this case?
- Man to man, I'm not.
- But he's interested.
I'd rather have you working with us than against us.
- That suits me.
- Then it's a bargain.
Anything you want to know?
- What about the suicide?
- That was a phony.
- The boys didn't even have to go down.
- I thought it might be.
Now they'll think every thin man with white hair is Wynant.
- Do you think Wynant did it?
- I don't know.
He planned something.
He closed up his apartment and shop.
- Were you there?
- Yes, but I couldn't find a thing.
I figure it like this.
Wynant went to Julia's apartment and found Morelli there.
Sees she's two-timing him, there's a fight.
He doesn't do anything because of Morelli.
Lets his lawyer give her money to give to him so she'll think it's blown over.
Then when she isn't expecting it, he lets her have it.
- No proof?
- Nothing as yet to cinch it.
- $50 will get you $100 that he didn't do it.
- What do you mean?
For one thing, he was too absent-minded to hold a grudge.
- Who's your candidate?
- I haven't gotten that far yet.
Not everything points to Wynant.
How about your alibis?
They're all okay.
Mrs. Jorgensen, the boy, Dorothy,
MacCaulay, even Morelli.
We had to let him go.
- What about Jorgensen?
- I'll check on that.
- Mrs. Charles, this must be dull for you.
- Dull? I'm sitting on the edge of my chair.
- What about Nunheim?
- He's all right.
We know all about him.
He does some stooling for us occasionally.
Did you know he's been hanging around Julia?
No.
- He's holding out on you.
- Let's look into that.
Taxi!
This may get a bit rough, baby.
I think you better let us go alone.
Catch me letting you go alone!
Grant's Tomb.
Taxi!
- Who is it?
- John.
Hello, Lieutenant.
Sit down, Nick.
I wasn't expecting you, Lieutenant.
You said you'd phone.
Have a shot?
What's the idea of telling me you knew the Wolf girl just by sight?
That's all I did, Lieutenant.
That's the God's truth.
Maybe I said hello to her.
"How are you," or something when I saw her... but that's all I did, Lieutenant.
That's the truth!
You open your mouth and I'll pop a tooth out of it.
- Is that so!
- Yeah!
Cut it out!
We didn't come here to watch you two roughhouse.
She's driving me nuts.
She's been ragging me all day.
Maybe if you'd quit running around after other women... you wouldn't have trouble with this one.
That's a lie.
Anybody that says that is a liar!
Do you want to take a poke at him?
I didn't mean you, mister.
Come on, she can't hear you now.
You know how it is.
A guy knocking around...
You'd have done better to have told me that in the beginning.
Where were you the afternoon she was knocked off?
You don't think
I had anything to do with it!
Where were you?
- Marion!
- Wait a minute!
I don't like crooks.
And if I did, I wouldn't like stool pigeons.
And if I did like stool pigeons,
I still wouldn't like you.
Marion, don't go!
Wait a minute! I'll do anything you say!
I'll behave! Don't go!
Let me get after her.
Let me bring her back, please.
I'll bring her right back.
I'll do anything!
I'll answer anything you want!
Sit down!
We didn't come here to watch you two dance around the Maypole.
Where were you when the girl was killed?
I don't know. I can't remember!
I can't tell you just offhand.
Maybe I was down at Charley's shooting pool.
Maybe I was up here, I don't know.
She'd remember!
How'd you like to be thrown in the can on account of not remembering?
Just give me a minute. I'll remember.
You know I ain't stalling.
I always come clean with you.
Sure, I remember.
I wouldn't blame you if you threw me in the can.
I remember where I was.
That's the afternoon...
Wait a minute, I'll show you.
What do you think of it?
I think we're on the right track.
Who are you phoning?
I'm phoning your office so they can send out a man to trail him.
- I want to see where he goes.
- Trail him? Trail who?
Nunheim.
Give me that phone.
Bill, pick up Nunheim, tell the boys.
He just left, went down the fire escape.
Cover the Grand Central and Pennsylvania Stations.
Check all airports and steamship terminals.
What's that?
No, have Lefty radio all the cars.
He was dressed in a black pair of pants, yes.
How should I know if his underwear's embroidered?
What?
Listen.
They've been questioning me again today, asking me what more I know... where I was that day.
Now, wait a minute, I ducked out on them.
Now, look, if you want me to play dumb anymore, I want $5,000 more.
$5,000 and I'll blow town today.
Okay. Where?
All right, right away.
See that you're there, and bring it with you.
Arthur Nunheim, honorary member.
No, not a thing.
Find out about that bullet yet?
Yes, sir, it's the same gun that killed Julia Wolf.
And how are your folks?
Hello?
How are you?
No, we didn't find a thing. It's your wife.
And, Lieutenant, I've got something.
I've been doing a little detecting on my own.
That flatfoot I married thinks he's smart, but I'm just one jump ahead of him.
That's swell, Mrs. Charles.
How did you like Grant's Tomb?
It's lovely.
I'm having a copy made for you.
What have you got, baby?
I can't quite hear you.
We'll be right up.
She's up at Mimi's.
Jorgensen's disappeared.
Well!
Chris may be at the club or somewhere.
I can't see that that's important.
You should have told them he disappeared.
But he has nothing to do with it.
That's not for you to decide.
Everybody's under suspicion.
Especially running off like this.
The police will want a description.
- Is this his picture?
- I tell you, he didn't do it.
They'll want more than your word for that.
All right, I'll tell them who did do it.
Mother!
And I'll give them proof.
- Dorry.
- Oh, Tommy!
Please, don't cry.
I can't help it. You don't know.
You can't go through any more of this.
Get together your clothes and skates.
We'll go to my family in the country.
No, I can't.
But you've got to get your mind off all this.
Darling, you've been so sweet.
There's only one thing you can do for me and that is to go.
- Go?
- Go and never see me again.
- What are you talking about?
- Please, you can't get mixed up in this.
Do you think I care about that?
You don't understand.
You don't know what's going to happen.
All I know is that I want you to marry me right now.
I can't marry you. I can't ever marry you.
Dorothy!
How'd you like to have a couple of murderers for children?
That'd be fun, wouldn't it?
Perhaps they'll murder each other and keep it in the family.
Father should have killed Gilbert and me.
Then we wouldn't have had all this to go through.
You're talking like a crazy person.
Why not? I am crazy, all our family is.
Dorothy, listen to me.
I love you, do you understand that?
I love you.
Please go.
Sleuthing isn't much fun after all, is it?
I feel awfully sorry for that girl.
Find anything?
She's ready to talk.
It wouldn't do any harm, though, to find out where he is.
You know, you're wrong about all of your children being murderers.
I studied the Mendelian Law of Inheritance... and their experiments with sweet peas.
According to their findings, and they're pretty conclusive... only one out of four of your children will be a murderer.
Now, the thing for you to do would be to just have three children.
No, that might not work.
The first one might be the bad one.
I'll have to look that up.
You needn't bother looking that up.
I'm not going to get married, and I'm not having any children.
From now on, I'm just out for the ride.
I took it from her hand.
It was Mr. Wynant's watch chain.
I wanted to protect him.
Well, I guess that cinches it, eh, Charles?
He killed them both, the Wolf girl and Nunheim.
$50 will still get you $100.
That's enough for me.
Extra!
Wynant's ex-wife produces murder evidence!
I wish they'd stop that.
It gives me the fidgets.
I wonder if they'll find him?
He must be in New York.
Where do you think you're going?
- I'm taking Asta for a walk.
- He's just been for a walk.
We're going sightseeing, aren't we?
What's that?
That's known in burgling circles as a flashlight.
Nick, what are you up to?
What is this?
- Looks like a hold up.
- What are you going to do?
I'm going down to Wynant's shop to find out why it's closed.
Why wouldn't he close it? He went away.
He went away when I knew him, but never closed his shop.
I got a hunch.
You think he's hiding there?
I don't know, but this is giving me the itch.
- I'm going to find out.
- Nick, I won't have you going down there.
It was you that got me into this.
I know, but this is different.
He's a crazy man. He might kill you.
He won't kill me.
I've got Asta to protect me.
All right, go ahead. Go on, see if I care.
It's a dirty trick, bringing me to New York, just to make a widow of me.
- You wouldn't be a widow long.
- You bet I wouldn't.
- Not with all your money.
- Fool.
Well, any port in a storm.
Goodbye, sugar.
Take care of yourself.
Sure I will.
Don't say it like that.
Say it as if you meant it.
- I do believe the little woman cares.
- I don't care.
It's just that I'm used to you, that's all.
If you let anything happen to him, you'll never wag that tail again.
You sure this is the place you wanted to come to?
Yes.
You don't want me to wait, do you?
Certainly. You're not afraid, are you?
No, I guess not.
All right, Asta.
Come on, Asta.
Asta, you're not a terrier, you're a police dog.
No, Asta. No.
Asta, get away from there. Come on.
Come on.
Hello, It. Guild, please.
Hello, John?
This is Nick Charles.
I'm up in Wynant's shop.
Well, I've found something.
It's a body.
Stick them up.
Turn around.
Now, don't make a move, or that dog will tear you to shreds.
All right, you can come out now.
He won't hurt you.
Up to your old tricks, Tanner?
You're Mr. Charles, aren't you?
- Yes, how did you get in here?
- I have a key.
I use to work here till they closed up the shop.
You worked here?
Yes, Julia Wolf got me a job here as bookkeeper.
Well, that's a hot one. Bookkeeper.
Where did you learn bookkeeping?
That last time you sent me up
I learned bookkeeping in Sing Sing.
I figured it would be an in for me somewheres.
Somewheres they might leave the safe open?
Honest, I never touched that safe.
Them bonds that was missing,
Julia Wolf took them.
Trying to put it off on her?
Mr. Charles, she did.
That's why he got sore at her and killed her.
Listen, Mr. Charles, can I take my hands down?
Okay.
I did do a bit of chiseling.
I come to bring the money back and fix up the books.
Easy.
It's all right, Mr. Charles, it's just a pocketbook.
I didn't want him to find out and come after me.
You can save that. Tell it to the police.
Police?
- Move over, will you?
- Haven't you got that yet?
You wouldn't know anything about this?
No, sir.
Take him down to Central.
I'll talk to him later.
Wonder what Wynant had against this one.
Quicklime.
Mind if I look these over?
No, go ahead.
Just rolled them up and threw them in.
Lucky thing for us these weren't entirely eaten up.
Extraordinarily lucky.
No identification.
He must have weighed 250 pounds, if he weighed an ounce.
Here's something.
Rubber-tipped. Must have been lame.
Who wouldn't be, carrying all that weight around?
I should say he stood about 5'11 ", wouldn't you, Doc?
About.
"D.W.R."
"R."
Say, that case you worked on, that man who threatened to kill Wynant...
What was has name?
Rosebreen.
Say, could this be the man?
I never saw him.
I don't think anybody ever saw him.
He threatened to kill Wynant for an invention he stole, wasn't that it?
Yes, but we figured that was blackmail.
Just the same, he wouldn't mind getting him out of the way, would he?
Doc, how long would you say this body has been here?
Can't say offhand, at least a couple of months.
Couple of months?
That's just when Wynant closed the shop.
That's an open book.
Wynant killed this guy and planted him here.
Julia knew about it, so he killed her.
And Nunheim caught him at that, so he bumped him off.
Boys, I guess we'll be going along.
Nick, you did a swell job.
You wouldn't mind paying me that $100 now, would you?
Wait until you catch Wynant.
I'll get him, all right.
You can bring that stuff all out to the car.
- You'll run it through the fluoroscope?
- Yes.
- Do you mind if I come down and see it?
- Not at all.
I'm very interested in that body.
Step right over here, Mr. Charles.
There's the bullet he was killed with, see?
What's that?
Just an old piece of shrapnel.
Shrapnel?
Maybe he was in the war.
That would account for his cane and his limp.
Yes.
Hey, doggie, come on.
Look down at the floor.
Come, look down at the body.
Now, Mr. Charles, this way, please.
- Get that out of here!
- Just a moment.
Mrs. Charles, this way, one family group.
It'll be lovely for the woman's page.
- Have the police an idea where Wynant is?
- No.
Do you think they'll find him?
I know they will.
- Got anything else to say about the case?
- No.
What about this Rosebreen?
Sorry, I don't know anything about it.
Can't you tell us anything about the case?
Yes, it's putting me way behind in my drinking.
- Let's get this in.
- Thanks, Nick.
What's your next step, Nick?
Right back to California.
We've got to rest up from this vacation.
We'll see you before you go.
- Bye-bye.
- Goodbye, boys.
Goodbye.
Back to California?
My soul, woman, I give you three murders, and you're still not satisfied.
- Well, if you insist.
- Well, I don't insist.
No, I wanted you to stay here and find Wynant.
- I did find him.
- What do you mean?
- He was down in his shop.
- Nick!
That was his body that was down there.
You'd better lay off that liquor.
That's a fact.
Wynant's body?
Yes.
Don't you want something to eat?
Everybody thought it was Rosebreen.
That's what they think,
Guild and the rest of them.
They just take it for granted that it's another one of Wynant's victims.
Guild's hot-footing around now looking for Wynant.
That's all that troubles him.
What makes you so sure it was Wynant's body?
Well, several things.
Hello, Fred?
We're hungry again.
And lots of onions.
And coffee.
You're driving me crazy. What things?
What things make you so sure?
Well, take the clothes, for instance.
They were very carefully preserved... and the body was just as carefully destroyed.
Whoever killed him was counting on one thing... that skeletons all look alike.
- Well, they do, don't they?
- Sure.
You won't get another swallow until you say.
I happened to remember he had shrapnel in his shin.
It bothered him.
I looked for it and found it. Give me.
- How long has he been dead?
- Couple of months.
Then he couldn't have committed those murders.
Smart gal.
Wynant's dead. Does Dorothy know?
No, nobody knows but you.
I'm going to tell her.
You can't do that.
She's going crazy.
She'd rather know he was dead...
I can't help it! I can't tell a soul.
- I haven't even told Guild.
- Why?
I want to lie low until I get the whole dope.
- I'm not going to go off half-cocked.
- What are you going to do?
I'm going to get the murderer.
And I've got an idea.
- Do you want to see me take him?
- Yes.
- Have you a nice evening gown?
- What's that got to do with it?
Have you got a nice evening gown?
Yes, I've got a lulu. Why?
I'm going to give a party and invite all the suspects.
The suspects? They won't come.
Yes, they will.
I'll get Guild to issue the invitations.
Who do you think did it?
Mimi.
Mimi?
Mimi, Jorgensen, Morelli, Tanner...
What were you doing on the night of October 5, 1902?
I was just a gleam in my father's eye.
Now, let's see, you at the head.
And you on my right.
Thank you.
I'll put MacCaulay here, where he can help me.
There ought to be a lady next to him.
I've got Mimi.
I don't think Mimi likes him.
Then it's Mimi.
Who goes next to me?
Suppose you leave that open.
See what you draw.
Put Dorothy there.
And then Tommy?
No, I'll keep Tommy on this side.
Put Gilbert next.
Nice boy. Who's next to Gilbert?
That bird that shot me.
Morelli? Well, this is going to be good.
I'll put that slick gigolo husband of Mimi's here.
- Have they found him?
- They found him.
Who goes next to him?
I'm leaving that open.
I've a feeling that he won't come alone.
Where are you going to put Guild?
At the end, where he can keep an eye on things.
That's the place for him when the trouble starts.
And the little friend of Nunheim's, the frying-pan juggler, there.
Nick, are you sure one of these people is the killer?
Positive.
Nick, I can't stand the suspense.
Which one of them did it?
I wish you'd tell me.
I wish you'd tell me.
- Mr. Charles.
- Yes, Henri?
I'm afraid these men will interfere with your beautiful dinner.
Really?
- How's it going, boys?
- Swell.
How's this?
Yes, monsieur.
Terrible.
That's all right.
Your men will serve the dinner.
These boys are just here in case.
I think they'll be all right.
Hello, Mrs. Charles.
Hello, Mr. Guild.
Well, I see you're all set.
- Do you think they'll come?
- Most of them are here already.
The rest will be here.
Don't worry about that.
My men are picking them up.
- Bring them in, boys.
- You're a great help to a hostess.
I wish had you at all my dinner parties.
Welcome.
Let go of my arm, you big lug!
Say, what's the idea anyway?
I ain't done, nothing! It's you?
We only wanted you to dine with us.
If you think I'm going to talk, you're crazy.
'Cause I was mixed up with a stool pigeon don't mean I'm one, too!
Absolutely not.
Will you show the lady a chair?
On your way, sister, on your way.
- Did you find Dorothy?
- She'll be here, don't worry.
What you need is a drink.
I'd think you guys would be tired of picking me up.
- Pipe down.
- Step this way, kid.
- What's up?
- Come on.
- Outrageous!
- How do you do, Mrs. Jorgensen?
- How dare you send a detective after us?
- We wanted to be sure you'd get here.
I told him we couldn't come.
We have an engagement.
We're going to the theater.
Nicky's putting on a little show of his own.
You must stay.
Please, come and have a cocktail.
- What's the gag?
- You know as much as I do.
- Have a cocktail.
- No, I don't care for any.
- I said, have a cocktail!
- I guess he wants us to have a cocktail.
Hi, MacCaulay.
Take off your hat and coat and join our festivities.
Why, Tanner, what's this?
They had me in jail last night,
Mr. MacCaulay.
Don't think a thing of it.
Come in. Take off your things.
What is it, Mr. Charles?
I wanted you to be here.
I've got something, I think.
Come in, Tanner.
- Where's Dorothy?
- I don't know.
I thought she was with you.
She left this afternoon.
No, she wasn't with me. Here she is now.
We got them. Picked them up at the Pennsylvania Station.
Come on in.
- Hello, Nick.
- Dorothy.
- A party?
- Yes.
Celebrating Father's third murder?
- They were making a getaway.
- We were doing nothing of the sort.
You can't get away with this.
How right you are.
Take this gentleman's hat and coat.
Music! Much music!
You know, Nick interrupted me at a very important time of my life.
I was just about to take my first false step.
I'm getting out of here.
No, you stay here.
If I stay,
I know I'm going to take a poke at him.
Then I insist you stay.
Here's Jorgensen.
Why, Chris!
How do you do? I'm Nick Charles.
- Chris, where have you been?
- None of your business.
Chris, I swear it isn't my fault.
I tried to keep you out of this.
Take your hands off him.
Do you hear me?
Chris, what does this mean?
Sorry we were late, but we had to break down the door.
Chris, how could you?
Do come in and make yourselves comfortable.
Just take the gentleman's hat and coat.
Come, friends, and get it.
Tommy, how would you like to be end man?
Mr. Jorgensen, next to Tommy, if you will.
Dorothy, I believe you and Mr. Quinn are over here.
MacCaulay, here if you will.
Tanner, down there.
Mrs. Jorgensen, next to Mr. Jorgensen.
I'm Mrs. Jorgensen!
Put it over there, sister.
I was Mrs. Jorgensen before you were.
Mimi, you're here.
Waiter, will you remove the illumination, please?
Ladies and gentlemen, be seated.
Now, my friends, if I may propose a little toast.
Let us eat, drink and be merry, for tomorrow, we die.
You give such charming parties,
Mr. Charles.
Thank you, Mrs. Charles.
Perhaps you'll tell us now why we're here.
We're here because
I have some very important news.
What is it?
Just this.
Clyde Wynant did not kill Julia.
He didn't kill Nunheim or anyone.
What are you talking about?
It's in the papers.
You mean, he didn't kill them?
- What did I tell you?
- Is that why you brought us?
I'd like to believe that.
- I knew they'd pull some monkey business.
- With money, you can do anything.
Quiet, let him have his say out.
What makes you say that, Nick?
I saw him last night.
- Where, Nick?
- You did?
That's nothing. I saw him myself.
You see? I told you.
- That's a hot one.
- What did I say? It's a frame-up.
Quiet. When did you see him?
Last night.
He came to see me in my apartment.
Is that so? What did he say?
Nothing much.
He wanted to know how I was and how the children were.
What kind of clothes was he wearing?
A brown suit, brown shoes, a white shirt... a grayish tie with reddish-brown, or brownish-red, dots in it.
- Tell them, Ed.
- I saw him, too.
He was wearing a green suit and a white tie...
What are you saying?
You weren't even there.
I know, but I saw him.
- Where did you see him?
- I was gazing in my crystal.
Waiter, will you serve the nuts?
I mean, will you serve the guests the nuts?
Mimi, I'm afraid you're lying.
You see, I really did see Wynant last night.
- Are you kidding?
- No.
- What's the idea of holding out on me?
- You saw him yourself.
I saw him?
That was his body buried in the shop.
Nick!
It's terrible to have to tell you this way, but your father is dead.
He's been dead for three months.
Pardon me, you have something on your coat.
- Darling, please don't cry.
- Tommy!
It's terrible, I know, but isn't it better that way?
Here, I'll take care of her.
- Tommy, you sit here.
- Waiter, will you kindly remove that?
What, no one eating?
Mimi, it hasn't affected your appetite.
Because I don't believe a word of it.
What's your proof?
A piece of shrapnel in his shin.
If he didn't do it, who did?
The murderer is right in this room, sitting at this table.
You may serve the fish.
- At this table?
- Eat something, you fool.
- Well, aren't you going to tell us who it is?
- I don't know.
I thought, if we all had a little get-together... we might be able to find out.
Nice food, isn't it?
Yes, it's the best dinner I ever listened to.
You say you don't know who did it, but who do you think?
Morelli...
- You can't pin this one on me!
- Sit down!
- Am I the fall guy?
- Sit down, or I'll use a sap on you.
I only want to ask you a question.
- Morelli, you knew Julia.
- Yeah.
Was she gypping Wynant?
- She don't say so, but I figure.
- Why do you say that?
Well, once I wanted $5,000, she give it to me like that, cash.
Thanks.
Three months ago... the night that Wynant caught you in Julia's apartment, Morelli... he discovered that Julia was cheating on him and splitting with some man.
That man was...
Tanner...
I'm so sorry, Tanner.
Don't you want some wine?
No, really, Mr. Charles,
I had nothing to do with this.
- I told you...
- That's all right, Tanner, that's all right.
You're driving me crazy.
Now, let me see, where was I?
Oh, yes.
Wynant went to find the man he accused of having cheated him.
That man, knowing that he was caught dead to rights... and with prison staring him in the face, took the only way out.
He killed Wynant.
- Mr. Jorgensen?
- Yes?
You're not eating.
Don't you care for oysters?
Why, I was just listening to what you had to say.
Good.
This murderer is very clever.
He studied this whole thing out very carefully.
You'd understand that, wouldn't you, Gilbert?
Yes! No!
He planned the whole thing beautifully.
After he killed Wynant... he wired MacCaulay using Wynant's name...
- and told him to close up the shop.
- Which I did.
Naturally.
Then he destroyed all of Wynant's clothes, with the exception of his watch chain.
He figured that someday that might come in handy.
Then he took Wynant's body and buried it with another man's clothes... a fat man's clothes, to throw us off the track.
He even put in a belt buckle with an "R" on it... hoping we would think it was Rosebreen... an old enemy of Wynant's who disappeared years ago.
Morelli, would you mind holding your knife some other way?
You're worrying Gilbert.
If that knife is missing,
I'll look for it in your back.
After our hero had killed Wynant, he had a brilliant idea.
He realized that he and Julia could still collect money.
Wynant was supposed to be out of town, no one knew where.
So our hero wrote letters to MacCaulay, signing Wynant's name... so that MacCaulay would continue to send the money to Julia.
He even telephoned MacCaulay.
You remember that first day you came to see me?
He telephoned he was in town?
Yes, he called while I was out.
Yeah, wasn't he slick about that?
That same afternoon,
Julia telephoned him.
She said you were coming, Mimi.
- I wanted to ask about Mr. Wynant.
- Exactly.
And our hero got terrified.
He was afraid Julia would break down and tell you that he had murdered Wynant.
So he went to Julia, and he killed her.
And he left Wynant's watch chain in her hand.
- Is this true?
- I don't know.
- Then why are you saying it?
- It's the only way it makes sense.
I hope you're well.
His plan was working beautifully.
Everybody believed that Wynant was in town... and that he had done it.
There was just one hitch.
A bird named Nunheim, your friend.
Nunheim had gone to call on her.
He heard the shots.
He saw the murderer leave.
He knew who did it.
If he knew, he didn't tell me!
You can't drag me into this!
Our hero had paid Nunheim once to keep his mouth shut.
And when Nunheim threatened him again, he bumped him off.
He was very clever.
Everybody, even our astute friend Guild, thought that Wynant was alive... and that he was the murderer.
You can skip that.
But our hero had just one weak link in his chain.
The telegrams and phone calls were all very well... but no one had actually seen Wynant.
So our hero picked on poor Mimi here to strengthen his case.
Mimi is the only one at this table who can tell us who the real murderer is.
Mimi, who was it who told you to say you saw Wynant?
- Nobody told me, I did see him!
- Why don't you let my mother alone?
What were you paid to stick to that story?
It isn't a story, it's true!
I did see him! He isn't dead!
You're lying, Mimi.
But you'd do anything for money.
You're getting a good price for saying you saw Wynant.
You figure you won't get anything if he's dead.
- I'm not going to stay here to be insulted!
- Sit down.
MacCaulay, you drew up Wynant's will.
Mimi was cut off, wasn't she, if she remarried?
I have no right to answer that.
- How about it, Tanner? Isn't that true?
- Yes.
You shouldn't let that keep you from telling the truth.
- Mrs. Jorgensen.
- Yes?
Were you ever divorced from Chris Jorgensen?
No.
So you see, Mimi, under the law, you've never remarried.
You're still one of the heirs.
So what are you holding out for?
A few crummy dollars, when you can get the whole estate?
Remember the other two who were mixed in with him on this...
Julia and Nunheim.
When he thought they might spill something, he bumped them off.
You ought to know he's not going to take any chances on you.
What do you want to do, be next on his list?
Why, you dirty little...
- Well, there's your murderer: MacCaulay.
- MacCaulay?
Sure, do you want me to wrap him up in cellophane?
Get in there! What's the matter?
MacCaulay? I can't believe it!
Well, I'll be a monkey's uncle!
Nicky, he might have killed you!
What's the matter? You sorry he didn't?
I'm glad you're not a detective.
Not a hip in a carload.
Well, here's to you two!
And to you two, too!
- Why, the rat, he can't top us.
- No.
- Shall I keep these fresh for you?
- Yes.
My gracious, it's 1:00.
- It's what?
- It's 1:00.
No, baby, it's 11:00.
It is not, it's 1:00. I set my watch ahead.
Yeah, you set your watch ahead at 12:00, didn't you?
Look, you're in New York, for instance.
The sun rises in New York.
San Francisco is
3,000 miles west of New York.
You're wrong!
The sun does not get to San Francisco till three hours after New York.
Yes, baby?
Does that mean that it's bedtime?
Well, that's a thought.
Come on, sugar, leave us do it.
Asta, are you ready?
- And flights of angels sing thee to thy rest.
- Same to you, Nick.
Good night.
I can never thank you for all you've done.
Don't be silly.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Gosh, darling,
I thought they'd never leave.
I thought you'd never leave.
Baby, the sun rises in the east, it sets in the west.
If it's 12:00 in New York, automatically, it's...
Nicky, put Asta in here with me tonight.
Oh, yeah?
CAPTIONING MADE POSSIBLE BY
TURNER ENTERTAINMENT GROUP
THE WINNER!
WHAT A FIGHT,
JOHNNIE!
OH, WHAT A...
THIS IS THE HAND...
THE LEFT ONE.
IT PACKS
DYNAMITE.
IT'S THE HAND!
JUST A MINUTE,
FELLAS, WILL YOU?
JUST A MINUTE.
GOOD BOY!
LET'S GET HIM
TO HIS CORNER.
COME ON. COME ON.
Man: SAY, YOU'RE
A SWELL MANAGER.
Second man: COME ON.
WHERE'S JOHNNIE? WHERE IS HE?
SNAP OUT OF IT.
ARE YOU ALL RIGHT?
HEY, BOYS,
A LITT ROOM.
HEY, JOHNNIE,
COME ON, BOY.
COME ON. YOU GOT TO SAY
A FEW WORDS TO THE PUBLIC.
OH, I DON'T KNOW
WHAT TO SAY.
THAT THING
SCARES ME.
OH, COME ON. GO AHEAD. SAY SOMETHING.
ARE YOU
LISTENING, MOM?
I WON, MOM, AND THERE
ISN'T A MARK ON ME,
NOT A MARK.
I'LL BE HOME SOON,
SWEETHEART,
BUT DON'T
WAIT UP FOR ME.
SAY, LISTEN. THIS ISN'T
A PRIVATE TELEPHONE LINE.
YOU GOT TO SAY SOMETHING TO THE PUBLIC.
WELL, HELLO, FOLKS.
EXCUSE ME
FOR MENTIONING MOM,
BUT I KNOW YOU'D DO THE SAME THING
IF YOU HAD A MOTHER LIKE MINE.
WELL, ANYWAY, I WANT
TO THANK YOU FOLKS
FOR ROOTING FOR ME ON MY
WAY UP TO THE CHAMPIONSHIP.
WELL, ANYWAY, I GUESS
WE'RE ALL GLAD IT'S BACK
IN THE GOOD OLD USA,
WHERE IT BELONGS.
I GUESS THAT'S ALL.
Man: ATTABOY, JOHNNIE!
Second man:
THE NEW CHAMPION!
GREAT FIGHT,
JOHNNIE.
YOU'RE A WORLD'S
CHAMPION.
THANKS,
INSPECTOR.
CONGRATULATIONS, DOC.
Man: I TELL YOU,
THIS KID WILL NEVER...
INSPECTOR ENNIS HERE?
YEAH, OVER THERE.
AND HE NEVER
FOUGHT AGAIN.
HA HA HA!
OH, HELLO, PHELAN.
GOT IT?
GOT A SURPRISE
FOR YOU, CHAMP.
WHAT'S THIS, MY BIRTHDAY OR SOMETHING?
YOU REMEMBER THIS?
MY WATCH.
GEE, I'M GLAD
YOU FOUND IT.
MOM GAVE IT TO ME.
SAVED UP ALL YEAR FROM
MY HOUSEHOLD MONEY FOR IT.
HA HA!
MOTHER'S DAY AGAIN.
YEAH. WE PICKED IT UP AT
A SIXTH AVENUE HOCK SHOP.
WE GOT THE GUY
THAT LIFTED IT, TOO.
YOU KNOW, THIS WATCH
MEANS MORE TO ME
THAN THAT DIAMOND BELT
I WON TONIGHT.
NICE WORK.
IT WASN'T ME.
IT WAS BREWSTER.
THEY JUST SENT ME
UP WITH IT.
YEAH. YOU SEE, PHELAN IS
TOO BUSY DOWN AT THE MORGUE
TRYING TO KEEP THE STIFFS
FROM ESCAPING TO MAKE A PINCH.
HA! ISN'T THAT
RIGHT, MONTY?
IF YOU SAY SO, INSPECTOR,
IT MUST BE RIGHT.
Johnnie: LET DOC
KNOW WHO THE GUY IS,
AND HE'LL BE
WELL TAKEN CARE OF.
DO YOU MIND STRAPPING
THIS ON, MY GOOD FELLA?
YOU KNOW, THERE ARE
NO POCKETS IN THIS SUIT.
NO.
THE OTHER WRIST.
SURE. THAT'S RIGHT.
THE OTHER WRIST.
I SHOULD'VE KNOWN, YOU BEING A SOUTHPAW.
FIRST HOLE.
YOU BET.
FIRST HOLE.
THAT'S SOME WRIST
YOU GOT THERE.
YEAH. I GUESS I GOT
PLENTY WRIST THERE.
SAY, I WAS AT
THE FIGHT TONIGHT.
YOU SURE GOT A FUNNY WAY OF
HANDLING YOURSELF IN THERE,
LEFT-HANDED LIKE THAT
WITH YOUR RIGHT STUCK OUT.
THAT'S THE FIRST THING
ONE NOTICES ABOUT A MAN,
HIS STANCE,
MORE THAN HIS FACE.
YOU KNOW, A LOT OF PEOPLE LOOK ALIKE,
BUT NO TWO PEOPLE EVER
STAND JUST THE SAME WAY.
THAT'S A GREAT THEORY
YOU GOT THERE, PHELAN.
IS THAT HOW YOU
IDENTIFIED BARNEY SCOFIELD?
YES, INSPECTOR.
YOU'D BETTER GET ALONG
BACK TO THE MORGUE.
THOSE DEAD ONES MAY START TROUBLE
IF YOU LEAVE THEM ALONE TOO LONG.
OK, INSPECTOR.
A NEW ONE
YOU'RE RIDING?
NEW ONE? HA!
WHY, HE'S BEEN WITH THE
DEPARTMENT EVER SINCE I HAVE,
ONLY HE'S
ON MORGUE DETAIL,
WHILE I'M
AN INSPECTOR.
FUNNY THING.
HE SOMEHOW GOT THE IDEA
HE WAS A GREAT DETECTIVE,
MADE ALL KINDS
OF PINCHES,
TILL ONE DAY, HE MADE THE WRONG ONE.
TALKING
ABOUT PHELAN?
YEAH. REMEMBER HIM PUTTING
THE FINGER ON BARNEY SCOFIELD?
AND FINDING OUT
HE WAS WRONG
AFTER THEY BURNED
SCOFIELD IN THE CHAIR.
NO FOOLING.
HE DID THAT?
ALL RIGHT, JOHNNIE.
LET ME KNOW WHEN
YOU'RE READY TO GO.
I GOT A POLICE ESCORT
OUTSIDE FOR YOU.
OK, INSPECTOR, AND
THANKS FOR EVERYTHING.
THEY'RE YOURS, MR. CHAMP, AND
YOU CAN CARRY AWAY THE BOX.
WRAP IT UP. HERE'S MORE OF YOUR PUBLIC.
HELLO, JOHNNIE.
GREAT FIGHT, BOY.
THANKS A LOT. I GOT
TO BE RUNNING AWAY NOW.
THERE'S A GANG OF
NEWSIES WAITING OUTSIDE
FOR A FEE I PROMISED THEM
AFTER THE FIGHT, SO...
THERE'S A GRAND GUY.
WINS A CHAMPIONSHIP,
AND THE FIRST THING
HE THINKS ABOUT
IS THE NEWSIES.
AND HIS POOR, OLD,
GRAY-HAIRED MOTHER.
Â¶ "M" IS FOR THE MILLION
THINGS SHE GAVE ME Â¶
YOU THINK THAT'S
FUNNY, DON'T YOU?
LAY OFF, JOHNNIE.
HE'S CANNED.
DON'T GET SORE. I DIDN'T MEAN ANYTHING.
OK.
JUST BECAUSE A GUY DOESN'T
DRINK AND FOOL AROUND WITH WOMEN
AND RESPECTS HIS MOTHER, YOU DON'T
HAVE TO MAKE A MONKEY OUT OF HIM.
DON'T PAY ANY ATTENTION TO HIM, JOHNNIE.
THE REST OF US
THINK YOU'RE OK.
Man: WE SURE DO,
JOHNNIE.
GOOD NIGHT.
SO LONG,
JOHNNIE BOY.
GOOD NIGHT,
JOHNNIE.
THERE GOES ONE GRAND GUY.
AM I RIGHT,
OR AM I RIGHT?
ONE GRAND GUY.
Announcer: TONIGHT YOUTH
WAS SERVED AGAIN
WHEN YOUNG JOHNNIE BRADFIELD WON THE
LIGHTWEIGHT CHAMPIONSHIP OF THE WORLD
IN THE SEVENTH ROUND
OF A SCHEDULED 15-ROUND BATTLE.
JOHNNIE FIGHTS
LIKE A REAL CHAMPION.
WHILE HIS RIGHT JABS
WITH LIGHTNING PRECISION,
HIS LEFT IS PACKED
WITH DYNAMITE.
RED DYNAMITE,
I'D SAY.
SOME PARTY,
DOC, HUH?
HA HA HA!
YEAH.
Announcer:
LIVE AT HOME WITH MOTHER
AND STAY AWAY
FROM BOOZE AND WOMEN
IS THE NEW CHAMP'S
FORMULA.
SAYS YOU,
BUT HE'S RIGHT ABOUT THE
WOMEN, ISN'T HE, JOHNNIE?
NO WOMEN
IN THE CHAMP'S LIFE,
JUST LITTLE GOLDIE.
YEAH.
WHAT'S
THE MATTER, DOC?
YOU'RE SORE BECAUSE
YOU AIN'T GOT A GIRL?
NO.
I AIN'T SORE.
COME ON.
POUR US A DRINK.
YEAH, YEAH. A BIG ONE FOR ME, TOO, DOC.
WELL, YOU
GOT A DRINK.
WELL, GIVE ME
SOME MORE.
I WANT MUSIC.
COME ON. CHEER UP, DOC.
YOU'RE MY MANAGER,
AIN'T YOU?
WE WON THE CHAMPIONSHIP,
DIDN'T WE?
WE WERE RIGHT
UP THERE ON THE MONEY.
YOU'RE GONNA HAVE
A LOT OF DAMES.
YEAH. HERE.
NOW I'VE GOT
SOMETHING.
COME ON. COME ON. GET UP. LET'S DANCE.
COME ON. GET UP.
I WANT TO FINISH
THIS DRINK.
YOU DON'T HAVE
TO FINISH THAT.
COME ON. LET'S DANCE, DANCE, DANCE.
WILL YOU PUT THAT
DOWN? YOU'VE HAD ENOUGH.
NOW COME ON. DANCE.
OH, DON'T!
OH, JOHNNIE, NO!
HA HA!
HA HA HA!
I KNOCKED OUT
JOHNNIE BRADFIELD!
AW, WHO IS THAT?
MAYBE IT'S BUDGIE.
I TOLD HER TO COME UP.
AW, WHAT DID YOU
WANT TO DO THAT FOR?
DON'T BE THAT WAY, BABY.
SHE'S NOT GONNA STAY.
WELL, DARLING,
HERE WE ARE.
SO GOOD YOU
COULD COME.
THIS IS MY FRIEND
CHARLIE MAGEE.
HELLO. COME ON IN. I WANT
YOU TO MEET EVERYBODY.
THIS IS DOC WARD.
DOC, THIS IS BUDGIE
MASSEY AND MR. MAGEE.
HIYA, DOC.
AND THAT IS JOHNNIE.
JOHNNIE! OH, JOHNNIE,
AM I CRAZY TO MEET YOU, EH?
DID YOU HEAR ME YELLING
FOR YOU TONIGHT?
I ALMOST BROKE UP
THE JOINT,
DIDN'T I,
CHARLIE, HUH?
YOU CERTAINLY DID.
JOHNNIE,
IS THAT FOR ME?
WELL, IT'S
STRAIGHT RYE.
OH, I CAN TAKE IT.
I TOLD YOU
I COULD TAKE IT, SEE?
HEY, WHY DON'T GIRLS
BE PRIZEFIGHTERS?
ANYONE AROUND HERE
WANT TO FIGHT, HUH?
HEY, JOHNNIE.
JOHNNIE, HEY.
YOU WANT TO FIGHT
WITH ME?
HEY, JOHNNIE,
COME ON.
SHOW ME
HOW TO FIGHT.
COME ON. LOOK AT
THAT LEFT OF MINE.
PRETTY GOOD, HUH?
PRETTY GOOD, HUH?
HOW ABOUT YOU?
BUDGIE, WHY
DON'T YOU RELAX?
AW, SHUT UP.
HEY, COME ON.
HIT ME CHAMP.
I'M WIDE OPEN.
HA HA HA!
OW!
WILL YOU
CUT IT OUT?
OOH, THE CHAMP
CAN'T TAKE IT.
PIPE DOWN,
WILL YOU, BUDGIE?
YOU'LL WAKE
MR. BRADFIELD'S MOTHER.
SHE'S A SOUND
SLEEPER.
SURE. SHE'S
A SHLOUND SHLEEPER.
SHE'S A SHLEEP
SHLOUNDER.
WHY DON'T YOU
GO HOME?
OH, JOHNNIE, DON'T BE LIKE THAT.
BUDGIE WAS ONLY KIDDING,
WEREN'T YOU, HONEY?
WELL, I DON'T LIKE THAT KIND OF KIDDING.
SHE'S
SLUG NUTTY.
LISTEN. YOU CANT TALK
THAT WAY TO MY FRIENDS.
FRIENDS,
NOTHING.
NOBODY HAS GOT
ANY FRIENDS.
COME ON, HONEY.
GIVE ME
ANOTHER DRINK.
WHAT DO YOU MEAN,
"NOBODY HAS GOT FRIENDS"?
AIN'T I
YOUR FRIEND?
YEAH,
YOU'RE MY FRIEND.
FOR 50%, YOU'RE
MY FRIEND.
THAT AIN'T RIGHT.
YEAH. YOU'RE MY FRIEND
NOW BECAUSE I'M UP,
BUT YOU AIN'T
FOOLING ME.
YOU'D TAKE MY ROLL,
MY WATCH, AND MY GIRL
IF YOU THOUGHT YOU
COULD GET AWAY WITH IT.
IF YOU WERE SOBER, YOU
WOULDN'T TALK LIKE THAT.
EH, GO ON.
IT'S A SUCKER'S GAME.
YOU MEAN,
THE FIGHT RACKET?
I MEAN,
BREATHING, LIVING.
NOBODY DOES ANYTHING UNLESS
THERE'S SOMETHING IN IT.
IF YOU DO,
YOU'RE A SUCKER.
EXCEPT
YOUR MOTHER, HUH?
HA HA HA!
THAT'S A LAUGH.
MY MOTHER.
MY DEAR, OLD MOTHER.
I HAVEN'T GOT
A MOTHER.
THAT GRAY-HAIRED OLD
LADY STUFF IS JUST A LINE,
A LINE FOR SUCKERS.
WELL, THAT'S
A GOOD LINE, AT THAT.
SURE IT IS.
SO IS THE ONE ABOUT
BOOZE AND WOMEN.
WHY, I'VE LAPPED UP
MORE BOOZE
AND RAN AROUND
WITH MORE WOMEN,
AND THE MOTHER ANGLE,
WHY, THAT'S JUST STANDARD.
CAN YOU DIE?
THAT JOHNNIE BRADFIELD
AIN'T GOT A MOTHER.
SHE WAS JUST A PROP
TO CATCH SUCKERS.
WELL, THERE'S A STORY FOR
YOUR PAPER, CHARLIE, HUH?
YEAH, SURE.
WHAT WAS THAT?
WHAT SHE SAY?
SHE SAID PLENTY. THAT MUG IS A REPORTER.
REPORTER?
HEY, CAN'T YOU TAKE
A JOKE, JOHNNIE?
THAT'S RIGHT,
THE "MORNING GRAPHIC."
YOU WOULDN'T PRINT
WHAT JOHNNIE JUST SAID
IN YOUR PAPER,
WOULD YOU?
NOW, WOULDN'T I?
CAN YOU THINK
OF A BETTER STORY?
WELL, SO LONG,
FOLKS, AND THANKS.
JUST A MINUTE, MAGEE,
YOU'RE GONNA
STICK AROUND A WHILE.
OH, YEAH?
YEAH!
YOU DAMES GO
POWDER YOUR NOSES.
YOU WOULDN'T
DO ANYTHING.
NOT UNLESS WE HAVE TO.
SCRAM.
LISTEN, MAGEE. YOU
AIN'T GONNA PRINT THAT.
I'D BE A SUCKER
IF I DIDN'T.
AND I'D BE A SUCKER IF I
DIDN'T TAKE A POKE AT YOU,
AND THAT GOES FOR EVERY TIME I SEE YOU.
Doc: JUST A MINUTE, MAGEE.
YOU'RE NOT
LEAVING YET.
OH!
WHAT GOES ON OUT HERE? JOHNNIE!
JOHNNIE,
ARE YOU HURT?
NO. HE'S ALL RIGHT.
CHARLIE!
CHARLIE, WHAT HAVE
THEY DONE TO YOU?
CHARLIE. CHARLIE.
ARE YOU ALL RIGHT?
HOLY...
WHAT?
NOTHING.
HE'S DEAD.
HE'S DEAD!
SIT DOWN! SHUT UP!
WHAT DID YOU
DO THAT FOR?
SHE HAD IT
COMING TO HER.
COME ON. LET'S BLOW.
WE CAN'T.
JOHNNIE IS OUT COLD.
WE GOT TO.
GET YOUR WRAPS.
COME ON. HELP ME GET HIM OUT OF HERE.
BUT WHERE
ARE WE GOING?
OUT TO MACKEY'S.
THERE'S NOBODY THERE.
OH. GRAB THOSE
HATS AND COATS.
ALL RIGHT.
GET IN THERE FIRST.
GO AHEAD.
GRAB HIS ARM.
TRY AND MAKE
A SUCKER OUT OF ME.
COME TO YET?
NO. HE'S STILL DEAD
TO THE WORLD.
SWELL. LET'S GET HIM IN THE HOUSE.
HERE.
BETTER HAVE A SHOT.
THANKS.
WE'LL NEED IT BEFORE
THE NIGHT IS OVER.
WHAT DO YOU MEAN?
COME HERE.
WE GOT TO SCRAM OUT OF HERE, AND QUICK.
NO. I'M GONNA STICK.
I GOT TO STICK.
ALL RIGHT. YOU STICK. IT'S
ALL THE THANKS YOU'LL GET.
DOC, ARE YOU
SURE HE DID IT?
I'M TELLING YOU, HE SOCKED
HIM WITH THAT LEFT OF HIS,
AND WHEN HE
DOESN'T GO DOWN,
HE HITS HIM A TERRIFIC WALLOP
OVER THE HEAD WITH A WHISKY BOTTLE.
THEN THE GUY GOES DOWN AND
CONKS HIMSELF OUT FOR KEEPS.
THE WHISKY BOTTLE? THAT
DON'T SOUND LIKE JOHNNIE.
I'M TELLING YOU, HE'S A
KILLER WHEN HE'S DRUNK.
THERE'S NO TELLING WHAT THAT
DAME WILL DO WHEN SHE WAKES UP.
WE'RE ALL IN IT,
YOU AND ME, TOO.
WELL, WE DIDN'T
DO ANYTHING.
YEAH? WELL, WE WERE
THERE, WEREN'T WE?
DO YOU THINK HE'S GONNA
SAY WE DIDN'T DO ANYTHING?
DO YOU THINK HE'S GONNA TAKE
THE RAP WHILE WE WALK OUT?
BUT WE DIDN'T
DO ANYTHING.
OH, SHUT UP.
YOU SAID THAT ONCE.
I'M EXPLAINING
TO YOU, AIN'T I?
IT AIN'T, "DID YOU DO ANYTHING?"
IT'S, "CAN YOU PROVE IT?"
CAN YOU PROVE
YOU DIDN'T DO NOTHING?
WELL, JOHNNIE
WOULDN'T SAY ANYTHING.
NO. HE'D GO TO THE CHAIR
FOR YOU, WOULDN'T HE?
YOU JUST HEARD HIM SAY
HE'S NO SUCKER.
WE NEED
TO STICK TOGETHER,
YOU AND ME, KID.
HE SAID YOU'D TAKE
HIS ROLL AND HIS WATCH.
YEAH, AND HIS GAL.
I'M NO SUCKER,
EITHER.
COME ON.
UHH...
OH!
DOC. DOC,
I'M SCARED.
I'M SCARED
STIFF.
THERE'S NOTHING TO BE
SCARED ABOUT, HONEY.
WE'LL BE ACROSS
THE BORDER LIKE THAT.
THEN WE'LL HIDE OUT UNDER COVER
UNTIL THIS WHOLE THING BLOWS OVER.
COME ON.
COME ON, DOC.
GET SOMETHING HOT.
OK, BABY.
Radio announcer:
LICENSE NUMBER 2A-1243.
LOOK FOR JOHNNIE BRADFIELD,
POSSIBLY TRAVELING
WITH MANAGER DOC WARD
AND HIS GIRL, GOLDIE WEST.
REPORTER KILLED
IN HIS APARTMENT.
DOC, THEY'RE
AFTER US.
DON'T LET THEM
GET US, DOC.
IT'S ALL RIGHT,
BABY.
I WON'T.
I WON'T.
Announcer: PICK UP
GRAY CONVERTIBLE PHAETON
LICENSE NUMBER 2A-1243.
THOSE COPS,
THEY'RE AFTER US.
EXTRA, EXTRA.
"RUNAWAY KILLER DEAD IN
SMASH-UP!" READ ALL ABOUT IT.
EXTRA, EXTRA. READ ALL
ABOUT IT. PAPER, MISTER?
EXTRA, EXTRA. "RUNAWAY
KILLER DEAD IN SMASH-UP!"
READ ALL ABOUT IT.
EXTRA, EXTRA.
OH, FOR CRYING OUT LOUD.
I DIDN'T HIT HIM WITH NO BOTTLE.
I THOUGHT
YOU WERE DEAD.
Johnnie:
NO, I AIN'T DEAD.
WHAT ARE YOU TALKING
THAT WAY FOR?
YOU KILLED
THIS MAN MAGEE.
I DIDN'T KILL HIM.
WELL, LISTEN. WHAT ARE
YOU DOING HERE, THEN?
I WANT TO ASK YOU WHAT ALL
THIS IS ABOUT, SAYING I'M DEAD.
THE WRISTWATCH.
YEAH. I KNOW.
I CAN READ.
I READ ABOUT IT
IN THE PAPERS, TOO.
HE STOLE MY WATCH,
MY GIRL, AND MY CAR.
EH, SERVES HIM RIGHT.
I'M SORRY
ABOUT GOLDIE.
SHE WAS OK.
SHE WOULDN'T HAVE
DOUBLE-CROSSED ME. IT WAS HIM.
LISTEN. DO YOU KNOW
THAT YOU'RE GUILTY
OF THE MURDER OF
THIS NEWSPAPER MAN?
WHAT ARE YOU TALKING
THAT WAY FOR?
I ARTED TO HIT HIM,
AND THEN I DON'T REMEMBER.
YOU STARTED TO HIT HIM,
AND HE'S DEAD,
AND HE, A NEWSPAPER MAN.
YOU'RE AS GOOD
AS DEAD.
WHAT ARE YOU TALKING
THAT WAY FOR
YOU'RE AS GOOD
AS DEAD.
WHAT ARE YOU...
OFFICIALLY,
YOU'RE DEAD.
YOU'RE THE GUY THAT
BURNED UP IN THE CAR.
YOU CAME TO ME
FOR ADVICE.
THIS IS MY ADVICE.
STAY DEA
LET JOHNNIE BRADFIELD
STAY DEAD.
YOU BE SOMEBODY ELSE.
BE, UH, JACK...
JACK DORNEY.
NOW GET OUT
OF NEW YORK.
YEAH, YEAH, BUT I...
I NEED SOME MONEY.
I GOT 10 GRAND
IN THE NATIONAL TRUST BANK.
YOU CAN'T GO TO THE BANK.
DON'T YOU UNDERSTAND?
IT'S IN A VAULT. ALL I
HAVE TO DO IS OPEN THE BOX.
I GOT THE KEY RIGHT ON
ME. NOBODY WILL SEE ME.
NOBODY WILL SEE YOU.
WELL, LET ME HAVE THE
KEY. I'LL GET IT FOR YOU.
WOULD YOU DO THAT?
WHY, SURE.
HERE. GO TO
THIS ADDRESS.
STAY THERE UNTIL
YOU HEAR FROM ME.
KEEP OUT OF SIGHT.
I HAVEN'T ANY MONEY.
I HAVEN'T GOT A CENT.
WELL, HERE.
HERE'S $10.
WHAT AM I GONNA
DO WITH $10?
WELL, WHAT DO YOU THINK?
YOU'RE NOT GOING TO NIGHTCLUBS.
OK, AND WHEN WILL I
HEAR FROM YOU, TOMORROW?
YEAH, TOMORROW.
THIS IS THE ADDRESS?
YEAH.
NOW, DON'T BE SEEN
BY ANYBODY.
I GET YOU.
IF YOU'RE SEEN, YOU'LL
BE TRIED FOR MURDER.
DON'T TALK THAT WAY,
WILL YOU?
GROW A BEARD. DO SOMETHING
TO CHANGE YOUR APPEARANCE.
OK. I'LL DO SOMETHING.
I DIDN'T
FIGURE THAT...
"AND WE FIND THE DEATH OF
JOHN BRADFIELD AND GOLDIE WEST
"DUE TO ACCIDENTAL CAUSES
WHILE EVADING ARREST
FOR THE MURDER
OF CHARLES MAGEE."
WELL, THE PAPERS
CAN'T SQUAWK THIS TIME.
A GUY IS MURDERED,
AND 6 HOURS LATER,
WE NOT ONLY DISCOVER
WHO COMMITTED THE CRIME,
BUT WE ALSO KNOW
THAT HE'S DEAD.
Man: CAN YOU
IMAGINE THE HOWL
IF THIS HADN'T
HAPPENED?
KILLING A REPORTER
IS ONE THING
THE PAPERS
WON'T STAND FOR.
BOY, YOU SAID IT.
WELL, THAT'S THAT.
CAN I SEE YOU
A MINUTE, INSPECTOR?
SURE. GOT A CLUE
ON THE MAGEE MURDER?
THAT'S IT EXACTLY.
I DON'T THINK
THE GUY THAT BURNED UP
WAS JOHNNIE BRADFIELD,
AT ALL.
OH, YOU'RE NUTS.
REMEMBER ME PUTTING THAT
WATCH ON HIS RIGHT HAND?
WELL, THE GUY THEY BROUGHT IN
HAD THAT WATCH ON, ALL RIGHT,
BUT IT WAS
ON HIS LEFT HAND.
SO WHAT?
CAN'T A GUY
CHANGE HIS WATCH
FROM HIS RIGHT WRIST TO HIS
LEFT, FOR THE LOVE OF MIKE?
WELL, THERE ARE SOME THINGS A
GUY ALWAYS DOES THE SAME WAY,
LIKE THE SIDE HE STARTS
TO SHAVE ON THE MORNING
AND THE WAY HE
STARTS TO DRESS.
SAME THING
WITH A WRISTWATCH.
OH, PHELAN, YOU'VE BEEN
HANGING AROUND STIFFS SO MUCH,
YOU'RE SEEING THINGS.
THAT'S WHAT...
SEEING THINGS.
I TELL YOU
ANOTHER THING.
THAT WATCH WAS
IN THE THIRD HOLE.
WHEN I STRAPPED IT ON
JOHNNIE BRADFIELD'S WRIST,
I PUT IT
IN THE FIRST HOLE.
YOU HEARD HIM TELL ME TO DO IT HIMSELF.
SO ONE WRIST IS BIGGER
THAN THE OTHER.
DIDN'T YOU EVER
HEAR OF THAT?
MAYBE.
ALL I ASK IS THAT YOU REOPEN
THE CASE AND ASSIGN ME.
REOPEN THE CASE?
NOW GET THIS, PHELAN.
JOHNNIE BRADFIELD
MURDERED MAGEE,
AND IT WAS JOHNNIE
BRADFIELD WHO BURNED UP
ON THE HIGHWAY THIS MORNING AT 5 A.M.
NOW LISTEN, CHIEF.
LISTEN TO WHO?
THE TROUBLE WITH YOU,
PHELAN, IS,
THAT EVER SINCE YOU RAILROADED
THE WRONG GUY TO THE HOT SEAT,
YOU BEEN SEEING THINGS.
YOU'RE SCREWY.
WHY DON'T YOU RETIRE?
I'LL TELL YOU WHY.
BECAUSE I'M
NOT THROUGH.
OH, YES, YOU ARE,
BUT YOU DON'T KNOW IT.
I'LL SHOW YOU IF I'M THROUGH. YEAH? HOW?
I'LL PROVE THAT GUY THEY BROUGHT
IN ISN'T JOHNNIE BRADFIELD.
YOU WILL, HUH?
LET ME TRY.
YOU'RE AFRAID TO.
WHO, ME?
YES! YOU!
FOR 10 YEARS, YOU'VE
BEEN PICKING ON ME
JUST BECAUSE
I MADE A MISTAKE.
WELL, MAYBE THIS
IS YOUR MISTAKE.
MAYBE IF I PROVE IT, THEY'LL
PUT YOU ON MORGUE DETAIL
LIKE YOU DID ME.
I'D LOVE TO SEE IT.
ALL RIGHT, PHELAN.
YOU GOT YOURSELF
AN ASSIGNMENT.
THANK YOU,
INSPECTOR.
NOW, BRING HIM BACK
DEAD OR ALIVE.
WHAT DID I
TELL YOU, FELLAS?
HE'S CUCKOO,
JUST PLAIN CUCKOO.
I'VE BEEN CALLING YOU
FOR TWO DAYS.
I'VE BEEN BUSY.
I WANT TO GET OUT OF
HERE. YOU GOT MY MONEY?
YES. I GOT YOUR MONEY RIGHT HERE.
THERE'S 50, 100,
WHAT'S THIS?
THAT'S YOURS.
WHAT DO YOU MEAN,
THAT'S MINE?
NOW, IF I WERE YOU,
I'D PUT AS MUCH DISTANCE
BETWEEN MYSELF AND THIS CITY...
WHERE'S MY MONEY?
WHERE'S MY 10 GRAND?
THE 250 YOURS. THE REST OF IT IS MY FEE.
WHAT DO YOU MEAN? WHERE'S
THE REST OF MY 10 GRAND?
I'VE EXPLAINED IT
TO YOU. IT'S MY FEE.
WHAT ARE YOU TRYING TO DO,
MAKE A SUCKER OUT OF ME?
WHAT DO YOU
THINK I AM?
YOU HAND OVER THE REST OF
THAT 10 GRAND, OR I'LL...
OR YOU'LL WHAT? WELL,
YOU'LL GO TO THE CHAIR.
NOW LISTEN TO ME, AND
I'LL GIVE YOU SOME ADVICE.
DON'T USE YOUR FISTS,
OR YOU'RE COOKED.
IF YOU TAKE THAT
COCKEYED STANCE OF YOURS
WITH YOUR RIGHT STUCK OUT
AND YOUR LEFT PULLED WAY BACK,
SOMEONE IS GONNA
SPOT YOU.
WHAT YOU DON'T SEEM
TO UNDERSTAND, DORNEY...
WHAT?
JACK DORNEY.
REMEMBER THAT?
JACK DORNEY.
THINK YOU CAN
REMEER THAT?
JACK... DORNEY.
WHAT I STARTED
TO SAY, DORNEY...
DORNEY.
DON'T TAKE THAT
COCKEYED STANCE OF YOURS.
DON'T USE
YOUR FISTS AT ALL,
NOT AT ALL.
YOU'LL BE KILLING
SOME OTHER MAN,
OR IF YOU DON'T,
YOU'LL GIVE YOURSELF AWAY.
YOU'LL
GIVE YOURSELF AWAY.
ONCE THEY GET YOU,
YOUR LIFE ISN'T WORTH...
BUT DO AS I SAY,
JACK DORNEY.
STAY AWAY FROM PLACES.
STAY AWAY FROM ALL PLACES,
OUT OF SIGHT, AFRAID.
FROM NOW ON, YOU'VE GOT TO BE AFRAID.
GET ME?
YEAH. YEAH.
I GET YOU.
THAT'S MY ADVICE,
AND IT'S WORTH 10 GRAND.
HERE.
NOW BEAT IT, SUCKER.
WHAT CAN I DO
WITH THIS?
WELL, IT'LL SEE
YOU A LONG WAY,
AND WHAT DO YOU
WANT MORE FOR?
YOU DON'T WANT TO USE ANY
TRAIN WHERE THERE'S PEOPLE.
YOU DON'T WANT TO USE AN AUTOMOBILE.
YOU GO HOP A FREIGHT SO
IT WON'T COST YOU ANYTHING
AND KEEP THE MONEY
FOR FOOD.
THAT OUGHT TO LAST
YOU AT LEAST 6 MONTHS.
HEY, YOU GOT YOUR
FOOT ON MY MONEY.
THAT'S WHERE
YOU'RE WRONG, BUDDY.
THAT'S MY MONEY,
NOT YOUR MONEY.
HEY,
WAIT A MINUTE.
TAKE IT EASY, MEL.
OH, SHUT UP.
WHAT'S THE MATTER
WITH YOU?
NOTHING.
NOTHING.
TAKE A WALK.
HEY, PEGGY.
HEY, PEGGY. COME HERE.
WHAT'S THE MATTER?
LOOK. ANOTHER TRAMP.
HEY, PIPE THE DUDE,
WILL YOU?
IMAGINE THAT... ONE LESS TREE TO PICK.
WELL, THAT WOULD
BE SWELL, HUH?
JUST ANOTHER CITY SLICKER ON THE MOOCH.
WHAT DO YOU THINK?
HEY!
WHAT'S THE IDEA?
LOOK. WE GOT COMPANY.
A DAME?
WHERE'S THE DAME?
NO DAME, YOU DOPE.
WHY DON'T YOU CUT IT
OUT? YOU PICK ON ME.
I WONDER IF THERE'S A CHANCE THAT...
YES. THERE'S
A BIG CHANCE.
THERE'S A LADDER
BACK THERE
AND SOME BASKETS
AND SOME DATES,
AND AFTER YOU PICK 3
BASKETFULS, YOU GET A HANDOUT.
OH,
I'M NO TRAMP.
HAW HAW.
I KNOW.
YOU'RE A BIG OIL MAN,
AND YOU CAME ALL THE WAY DOWN
HERE TO STUDY ABOUT ANTICLINE.
I SUPPOSE YOU HAVE A
LIMOUSINE PARKED DOWN THE ROAD.
SUPPOSE I TOLD YOU I
DID HAVE A LIMOUSINE,
TWO OF THEM.
LOOK. I KNOW
ALL THE ROUTINES,
BUT IF YOU WANT TO EAT,
YOU GOT TO PICK.
I GOT A HUNCH I WOULDN'T CARE
FOR THE MEALS HERE, ANYWAY.
HMM.
ALL RIGHT WITH ME.
YOU KNOW, THE WALDORF
IS RIGHT AROUND THE CORNER.
YOU OUGHT
TO TRY THE CAVIAR.
THANKS. I'M A SUCKER FOR CAVIAR.
GRANDMA!
GRANDMA RAFFERTY!
QUICK!
OH, NOW WHAT'S
THE MATTER?
OH! OH!
HERE, HERE.
WHAT'S THE MATTER?
HE'S FAINTED.
WELL, COME ON. GET HIM OUT
OF HERE. WE DON'T WANT HIM.
NOW LOOK OUT. HE'S
SAGGING IN THE MIDDLE.
COME ON.
NOW GET HIM UP.
GOLDIE.
IS THAT YOU, GOLDIE?
NO, IT ISN'T GOLDIE.
WHERE AM I?
WHERE'S DOC?
TAKE IT EASY, PAL.
I WANT TO KNOW.
WELL, YOU'RE
AT RANCHO RAFFERTY,
ABOUT 20 MILES FROM
COLINGA, ARIZONA,
IF THAT MEANS
ANYTHING TO YOU.
ARIZONA.
YEAH.
YEAH, YEAH, YEAH.
I GET IT.
I MUST HAVE
TAKEN THE COUNT.
LONG COUNT, I'D SAY.
YOU'VE BEEN OUT
FOR TWO DAYS.
WHERE WAS I HIT?
IN THE STOMACH.
I DON'T THINK YOU'VE
EATEN FOR A WEEK.
HERE.
WHAT'S THAT?
IT'S MILK.
EVER HEAR OF IT?
HA! SURE, SURE.
THEY MAKE UMBRELLA HANDLES OUT OF IT.
UGH.
NICE AND QUIET
AROUND HERE, HUH?
MM-HMM.
NOBODY MUCH AROUND?
NOPE. JUST ME AND GRANDMA AND THE KIDS.
WHAT DO YOU DO
WITH YOURSELF ALL DAY?
RANCH.
I DON'T GET IT.
YOU'RE NOT THE KIND THAT...
NO.
YOU DON'T LOOK LIKE THE
RANCHER'S DAUGHTER TO ME.
LOOK. SUPPOSE YOU
TELL ME ABOUT YOURSELF.
ALL RIGHT.
LISTEN. YOU DO THAT AGAIN,
AND YOU'LL BE OUT FOR A WEEK.
I TOLD YOU ONCE
I WASN'T GOLDIE.
WELL, YOU CAN'T
ARREST ME FOR TRYING.
WELL,
HERE WE ARE.
HELLO, PEGGY.
HELLO,
SHERIFF.
HOW HAVE YOU BEEN?
ALL RIGHT, I GUESS.
THAT'S GOOD. OH.
SO THIS IS THE YOUNG FELLA
THAT PASSED OUT ON YOU, HUH?
AYE, SHERIFF.
THIS IS THE BOY,
ALL RIGHT.
WHERE ARE YOU
FROM, BOY?
UM, TEXAS.
I'VE BEEN CUTTING
DOWN THERE.
THROATS?
UH, NO. BEEF.
GOT ANY FOLKS
AROUND HERE?
NO, NO, NO. MY FOLKS ARE BACK IN TEXAS.
I'VE BEEN JUST
LOOKING FOR WORK
TILL THINGS
PICK UP DOWN THERE.
OH. OH, LEAVE THE BOY
ALONE, SHERIFF.
HE'S BEEN OUT OF HIS HEAD FOR TWO DAYS.
SURE, SURE.
IT'S ALL RIGHT.
I'LL BE
ON MY WAY NOW.
JUST WANT TO STOP IN
AND SEE ABOUT THE KIDS.
I GOT TO MAKE MY REPORT
TO THE BOARD, YOU KNOW.
EH, LIKE THEY
CARE ABOUT IT.
HEY, SHERIFF, HOW'S ABOUT ME
GETTING A PICTURE OF YOU, HUH?
MY PICTURE?
SURE. WHY NOT?
OK. OUT HERE
WHERE IT'S LIGHT.
HUH. THAT'S A
LIKELY-LOOKING YOUNG FELLER.
YEAH. HE'S LIKELY
TO GET OUT OF HERE
AS SOON
AS HE CAN WALK.
HA HA HA!
HEY, WHERE ARE YOU GOING?
WHAT ARE YOU DOING,
YOU SPONGE?
YOU'RE WALKING OUT
ON THE JOB, AREN'T YOU?
HEY, GRANDMA AND PEGGY!
EH, SHUT UP, YOU.
WHY, YOU BIG...
WAIT A MINUTE, YOU
PUNK. PUT UP YOUR DUKES.
BEAT IT, KID,
OR YOU'LL REALLY GET HURT.
A FINE THING TO BE HITTING A
LITTLE BIT OF A BOY HALF YOUR SIZE.
FOR TWO PINS, I'D BOX
THE SIDES OF YOUR EARS.
OH, I JUST
TOUCHED HIM.
CAN'T A GUY
TAKE A WALK
WITHOUT SOME KID FIRING
OFF A 21-GUN SALUTE?
OH, SO YOU WERE RUNNING AWAY
WITHOUT SAYING A WORD TO ANYBODY.
WELL, YOU DON'T WANT ME TO HANG
AROUND HERE FOREVER, DO YOU?
I TOLD YOU I WAS
LOOKING FOR WORK.
WELL, IT'S 20 MILES
TO THE NEAREST TOWN.
OH, WHY DON'T YOU
LET HIM GO?
THE SHERIFF HAS
A PLACE FOR HOBOES.
I TELL YOU, I'M
LOOKING FOR WORK.
THEY CAN'T DO NOTHING TO A MAN FOR THAT.
YOU TALK LIKE
I WAS A CRIMINAL.
SEE HERE. IF IT'S ONLY
WORK YOU'RE LOOKING FOR,
YOU KNOW, THERE'S PLENTY
OF THAT HANGING AROUND HERE.
I GET IT. YOU KEPT ME A COUPLE OF DAYS.
NOW YOU WANT ME
TO WORK IT OFF, HUH?
FOR WHAT ELSE
WOULD I BE ASKING?
A GREAT, BIG, LAZY
LUMMOX OF A FACE LIKE YOURS
TO BE STANDING
AROUND HERE.
WELL, WHAT DO YOU
WANT ME TO DO?
WELL, TILL YOU GET A BIT OF
COLOR INTO THAT FACE OF YOURS,
YOU CAN SIT AROUND
IN THE SUN
AND AMUSE THE KIDS.
BAH.
AMUSE THE KIDS?
Boy: HA HA HA!
HA HA!
WE'RE NOT AMUSED.
HEY. YOU'RE FROM NEW YORK, AIN'T YOU?
YEAH.
I BEEN THERE.
BOY, DO I MISS
THAT EAST RIVER.
YEAH, AND THAT REFORM
SCHOOL YOU WAS GOING TO.
I GUESS YOU MISS
THAT, TOO, HUH?
EH, REFORM SCHOOL
AIN'T SO BAD.
ME BROTHER HAS BEEN
UP THERE TWICE.
HE DON'T GET OUT
TILL HE'S 21.
YEAH. HE GOT
A LEASE ON THE JOINT.
JUST WHAT IS
THE SETUP HERE?
OH, WE GOT TOO HOT
IN NEW YORK.
SO THEY SENT US OUT
HERE TO REFORM US.
YEAH? WHO DID?
FATHER RAFFERTY. DID
YOU EVER HEAR OF HIM?
HE WAS NEVER
IN MY CHURCH.
MINE, NEITHER.
WELL, ANYHOW, HE WAS A PRIEST
DOWN ON THE EAST SIDE, SEE,
TILL HE DIED
ABOUT A YEAR AGO.
HE GOT UP THAT "HELP
THY NEIGHBOR" FUND
TO SEND TOUGH KIDS
OUT TO HIS SISTER.
THAT'S
THE OLD LADY.
WHAT FOR?
TO GET
DEGENERATED.
REGENERATED,
YOU DOPE!
REGENERATED.
THAT MEANS
REFORMED.
A REFORM SCHOOL
FOR KIDS, HUH?
HA!
YEAH, BUT THEY AIN'T
GONNA REGENERATED ME
BECAUSE I'M GOING BACK TO THE EAST SIDE.
HOW YOU GOING, BY PULLMAN, OR
YOU GONNA TAKE A SPECIAL AIRPLANE?
I'M GONNA
TOUR BACK, JOE.
I'M GONNA TOUR BACK
LIKE HIM.
EH, YOU AIN'T
GOT THE NERVE.
YOU AIN'T GOT
THE NERVE.
HEY. WHO'S THE DAME?
OH, THAT'S
TOMMY'S SISTER.
Johnnie: YEAH?
AND WHAT DID SHE DO?
SHE DIDN'T DO NOTHING.
SHE'S SUPPOSED TO WATCH
TOMMY GET DEGENERATED.
REGENERATED!
AW, CUT IT OUT.
YEAH. THE JUDGE WOULD'VE
SENT TOMMY TO REFORM SCHOOL
IF SHE HADN'T PROMISED
TO PLAY COPPER TO HIM.
UNTIL HE
GET DEGENERATED.
EH, SHUT UP.
HEY!
WHAT ARE YOU TRYING
TO DO, MURDER ME?
NO, ONLY
CUT YOUR THROAT.
YOU KNOW, TOMMY IS
A PRETTY TOUGH GUY.
THEY CAUGHT HIM
ROBBING A WAREHOUSE.
THEY GOT ME FOR SLASHING
TIRES ON CHERRY STREET
IN A PARKING GARAGE.
GOT A MATCH?
WHAT DO YOU
GOT THERE?
OH, THE CORK-SILK BUTT. YOU WANT ONE?
NO. ONE OF YOU KIDS
WOULDN'T KNOW
WHERE A GUY COULD GET
SOME REAL BUTTS, WOULD YOU?
YEAH. THEY SELL THEM
OVER AT THE STAND.
YEAH? WELL, WHAT'S THE
USE OF SMOKING GRASS
WHEN YOU CAN
HELP YOURSELF?
NAH. THEY WOULDN'T STEAL
NOTHING AROUND HERE.
NO STEALING FOR ME.
I THOUGHT YOU KIDS
WERE TOUGH.
WAIT A MINUTE.
WHAT ABOUT YOU?
AFRAID, KID?
AFRAID? HMM. I AIN'T
AFRAID OF NOTHING.
HOOKING BUTTS AIN'T
MY LINE, THAT'S ALL.
LEAVE HIM ALONE.
WAIT A MINUTE.
I DARE YOU
TO GET ME SOME.
OH, A DARE. DARE.
YOU GOT TO TAKE A DARE.
EHH.
HEY, AIN'T YOU GONNA TAKE A DARE?
TOMMY, YOU GOT TO TAKE A DARE.
HELLO, SIS.
WELL, HIYA, TOMMY.
FINISH PICKING YET?
UH-UH, NOT YET.
WHAT'S THE MATTER? YOU'RE
NOT QUITTING SO SOON, ARE YOU?
WELL, I AIN'T
QUITTING.
IT'S JUST THAT IT'S
KIND OF HOT, THAT'S ALL.
HEY, CAN I
HAVE A DRINK?
YEAH. YEAH.
I'LL GET ONE FOR YOU.
HERE YOU ARE.
OH, THANKS.
BOY, THAT JUST
HIT THE SPOT.
YOU GET THEM, KID?
YEAH. HERE YOU ARE.
NICE WORK.
THANKS.
VERY NICE WORK,
GETTING KIDS
TO STEAL FOR YOU.
IF THERE'S ANYTHING
LOWER THAN THAT,
I HAVEN'T MET IT YET.
COME ON.
BOX THERE. GO ON.
COME ON!
CROWN HIM, ANGEL!
BOX. FIGHT.
GO AHEAD!
WHAT ARE YOU WAITING FOR?
GO ON. GO AHEAD.
GO ON. DO IT.
GO AHEAD.
BREAK IT UP, GUYS!
BREAK IT UP.
WHAT'S THE MATTER
WITH YOU?
EH, LOOK OUT.
BOX. FIGHT.
GUYS, GUYS, FIGHT.
HIT HIM WITH
THAT RIGHT, TOMMY.
COME ON, GUYS.
FIGHT.
COME ON.
GO AHEAD. FIGHT.
OH, KNOCK
HIS BRAINS OUT.
ONE GUY,
GET KNOCKED DOWN.
AAH!
FOUL! FOUL! FOUL!
WHAT DID I DO?
SHUT UP.
HEY, YOU SAW IT,
DIDN'T YOU?
WE DIDN'T
SEE NOTHING.
SURE, IT WAS A FOUL. HE
CAN'T PUT NOTHING OVER ON ME.
AS LONG AS THE REFEREE
SEES YOU, IT'S A FOUL.
SURE. I KNOW MY MARKWIS
OF QUEENSBURY RULES.
MARQUIS.
AAH!
CUT IT OUT, YOU...
YOU'RE GONNA BE SMART,
YOU DO IT IN THE IN-FIGHT.
COME HERE.
I'LL SHOW YOU.
HERE, TOMMY.
STAND UP THERE.
SEE, YOU'RE LEADING
WITH YOUR RIGHT,
AND YOU'RE MOVING
LIKE THAT.
WHILE YOU'RE TURNING
YOUR RIGHT AROUND,
YOU FAKE
A LEFT HOOK,
AND YOU JAB HIM IN THE
GUTS WITH YOUR LEFT ELBOW.
SEE? YEAH, BUT THAT AIN'T FAIR.
OF COURSE, IT AIN'T IF
THE REFEREE SEES YOU.
THE TRICK IS TO GET THE OTHER
GUY BETWEEN YOU AND THE REFEREE
SO'S HE WON'T
SEE YOU.
COME ON, JACK.
LET'S BOX.
EH, I DON'T KNOW
ANYTHING ABOUT IT.
OH, SAYS YOU.
COME ON.
HA HA HA!
COME ON, JACK.
HIT HIM RIGHT IN THE EYE.
WATCH THAT RIGHT,
TOMMY.
WATCH THAT RIGHT.
WHAT ARE YOU DOING?
I WAS ONLY
TAKING YOUR PICTURE.
LAY OFF. DON'T YOU
EVER DO THAT AGAIN, SEE?
WHAT'S EATING YOU?
NEVER MIND, BUT LAY
OFF WITH THAT CAMERA.
OK, OK.
WHAT YOU GETTING SORE ABOUT, JACK?
COME ON.
COME ON, JACK.
COME ON, JACK. SHOW US SOME MORE TRICKS.
GO ON.
GIVE HIM THAT ELBOW.
HIT HIM WITH
THE RIGHT, BOY.
GIVE HIM THAT
RIGHT, TOMMY.
COME ON.
GET UP AND...
NOW LOOK. IF YOU CAN'T
GET TO STAND ON HIS FEET,
GIVE HIM THE THUMB
IN THE EYE LIKE THIS.
OW! I GET IT.
Johnnie: ONLY HARDER
AND QUICKER,
BUT MAKE SURE YOU GOT THE OTHER
GUY BETWEEN YOU AND THE REFER...
OK, KIDS.
BEAT IT.
BEAT IT. BEAT IT.
GEE WHIZ, PEGGY,
YOU'RE ALWAYS BUTTING IN.
WHY DON'T YOU LEAVE
US MEN ALONE?
WHY, YOU SURE CAN
GET IN MY HAIR.
I WAS JUST TEACHING THE KID
HOW TO TAKE CARE OF HIMSELF.
YEAH,
WITH DIRTY TRICKS.
WELL, SOMEBODY WILL
PULL THEM ON HIM,
AND HE MIGHT AS WELL
LEARN TO PULL THEM FIRST.
YOU DON'T BELIEVE ANYTHING
IS ON THE LEVEL, DO YOU?
DO YOU? I KNOW YOU'RE NOT.
AND WHAT ABOUT YOU?
WELL, WHAT ABOUT ME?
YOU'RE PLAYING PROBATION
OFFICER, AREN'T YOU?
SO WHAT? GETTING DOUGH FOR IT?
NO.
DON'T GIVE ME THAT.
I KNOW ALL ABOUT THAT
PRIEST IN NEW YORK.
HE'S DEAD.
YEAH? WHAT ABOUT
THE FUND?
THERE ISN'T
ANY FUND.
IT STOPPED
WHEN HE DIED.
YOU TRYING TO TELL ME
YOU AND THE OLD LADY
ARE SUPPORTING THESE
KIDS ON THE CUFF, HUH?
THAT'S RIGHT.
WHAT FOR?
YOU WOULDN'T
UNDERSTAND.
EH, YOU MUST HAVE
SOME ANGLE.
I WONDER IF YOU'RE AS
TOUGH AS YOU THINK YOU ARE.
I AIN'T SO TOUGH,
BUT I AIN'T
A SUCKER, EITHER.
WHAT DO YOU CALL
A SUCKER?
WELL, YOU'RE A SUCKER IF
WHAT YOU TELL ME IS TRUE.
SO'S THAT OLD LADY.
SO'S THAT DEAD PRIEST.
WHY, BECAUSE HE
PUT OUT A HELPING HAND?
"HELP YOURSELF"
IS MY SLOGAN.
AND WHAT DOES
THAT GET YOU?
WELL,
A LOT OF THINGS.
THANKS FOR THE LESSON.
ALL RIGHT. B-16.
"SINGLE-PUMP, 500-GALLON,
FIREPROOF TANK.
INSTALLED."
SO WHAT?
TOMMY IS FIGURING ON
OPENING UP A SERVICE STATION.
YEAH? WHERE AT?
OH, IN FRONT
OF THE STORE.
TOMMY JOINED THE BIG BROTHER MOVEMENT.
YEAH. WELL, A FELLA
HAS GOT A RIGHT
TO LOOK OUT AFTER HIS
OWN SISTER, AIN'T HE?
WELL, WHAT'S THE
MATTER WITH YOUR SISTER?
SHE WAS DOING ALL RIGHT
WHEN I SEEN HER LAST.
SHE'S PLENTY WORRIED
ABOUT THE RANCH.
ONLY SELLING ENOUGH DATES
TO PAY FOR FOOD AND UPKEEP.
WE'VE BEEN BEHIND IN TAXES EVER SINCE
MONEY STOPPED COMING FROM NEW YORK.
MIGHT LOSE THE PLACE
BEFORE LONG.
WELL, WHO TOLD
YOU ALL THIS?
THAT'S ALL SHE
AND GRANDMA TALK ABOUT.
YEAH.
I HEARD THEM, TOO.
SO WHAT?
SO WE FOLD UP THE RANCH
AND GO BACK TO NEW YORK.
BOY, THAT WOULD
BE SOMETHING.
YOU KNOW, THERE AIN'T A
GAS STATION ON OUR ROAD
42 MILES ONE WAY
AND 28 THE OTHER.
ABOUT 200 CARS A DAY PASS
OUR PLACE DURING WEEKDAYS
AND TWICE AS MANY
ON SUNDAYS.
I FIGURE WE COULD SUPPORT
THE RANCH SELLING GAS.
WELL, IT LOOKS LIKE HE'S
DEGENERATED, ALL RIGHT.
WHAT DID YOU SAY THAT GAS
STATION WAS GONNA COST?
OH, ABOUT TWO GRAND.
WELL, WHAT DO YOU
EXPECT TO USE FOR MONEY?
HE THINKS HE'LL
STICK UP A BANK
WHEN HE GETS
BIG ENOUGH.
OH, SHUT UP.
THAT AIN'T FUNNY.
EH, IT'S TOO HOT
FOR PIPE DREAMS.
IS THAT THE TANK
YOU'RE TALKING ABOUT?
YEAH! THAT'S IT! THE
EAST RIVER OF THE WEST.
WHOA!
NOW LISTEN, KIDS.
GET THIS.
WE WENT DOWN THE ROAD SEVERAL MILES TO THAT
NEW DATE RANCH WHERE THEY'RE IRRIGATING.
WE WATCHED THEM FOR A WHILE AND
SORT OF FORGOT ABOUT THE TIME, SEE?
ANYBODY THAT SQUEALS WE WENT
SWIMMING GETS THE WORKS, UNDERSTOOD?
RIGHT. CHECK.
LAST ON IN IS A YELLOW DOG!
FIRST ON IN
IS A HEEL!
SHUT UP, WILL YOU?
WANT OLD MAN HENRY
TO COME AROUND AND CHASE US?
DON'T RUSH.
WE GOT ALL DAY.
BOY, WAIT TILL I
GET IN THAT WATER.
LET'S GO!
BOY, THIS IS THE LIFE. I'M COMING.
HERE I GO!
HOW'S THE WATER, JACK?
IT'S THE CAT'S!
YAHOO!
WAIT FOR ME!
THE OLYMPIC CHAMP
IS COMING NOW.
BABY!
WHY DON'T YOU
COME ON IN?
OH, WHAT ARE YOU
SCARED OF?
I AIN'T SACRED.
HEY, HE'S FROM
EIGHTH AVENUE.
NONE OF THEM KIDS
KNOWS HOW TO SWIM.
WHO DON'T KNOW
HOW TO SWIM?
I'LL SHOW YOU.
HEY, FELLAS, LOOK HOW LOW THE WATER IS.
I CAN JUST
REACH THE TOP.
THEY MUST BE
IRRITATING.
IRRIGATING, YOU DOPE. IRRIGATING.
OK, OK.
IRRIGATING.
HEY, JACK!
I CAN'T REACH THE TOP!
JACK, YOU BETTER HELP HIM
BECAUSE HE CAN'T SWIM VERY GOOD.
OK, KID.
UP YOU GO NOW.
OH, JACK! GET ME UP!
SHUT UP. WHAT'S THE MATTER WITH YOU?
I WANT TO GET UP!
YOU ALL RIGHT NOW?
OF COURSE, YOU ARE.
COME ON.
HEY, JACK! THE WATER IS RUNNING OUT.
I KNOW. HERE.
HOLD HIM, WILL YOU?
TOMMY, COME HERE.
DIPPY,
YOU HOLD ANGEL.
NOW LOOK. I'M GONNA GO DOWN,
LIFT YOU UP BY YOUR ANKLES,
AND LIFT YOU RIGHT UP ON THE
TOP, AND YOU GRAB HOLD OF IT.
OK. LET'S GO.
READY?
TRY AGAIN.
YOU READY?
YEAH, I'M READY.
SPIT, ARE YOU SURE YOU'RE
TELLING ME THE TRUTH?
CROSS MY HEART.
HONEST, PEG, I DON'T
KNOW WHERE THEY WENT.
WELL, DIDN'T THEY SAY
WHERE THEY WERE GOING?
JUST TOOK THE TRUCK AND LEFT.
HOW LONG AGO?
ABOUT AN HOUR.
IT'S DOWN TO 10 FEET
AND STILL FALLING.
ALL WE HAVE TO DO
IS STICK TOGETHER
AND WAIT TILL THE WATER GOES
DOWN, AND WE CAN TOUCH BOTTOM.
YOU GETTING TIRED?
NO. NAH. NO.
HEY, JACK! THE WATER STOPPED GOING DOWN.
ARE YOU SURE?
YEAH. YOU SEE? IT'S
STILL AT THE SAME MARK.
WHAT DO WE DO NOW?
HEY!
HERE. I'M GONNA GO DOWN AND SEE
WHAT'S AT THE BOTTOM OF THIS TANK.
WILL YOU HOLD HIM
FOR A FEW MINUTES?
YEAH. I'LL HOLD HIM.
DON'T LET ME GO, TOM.
THERE'S A VALVE DOWN THERE
THAT LETS THE WATER OUT,
BUT YOU GOT
TO KEEP IT OPEN.
I'LL GO DOWN THIS TIME. TAKE THE KID.
OK.
HERE I GO.
I COULDN'T
HOLD IT VERY LONG.
IT'S ALL RIGHT,
TOMMY.
I THINK
IT'S GONE DOWN.
HERE. HOLD HIM,
WILL YOU?
I'M GONNA
TAKE A TRY.
TAKE IT EASY, KID.
TAKE IT EASY.
DID YOU GET IT?
I TOUCHED BOTTOM.
ONE MORE TIME
OUGHT TO DO IT.
GO AHEAD, JACK.
OH, PEG, WE'VE BEEN
LOOKING ALL OVER THE PLACE.
WE CAN'T FIND
THOSE GUYS.
YEAH. WE WAS ALL THE
WAY DOWN THE ROAD, TOO.
GRANDMA, THEY COULDN'T HAVE
TAKEN THE TRUCK TO TOWN.
OH, WELL,
DON'T WORRY, PEGGY.
MAYBE THE TRUCK
BROKE DOWN.
THEY'RE ALL RIGHT.
OH, THAT'S A GOOD IDEA.
NOW COME ON. GET UP.
HERE WE GO. UP!
NOW TOMMY AND ANGEL.
REACH FOR THAT LADDER
AND BRING IT DOWN.
OK, GUYS.
COME ON.
YEAH.
LOOK ALIVE.
ALL RIGHT, KIDS.
UP ON IT.
THAT'S IT.
WAIT TILL HE
GETS UP ON IT.
HEY, THIS GUY IS SPOUTING
WATER LIKE A FOUNTAIN.
KEEP HIS FACE DOWN.
THIS BUMPING UP AND DOWN
WILL DO HIM GOOD.
JOHNNIE, DO YOU THINK
HE DROWNED MAYBE?
NO, NO.
HE'LL BE ALL RIGHT.
NOW, LISTEN.
NOBODY TALK, SEE?
HE GOT AWAY FROM US AND FELL IN
THE WATER, AND WE FISHED HIM OUT.
GET THAT?
UNDERSTAND?
YEAH, SURE.
WE HAVEN'T SEEN THEM SINCE
ABOUT 2:00 THIS AFTERNOON.
THEY LEFT
IN THE TRUCK.
WELL, I DON'T
KNOW, SHERIFF.
I DON'T KNOW
WHERE THEY WENT.
WHAT DID YOU SAY?
HEY, LOOK.
HERE THEY COME.
Peggy: NEVER MIND, SHERIFF.
THEY JUST CAME IN. THANKS.
WHERE HAVE YOU BEEN?
WE TOOK THE TRUCK AND WENT WAY DOWN...
DOWN TO WHERE THEY WAS
IRRIGATING THAT NEW RANCH,
AND WE STOPPED
TO WATCH THEM, AND...
YEAH, AND BEFORE WE KNEW
IT, IT WAS GETTING DARK,
WASN'T IT, ANGEL?
YEAH.
WHY, YOU'RE WET
TO THE SKIN!
OH! GET SOME TOWELS, QUICK,
AND GET A BRANDY.
COME OVER TO THE STOVE
AND GET WARM.
WELL, WHAT DID
YOU DO TO HIM?
HE FELL IN
AN IRRIGATION DITCH.
YEAH, SURE.
THAT'S RIGHT.
DID YOU ALL FALL IN THE
SAME IRRIGATION DITCH?
YEAH. WE GOT WET
FISHING HIM OUT.
WELL, THEY'VE GOT
TELEPHONES, YOU KNOW.
NOT WHERE WE WAS.
I DON'T EXPECT TO GET
THE TRUTH OUT OF YOU
OR OUT OF ANY OF THEM
WHILE YOU'RE AROUND.
IN FACT, I THINK WE
HAVE ENOUGH OF YOU.
GET OUT.
IT'S OK WITH ME. WHEN
DO YOU WANT ME TO GO?
THE SOONER,
THE BETTER.
I'LL LEAVE RIGHT NOW, IF
THAT'S HOW YOU FEEL ABOUT IT.
PEGGY, YOU DON'T
KNOW WHAT HE...
SHUT UP.
COME ON.
EH, IT AIN'T RIGHT,
I TELL YOU. IT AIN'T.
EH, THAT'S OK.
THERE WE WAS, CAUGHT
LIKE CATS IN A TRAP.
YOU MEAN, RATS. I MEAN,
CAT. YOU KNOW, JACK.
JUST LIKE WHEN YOU DROP A BUNCH OF
KITTENS TO DROWN IN A BUCKET OF WATER.
SURE. THAT'S RIGHT.
THERE WE WAS,
ON THE DRINK OF DEATH.
BRINK.
AW, CUT THAT OUT,
WILL YOU?
EVERY TIME YOU DO THAT, YOU
MAKE ME NERVOUS ALL OVER.
THINK THAT'S
GOOD FOR ME?
WELL, ANYWAY, IN THE
WATER, IT'S DRINK OF DEATH.
WE'D ALL BE DEAD DUCKS
IF IT WASN'T FOR JACK.
SURE. OF COURSE.
CERTAINLY.
WHY WON'T YOU
LET US TELL HER?
WELL, SHE'D SAY IT WAS
MY FAULT FOR TAKING YOU.
YOU HAVEN'T THOUGHT OF TAKING
ANYBODY WITH YOU, HAVE YOU?
WHO? WHO DO
YOU MEAN? YOU?
WELL, LOTS OF RANCH HELP TRAVEL
AROUND IN PAIRS LIKE THAT.
WHAT ABOUT THAT
GAS STATION?
WELL, THAT CAN WAIT TILL I
EARN ENOUGH DOUGH AND COME BACK.
EH, I'D LIKE
TO TAKE YOU, KID.
BUT YOUR SISTER WOULD HAVE THE
MILITIA OUT AFTER ME FOR KIDNAPPING.
WELL, I ONLY
THOUGHT THAT...
SURE, TOMMY,
AND I APPRECIATE IT.
BUTTING IN
AGAIN, HUH?
HAVEN'T YOU CAUSED ENOUGH
TROUBLE FOR ONE DAY?
I'D LIKE TO TALK
TO JACK ALONE.
OK, KIDS. BEAT IT.
WHAT'S ON YOUR MIND?
NOTHING, JOHNNIE,
EXCEPT THAT...
WELL...
ANGEL TOLD ME THE TRUTH ABOUT
WHAT HAPPENED THIS AFTERNOON.
I SAID I WAS SORRY,
DIDN'T I?
I CALLED YOU A HEEL, BUT
I GUESS YOU'RE A HERO.
IS THIS A BUILDUP FOR
ANOTHER SOCK IN THE NOSE?
NO. I THINK
YOU'RE ALL RIGHT.
SURE. I AIN'T
A BAD GUY.
I TOLD YOU SO BEFORE.
I KNOW.
SO DID GRANDMA,
BUT I DIDN'T
BELIEVE IT TILL NOW.
YOU DON'T HAVE TO LEAVE
UNLESS YOU WANT TO.
YOU KNOW,
THERE'S ONLY ONE REASON
I WANT TO STAY HERE...
YOU.
DO YOU WANT ME TO STAY?
WELL, UH,
THAT'S THAT.
UM, AS LONG AS YOU'RE ALL
CLEANED UP AND EVERYTHING,
WOULD YOU LIKE
TO DRIVE ME TO TOWN?
I GOT SOME ERRANDS.
IT'S A DATE.
WELL, THEN YOU BETTER GRAB YOURSELF
SOME SUPPER, AND I'LL CHANGE.
15 MINUTES.
MIND?
UH-UH.
SAY, I KNOW A SPOT ON
THE SIDE OF THE ROAD
WHERE NO CARS
EVER PASS.
SUPPOSE
WE PARK AND...
TALK.
WHAT FOR?
I'M CRAZY ABOUT YOU.
AIN'T THAT ENOUGH?
YEAH. IT'S A LOT, BUT
IT STARTS THE WRONG WAY.
HOW, THE WRONG WAY?
WELL, I DON'T KNOW
ANYTHING ABOUT YOU
OR WHO YOU ARE,
EXCEPT YOUR NAME,
AND MAYBE IT
ISN'T YOUR NAME.
YOU SOUND LIKE I WAS
PROPOSING MARRIAGE.
WHAT ARE YOU
PROPOSING?
OH, NOTHING
LIKE THAT.
OH.
WELL, YOU'RE
FRANK, ANYWAY.
WELL, WHY DON'T YOU
BE FRANK, TOO?
YOU WANT ME TO?
SURE.
ALL RIGHT.
YOU'RE
A NICE-LOOKING MAN...
THANK YOU KINDLY.
WITH THE RIGHT HEART...
AHH.
BUT THE WRONG HEAD.
BECAUSE I TRY
TO MAKE LOVE TO YOU?
NOPE. BECAUSE YOU'RE TRYING
TO GET AWAY WITH MURDER.
YOU KNOW, I'M
FROM THE BIG CITY, TOO,
AND I'VE HEARD
A LOT OF LINES BEFORE.
AND SO IT'S UP TO ME TO
THINK OF A NEW LINE, HUH?
MM-HMM.
WOULDN'T HURT.
ALL RIGHT.
I'LL THINK OF ONE.
I'LL BE WAITING.
HI, JACK!
HI, PEGGY!
HIYA, SPEED.
YOU GET SOME GAS.
I'M GOING OVER
TO THE HARDWARE STORE
TO SEE MR. HAYMAN
ON SOME BUSINESS.
BACK IN A MINUTE.
RIGHT.
FILL 'ER UP?
YEAH, WITH THE CHEAP.
OH, WHY DON'T YOU GET
SOME GOOD GAS THIS TIME
SO YOU CAN TRY OUT
MY NEW PUMP?
IF I EVER TRY TO PUT GOOD GASOLINE INTO
THIS JALOPY, SHE'D PROBABLY EXPLODE.
SAY, I'VE GOT SOME SWELL NEW OIL
OVER THERE, IF YOU CAN USE ANY.
JUST CAME IN.
YEAH? HOW MUCH?
30 CENTS.
30 CENTS?
THAT'S TOO MUCH.ENTS.
HEY, YOU GONNA
TAKE THAT IN?
I HEAR HE'S GOOD.
EH, IF HE
WERE ANY GOOD,
HE WOULDN'T BE
BARNSTORMING IN THE STICKS.
WELL, HE MUST BE PRETTY GOOD
IF THEY'RE GONNA GIVE $500
TO ANYBODY WHO CAN
STICK WITH HIM.
THAT'S A LOT OF MONEY.
YEAH. I GUESS THAT IS A
LOT OF MONEY, ALL RIGHT.
Speed: THAT NOT ENOUGH
TO TEMPT ME, THOUGH.
NO?
SAY, I WOULDN'T GET IN THE
RING WITH THAT BIG, UGLY MOOSE
FOR $5,000 A ROUND.
"WILD BULL OF EUROPE."
HUH. LOOKS LIKE
A KILLER TO ME.
HMM? UM, ALL SET?
YEAH. SHE TOOK 8 GALLONS. THAT $1.28.
CHARGE IT.
SAY, JACK, THAT BILL
IS GETTING KIND OF HIGH.
OW ABOUT A LITTLE
ON THE ACCOUNT?
EH, WHAT ARE YOU
SQUAWKING ABOUT?
YOU'LL GET PAID...
SOMETIME.
OK.
I GUESS I CAN DO MY BIT
FOR PEGGY AND THE OLD LADY
TILL THINGS GET
BETTER FOR THEM.
THAT'S A NICE PUMP.
SAY, YOU DO PRETTY GOOD
AROUND HERE, DON'T YOU, SPEED?
OH, I CAN'T
COMPLAIN.
THAT'S ONE THING THEY
CAN'T SAY ABOUT THEM.
WHEN THEY GOT TO HAVE
GAS, THEY GOT TO HAVE GAS.
WHAT THIS PUMP SET YOU
BACK, ABOUT TWO GRAND?
JUST ABOUT, AND SAY, WHAT
A BIG IMPROVEMENT THAT IS
OVER THIS
OLD HAND PUMP.
LISTEN. I'M GOING ACROSS
THE STREET FOR A FEW MINUTES.
IF PEGGY COMES, TELL HER
I'LL BE RIGHT BACK, HUH?
ALL RIGHT.
YOU'RE NOT BIG ENOUGH. YOU'RE TOO LIGHT.
WHAT'S THAT GOT TO DO
WITH IT IF I'M WILLING?
I'M NOT WORRIED ABOUT
YOU. IT'S THE CUSTOMERS.
THEY DON'T PAY DOUGH
TO SEE SETUPS, YOU KNOW.
I'LL GIVE THAT GUY
PLENTY OF FIGHT.
LOOK. I'M HAVING
A FIGHT, NOT A MURDER.
GO ON.
SCRAM, WILL YOU?
I GOT A LOT
OF WORK TO DO.
LISTEN. I WANT A CHANCE AT THAT MUG.
GO ON. SCRAM.
I'M BUSY.
KEEP YOUR HANDS OFF ME,
OR I'LL CLIP YOU.
OH, YOU WILL?
OOH!
COME ON. DO I GET
THAT FIGHT, OR DON'T I?
YEAH. YOU GET IT.
IT'LL BE A PLEASURE.
WHAT'S THE MATTER?
SOMETHING ON YOUR MIND?
YEAH. I THOUGHT THAT TAD
HAYMAN WOULD HELP US OUT
WITH AN ADVANCE
ON THE NEXT CROP,
BUT HE'S STRAPPED
ALL HIMSELF THIS YEAR.
EH, DON'T WORRY
ABOUT ANYTHING.
YOUR TROUBLES
ARE OVER.
WE'RE GONNA OPEN
A GAS STATION.
A GAS STATION?
SURE.
WELL, HOW DID YOU
HAPPEN TO THINK OF THAT?
WELL, UM, UH,
STATISTICS.
YOU KNOW, THERE ISN'T A
GAS STATION ON OUR ROAD
42 MILES ONE WAY
AND 28 THE OTHER.
WHAT YOU ANY IDEA
WHAT A GAS STATI COSTS?
OH, I LOOKED
INTO THAT.
WELL, YOU HEAR ABOUT THE
BIG FIGHT THEY'RE HAVING
AT THE LEGION STADIUM
IN A COUPLE OF WEEKS,
ABOUT THE PALOOKA THAT'S
OFFERING $500 A ROUND
FOR ANYBODY THAT WILL STICK
WITH HIM MORE THAN TWO ROUNDS?
YEAH. I READ
SOMETHING ABOUT IT.
WELL, I'M GOING IN THERE AND FIGHT HIM.
ALL I HAVE TO DO IS STAND
ON MY FEET FOR 4 ROUNDS.
4 TIMES 500...
THAT'S 2,000 BUCKS.
WHY, IT'S
IN THE BAG.
OH, BUT, JACK,
YOU'RE CRAZY.
WHY, HE'S
A PROFESSIONAL FIGHTER.
YOU'D GET BADLY HURT.
AW, GEE, ANYBODY WHO WOULD STAND UP
AGAINST A FIGHTER LIKE THAT WOULD BE A...
A SUCKER?
YEAH, A SUCKER.
AND IF I DID GET HURT,
WOULD IT MATTER MUCH TO YOU?
YES, JACK, IT WOULD...
LOTS.
THAT'S ALL
I WANT TO KNOW.
WITH YOU ROOTING FOR ME,
I'LL GO IN THERE
AND BANG THE EARS OFF THE
BIGGEST GUY IN THE WORLD.
Tommy: COME ON.
KEEP ON HITTING HIM.
Dippy: HIT HIM
WITH A RIGHT, BOY.
RIGHT. RIGHT,
LEFT, RIGHT.
RIGHT! RIGHT!
OH, CUT IT OUT!
FLATTEN THAT GUY!
COME ON! KNOCK
HIS BRAIN OUT!
BEAT HIM UP!
OH, WHAT A FIGHTER!
YOU COULDN'T LAST
A HALF A ROUND
WITH FOOTWORK
LIKE THAT.
YOU COULDN'T STOP
A TRUCK MOVING THAT SLOW.
GO ON!
MOVE FAST! JUMP!
EH, WHAT DO YOU
KNOW ABOUT IT?
PLENTY, YOU BIG, FAT,
CLUMSY LUMMOX.
SO HOW'S YOUR WIND?
MY WIND?
OH, IT'S ALL RIGHT.
WELL, I'LL FIND OUT
ABOUT THAT LATER.
GO ON NOW. HIT IT.
DON'T MAKE LOVE TO IT.
HIT IT, I TELL YOU.
HIT IT! THAT'S IT.
WORKING HARD?
YEAH. I KIND OF
LIKE IT.
WILL YOU BLOW, PEG?
I WISH YOU WOMEN WOULD
STOP AGGRAVATING THE CHAMP
WHILE HE'S WORKING OUT.
MIND YOUR OWN
BUSINESS, WILL YOU?
THAT IS MY BUSINESS,
TRAINING THE CHAMP.
YOUR
BUSINESS?
SINCE WHEN ARE YOU TRAINING HIM?
COME ON, JACK.
ABOUT 3 MORE MINUTES,
AND WE'LL BREAK.
Â¶ BY A WATERFALL Â¶
Â¶ I'M CALLING
YOU-OO-OO-OO Â¶
Â¶ BY A WATERFALL Â¶
HEY, HURRY UP WITH THAT
WATER, WILL YOU, YOU GUYS?
TAKE IT EASY, CARUSO.
YOU'LL LAST LONGER.
HOW'S THE WATER, CHAMP?
BRR. HOW DID YOU
GET IT SO HOT?
Â¶ BY A WATERFALL,
I'M CALLING YOU-OO-OO-OO Â¶
HEY, FELLAS! GET A
LOAD OF THIS, WILL YOU?
WHAT DO
YOU GOT, T?
I JUST WON 3 BUCKS.
WHAT DO YOU MEAN, YOU JUST WON 3 BUCKS?
THE AMATEUR PICTURE CONTEST
IN THE "SALT LAKE TIMES."
HERE'S THE 3 BUCKS
IF YOU DON'T BELIEVE ME.
WELL, COME ON. SHOW US THE PICTURE.
WHERE IS IT?
YEAH, SURE.
COME ON. GET IT OUT THERE.
LOOK. RIGHT THERE.
WHAT DO YOU KNOW ABOUT THAT? IT'S JACK!
JACKIE.
HEY, JACKIE, LOOK.
THERE'S YOUR PICTURE
IN THE PAPER.
WHEN DID YOU
TAKE THAT?
ONCE WHEN YOU
WASN'T LOOKING.
I THOUGHT I TOLD YOU TO
LAY OFF OF THAT STUFF.
WHAT DID I TELL YOU
ABOUT TAKING MY PICTURE?
OH, WHAT HARM
DID I DO?
I OUGHT TO FLATTEN
YOU FOR THIS,
YOU DOUBLE-CROSSING,
LITTLE CHISELER.
AW, LAY OFF ME,
WILL YOU?
I DIDN'T DO NOTHING.
I MADE 3 BUCKS, DIDN'T I?
EH, SHUT UP.
BUT LOOK AT THE WAY HE'S
GOT HIS RIGHT HAND STUCK OUT.
SO A GUY GETS UP
OUT OF HIS GRAVE,
STICKS OUT HIS RIGHT HAND
JUST SO YOU CAN MAKE THE PINCH
AND PROVE THAT ALL THE REST
OF US AROUND HERE ARE DOPES.
I TELL YOU, I GOT A HUNCH
THAT'S JOHNNIE BRADFIELD.
IT'LL TAKE ME MAYBE
A MONTH TO FIND OUT,
BUT IT'S
WORTH TRYING.
SWELL. TAKE TWO MONTHS. TAKE TWO YEARS.
WRITE US
PICTURE POSTCARDS.
HA HA HA!
HA HA HA.
GO ON. LAUGH.
WELL, YOU'D LAUGH, TOO, PHELAN,
IF YOU KNEW HOW FUNNY YOU WERE.
MAYBE I WOULD.
MAYBE I'LL
LAUGH LATER.
"THESE GLOVES USED BY KID McNEIL
"WHEN HE KNOCKED OUT
SAILOR O'SHEA.
A BUY AT 8 BUCKS."
I'LL BET THAT'S
LUCKY LEATHER.
YEAH. WE COULD GET THEM FOR JACK
IF WE HAD
$7.60 MORE.
HA! IF MY AUNT HAD
WHISKERS, SHE'D BE MY UNCLE.
HA HA HA!
HEY, LOOK OVER THERE,
WILL YOU?
Dippy:
LAMP THAT JALOPY.
Spit: LAMP WHAT'S
IN THAT JALOPY.
WAIT A MINUTE. I GOT AN IDEA. COME ON.
Spit: LET'S GO.
CHECK IT OUT.
ISN'T HE CUTE?
HEY,
WHAT IS THAT?
IT'S ALIVE.
HEY, BUD, WHAT'S YOUR NAME?
J. DOUGLAS WILLIAMSON.
J. DOUGLAS WILLIAMSON.
WHOO WHOO!
AND WHAT'S
YOUR NAME?
J. MONTMORENCI SPIT JR.
WHAT BOOK YOU GET
THAT OUT OF, KID?
TELL ME SOMETHING.
WHAT ARE YOU DOING HERE?
WE JUST STOPPED TO HAVE A FLAT FIXED.
WE SHALL BE OFF AS SOON AS DAD AND MATER
RETURN FROM THE TELEGRAPH OFFICE.
OH, IT AIN'T
GONNA STAY.
HE'S BREAKING
MY HEART.
HEY,
WHAT'S A MATER?
A MATER. THAT'S HIS OLD LADY, YOU DOPE.
DON'T YOU
READ ANY BOOKS?
NOPE.
YOU THINK YOU'RE
SMART, DON'T YOU?
THEY CALL US
THE 6 GENIUSES.
HEY, WHAT KIND
OF CAMERA IS THAT?
IT'S A MOTION-PICTURE
CAMERA.
LET ME SEE THAT.
I'LL GIVE IT BACK.
YEAH, YEAH. I KNOW JUST
WHAT YOU'RE THINKING.
WELL, IT'S A CINCH.
LOOK. WE GOT TO GET IT HONESTLY,
SEE, OR JACK WOULDN'T LIKE IT.
OH, YEAH, YEAH.
HEY, ANGEL.
COME ON, WILL YOU?
LET HIM SEE IT.
Dippy: ALL RIGHT. KEEP YOU
HANDS OFF THAT GOOD CAMERA.
HEY, DOUGIE. HOW DO
YOU LIKE THIS ONE, DOUG?
COME ON, GANG.
WE GOT TO GET GOING.
HEY, YOU WANT
TO COME ALONG, KID?
WHERE TO?
OH, WE'RE JUST
GONNA PLAY.
MARBLES?
THAT'S
A SISSY GAME.
WE'RE GONNA
PLAY POKER.
YOU KNOW HOW
TO PLAY POKER?
NO.
OH. WE COULD TEACH YOU
HOW. IT'S VERY EASY.
WE AIN'T GOT NO TIME
TO LEARN BEGINNERS.
Dippy: EH, HE'S
TOO YOUNG, ANYWAY.
BUT I'M 12,
AND I COULD LEARN.
WELL, WHAT DO
YOU SAY, GANG?
SHOULD WE
LET HIM IN?
Dippy: SURE. WHY NOT?
COME ON,
DOUGLAS.
STEP RIGHT OUT.
THAT'S THE WAY.
I'VE ONLY GOT
25 CENTS.
OH, THAT'S OK, KID.
YOU DON'T NEED NO DOUGH
TO PLAY STRIP POKER.
WHAT'S
STRIP POKER?
YOU'LL FIND OUT.
GIVE ME SOME CARDS, WOULD YOU?
GIVE US A COUPLE
OF GOOD ONES.
Douglas: I GOT
6, 7, 8, 9, AND 10.
ISN'T THAT ANY GOOD?
NOPE.
NOPE.
KEEP THE 10, SEE?
WE'LL TRY TO DRAW
SOMETHING BETTER.
HEY, DIPPY.
4 CARDS
FOR DOUGLAS JR.
Tommy: GIVE ME 3.
Douglas: IS THAT ANY GOOD?
WELL, IT'S BETWEEN
YOU AND ANGEL NOW.
WHAT DO YOU
GOT, ANGEL?
I GOT A PAIR OF 7s.
OH, BUT MINE ARE
ALL THE SAME SUIT.
YEAH, YEAH, THEY ARE, BET
THERE AIN'T A PAIR IN THE BUNCH.
ANGEL'S PAIR OF 7s WINS.
OH, I SEE NOW.
YOU GOT
TO HAVE PAIRS.
SURE. YOU'LL
CATCH ON TO THIS.
YEP. DOUGLAS JR., NOW YOU CAN
TAKE OFF THE COAT AND BELT.
OH, YOU MEAN,
I LOSE, THEN?
YOU DON'T WIN.
WELL, MAYBE YOU'LL
WIN IT BACK NEXT HAND.
JUST PUT IT
OVER THERE.
Dippy: DON'T
GET IT WRINKLED.
YOU GET TO COME BACK ON
ANOTHER LITTLE HAND LATER.
HEY, COME ON.
HURRY UP. WE'RE TRYING
TO LEARN YOU SOMETHING.
COME ON. HURRY UP
WITH THEM CARDS.
Douglas: I GOT
A PAIR THIS TIME.
CERTAINLY HAVE.
HOLD ON NOW.
WE'RE STAYING PAT.
Angel:
PAT? I'M OUT.
I'M TAKING 3.
I GOT THEM.
WELL, WHAT DO
YOU GOT, TOMMY?
OH, JUST A MEASLY
PAIR OF TWOS.
I WIN, DON'T I?
NO. HE'S GOT TWOS.
YOU ONLY GOT ONES.
KEEP YOUR MITTS
OFF IT.
IT'S ALL RIGHT, DOUGLAS.
YOU'RE LEARNING ALREADY.
NOW, THAT DIDN'T TAKE
LONG, DID IT, DARLING?
DOUGLAS!
WHY, WHAT
HAS HAPPENED?
DID YOU GET BY
ALL RIGHT?
HUH? YEAH.
DOCTOR SAID
I WAS 100% OK.
I HIT THE SCALE
AT 153.
LET ME TELL YOU
SOMETHING.
IF I GET
IN THAT RING FIRST,
YOU'LL NEVER GET
A WHACK AT THAT GUY.
WISH I FELT
THAT WAY ABOUT IT.
IT'S FUNNY WHAT US GUYS
WILL DO FOR MONEY, ISN'T IT?
HEY, WAIT A MINUTE.
WHAT ARE YOU
FIGHTING FOR?
MY WIFE IS GONNA
HAVE A KID.
YEAH?
TOUGH RACKET,
AIN'T IT?
WELL, GOOD LUCK.
THANKS.
GOT ANY GOOD SEATS LEFT
FOR TOMORROW NIGHT?
YEAH. I HAVE
A FEW LEFT.
WHERE ARE THEY?
HOW NEAR DO YOU
WANT THOSE?
CLOSE AS I CAN GET.
WELL, HOW ABOUT
A RINGSIDE?
FINE.
SAY, THIS GUY
JACK DORNEY,
IS HE A SOUTHPAW?
YOU CAN SEARCH
ME, MISTER.
THAT'LL BE
$3.30, PLEASE.
OK.
THANK YOU.
HEY, YOU THINK WE NEED SOME MORE CREEP?
NO, WE DON'T NEED
NO MORE CREPE.
YOU ASK ME,
YOU'RE A DEAD PIGEON.
WATER, WATER EVERYWHERE.
HEY, HE PASSED!
HE PASSED!
HE PASSED
THE MEDICAL EXAM.
HE PASSED
WITH FLYING COLORS.
HOW DO YOU KNOW?
CY KIMBALL
JUST TOLD ME.
HE JUST DROVE BY
IN HIS TRUCK,
AND HE SAID THAT THE DOCTOR SAID
THAT IF JACK WAS ANY HEALTHIER,
HE COULDN'T LIVE.
HERE HE COMES.
COME ON.
TAKE YOUR PLACES.
Peggy: SURPRISE.
Spit: GO ON.
SIT DOWN.
NOW?
YEAH.
OK.
QUIET!
CHAMP, ON BEHALF
OF THE GANG AND MYSELF,
AND GRANDMA AND PEGGY,
WE TAKE THIS OCCASION
ON THE EVE OF THE BIG FIGHT
TO PRESENT YOU WITH THIS
LITTLE TOKEN OF OUR ESTEEM.
HERE.
SPEECH!
SPEECH, CHAMP.
LOOK. I'M SORRY
YOU DID THIS.
YOU SEE,
I CAN'T FIGHT.
THE DOC TURNED ME DOWN.
THERE'S SOMETHING THE MATTER
WITH MY TICKER.
COME ON, BOYS.
COME ON.
COME ON. COME ON.
COME ON.
WHAT'S THE MATTER
WITH EVERYBODY?
THEY KNOW
YOU'RE LYING, JACK.
WHO, ME?
YOU PASSED THAT
MEDICAL EXAMINATION.
LISTEN, PEGGY. I TOLD YOU.
THE DOCTOR SAID THAT...
CY KIMBALL WAS HERE AND
TOLD US WHAT THE DOCTOR SAID.
ALL RIGHT.
SO I'M YELLOW.
YOU'RE NOT THAT,
EITHER.
I'M A LIAR,
AND I LOST MY NERVE.
LET IT GO AT THAT.
JACK, TELL ME
SOMETHING, WILL YOU?
WE'RE YOU LYING TO ME WHEN
YOU TOLD ME THAT YOU LOVED ME?
NO. NO.
WELL, WHAT'S THAT
GOT TO DO WITH IT?
EVERYTHING
BECAUSE WHEN YOU
LOVE SOMEONE,
YOU DON'T
LIE TO THEM.
YOU DON'T HOLD
ANYTHING BACK.
WHAT ARE YOU TALKING
ABOUT? HOLD WHAT BACK?
LISTEN.
LISTEN TO ME, JACK.
I LOVE YOU, TOO,
AND I KNOW
YOU'RE NOT A QUITTER.
THERE'S
SOMETHING ELSE.
YEAH.
YEAH, YEAH, YEAH.
YEAH, THAT'S RIGHT.
THERE'S
SOMETHING ELSE.
SOMETHING ELSE
TURNED UP.
I HEARD ABOUT A SWELL JOB,
SEE, AND I WAS GONNA...
EH, WASN'T IT MY IDEA
ABOUT THE FIGHT?
WELL, I CHANGED
MY MIND, SEE?
THE GUY IS TOO BIG.
HE'S TOO TOUGH.
I'M NO SUCKER, SEE?
WHY SHOULD I GET
MY HEAD KNOCKED OFF
WHEN I CAN GET THE DOUGH SOME OTHER WAY?
THAT'S ALL
THERE IS TO IT.
LEAVE ME ALONE,
CAN'T YOU?
JACK.
WILL YOU
LEAVE ME ALONE?
HE TOOK ONE LOOK AT THAT
STUMBLEBUM HE'S SUPPOSED TO FIGHT,
AND HE GAVE UP,
THAT'S ALL.
HE LOST HIS NERVE.
Angel: YEAH. THEY GET
THAT WAY SOMETIMES.
Dippy: NOT IF THEY
GOT WHAT IT TAKES.
NO MOXIE.
NO MOXIE.
Spit: BOY,
IS THAT GUY CHICKEN.
SHUT UP.
JACK AIN'T AFRAID
OF NOBODY, SEE?
OH, NO.
JACK AIN'T AFRAID.
NOT MUCH, HE AIN'T.
SHUT UP!
OH, LEAVE
THE KID ALONE.
SURE,
HE'S AFRAID.
QUIT LIKE
A YELLOW DOG.
WHAT A SLUG, BLAMING IT ON HIS TICKER.
JACK.
GOING AWAY, JACK?
WHY?
OH, NOTHING.
IF YOU ARE, WELL...
WHAT I SAID ABOUT GOING
WITH YOU STILL GOES.
FORGET IT, KID.
NOBODY GOES WITH ME.
WELL, I JUST THOUGHT
THAT MAYBE...
I DON'T NEED NOBODY.
I...
I TRAVEL ALONE.
YEAH.
YEAH, SURE, JACK.
IT DON'T MAKE
NO DIFFERENCE TO ME
WHAT THE KIDS
AND THE WOMEN SAY.
I KNOW YOU AIN'T
AFRAID OF THAT GUY.
NO, I AIN'T
AFRAID OF HIM.
YOU AIN'T AFRAID OF
ANYBODY. I KNOW THAT.
SHUT UP.
STOP TALKING ABOUT IT.
DON'T GET
EXCITED, JACK.
WHAT I WANTED
TO SAY WAS
THAT IF YOU
MADE UP YOUR MIND...
YEAH.
I MADE UP MY MIND.
YOU MUST HAVE
YOUR REASONS.
SURE, I GOT
MY REASONS.
I SUPPOSE THAT'S OK,
IF THAT'S HOW YOU
FEEL ABOUT IT.
WHAT I'M TRYING TO TELL
YOU IS THAT I'M WITH YOU
IF YOU WANT TO TAKE ME.
EH, WHO'S
GOING AWAY?
YOU AIN'T GOING?
I'M GONNA
STAY RIGHT HERE.
YOU'RE GONNA FIGHT?
WHAT DO YOU THINK?
IT WAS A RIB.
IT WAS A RIB. I KNEW
IT WAS ALL THE TIME.
BOY, WAIT TILL
I TELL THE GUYS.
ATTABOY. YOU TELL THEM. TELL THEM ALL!
WHAT DO YOU SAY, FATHER?
SUPPOSE THAT DICK DIDN'T
SEE NO SOUTHPAW IN THE RING.
HE WOULDN'T BE SO SURE
IT WAS JOHNNIE BRADFIELD,
WOULD HE?
HAVE YOUR TICKETS
READY.
HE'S GOT
THE TICKETS.
I'M WITH HIM.
TICKETS.
TICKETS.
TICK...
TICKETS.
HEY! THERE'S
ONLY TWO HERE.
WHERE'S THE OTHERS
FOR THEM?
WHO'S THEM?
THERE'S ONLY TWO OF ME.
THAT'S ALL.
JIM, WATCH THAT GATE.
SURE.
OVER THERE.
THAT'S WHERE...
GOOD SEATS OVER THERE.
HEY, YOU FELLAS!
Angel: HEY, WHAT'S
EATING YOU, MISTER?
YOU AIN'T
GOT NO TICKET.
HEY, WHO AIN'T
GOT A TICKET?
WHAT'S THAT, WOOD?
COMING THROUGH.
HEY, FELLAS.
HEY, ARE THESE
THE GUYS I'M GONNA FIGHT?
YEAH. SHAKE HANDS
WITH THE BOYS.
HE DON'T
SHAKE HANDS.
HE'LL SHOW THEM PLENTY
OF HANDS IN THE RING.
HEY, COME HERE, YOU.
LET ME SEE YOUR HANDS.
ALL RIGHT.
SAY, WAIT
A MINUTE.
WE AIN'T
IN THE RING YET.
HE'S ONLY KIDDING.
COME HERE.
COME OVER HERE. WHAT'S
THE MATTER? YOU SCARED?
NOPE.
I'M NOT AFRAID
OF ANYBODY.
ATTABOY.
HEY, TAKE IT EASY,
WILL YOU?
HE'S ONLY KIDDING. HE'S
JUST A BIG BABY, THAT'S ALL.
HEY, YOU. COME HERE.
WHAT'S YOUR WEIGHT?
GET YOUR SMEARY
HANDS OFF ME.
I KNOW THAT RACKET.
OH, YOU'RE
A FIGHTER, EH?
I'M NO FIGHTER.
WHAT DID YOU COME UP
HERE TO FIGHT ME FOR?
I SEEN YOUR PICTURE
IN THE PAPER,
AND I COULDN'T WAIT
TO GET YOU ALONE.
OH, YEAH?
GO AWAY.
COME HERE. CUT IT OUT. WHAT'S
THE MATTER WITH YOU GUYS?
I'LL TAKE HIM FIRST.
GO ON. GET HIM
OUT OF HERE.
ARE YOU CRAZY?
NOW THAT GUY WILL CUT YOU
TO PIECES IN ONE ROUND.
THAT'S WHAT
YOU THINK.
BOO! BOO! BOO!
WHAT A STUMBLEBUM!
ALL SET.
THEY'RE READY.
SWELL.
NOT YOU, KID.
HE CHANGED HIS MIND.
COME ON, KALUTCHEE.
HURRY UP. THEY'RE WAITING ON YOU.
I CATCH ON. HE TRYING TO GET MY GOAT.
SOFTEN HIM UP
FOR ME, KID.
COME ON, LYNCH. WE'RE
GONNA NEED YOU UP THERE.
HE'S MAKING ME
WAIT, TOO.
SURE.
HE'S AFRAID OF YOU.
THINK SO? REALLY?
SURE.
I'LL BOX
HIS EARS OFF.
COME ON.
SIT DOWN, WILL YOU?
RELAX.
WHAT'S THE MATTER?
YOU WORRIED
ABOUT THE WIFE?
I'LL STAY IN THERE TILL I
GET THAT HOSPITAL BILL PAID,
OR I'LL... GO ON. SIT DOWN, WILL YOU?
BUCK UP. BUCK UP.
WONDER HOW KALUTCHEE
IS DOING.
WE'LL FIND OUT
PRETTY SOON.
WELL, THE BULL AIN'T
AFRAID OF FELLAS LIKE HIM.
HE AIN'T AFRAID
OF HITTERS.
HE'S AFRAID
OF BOXERS.
SURE.
DON'T LET HIM
WORRY YOU, KID.
OH, HE AIN'T
WORRYING ME.
WHAT'S THAT?
MUST BE KALUTCHEE.
THINK SO?
SURE.
SEE? SEE?
THAT'S WHAT HE GETS
FOR COMING IN.
HE SHOULD STAY
AWAY FROM HIM.
THAT'S WHAT I'M GONNA DO,
UNLESS YOU TAKE HIM FIRST, EH?
YOU WANT TO LET HIM
COME INTO YOU, EH?
BOX HIM. BOX HIM.
SPEAR HIM.
SPEAR HIM GOING AWAY.
THAT'S WHAT I'M GONNA
DO... BOX HIS EARS OFF,
UNLESS YOU
TAKE HIM FIRST.
NEXT COMING UP.
LISTEN.
WHERE KALUTCHEE?
JUST TOOK HIM AWAY.
ALL
BUSTED UP.
YOU SEE? YOU SEE?
THAT'S WHAT HE GETS
FOR COMING IN.
YEAH, YEAH. I KNOW.
OK. OK. LET'S GO.
NO, NOT YOU, KID.
HE WANTS SMITH.
WHO, ME?
STILL TRYING
TO GET MY GOAT, EH?
ALL SET, KID?
WELL, YEAH, BUT,
WELL, NO.
I'VE ONLY GOT
ONE HAND BANDAGED.
OK. WE'LL TAPE THE
OTHER ONE IN THE RING.
COME ON.
WELL, YOU'RE ALL RIGHT
NOW, AREN'T YOU, DORNEY?
ARE YOU TURNING CHICKEN?
ME? I'LL BOX
HIS EARS OFF.
HIS EARS ARE UPSTAIRS. COME ON.
Johnnie:
GOOD LUCK, KID.
RIGHT TO THE JAW,
A LEFT TO THE FACE.
BOY, IS HE A KILLER.
IS HE MURDEROUS.
THE BULL LANDS A TERRIFIC RIGHT
TO SMITH'S JAW, AND SMITH IS DOWN.
YOU CAN FORGIVE SMITH IF HE STAYS
DOWN BECAUSE THIS IS DOWNRIGHT MURDER.
SMITH'S FACE IS RED PULP,
RED, RED, PULP.
AND SMITH IS OUT.
PHEW. AM I GLAD THAT'S OVER.
NOW, THE NEXT FIGHTER
TO MEET THE BULL
IS JACK DORNEY.
HEY! THERE HE IS!
IT'S JACK!
ALL RIGHT, JACK!
ALL RIGHT, JACK!
COME ON, JACK!
JACK!
JACK.
HERE WE ARE! OVER HERE! THE FOURTH ROW!
HA HA!
JACK WILL SHOW
THAT BIG GORILLA.
OH, I DON'T KNOW,
GRAMMY. HE'S AWFUL TOUGH.
WELL, SO IS JACK. DIDN'T
IT TRAIN HIM MYSELF?
LAY IT INTO HIM JACK!
LAND HIM...
I BEG YOUR PARDON.
I BEG YOUR PARDON.
OH, JACK WILL KNOCK
HIS EARS BACK FOR HIM.
HA!
YOU BETTER DO ALL
YOUR YELLING NOW!
IT'LL BE OVER
IN A MINUTE!
I'LL GIVE YOU
THE BACK OF ME HAND!
HEY, JOHNNIE.
Phelan:
HEY, JOHNNIE.
HEY, THERE'S A GUY DOWN
THERE CALLING YOU, KID.
YEAH?
HOW ARE YOU, JOHNNIE?
KNOW HIM?
NAH. NEVER SEEN HIM
BEFORE IN MY LIFE.
QUIET! QUIET, PLEASE!
THE LAST CHALLENGER
TO MEET THE WILD BULL...
JACK DORNEY!
COME ON, BOYS.
ALL RIGHT.
COME ON. COME ON.
YOU FELLAS WILL FIGHT THE STATE
MARQUIS OF QUEENSBURY RULES.
NO LOW BLOWS,
NO HOLDING AND HITTING.
SHAKE HANDS NOW
AND COME OUT FIGHTING.
COME ON,
JOHNNIE.
HIT HIM, JACK!
HIT HIM!
DON'T LET HIM HIT YOU!
HIM HIM!
PIPE DOWN!
PIPE DOWN, YOURSELF.
GET LOST,
WILL YOU?
RUTCHEK IS WORKING DORNEY
ACROSS THE RING.
HE RIPS A TERRIFIC RIGHT
TO DORNEY'S HEART
AND DRIVES DORNEY
UP AGAINST THE ROPES.
"JACK WILL KNOCK
HIS EARS BACK."
HA!
THAT'S IT, JACK!
CUT HIM! CUT HIM, JACK!
CUT HIM WHERE HE
CAN'T TAKE IT!
IN THE BREADBASKET!
IN THE BREADBASKET!
YOUR LEFT! YOUR LEFT!
SOME MORE LEFTS!
COME ON. FIGHT.
DON'T LET THAT GORILLA
DO THAT TO YOU, JACK!
HIT HIM BACK!
HIT HIM BACK!
I BEG
YOUR PARDON.
COMING AROUND THE CORNER.
THE BULL IS RIGHT AFTER HIM.
HE JABS WITH HIS LEFT.
HE SENDS DORNEY'S HEAD BACK.
HE LANDS A TERRIFIC RIGHT
TO DORNEY'S JAW,
COMES THROUGH
WITH A LEFT TO THE JAW,
AND ANOTHER HARD RIGHT
TO THE HEART.
AND DORNEY IS DOWN.
ON YOUR FEET,
JACKIE, ME BOY!
ON YOUR FEET!
OH, HE MUST
HAVE SLIPPED.
OVER A RIGHT HOOK
TO THE JAW.
HA!
JACK, GET UP!
PLEASE GET UP, JACK!
SOCK HIM! SOCK HIM!
MOW HIM DOWN!
I BEG YOUR PARDON.
TIME.
WHAT'S THE MATTER,
YOU GETTING SOFT?
FINISH HIM UP THIS
TIME, KID. FINISH HIM.
YOU CAN BET THIS ROUND.
HE AIN'T BEGUN THE FIGHT.
YOU WAIT.
I'M WAITING.
EH, PUT A ZIPPER
ON THE TRAP, WILL YOU?
NOW GET HIM!
THERE GOES THE BULL AGAIN.
HE'S GOT DORNEY
BACKED INTO A CORNER.
RIPS LEFTS AND RIGHTS
TO THE BODY.
LIFTS DORNEY OFF HIS FEET
WITH A TERRIFIC RIGHT UPPERCUT.
THERE HE GOES. DORNEY IS DOWN
FROM A TERRIFIC RIGHT TO THE JAW.
GET UP, JACKIE!
GET UP!
DO YOU HEAR ME?
DIDN'T I HEAR SOMEONE SAY
SHE TRAINED THAT PALOOKA?
HA!
HE'S UP! HE'S UP!
BUT NOT FOR LONG.
GO AFTER HIM
WITH YOUR LEFT, YOU...
OH. I'M...
JACK, I COULD MAKE A
GREAT FIGHTER OUT OF YOU
IF THAT GUY
DON'T KILL YOU.
I DON'T KNOW WHEN
I'LL NEED A MANAGER OR NOT.
THIS IS ONLY COSTING US 1,500 BUCKS.
DO YOU THINK THAT'S HAY, YOU DOPE?
WELL, THE BELL
SAVED HIM.
"THE BELL
SAVED HIM."
IF YOU HAD TAKEN HIM IN THE FIRST ROUND,
THERE WOULDN'T HAVE BEEN NO BELLS.
HOW'D YOU LIKE
TO FIGHT?
THIS GOES
ONE MORE ROUND,
YOU'LL PAY, SWEETHEART, NOT ME.
AH!
JACK! YOU'RE
STANDING AROUND!
BUT HE FALLS
ALL RIGHT.
YOU AIN'T GONNA LET
THAT BIG PALOOKA LICK YOU,
ARE YOU, JOHNNIE?
COME ON.
QUIT STALLING.
STICK OUT THAT RIGHT
AND SIC THAT LEFT.
I KNOW WHO YOU ARE,
SOUTHPAW.
YOU AIN'T FOOLING ME.
Referee:
SOUTHPAW, HUH?
YEAH!
WHAT DID I TELL YOU?
AW, PIPE DOWN.
SAY THAT AGAIN.
PIPE DOWN.
GOOD BOY, JACK.
YOU DID IT.
GO ON, KID.
BEAT IT.
AW, COME ON. BEAT IT YOURSELF, WISE GUY.
ATTABOY, JACK.
ATTABOY.
WE GOT THE DOUGH NOW.
YOU CAN QUIT.
NOT YET.
YEAH, BUT YOU'RE ALL
CUT UP, JACK,
AND WE DON'T NEED
ANY MORE DOUGH.
WE STILL NEED SOME MORE.
GO ON. SCRAM. SCRAM.
BUT, JACK,
YOU'RE ALL...
KID IS HARD
WITH HIS LEFT.
HERE. TAKE A WHIFF
OF THIS.
Man: COME ON!
GET UP, JACK,
GET UP.
PLEASE GET UP!
WHAT YOU THINK, DOC?
WELL, HE TOOK A PRETTY BAD BEATING,
BUHE'LL COME OUT
OF IT ALL RIGHT.
JACK. JACK.
JACK, ARE YOU
ALL RIGHT?
HOW IS HE,
DOCTOR?
JUST ABOUT
THE SAME.
OH, JACK!
GET UP, DO YOU HEAR? GET UP!
DID YOU TRY VINEGAR?
WE'VE DONE
ALL WE CAN FOR HIM.
WELL, YOU AIN'T
GOING TO DO MUCH
WITH THAT SILLY LITTLE
TIN EAR TRUMPET, YOU KNOW?
Peggy: OH, JACK!
COME OUT OF IT, PLEASE!
OH, JACKIE.
JACKIE, COME OUT OF IT.
YOU'RE ALL RIGHT.
LISTEN. OH, HE DID IT
ALL FOR US.
HE WENT OUT
AND GOT HIMSELF KILLED
JUST FOR US.
OH, JACKIE.
IT'S ALL RIGHT, DEAR.
WE GOT THE MONEY.
OH, MY HEAD.
GO AHEAD, JOHNNIE.
JACK'S THE NAME.
WHO'S HE?
OH, HE'S JUST
A FRIEND OF MINE.
OH, BOY.
YOU FOUGHT A GOOD FIGHT.
YOU KNOW YOU DID.
WHAT A FIGHT!
YEAH, SO I SAYS,
"WHO'S GOT A BETTER RIGHT
IN THERE BUT HIS BROTHER?"
HOW YOU FEELING,
JACK?
I FEEL FINE.
THERE.
WHAT DID I TELL YOU?
JUST A LITTLE WINDED,
THAT'S ALL.
GIVE HIM ANOTHER CHANCE
WITH THAT GORILLA,
AND HE'D TAKE HIM,
WOULDN'T YOU, JACK?
I, UH,
I GOT TO GO NOW.
GO?
I MEAN, UH,
I GOT TO GET DRESSED.
COME ON NOW, BOYS. COME
ON. GET OUT OF HERE.
SEE YOU
AT THE RANCH, JACK.
GO ON! GO ON! GO ON!
I'LL WAIT
OUTSIDE FOR YOU.
ALL RIGHT.
GO ON. I'LL CALL YOU.
YOU'RE ALL RIGHT.
COME ON. GET DRESSED.
I'LL BE RIGHT
WITH YOU, PHELAN.
JACK, ARE YOU
ALL RIGHT NOW?
YEAH. I'M FINE.
I'M FINE.
WILL YOU WAIT
JUST A SECOND, PHELAN?
I GOT TO TELL
PEGGY SOMETHING.
ALL RIGHT.
MAKE IT SNAPPY.
COME ON. I WANT TO TALK
TO YOU, PEGGY.
NO KIDDING. HE'S BOOKED A COUPLE
OF FIGHTS FOR ME BACK EAST.
HE'S MY MANAGER.
THAT'S ALL THERE IS
TO IT. HONEST.
YOU'RE LYING TO ME,
AREN'T YOU, JACK?
NO, NO.
HE'S LYING TO ME, ISN'T
HE? TELL ME THE TRUTH.
NO. HONEST, I'M NOT. HE'S
MY MANAGER, AREN'T YOU?
SURE,
I'M HIS MANAGER.
YOU SEE, HE'S GONNA
TAKE ME BACK EAST,
AND HE'S GOT A LOT
OF BOUTS LINED UP FOR ME.
I'M GONNA PICK UP
SOME EASY CASH,
THEN I'M GONNA
COME RIGHT BACK TO YOU.
HONEST, I AM.
IN ABOUT
10 YEARS.
UH, HE'S JUST CLOWNING,
THAT'S ALL.
THAT'S ALL HE EVER DOES.
ANYTHING FOR A GAG.
MAYBE IF HE BEHAVES HIMSELF REAL GOOD,
YOU'LL SEE HIM
SOONER.
YOU KNOW, HE WANTS ME TO
GO ON A BARNSTORMING TOUR.
YOU KNOW, ONE-NIGHT STANDS
AND THINGS LIKE THAT?
BUT NONE OF THAT
FOR ME.
I'M COMING
RIGHT BACK TO YOU.
I'M GOING WITH YOU.
NO, NO. YOU CAN'T.
YES.
YOU CAN'T BECAUSE...
BECAUSE, WELL,
THIS IS A STAG. HUH?
WE'RE GOING STAG,
AREN'T WE, PHELAN?
HUH? YEAH. NO WOMEN.
THERE'S SOMETHING
WRONG, JACK.
WHAT IS IT?
TELL ME, PLEASE.
NO. THERE ISN'T
ANYTHING WRONG.
I'M COMING
RIGHT BACK TO YOU.
I SWEAR I AM.
I DON'T CARE IF YOU'VE
DONE ANYTHING WRONG, HONEY.
I'M STICKING
WITH YOU.
YOU GOT TO STICK WITH
GRANDMA AND THE KIDS.
COME ON, SON.
WE GOT TO GET GOING.
I WON'T GO TO THE
STATION WITH YOU, JACK...
IF YOU'LL JUST KISS ME
ONCE AND THEN GO QUICKL
BECAUSE
IF YOU DON'T,
I'M GONNA MAKE
AN AWFUL MESS OF IT.
TAKE ME WITH YOU, JACK.
TAKE ME WITH YOU, JACK!
YOU KNOW, PHELAN, YOU WOULD
HAVE MADE A GREAT DETECTIVE
IF YOU HAD
STARTED SOONER.
WELL, I'M NOT
COMPLAINING.
DON'T KNOW WHY
TODAY I'M NOT.
SURE, SURE.
WHEN YOU GET BACK
TO TOWN,
THE MAYOR WILL PROBABLY
GIVE YOU A RIDE DOWN BROADWAY
WITH CONFETTI
AND EVERYTHING.
YOU'LL PROBABLY
BE A BIG SHOT
IN HEADQUARTERS
FROM NOW ON.
YOU SAID IT.
SAY, KID, WE GOT TO
TRAVEL TOGETHER FOR 3 DAYS.
CAN I DEPEND ON YOU?
DON'T WORRY. I WON'T
GIVE YOU ANY TROUBLE.
OK. COME ON.
SIT DOWN.
HELLO, JACK.
WHAT DO YOU MEAN
"HELLO?"
GO ON HOME.
GOING AWAY?
NOW GO ON.
BEAT IT, KID.
WE DON'T NEED YOU
AROUND HERE.
WHO'S TALKING
TO YOU?
HEY, WOULD YOU LIKE ME TO COME WITH YOU?
I TOLD YOU,
GO HOME.
YEAH, BUT YOU SHOULD TAKE ME WITH YOU.
I YOU
TO GO HOME!
MR. PHELAN AND I
HAVE GOT A DEAL ON,
AND IT'S KIND OF PRIVATE.
I'D LIKE TO TAKE YOU
WITH ME, BUT I... I CAN'T.
IT'S A BIG DEAL.
AIN'T IT SO?
THAT'S RIGHT.
NOW GO ON AWAY, KID.
YOU SEE,
YOU GOT TO GO BACK
AND GET THAT
GAS STATION STARTED.
YOU KNOW,
IT WAS YOUR IDEA.
THAT KID KIND OF
THINKS YOU'RE THE WORKS.
YEAH.
HE'S A GOOD KID.
WELL, IT MAKES NO DIFFERENCE TO ME, SEE?
I'M A COP.
I GOT TO DO MY DUTY.
I KNOW.
WHETHER I LIKE IT
OR NOT.
I'M NOT SAYING
YOU DON'T.
I'LL GIVE YOU
ONE TIP.
WHAT?
MAGEE WAS SLUGGED
WITH A RIGHT HAND.
YEAH?
YEAH.
IF YOU GET YOURSELF
A GOOD LAWYER,
YOU MIGHT
CLEAR THAT UP,
YOU BEING A SOUTHPAW
AND ALL THAT.
IF I GET A GOOD LAWYER.
WELL, NOT THAT IT'S
ANY BUSINESS OF MINE.
HERE SHE IS NOW.
WELL, LET'S GO.
THAT'S
A SWELL-LOOKING DAME
YOU'RE LEAVING
BEHIND, KID.
I FEEL KIND OF SORRY
FOR HER.
ALL RIGHT, ALL RIGHT.
COME ON, COME ON, COME ON.
THAT GUY I SENT OUT,
THE GUY THEY BURNED?
HE HAD A WIFE.
WHEN THAT DAME SAID
GOOD-BYE TO YOU,
SHE LOOKED
JUST LIKE HER.
HER MOUTH
ALL TWISTED UP LIKE
FROM THE HURT
INSIDE.
THAT OLD LADY
AND ALL THE KIDS.
THEY SURE THINK YOU'RE THE
WHITE-HAIRED BOY, DON'T THEY?
LOOK, PHELAN.
I'M GOING BACK
AND TAKE WHATEVER
IS COMING TO ME,
BUT THIS SORT OF STUFF
AIN'T INCLUDED, SEE?
OH, I WAS JUST THINKING
A SMART GUY LIKE YOU...
IF YOU HADN'T LAID YOURSELF WIDE OPEN
FOR A DAME
AND THEM KIDS,
I'D NEVER
HAVE FOUND YOU.
YOU'RE A TERRIBLE
SUCKER.
YOU'RE TELLING ME?
BUT I'D DO IT
AGAIN, SEE?
NOW, WILL YOU PLEASE
LAY OFF OF ME?
WELL, I MADE ONE
MISTAKE IN MY LIFE.
SAY, MAYBE
I'M MAKING ANOTHER.
MAYBE I GOT
THE WRONG GUY.
MAYBE...
YEAH. MAYBE YOU HAVE,
WISE GUY.
I'M NOT QUITE SURE.
Man: ALL ABOARD.
GO ON, KID. BEAT IT!
AND, SAY, KEEP THAT KISSER
OF YOURS OUT OF THE CAMERA.
YOU NEVER
PHOTOGRAPH GOOD!
SO LONG, DORNEY!
SO LONG!
SUCKER.
TOMMY!
YOU DARN FOOL KID.
WHERE DO YOU THINK
YOU'RE GOING?
WITH YOU.
THEN COME ON.
CAPTIONING MADE POSSIBLE BY
TURNER ENTERTAINMENT GROUP
CAPTIONED BY THE NATIONAL
CAPTIONING INSTITUTE www. ncicap. org...
Gentlemen of the jury, have you decided on your verdict?
We have.
The prisoner will rise.
Do you find the prisoner guilty or not guilty of willful murder?
According to the evidence, we have no choice but to find the prisoner not guilty so do we all find and may god forgive us.
Prisoner, at the bar and you have heard the verdict.
Under the law, no other verdict is possible.
Yet, it is undoubtedly a gross miscarriage of justice.
It is deplorable,
Professor Moriarty, that a man of your intellectual attainments should be standing in the prisoner's box charged with a crime of murder.
And in setting you free,
I cannot in my conscience exonerate you.
Let the prisoner be discharged.
Let me in, let me in.
My Lord, my lord,
I have important new evidence.
You come too late,
Mr. Holmes.
The prisoner has been discharged.
But my lord, you can't let Moriarty go free.
He killed Loray.
I can prove it.
I can destroy his alibi.
That alibi has been established by three hundred fellows of the Royal Society.
Your lordship, my client has been acquitted.
He cannot be tried twice for the same charge.
Oh there you are, Holmes.
I'm afraid you have a bad opinion of me.
On the contrary, I hold you in the highest esteem but only as a maid.
It's gratifying to know that one's talents are appreciated by such a distinguished connoisseur.
May I give you a lift?
Cabs are scarce in this rain.
Thank you.
Two twenty one
Bakers Street.
Very good, sir.
After you, my dear Holmes.
By no means,
I prefer that you precede me at all times.
Such a creature of habit you are.
You have a magnificent brain, Moriarty.
I admire it.
I admire it so much
I'd like to present it pickled in alcohol to the
London Medical Society.
That would make an interesting exhibit.
Holmes, you only now barely missed sending me to the gallows.
You're the one man in England clever enough to defeat me.
The situation has become impossible.
Have you any suggestions?
I'm gonna break you Holmes.
I'm going to bring out right under your nose the most incredible crime of the century and you'll never suspect it until it's too late.
That will be the end of you, Mr. Sherlock Holmes.
And when I've beaten and ruined you then I can retire in peace.
I'd like to retire, crime no longer amuses me.
I'd like to devote my remaining years to abstract science.
Well here, we are at my lodgings.
I'm so sorry
I can't ask you in.
Good night,
Professor Moriarty.
Good night.
I was just coming in when you rang, sir.
Well there you are, Dawes.
Mr. Bassick is here, sir.
I'll see him at once.
Come to me as soon as he's gone, Dawes.
There's something
I want to say to you.
Yes sir.
Well Bassick.
Don't that bloke ever stop.
That music gives me the creeps.
Does it Bassick?
I rather like it.
I want you to post that letter at the box at
Portland Square just a few minutes before twelve.
Then drive directly to your lodgings by way of Oxford Service.
Wait there till
I send for you.
That's all.
First, I want to know what I'm getting into.
You have your orders.
That's enough.
I have a right to know the layout in case there's trouble.
I'll take care of that.
That's what you promised Higgins in that Emosmith job.
Oh poor Higgins.
They found nothing but his boots.
One boot.
You know, Bassick,
Higgins was a valuable man and a clever craftsman.
But he had your unfortunate habit of asking too many questions and now all that's left of him is one boot.
Don't take me wrong, Professor.
I'll do what you tell me right enough.
I'm sure you will, Bassick, and just to prove how I trust you
I'm going to tell you my plan although you haven't the imagination to appreciate its subtlety.
My whole success depends upon a peculiarity of Holmes brain, its perpetual restlessness.
Its constant struggle to escape boredom.
Holmes again?
Always Holmes until the end.
He's like a spoiled boy who picks watches to pieces but loses interest in one toy as soon as he's given another.
So I'm presenting the ingenious but fickle
Mr. Holmes with two toys, in the order in which
I mean him to have them.
The first, that letter.
If I know Mr. Holmes that will interest him very little, after this comes to fascinate and tantalize his imagination.
Blimey, what it mean?
That is what I'm depending upon to absorb
Mr. Holmes' interest while I'm engaged elsewhere.
I'll give him a toy to delight his heart so full of bizarre complications that he'll forget all about the first toy, that letter.
What you know it, Professor?
The germ of a crime, Bassick, a truly great crime, a crime that will stir the empire, that children will read about in their history books and you're going to be part of it, Bassick.
Off with you now.
You wanted to see me, sir?
I'm away for a few weeks, Dawes, and I come back to find my emfurium magenta, my incomparable emfurium magenta withered, ruined.
I can't understand it, sir.
I take good care of all the plants.
Did you water them?
Every day, sir, just as you told me, sir.
Then how did it happen that I find a spider's web spun across the spout of a watering can?
That can happen overnight, sir.
Overnight, uh.
Then you didn't water them today.
There has been so much to do, sir, preparing for your coming back and all.
Nothing is as important as the care of my flowers.
Through your neglect this flower has died.
You murdered the flower.
I'm sorry, sir.
And to think that for merely murdering a man
I was incarcerated for six whole weeks in a filthy prison cell.
A pity, sir.
A travesty on justice.
Quite so, sir.
But for this crime, Dawes, you should be flogged, broken on the wheel, drawn and quartered.
Yes sir, will that be all sir?
And boiled in oil.
Thank you, sir.
Go away.
Yes, sir.
Well Billy, when you finish sweeping you can dust.
Yes ma'am.
Well good morning,
Dr. Watson.
Good morning, Mrs. Hudson.
Is Mr. Holmes in?
Go right up doctor.
Ah good.
Is he busy?
Well you might say he was busy and then again, you might say he was not busy.
Huh?
Say he was busy, not say he was busy.
Well, well, well, well Billy.
That's a fetchy little froth that you're wearing.
Mrs. Hudson made me put it in, sir.
I was afraid Mr. Holmes or you would see me.
I think it's very becoming.
Come in, Watson.
I trust I don't come inopportunely.
My dear fellow as if you ever could.
Come on pull up a chair.
As a matter of fact, you're just in time to help me decide a matter that is certainly delicate and possibly of the greatest importance.
Of course, anything I can do.
I received this note last night.
My dearest Mr. Holmes.
I'm taking the liberty of calling on you at eleven o'clock tomorrow morning.
That's very soon now, to ask you what may appear a silly question whether or not I should go to a garden party on Saturday of Lady Conynghams.
I beg you to see me.
I'm in desperate need of advice.
Sincerely yours,
Ann Brandon.
What you make of it, Watson?
Somebody's pulling your leg.
No, no, no.
I checked on the young lady.
She lives in town with her brother.
She's very rich, mining fortune.
Her father died somewhat mysteriously about ten years ago.
As for
Miss Brandon's dilemma,
Lady Conyngham is imminently respectable but she gives the kind of parties that one comes away from with a feeling that one hasn't been anywhere.
Oh, how can you trifle with such inconsequentiality when Moriarty's lose on London?
My dear Watson, you astound me.
It's the very inconsequentiality of Miss Brandons message that engages my interest.
And Moriarty, what of him?
I've taken the most efficient steps of keeping in touch with Moriarty.
You're having him followed.
Oh don't be so crude, Watson.
Well what are you doing?
Nothing.
Nothing?
My dear Watson you needn't check me back as if I didn't have a voice
I said nothing.
That's the best thing
I can possibly do at the moment.
Moriarty is as curious about my movement as I am about his so I sit here and wait for him to come to me
And he'll come, never doubt it.
Ba, ba, ba, ba, ba.
So, you fiddle while Rome burns.
A daring metaphor Watson.
And what are you doing with that inferno fiddle, with those flies.
I was observing the reaction on the common housefly of the chromatic scale.
A brilliant experiment.
Yes it will be, if I can find a note that annoys the housefly then might need only play that one note and all the houseflies disappear.
Amazing.
No, no, no.
Elementary, my dear Watson, purely elementary.
I expect that will be the young lady.
On the contrary,
I suggest an elderly gentlemen perhaps a touch of gout in his right leg.
Sir Ronald, I'm delighted to see you.
How do you do, Holmes?
Let me take your hat and stick.
Oh thank you.
I don't think you know
Dr. Watson, do you?
Watson, this is
Ronald Ramsgate,
Constable of the town London where all he has to do is to keep his eyes on the crowned jewels.
How do you do, sir?
Holmes has often spoken of you, Dr. Watson.
You haven't dropped in like this for a long time,
Sir Ronald.
Won't you sit down and have a cup of tea.
Thank you no, no.
I've come to consult you on a rather peculiar matter.
Now just have a look at that.
Doesn't it strike you that the handwriting is...
Yes, yes.
That's because it's written with a left hand.
Star of Delhi will never reach the Tower of London.
Huh.
Curious, and anonymous.
And what is the star of Delhi?
Probably the largest emerald in the worid, a gift to her majesty from the Maharajah Rapur.
Oh, I shouldn't worry about this, Sir Ronald.
It's a typical crank letter besides no professional thief would risk stealing so famous an emerald.
You can't break it up.
He certainly couldn't sell it as it is.
Perhaps not but in my position of trust
I can't afford to take any chances.
I wonder whether you could possibly manage to be on hand when the jewel is delivered.
Now when will that be?
This weekend.
It's coming on the
Cruiser Invincible.
Oh, Sir Ronald, even though I'm convinced that the threat means nothing and that a routine police guard would be quite adequate, you can depend on me.
Thank you.
Now I feel sure the jewel will be safe.
Little enough to do for you, Sir Ronald.
Excuse me.
I don't know what you must think of me but I'm sure I was followed here.
You are Miss Brandon?
Yes.
I'm Sherlock Holmes.
Yes, I know.
Let me introduce you to my associate, Dr. Watson.
How do you do?
Sir Ronald Ramsgate.
Mr. Holmes, I, I...
Well, I've got what I wanted, so I think I'll be going along.
Good day, Miss Brandon.
Goodbye doctor.
Goodbye, Sir Ronald.
Your hat and stick Sir Ronald
Thank you.
I'm depending on you.
I'll not fail you.
I'm sure of it.
Goodbye, sir.
Goodbye.
Yes, Miss Brandon?
I shouldn't have written you as I did Mr. Holmes and then burst in, in this melodramatic way but I had to see you.
It doesn't matter,
Miss Brandon.
There's no more resolutely informal household in all of
London than mine.
You're very kind.
Not at all, only I don't understand why you wish to consult me about a garden party.
You couldn't possibly find a worse guide to social etiquette.
It's because my brother and Gerald Hunter he's the family solicitor.
He insist on my going and I don't want to.
I don't want to.
Yes but how should I know how to advise you,
Miss Brandon.
Perhaps you should do as your brother and family solicitor suggest.
Lady Conyngham is imminently respectable.
Oh Mr. Holmes,
I'm so frightened.
What are you frightened about, Miss Brandon?
Murder.
Sit down, Miss Brandon.
Now suppose you tell us all about it.
Well this came for my brother, Lloyd, in the post two days ago.
Hmm.
This seems to be a field day for crank messages.
Look at that, Watson.
Huh?
Curious.
May the eleventh, that's today.
My father received just such a note before he was murdered.
Murdered?
Murdered.
Ten years ago on
May the eleventh.
Scotland Yard couldn't make anything of it but I saw him, my father, lying there on the pavement with the back of his head all...
Now tell me,
Miss Brandon, do you associate
May the 11th with anything else besides your father's death,
I mean, perhaps with some other incident in your family history?
No, no nothing.
My family has no history.
My father was a self-made man.
I see.
Oh Mr. Holmes, you must save my brother.
Don't let them kill him as they did my father.
Jerrold?
It was very wrong for you to come here, Ann, after I expressly asked you not to.
No more so than for you to follow me.
Where's the paper you took off my desk?
Here in my hand and I'll keep it until I find out what it means.
I apologize for the intrusi髇, gentlemen.
My name is Hunter.
I'm a legal representative for
Miss Brandon's brother.
That note was placed confidentially in my keeping.
It's of no concern to anybody except
Mr. Brandon and myself.
Murder is a concern of every right-minded person, Mr. Hunter.
You make too much of a trifle.
There's is nothing trifling about murder.
Miss Brandon fears this drawing may be a threat.
Oh, she's been reading too many novels.
It's merely some kind of joke or the word of a mental incompetent.
Isn't it true, Mr. Hunter, that Miss Brandon's father received such a drawing before he was killed?
Since my client attaches no significance to that, Mr. Holmes,
I don't see why you should.
It's pure coincidence.
Yes.
But it would be unfortunate if the coincidence turned into a tragedy, wouldn't it?
That is our responsibility,
Mr. Holmes.
I regret that you've been troubled.
I'll send you a check for your fee.
As of yet there is no fee.
I haven't accepted the case.
You see, Ann, you've only made yourself ridiculous.
Well, if Mr. Holmes won't help me
I'll go to Scotland Yard.
Don't you trust me, Ann?
But Jerrold there's too much at stake.
My brother's life.
Darling, you must trust me.
If you don't what's to happen to us?
I don't know, Jerrold.
I can't think.
I've decided to accept your case, Miss Brandon.
I shall help you all I can.
Oh thank you.
We don't want your interference, Mr. Holmes.
I interfere whenever and wherever
I like, Mr. Hunter.
I think you better go, Jerrold.
Come with me.
No.
Very well if that's how you want it.
Good day, gentlemen.
Am I being very foolish, Mr. Holmes?
I don't think so.
May I keep that note?
Yes, of course.
It struck me that
Mr. Hunter behaved rather curiously.
Yes.
He's my fiance.
I understand that.
You have no idea what kind of bird this is supposed to be, have you?
I don't know anything about birds.
I noticed that it isn't just a bird.
It's a definite kind of bird.
I think it belongs to the
Procellariiformes family.
We should go to the Kensington
Museum and look him up and I'd like you to come with me, Miss Brandon.
Oh yes, yes of course, anything you say.
Come in, Billy.
Yes, Mr. Holmes?
Now Billy, I'd be obliged if you'd take this young lady down to Mrs. Hudson and give her a cup of tea.
Yes, Mr. Holmes.
Then Billy I want you to get me a cab.
I know sir.
Not the first, not the second cab in the line but the third.
I don't think that precaution would be necessary in this case but use your own judgment.
Yes sir.
And by the way Billy.
Yes, sir?
When you found that cab, you might remove the dust that you kicked under the rug on the landing.
Billy's studying to take over my duties when
I retire, Miss Brandon.
I'll join you below in just a few minutes.
I don't know how to thank you, Mr. Holmes.
Please don't try.
Holmes, you can't get involved in this case.
Your duty is to guard the Star of Delhi.
Now what?
Oh, bother the star of Delhi.
What?
Here's a case where a man's life may be involved and there's something grotesque about this business.
The young Hunter knows a great deal more than he proposes to tell.
Find out what you can about him, will you Watson and report to me at the museum.
It's time for lunch.
Lunch, one can have lunch anytime.
Oh go on, Watson, please hurry up.
You're certain there was no one unearthed a grievance against your father or your family.
No, I told you.
My brother and I live very quietly.
My father, well I admit he was a hard man but men who got into new worids have to be but he was honorable and fine.
And Mr. Hunter?
We've known each other ever since we were children.
My brother and I have always trusted him completely.
Tell me, have you ever through your family or Mr. Hunter heard the name of a man called Moriarty.
Moriarty?
No.
You're quite sure?
Quite.
Why do you ask?
Somehow,
I have the feeling of renewing an old acquaintance.
Here we are.
Procellariiformes, west wing, section 4-A.
I'm sure everything will be taken care of to your satisfaction.
I depend upon you implicitly.
Well there'll be no difficulty.
Lloyd?
I thought you were asleep.
How can I can sleep with this threat over me?
We've got to do something about it, Jerrold.
Who's that man here just now?
A client.
Who was he?
See here, old man.
You mustn't let yourself go like this.
I know.
I haven't slept a wink since that note came.
You've got to sleep if you're to keep your wits about you.
This is May the 11th, the day on the paper.
He's going to kill me, Jerrold.
Wherever I go, whatever I do, he's going to kill me.
Is there nothing anyone can do about it?
Why don't you go home and go to bed.
Can't do yourself any good pacing my office.
Now the safest place in
London for you just now is your own home.
Perhaps you're right.
You know I can't go on like this.
I'll go home.
You'll come with me, Jerry?
I'm afraid I can't, Lloyd.
Probably wouldn't matter.
If anything should happen to me, you'll look after
Ann, won't you?
Don't be absurd.
Nothing's going to happen to you.
But if it should.
You know how
I feel about Ann.
Goodbye.
Thanks.
You'll be alright, Lloyd.
I think it's just a bad dream.
I think I'll walk home, get some air.
And why not?
Nothing can happen to you on a public street.
I hope you're right.
Goodbye Jerrold.
Goodbye old man.
See the beak, the nostrils, the whole formation of the body is the same.
In sea lore, the companion of ships and the good old men of honest mariners but an 醤gel of destruction to those who do him ill.
The albatross.
It looks the same.
I wonder what it means.
Are you certain that the albatross doesn't suggest some memories, an association with your family?
Think.
I am thinking.
No the only thing it reminds me of is the poem, water, water everywhere and all the boards did shrink.
Water, water everywhere, nor any drop to drink.
You've hit on it.
And instead of the cross, the albatross about my neck was hung.
This is no childish prank, Miss Brandon, but a cryptic warning of a venging death.
We must go to your brother at once.
Holmes, Holmes.
Come on Watson quick.
Holmes, this is important.
Well Watson, you're bursting with news.
What it is man speak up.
We've no secrets from Miss Brandon.
Moriarty.
I knew it.
What have you found out, Watson.
That fellow Hunter is working for Moriarty.
They were together in Hunter's office.
I watched Moriarty leave.
Excellent.
And what did
Mr. Hunter do then?
I don't know.
You don't know.
No, I came away directly to tell you what I discovered.
Have I done something wrong?
I hope not.
I particularly wanted
Mr. Hunter's movements kept in view today.
Sorry?
Mr. Holmes?
Yes, Miss Brandon?
Regardless of appearances, don't condemn
Jerrold too quickly.
I know he's keeping some secret from me but he could never do anything vicious I'm sure.
I trust you're right, Miss Brandon, but we must be on our guard.
And I was gonna say...
Well what were you about to say, Watson?
Nothing.
Watson?
Yes.
I'm afraid you're an incorrigible bungler.
Oh Mr. Holmes, I wish you could go faster.
He's going as fast as he can, my dear.
Will we be in time?
I'm sure we will,
Miss Brandon.
He's dead all right.
Lloyd?
Lloyd.
Yes?
Oh, Mr. Holmes?
Can I give you a hand sir?
No, thank you, I can manage all right.
Oh my.
She's only fainted.
Take care of her, will you Watson?
Get me some smelling salts.
Yes, sir.
Where's Inspector Bristol.
In there.
I don't think you ought to go in.
He's questioning a witness and you know the inspector.
I'll take responsibility.
Oh it's you, Mr. Holmes.
How do you come to be here?
I just happened to be passing.
I know the family.
Hi, Mr. Hunter.
And you, inspector?
I don't know how much you know about this business Mr. Holmes, but this time,
I'm a little bit ahead of you.
Excellent Bristol.
And you've already solved the crime?
I found the murderer.
Yes, but that's not quite the same thing you know.
I didn't kill
Lloyd Brandon.
Has anyone said you did.
Oh, it's plain enough what's in the inspector's mind.
And he's wrong.
Well he's wasted time badgering me the murderer's got away.
Well if you're so anxious to save my time supposing you explain how you came to be found bending over the corpse with this in your hand and him with his head bashed in?
Well if you won't talk,
I'm gonna hold you on suspici髇 of murder.
I didn't kill him I tell you.
You clubbed him to death with the butt end of this revolver from behind.
I wouldn't go too far along that line, inspector.
And what would you propose that I should do,
Mr. Holmes?
Find the murderer?
What?
If that man didn't club
Lloyd Brandon to death, who did?
Nobody.
What?
Brandon was strangled to death.
Strangled?
The wound to the back of his head were administered post-mortem.
Are you sure of it, Mr. Holmes?
Absolutely.
Talk to the medical examiner if you have any doubts.
You wait here.
How do you know he was strangled?
The marks around the neck.
Cigarette, Mr. Hunter?
No thanks.
So, that blow on the back of the head becomes an interesting element.
It was unnecessary therefore vicious.
Intelligent criminals are seldom vicious except on special occasions.
Though the apparent method of the crime was brutal,
I'm convinced that the crime itself was intelligently planned.
And Bristol thinks I did that.
The nose of a police dog, although long and efficient, points in only one direction at a time.
What do you mean?
Simply that you're the obvious suspect.
It's so ridiculous.
Why should I want to kill him?
You should know that better than anyone else, Mr. Hunter.
You're his lawyer.
You manage the estate.
You'll have to explain that, Mr. Holmes.
The Brandon estate is quite considerable.
Miss Ann inherits and you're about to marry Miss Ann.
Why you...
I was merely demonstrating how the police mind works.
Yes I'm afraid our friend the inspector has quite set his heart on arresting you.
Arresting me?
You mustn't allow them to do that, Mr. Holmes.
I must be let free to protect Ann.
From what, Jerrold?
Answer me.
Ann, I'm sorry.
First they murdered my father and now they've murdered Lloyd.
Do they want to kill me too?
I don't know.
I don't know anything anymore.
I did my best to guard him day and night yet they found him all the same in an empty street.
Oh I may have lost him for a moment but I couldn't have been far behind.
Who are they?
Jerrold you're lying.
You've been lying all the time.
You knew from the first that note was a real threat.
That's why you tried to send me away, why you followed Lloyd.
Oh Jerrold, if you know who killed him why won't you tell us?
Why won't you tell us everything?
I'll tell you why.
I've been watching you, Mr. Hunter and I found out...
What have you found out, Dr. Watson?
Whatever Watson has found out you'll know inevitably.
I have unbounded confidence in his lack of discretion.
Meanwhile, time presses and we've work to do outside before it gets too late.
Mr. Holmes.
Excuse us.
You pushed me out of the room as if I were a child.
What am I to make of this, Holmes?
Anything but such a petulant face old fellow.
Come along.
In another moment
I would have made him confess about Moriarty.
That's exactly what I didn't want.
If Moriarty's behind this case,
Hunter will lead us to him.
Well, Mr. Holmes,
I just coming to find you sir.
Have you seen the body?
He was strangled to death, just as you and I thought.
So now I'm gonna arrest this fellow Hunter, take him down to the yard.
I can really question him there and I thought perhaps you'd like to come along, sir.
No I think not, inspector.
Dr. Watson and I are going across the way to take a look at the scene of the crime.
You'll be wasting your time, sir.
My men have already covered the ground.
Well we'll just take a look all the same.
Incidentally, inspector, if I were you
I shouldn't arrest Mr. Hunter, in any case not now.
Nor I shouldn't question him any further.
Why not?
Well it won't get us anywhere.
He won't talk until he's ready.
Anyhow you haven't a case against him yet.
Why not leave him at large.
Have him watched and see what happens, for a day or two at least.
Hmm.
You've always found my advice pretty sound, haven't you, inspector?
It's got you a lot of attention in the newspapers.
Then you'll work on the case, sir, in the usual way?
In the usual way, inspector.
I'll do as you suggest, sir.
Good.
Come on, Watson.
Come in.
Oh, Mr. Hunter, we shan't be wanting you any longer.
You're free to go whenever you like.
Thank you, inspector.
You see, darling, they don't think anything of the kind.
Ann, you must believe.
I don't know what to believe anymore that Lloyd's gone.
If I can't believe in you, Jerrold, there's nothing in the whole worid
I can believe in or count on.
Yes.
But if you knew
Lloyd was in danger why did you try to keep me from seeing
Sherlock Holmes?
Why did you follow Lloyd with a revolver in your pocket?
Makes me afraid sometimes even of you.
Darling, how can you say such a thing?
Oh, I don't know what I'm saying.
I'm so tired and confused.
All right, Holmes.
I found it.
Ready when you are.
I say there, has something happened?
Definitely.
Would you mind moving back a few paces.
Not at all.
Thank you.
Perhaps I can find a doctor.
I'm a doctor.
What's the matter with you?
I'm all right.
I was thinking of you.
Why?
But aren't you ill?
Certainly not.
I'm dead.
Well I'm afraid
I must be getting on.
Don't let me detain you.
Stupid fellow.
Watson, come here.
Coming Holmes.
Look at that, Watson.
What have you found, Holmes?
Footprints?
Yes.
A club-footed man about five foot eleven I should say from the length of his stride.
Do you observe anything singular about these footprints, Watson?
I can't say that I do.
Club-footed people invariably bring their full weight down on the toe.
If you look closely you'll observe that the weight of the man who made these footprints is normally balanced from toe to heel.
Well what can you make of that, Holmes?
Oh just one more unnatural element to this rather peculiar case.
The clubfoot must have some other compensating deformity to explain these footprints.
What?
You think these are the footprints of a murderer?
It's possible.
Yes, yes it's quite possible.
What Holmes?
Well a man standing just about here would command a view of the park.
He might project some kind of weapon.
Not a weapon's been found except Hunter's revolver.
It could easily have been retrieved in the excitement.
And what kind of weapon thrown from here could both strangle a man and crush his skull in?
If we knew that, my dear Watson, we'd be a great deal nearer to the solution of the crime.
Look at that.
Here.
Yes, it was torn from that tree perhaps by something hurdling past.
The sap's not dry yet.
That means it was torn off within the last few hours.
Ahh.
What have you found, Holmes?
It's a watch guard.
Looks like a rabbit's foot.
No, no, no.
It's chinchilla.
Unquestionably chinchilla.
Well rabbit or chinchilla.
What's it matter?
No, no. Perhaps it doesn't matter at all, Watson.
We'll see.
I've always thought those things were in very poor taste.
Fancy going about with a dead animal's foot dangling from your pocket.
Yes, and then losing it at the scene of a murder.
Very careless.
Scream!
She's in here, sir.
Who is it?
It's Mr. Holmes.
Oh, Mr. Holmes, I'm so glad you're here.
This may sound foolish to you but after Mr. Hunter left
I went up to be with my brother.
While I was with him
I heard...
Yes?
The sound of music from the street, strange music.
It didn't begin, and it didn't end.
It just went on and on.
What was it about the music that frightened you?
I heard it once before, Mr. Holmes, only once when
I was a little girl in South America, the night my father was killed.
It's quite possible that under the circumstances this impressi髇 was a hallucination.
This was no hallucination,
Dr. Watson.
Take my word for it.
Did you see who was playing?
I went to the window.
There was a street beggar standing in front of the house.
I could just see the outline of its figure and then I became so frightened I screamed and
Yes I don't wonder.
Do you think you would remember that melody?
Remember it.
I should never forget it as long as I live.
Miss Brandon, I wish
I could spare you this but time is so important.
I understand.
What do you want me to do?
It's not going to be easy.
Anything if it will help you clear up my brother's death.
Do you think you could bear to repeat it for me?
I'll try.
That's definitely every note of it.
Mr. Holmes, would you mind going out, please?
Yes.
Yes, of course.
You must try to get some sleep.
It's been a terrible day for you.
Thank you, Billy.
What's that, Mr. Holmes?
Huh?
Yeah, that's a chinchilla foot, Billy.
Chinchilla?
Yes.
You know what a chinchilla is?
Yes, Mr. Holmes.
It's a little animal that grows in South America and its fur is very expensive.
Ahh, you should remember that, Billy.
It'll save you a lot of money when you grow up.
May I look at it, sir?
Uh, yeah, yes, certainly, Billy.
Well what do you make of it, Billy?
I'd like to have one of these.
They must bring you lots of luck.
Well why do you say that?
Well I bet in Chile or
Bolivia they carry around a chinchilla's foot for good luck the same as we carry a rabbit's foot.
Ahh.
You hear that, Watson?
My hearing is in no way impaired, thank you.
And you think that the man who lost this comes from
Chile or Bolivia?
Yes, sir, cause that's the only places chinchillas grow.
Well, Watson.
What do you say to that for a simple deduction?
I've listened to seashells that made better sense.
Why do you waste your time like this, Holmes?
Half the women in the worid own chinchilla wraps.
You exaggerate, Watson, and half the women in the worid wish they didn't.
No, Dr. Watson.
You see they make the coats out of skins.
Oh really?
Yes, sir, and the only place you can get a chinchilla's foot will be where the chinchilla lives.
There Billy, there's sixpence for you.
Blimey me a tenner.
Oh, thank you.
No, thank you,
Billy, thank you.
I don't know why you let that insufferable little brat come in here.
I was pulling your leg, Watson, merely relaying to you through Billy certain observations, which may or may not coincide significantly with what I found.
You found something?
I think so.
I've identified the death music, Watson, the melody Miss Brandon played for us last night.
It's an ancient
Inca funeral dirge still used by the Indians in the remote
Chilean Andes as a chant for the dead.
What on earth has that got to do with Professor Moriarty or the Star of Deli?
I wouldn't know, Watson.
I really wouldn't know.
Would you mind?
Inca funeral dirge.
Ahh, how do you do, doctor.
How are you sir.
Holmes, how lucky to find you at home.
Sir Ronald, well won't you sit down.
Here, sir.
Thanks.
Oh I hope I'm not interrupting you.
Oh no, no, no.
But I'm very anxious to know have you had any idea, in the connection with that note?
The note?
Oh, I'm afraid
I haven't had much time to think about it and after all the Star of Deli is not the immediate problem.
Oh but it is.
You will help me as you promised, won't you Holmes?
Lmagine the scandal, if anything should happen to a crown jewel.
Yes.
When does it arrive?
Tomorrow night.
I've had to arrange for delivery at ten o'clock, a most inconvenient hour for everyone of course but I can't leave the jewel out of the vault overnight, you know.
Once it arrives it's technically in my custody.
Yes.
Yes, I understand.
What do you want me to do?
Could you possibly be at the tower tomorrow night at ten.
I'll take care of everything.
Good.
You'll have your own men there, of course, and as an added precaution
I'll see to it that a few policemen are on hand.
Excellent.
I can't tell you, how grateful
I am to you, Holmes.
Not at all, Sir Ronald.
Well goodbye.
Goodbye, sir.
You'll forgive me bothering you like this.
But I'm sure you understand the emergency of the matter.
Certainly, Sir Ronald.
Thank you again.
Goodbye doctor.
Goodbye Sir Ronald.
How do you do,
Miss Brandon.
How do you do?
Will you excuse me please?
Port Authority, pier nine.
Miss Brandon, is anything wrong?
Two are not enough.
They don't even give me time to bury my dead.
Please sit down.
No, I don't want to sit down thank you.
This is exactly like the drawing your brother received and it bears another date,
May the thirteenth.
That's tomorrow.
Was this left at your door?
Yes, about half an hour ago.
I came here directly.
You didn't happen to notice the messenger who left it?
No, one of the servants answered the door.
He just took it.
He didn't notice anything.
Mr. Holmes, what shall I do?
Isn't May the thirteenth the night you're supposed to go to
Lady Conyngham's party?
Well yes, but...
I know Lady Conyngham is irreproachable but there's too much emphasis on this date,
May the thirteenth, whether you should go to the party or whether you shouldn't.
You mean Jerrold?
Miss Brandon we feel that...
Mr. Hunter has much to explain, Miss Brandon.
As yet he's not been proved guilty.
But I must know.
You really want to know?
I must.
I'll do anything rather than bear this uncertainty, the suspense.
Then go to Lady
Conyngham's party.
But I can't, not now.
After Lloyd...
I understand your feelings but you must go to
Lady Conyngham's just the same.
She's an older woman.
She's very fond of you.
Now you're alone in a time of trouble.
What more natural than that you should go to her?
But she's giving a party and my brother's...
You only have to make an appearance.
Yes, but...
That's what I want, Miss Brandon.
I want you to make an appearance, perhaps take a walk through the grounds.
I warn you it may involve considerable risk but I think the kind of woman I take you to be would rather risk everything on one venture than live the rest of her life in the shadow of doubt and death.
Am I right?
You are right, Mr. Holmes.
I'll do as you say.
Thank you and goodbye.
No.
This time we'll say au revoir.
Miss Brandon?
Yes.
Are you quite sure you're not afraid.
Of course I'm afraid but I'll go through with it.
Good.
May the thirteenth.
That's tomorrow night.
Well Holmes you've certainly let yourself in for a busy night tomorrow.
What about the
Star of Deli and you promise to Sir Ronald and what about your duty to the crown?
All that will be taken care of.
Never fear.
I'm going to delegate the most dependable man I know to guard the star of
Deli in my place while I keep an eye on Miss Brandon.
Oh really, who may that be?
You my dear fellow.
Huh?
You'd like to let that razor slip, wouldn't you, Dawes?
No sir.
By no means, sir.
You're a coward, Dawes.
If you weren't a coward you'd a cut my throat long ago.
Why I give you my word, sir.
That thought never entered my mind, sir.
Then you're worse than a coward.
You're a fool.
You have as much hatred for me as I have contempt for you.
Excellent.
Without your beard, sir, you look like your own son.
It's unlikely that I shall be back tonight Dawes
You may as well take the evening off.
Thank you, sir.
Thank you, Dawes.
I'm engaged.
Of course you are, Bassick.
Why do you think
I'm paying you?
I never would have recognized you, professor.
Yes, sir?
What'd you find out, Bassick?
Just like you said.
They're taking the goods off the boat tonight.
The men is waiting.
Excellent.
Now let's hurry.
Yes sir.
Excuse me.
Hello darling.
Are you feeling all right, my child.
Yes, I think so.
And has that young son of mine been behaving himself?
He's been awfully kind.
I'm afraid I'm very tiresome this evening.
Nonsense.
No man on the bright side of senility could possibly call you tiresome.
Ann, you're glad you came aren't you?
Very glad.
Good.
You see I was right.
It was quite the best thing for you to do to come down here.
You shouldn't have thought of staying alone in that house, so soon after.
Perhaps you're right.
You're going to stay on here over the weekend.
If you want me.
As long as you like, my dear.
Thank you.
Has anyone asked for me tonight?
Why no?
Are you expecting someone?
I'm not sure.
Well it doesn't matter.
Oh mother.
May I take Ann away.
I want her to see some of this entertainment.
Of course, dear.
I hope it will be good.
Sit here, Ann.
I want you to see this musical chap.
He may be amusing.
Everyone delights to spend their summer holidays
Down beside the side of the silvery sea
I'm no exception to the rule in fact if I had my way
I'd be down beside the side of the silvery sea
But when your just a commoner a Smith or Jones or Brown a business up in town
You've got to settle down
You save up all the money you can till summer comes around then away you go to a spot you know where the shells are found
Oh I... do like to be beside the sea side
I do like to be besides the sea
I do like to stroll along the
So just let me be beside the sea side
I'll be beside the silver sea for there are lots of giris beside
I should like to be besides
Beside the sea side besides the sea.
Funny fellow, isn't he?
Yes.
Ann, I wish there was something I could do.
Could I get you an ice?
You're very kind to me.
I'd like that.
All right.
You stay here.
I'll see what I can pillage, be straight back.
Thank you.
Good evening,
Miss Brandon.
Everything all right?
What do you want?
We did have an appointment, you know.
Mr. Holmes, you're...
Shhhh...
We mustn't be seen together.
Has anything happened?
Have you seen anything unusual?
No nothing yet.
Mr. Holmes, do you think
I could possibly be in danger here?
There's no doubt of it but don't worry.
I'll be watching.
I'll be glad when it's over.
Yes, I know.
Don't take any unnecessary risks.
Don't talk to strange people and above all don't wander far from the lights and the crowd.
You must go back.
Good luck.
Here we are, Ann.
Thank you.
Tell me, that's a
South American gaucho orchestra, isn't it?
Yes.
Rather good aren't they?
Yes.
Shall we go in.
It's rather chilly out here.
Just as you like, Ann.
You're being too hard on Holmes, Sir Ronald.
He gave me his word he'd be here, sir.
He sent me in his place.
You?
Well, sir, I've been with Holmes on a good many cases and I can assure you, you might have done considerably worse.
Where are these other policemen he promised to send me?
They'll be here directly.
A sergeant and two policemen, picked men sir.
What is it, sergeant?
Police officers to see Dr. Watson, sir.
Bring 'em in.
It's about time.
Is Dr. Watson here?
Yes, I am Dr. Watson.
Sergeant Bullfinch at your service, sir.
Good evening, sir.
My I see your identification, sir?
I told you
I am Dr. Watson.
I don't doubt that, sir, but the inspector said
I was to be particular about identification, sir.
Well you seem to be a law-abiding citizen.
I suppose you'll be wanting to see mine?
Yes, please.
Everything seems in order, Sir Ronald.
Company halt.
Captain Mannery,
Royal Navy, with escort reporting to Sir Ronald Ramsey.
Just a moment, sir.
Is that you, Sir Ronald?
Yes.
Captain Mannery?
Yes, sir.
Raise the gate.
Well here it is, Sir Ronald.
Ahh.
The Star of Deli.
This has been a great anxiety to me,
Captain Mannery.
I can't tell you how relieved I shall be when I have this jewel safely locked up in the tower.
Would you like us to go with you, sir?
No, there's no occasi髇.
I have ample protection.
Then I bid you goodbye, Sir Ronald.
Goodbye Captain Mannery.
I am most grateful to you.
Thank you, sir.
All right, Gentlemen.
Guard, about face.
Halt.
Ahh.
It's the longest short walk I ever had.
Hold that for a moment, will you?
The crown jewels, gentlemen, the accumulated wealth of ten centuries of English kings, a grave responsibility.
It's not often this door is unlocked and this is the key to all this treasure.
The emerald, where is it?
Somebody snatched it.
The policemen, where are they?
They're not policemen at all.
After them.
Sir Ronald, look.
The Star of Deli.
They've dropped it.
You see, Sir Ronald.
Every thing's turned out all right after all.
And all thanks to your brilliant friend,
Sherlock Holmes.
So my fears were ridiculous and that note was merely the work of a crank.
Nobody would steal the star of Deli.
No one there, Sir Ronald.
Never mind Sergeant
I have the jewel.
I have a good mind to give this story to the press.
It will put
Holmes in his place.
Oh, I wouldn't do that, Sir Ronald.
You have got the jewel back.
I have indeed, as safe as the
Crown Jewels of England, but no thanks to Holmes.
Well he did send me in his place.
Yes, and it's a capital thing he did.
You're a splendid fellow, Watson.
You've done me a great service tonight.
I shall see to it that it is reported in due course to the proper authorities.
Come along, Sergeant.
Turn out the light.
Yes.
They got away, sir, in the direction of Cog Hill.
But they left what they came for.
The emerald is safe.
Oh good, sir.
All right Sergeant.
Goodbye, my dear.
I'll drive over and see you tomorrow.
You're terribly tired, my child, aren't you?
Yes, I am.
You better go to bed.
I'm going to look in on you later and if you're not asleep,
I shall be very severe.
Uh-uh.
Whatever is the matter with you, my dear?
I just noticed the time.
That clock on the landing.
It's seven minutes to twelve.
In another eight minutes it won't be May the thirteenth anymore.
You must go to bed at once, You really must.
I'll go with you.
I'd like you to.
I shouldn't take you away.
Nonsense.
They've all gone.
Besides no one misses a middle-aged hostess.
Have a good rest, my dear, and be sure to sleep late.
It's an invariable custom of the house.
I'll try.
Good night.
Good night, my dear.
I was just coming to find you, Miss Brandon.
There's a gentleman on the terrace asking to see you and he says it's most important.
Mr. Holmes, thank you.
Ann, my dear.
What are you doing here?
Am I so unwelcome?
Why did you come?
I've been terribly worried about you, darling.
I wanted to be sure you were safe.
Why did you think
I might not be safe?
Ann, whatever has come over you?
Don't touch me.
Don't touch me.
Surely you're not afraid of me?
You are afraid.
That's how much all the years have counted.
You think I want to hurt you.
I don't know why I don't.
Ann.
Wait.
Come here, Ann.
Come along this way quick.
Ahh!
Holmes, you all right?
Never better, Watson.
And Miss Brandon?
She'll be all right, the poor child she's fainted.
Look after her will you, Andrews, and take her back to the house.
What on earth is this, Holmes?
This, Watson, is a
South American bolas, the instrument that killed Lloyd Brandon.
What?
Yes.
Come and take a look at his murderer.
He's badly hurt.
Can he be moved, doctor?
Yes.
Then I'll take him to the Yard.
Yes, it's just as I suspected.
This club footed shoe was a very clever device but not quite clever enough, my friend.
I'll wager you didn't think of it yourself.
Who put you up to it?
The professor.
He's said he'd fix it so I don't get caught.
Professor Moriarty.
Si, Moriarty.
I kill him.
I scarcely think you'll have the chance now.
So that clears up our case.
Clears it up, we've only just begun.
Come along Watson.
Don't move.
Stay where you are and keep your eyes open.
All right come on Watson.
There's nobody here.
Well why didn't you say so before?
Oh, lilly pond.
It's damp.
Damp, I'm wet through.
He's been shaving.
Moriarty's worn that beard for years.
Why would he shave it off?
To disguise himself, of course.
Obviously, Watson.
But why tonight especially for what purpose?
Huh?
A Baedeker.
What would Moriarty be doing with a guidebook?
He knows London like a cab driver.
Look, Watson, look.
The Tower of London.
Sergeant Bullfinch.
Moriarty without his beard.
Then he stole the emerald.
I wonder what exactly he did do, or rather is doing.
What do you mean, Holmes?
Don't you see, my dear Watson.
Moriarty concocted that Brandon case with all its fantastic convolutions expressly to divert my attention till the time the
Star of Deli was delivered.
So that he could steal the emerald but he didn't get it.
We fooled him.
That's exactly the point, Watson.
He didn't want the Star of Deli.
What?
No.
A real crime has not yet come to light.
He caused a man to be murdered solely in order to distract me.
He staged that fiasco at the Tower of London.
Why I don't know but one thing I'm certain.
It was all done with a purpose.
Somewhere in London at this very moment something tremendous is happening.
He said he was going to do it and he's doing it now, the most stupendous, the most incredible crime of the century, the crowning act of his career, the crowning act.
Crowning?
St. Edward's crown.
This was the crown stolen from the
Tower of London in 1671 by Colonel Blood and his accomplices, the total value of the regalia is estimated at three million pounds.
Watson, the crown jewels.
We're wasting time.
Ay, cabby.
Never mind, get in, Watson.
I say drive carefully old boy.
What is it, McKenzie?
An accident, Sergeant.
Give me your hand.
Get this man out of here.
Well, what were you trying to do, batter your way right into the Tower of London?
Of course not, course not, it's preposterous.
Well what were you doing?
Well I...
Where is your cabby
Well where is he?
I don't know, I haven't the faintest idea.
Bring him along to the posting room.
Did you hear a shot?
I did, sir, I thought it came from the tower.
Follow me on the double.
Well, Ann Brandon 21, and Jerrold Hunter 29, were married this morning at the Castone Hall
Register Office.
Well that takes care of that but I still don't understand how young Hunter became involved in the mystery.
Alfred?
Can I borrow your violin?
Certainly, governor.
I said, I still don't understand how young Hunter became involved.
Perfectly simple.
Whatever Gerald Hunter did was done to protect Miss Brandon.
But I saw it myself talking with Moriarty.
My dear Watson,
I expected even you to see through that trick.
Moriarty went to him with a trumped up lawsuit to pull us off the track.
Those flies again.
Very effective, my dear Watson.
Elementary, my dear
Holmes, elementary.
>> Napisy pobrane z http:/napisy.org <<
>>>>>>>> nowa wizja napis體 <<<<<<<<
- That's got you.
- Let's have a look here.
Perhaps you've got me, perhaps you ain't.
- What's that?
- Don't know, I'm sure.
It's your sister.
The petition, have you heard yet?
It- It was rejected.
Well, that's that.
Paul. Paul, listen to me.
You can't give up hope.
- I haven't.
- Oh, what's the use?
- Listen. Geoffrey Richmond has arranged-
- What can he do?
He's been our best friend through all this horrible time.
Now he's arranged for me to meet the home secretary today.
Don't you see how different it will be to talk to them personally?
I'll make them see that they can't-
I'm an ungrateful devil.
I hope she won't be much longer.
We've got to be at the home secretary's office by 12:30.
I don't think it'll do much good, Richmond... though it was decent of you to arrange the interview.
- How is he?
- I think he's a little more hopeful now.
- Shouldn't we be starting?
- Yes, we can just do it.
Miss Gray, every particle of evidence in this case... has been thoroughly sifted... finally before the court of appeal.
There is therefore nothing that can be done to help your brother.
You must understand that in this matter
I am merely the mouthpiece of the state.
But we're supposed to be civilized.
Surely there must be some way of stopping the state from committing murder.
State? Murder?
Isn't it murder if the state kills an innocent man?
Miss Gray, your brother has been tried and found guilty.
The court of appeal sustained the original verdict...
and a petition for reprieve has been rejected.
There is absolutely nothing to be done.
The law must take its course.
I- I've every sympathy, of course, for you.
- Here, Miss Gray, drink this.
- Let me have that.
Thank you.
I'm all right now.
I hope everyone will forgive me for behaving like this.
Hadn't you better rest longer, Miss Gray?
No, thank you.
I'm perfectly all right.
- Will you take me home now, Neil?
- You sure you're all right, dear?
Yes. Only ashamed of myself.
May I lend you my car?
No, thank you.
Neil will drive me.
- Thank you again.
- I wish I could do something that would really help.
Oh, you've been wonderful,
Geoffrey.
Oh, Mr. Kemp, was that Gray's sister who just went out with those gentlemen?
- Yes. Poor child.
- Fancy such a sweet girl like that... having such a fiend for a brother.
That dreadful knife.
They say the head was almost severed from the body.
That will do,
Miss Judson.
You know, I have the most curious feeling about the Gray case.
- Really, Mr. Kemp?
- That poor child's faith makes me wonder... whether, in spite of all the evidence, there could have been a mistake.
I wish that I had the power to help her.
Yes, Sir Lionel.
- Close the Barstow files today.
- Yes, sir.
Has Inspector Chan arrived?
No, sir, Mr. Chan is not here yet.
- Excuse, please. Observe humble presence.
- Oh, I beg your pardon.
Sir Lionel,
Mr. Chan has just come in.
- Show him in at once.
- Certainly, Sir Lionel.
I'm sorry. I'm afraid
I didn't hear you come in.
Excuse silent movement.
Habit of profession.
Yes. If you will come with me, the home secretary will see you immediately.
Thank you so much.
Inspector Chan, Sir Lionel.
Was that the Chinese detective who caught
Barstow in Honolulu and brought him over here?
Yes, a wonderful piece of detective work.
The British government, Mr. Chan, is therefore very deeply indebted to you.
Much honored to be of humble service to British lion.
It's remarkable, Mr. Chan, how you ever suspected Barstow.
He puts up an excellent front.
Front seldom tell truth.
To know occupants of house, always look in backyard.
- Provided there is one.
- Excuse.
Every front has back... and little things tell big story, even in this room.
Why, what do you mean?
Today you have had most distressing interview... with lady.
Much disturbed lady who is very anxious.
That's quite true.
How did you arrive at that?
Observe, please.
Tearing hands suggest torn heart.
You certainly have sharp eyes, Mr. Chan.
Humble eyes have much practice.
It just bears out what our chief inspector of the police told me today.
We were speaking of the Martin case.
He said no other detective in the world could have solved it.
Extravagant praise.
But thank you so much.
And now, Mr. Chan, perhaps you'll tell me... if there's anything we can do to assist you in your journey back to Honolulu.
Very grateful, but all passport mysteries have been solved.
Hello? Knightsbridge 4243?
Miss Gray, please.
Oh.
This is Sir Lionel Bashford's private secretary speaking.
Would you ask Miss Gray to call me immediately she returns?
Thank you. Yes.
- Mr. Chan?
- That is humble name.
I- I'm Pamela Gray.
Uh, a friend sent me to see you.
I must speak to you.
Much regret, but no time.
In one hour catch train for boat to Honolulu.
Please, I'm desperate.
I implore you at least to listen to me!
Please to enter.
Mr. Chan, I'm in the most terrible trouble.
There's no one in London- no one in the world who can help me except you.
World is large.
Me lowly Chinaman.
Oh, you-you must help me.
You are much troubled.
You rest.
You-You know this trouble?
Yes. My name is Howard.
Neil Howard.
- Miss Gray and I are engaged to be married.
- Oh.
That is good.
If you will honor other room with your presence.
Now you stay here and rest, dear.
I'll explain everything to him.
Thank you.
Excuse, please, but I must catch train.
You talk, I listen.
Begin at best place- beginning.
You must have read in the papers about the stable murder case.
Only headlines.
Miss Gray is Paul Gray's sister- his only relative, in fact.
- That is bad.
- I can give you the facts very briefly.
The murder was committed three months ago in the stables... of a Mr. Richmond's country house in Retfordshire.
Gray was Richmond's hunt secretary.
Hamilton was the murdered man.
He was a weekend guest.
At the trial the circumstantial evidence against Gray was overwhelming.
But his sister is utterly convinced of her brother's innocence...
- and therefore she thinks that-
- One moment, please.
- You are?
- Oh, I should have explained.
Uh, I'm a barrister.
What you would call an attorney.
- I defended Gray at the trial.
- You have appealed case?
Yes, but in England, there's only one appeal.
Gray's was rejected.
He is to be hanged in three days.
Then only way to save brother...
- is to prove someone else real murderer.
- Exactly.
And find him before
9:00 on Friday morning.
Now- Now 4:00 Tuesday.
Only 65 small hours.
Lady's faith in powers of humble self most puzzling.
Detective cannot work miracle.
Yet a miracle is the only thing that could save him.
One question, please.
Very important.
You yourself believe brother innocent?
Well, uh, is that question necessary?
Please.
Please.
You believe brother innocent?
No.
Of course, I-
- You!
- Pamela!
Don't try to excuse yourself!
I never want to see you again!
Pamela, wait!
Well, it's been a great season,
Jardine, don't you think?
- Yes. I'm sorry it's nearly over.
- So am I.
You don't know how swell it is to be back here again.
You Americans mustn't get too keen on hunting or there'll be no foxes left for us.
- Or horses either. What?
- I didn't say anything.
- Where is the meet on Thursday?
- Here.
That means a good day.
And just the country that suits Hellcat.
By the way, Mary, I've decided that you're not to ride that mare again.
She's nappy.
Isn't she, Jardine?
Definitely.
Not a woman's horse.
Reluctantly compelled to agree.
The mare is incorrigibl- incorrig-
She's mine and the best hunter in the country.
Who are you to give me orders anyway?
Your future husband, darling.
Had you forgotten?
Listen. Give you a word of advice.
Never get married.
Bunny, please be quiet.
See what I mean?
Well, in spite of advice,
I'm still going to marry you.
And in a month you'll do as I tell you.
You're just a bully.
I'll go and find someone who really appreciates me.
And I'll help you.
- May I have a word with you, sir?
- What is it, Phillips?
- I agree with Richmond on two counts.
- Mm-hmm.
- One: You're adorable.
- Jerry, please.
Two: You shouldn't ride that mare. She's crazy.
Another bully.
I can't bear the thought of your ever being hurt.
- Garton, excuse us a moment, will you?
- Certainly.
- What's the matter, Geoffrey?
- Pamela's here. She wants to see us at once.
I wonder what's happened.
- Pamela!
- Mary.
- What's the matter, Pamela?
- I hope you don't mind my coming here like this.
Oh, my dear child. You couldn't have done anything better, could she, Mary?
- Why, of course not. - I- I feel as if the bottom had dropped out of everything.
- What's happened, Pam?
- Neil thinks Paul's guilty.
- What?
- It's impossible. Why, at the trial he-
He's never believed
Paul was innocent.
And today he told someone who might have helped.
And now I've got to start all over again.
Oh, my dear.
Geoffrey, what can we do?
My dear, don't worry.
We'll think of something.
I tell you what. You take her upstairs.
Give her the west room.
Then we'll get rid of everyone who isn't staying as quickly as we can.
And then the three of us will talk this thing over properly. Come on, dear.
- Oh, Phillips.
- Sir?
- Miss Gray is staying. She will have the west room.
- Yes, sir.
- See to it that she's not disturbed on any account.
- Very well, sir.
Good evening.
Miss Gray is here?
- Miss Pamela Gray?
- Miss Gray has retired.
If you wish to see her, you must return in the morning.
- Highly important I see her now.
- Miss Gray has retired.
There are strict orders she's not to be disturbed. Return in the morning.
Thank you so much.
Have a nice cup of tea, miss.
It'll make you feel ever so much better.
- No, I don't want anything.
- Not a nice hot cup of tea, miss?
Oh, do.
Please leave me alone.
Saints alive!
Excuse, please.
- Mr. Chan.
- Don't let him get his hands on you, miss!
Don't be stupid, Perkins.
I know the gentleman. Now go, please.
And don't say anything to anyone.
Thousand apologies.
Unceremonious entry due to butler's doubts of humble self.
But why are you here?
- I have seen your brother.
- And you believe?
That what you think may be truth.
Then you are going to help?
Humble endeavors will be in that direction.
Mr. Phillips! Mr. Phillips!
We'll all be dead in our beds!
- What's the meaning of this conduct?
- What'll we do?
- There's an horrible murdering man climbing all over the house.
- Have you been drinking?
I have not! Didn't I see him with me own eyes climbing into Miss Gray's window?
- What?
- So help me, it's the truth. And he's hypnotizing her.
I think most of the people who testified at the trial are here.
There's Mr. Richmond.
Oh, Phillips, take Mr. Chan into the study.
Very well, madam.
This way, please.
Thank you so much.
- Hey, there!
- Oh, hello.
- I say, what about a little drink?
- No, thanks, Bunny.
- Well, what about committing a slight spot of "hoppery"?
- Sorry, Bunny, she's dancing with me.
- What, again?
Oh, Bunny, please be quiet.
Can't we sit this one out?
I want to talk to you.
I thought you wanted to dance.
I just wanted to be with you, that's all.
I wish you wouldn't go on like this, Jerry.
- I can't help myself. You're so-
- Please, Jerry.
- What's the matter, dear?
- I'll explain later.
We've gotta get everyone here who gave evidence at Gray's trial into the study.
Will you get rid of the rest? Make any excuse to get rid of them while I collect the others.
Yes, dear.
And now you all know who Mr. Chan is and why he's here.
And I feel certain that you'll all give him every possible assistance.
Thank you so much.
If you will all sit, please.
Now, please, uh-
If Mr. Gray not guilty... then some other person is murderer.
Only method to save Mr. Gray... is to find this other quick... in 57 hours.
Now, please... tell briefly events of sad night.
Well, after dinner Gray came in here and Hamilton followed.
Please excuse.
They both live in this house?
No, Paul Gray was my hunt secretary and stayed here during the hunting season... but Captain Hamilton was just down for the weekend.
Captain Hamilton was soldier?
No, air force. But he and Gray had never got on very well together.
- They were always-
- Excuse, please.
Ancient history not necessary.
I'm sorry. On the night of the murder...
Hamilton followed Gray into this room.
There was no one else here, but they were heard quarreling violently.
- Who heard?
- Mr. Fothergill...
Major Jardine and Mr. Garton.
That's right. Devil of a row.
Hamilton shouting.
Gray shouting.
Sounded like a politic- a polit- a political demonstration.
Bunny, please sit down!
Thank you so much.
- Other witness, please.
- Yes.
They were quarreling, all right.
I heard them from the hall.
It was about that chorus girl.
- Excuse, please. Only events.
- Sorry.
And third witness?
Where's Garton?
He wasn't anywhere about.
I sent Phillips to look for him.
Where could he have gone?
Do you want to wait?
No. Time is enemy here.
I think Mr. Jardine... can tell events that took place after quarrel.
Well, I, um-
I thought I'd better stop the row before any of the women heard.
I was just outside the door.
- Fothergill was behind me.
- That's right.
Continue, please.
Through the door
I heard Hamilton say...
"Remember what
I've told you."
And then Gray shouted something.
And then I heard those windows...
opening and slamming shut.
Opening and slamming shut.
- Yes. You enter?
- No.
Obviously one of them had left the room and I-
I decided to mind my own business.
Admirable British quality.
And, uh, next event, please?
Two hours later Garton and Jardine went over to the stables... and found Hamilton's body.
As they were walking over, Garton noticed
Gray coming back towards the house.
I wonder where the deuce Garton is.
Why were you going to stable so late at night?
One of Garton's horses was sick.
We were going to have a last look at it before going to bed.
I understand.
Then nobody see Hamilton alive after bang of window?
No.
I haven't been able to find Mr. Garton, sir... but I'll continue to look for him.
Thank you so much.
There is something which belongs here.
Is it twin of this?
Yes.
And murderer use missing knife?
It was lying by the body.
The police have it now.
I see.
There were fingerprints?
No. It was maintained that Gray wore gloves.
Strange that crime of passion should be committed with gloved hand.
Yes, but the prosecution held that this was a premeditated crime...
- and unfortunately a pair of gloves were found-
- Wait, please.
If Mr. Gray not murderer... must forget all evidence at trial.
No time to expose lies.
Must expose truth.
Now, please, would much like... everybody to go with me to stables.
Stables? What for?
Crime to be reconstructed.
Method of French police.
Sometime very good.
Garton was over there when he saw Gray disappear behind that hedge.
And, uh, where was body found?
In the stables near the end box.
I see. Please, in absence of Mr. Garton... you and Mr. Jardine help proceed with reconstruction.
Certainly. Jardine.
Let us proceed. Uh-
Humbly suggest you be Hamilton, you be murderer.
It seems like a lot of childish nonsense to me.
Look here, Richmond, do we really have to do this?
Mr. Chan is in charge, Jardine.
Maybe I not clear.
Crime to be-
- Yes, I understand, I understand.
- Thank you so much.
Here, here!
What's all this?
It's all right, Lake.
You can go back to bed.
Very well, sir.
Beg pardon, sir.
- Who?
- That's Lake, my stud groom.
Regret do not understand
English, only American.
Well, he's my chief groom- my head lad- boss horseman.
Oh, I catch.
- And now.
- What the deuce!
Only knife from study.
You are murderer.
You are Hamilton.
Kindly go into stable.
Right.
Please take.
Look here, this is outrageous!
Take knife, please.
Now, you go in.
Pretend to strike... as prosecution say real Hamilton was struck.
Then leave knife where you find real knife.
Now, please, proceed with murder.
Steady, old girl, steady.
- Can't we get out of here and do this somewhere else?
- See what your nonsense has done?
What troubles noble animal?
Lake! Lake!
Here, steady, old girl. Whoa. Steady. Easy.
- Hurry, Lake!
- Whoa there!
Steady!
What's all the noise, you old cow?
That's Lady Mary Bristol's horse.
See what happens with your foolery?
Why, you might have gone-
That'll do, Jardine.
Hellcat will be quiet now that Lake's here.
He can do anything with her.
Control of noble animal by lowly man.
Most interesting.
That light, it was on when you find body of Hamilton?
No, Garton switched it on after.
Then not on now.
If you think I'm going through with this tomfoolery now-
The least we can do is to follow instructions.
Oh, all right, all right.
I wonder if they've forgotten all about us? I wonder. Hmm?
Come on, Jardine.
Oh, Betty, please be quiet.
Look here, I've had about enough of this.
Please, now drop knife in place where you find other knife.
- That is right?
- Yes.
Please rise.
When can I do something?
- What's going on here?
- I'll explain.
It's the "reconstriction" of the "crim."
No, the re- "reconstruction-striction" of the "crim-" the crime.
You know. It's French.
Practically infallible.
You know, you act what's happened... and then you know who's done it, see?
- Oh, Bunny, please.
- I won't!
Where have you been,
Jerry?
Just walking.
Then in my room.
Heard an awful racket in the stables.
What horse is cutting up?
Hellcat. She always gets like that if Lake isn't with her.
Where have you been?
We've been looking all over the place for you.
This is Mr. Garton.
Do you want to speak to him?
- Not now. All this is finished.
- Right. Shall we go back?
Wait, please.
One question.
Mr. Gray was secretary to hunt.
Is there new secretary?
- Yes, Major Jardine.
- Oh.
Please, take ladies and gentlemen back to house.
- I stay here.
- On to something?
Want to talk to number one horseboy.
- Right. Can you find your way back?
- Yes, thank you.
All right, everybody, come along.
Mr. Chan will join us when he's ready.
- Excuse, please.
- What do you want?
- I am very curious man.
- I ain't got no time to waste answering questions!
I've got my sleep to get, the same as other people.
It is unasked question which prevent sleep.
What are you tryin' to do?
We don't like foreigners messing around here.
Englishman mind own business.
Not always Chinaman.
If you've got anything to ask me, ask me.
And get it over.
Not as though I'll answer!
Three questions only.
Very simple.
First: You were here upstairs in your apartment when murder was done?
Apartment. That ain't no blooming apartment. That's me loose box.
You were in this, uh, box when murder was done?
No. Why don't you read the newspapers?
I wasn't here because it was me night off.
I was out, see?
With me girl, see?
I can prove it.
- I did prove it!
- I understand.
You make holiday.
Thank you.
Now, second question.
This noble animal, he was here in same place on night of murder?
If you mean Hellcat, she's a mare.
Yes, of course she was here.
She's always here!
- What of it?
- I see. Thank you.
Third question.
You did not then see body of Hamilton lying there?
I tell you I wasn't here!
I was out!
It was me night off!
Ain't it enough for you?
Yes, enough for present.
Perhaps more later.
Thank you so much.
Mr. Chan.
Tell me, have you found out anything?
Yes.
- Something I do not understand.
- What is it?
You were in house here... the night
Hamilton is killed?
Yes, I was here for the weekend. Why?
Did anyone in house hear noise... from noble animal the night of murder?
Oh, you mean a horse cutting up?
No, I remember no noise, and I haven't heard anyone else say there was.
Perhaps it wouldn't be heard.
Oh, yes, Mr. Garton hear noise from house just now.
Really?
No noise was mentioned at trial?
- No.
- Very good.
Tell me what all this means, please.
- Don't you realize there's less than three days before- - I know.
I will tell you.
Certain noble animal,
Cat of Hell... always cut up when strangers near... unless Lake is present.
But noble animal make no noise... when Hamilton killed outside its apartment.
Oh, I see. Yes.
Yes, and Lake was supposed to be out that night.
Mr. Chan, have you spoken to him?
A little, but enough.
- What'd he say?
- Many words meaning nothing.
- Except that he is afraid.
- You mean you think he is really-
Thoughts are like noble animal- unchecked, they run away causing painful smashup.
But what are you going to do? Aren't you going to see him now and make him tell?
No.
- Later, after sunrise.
- But why waste time?
Oh, please, don't you see how little time there is? Why must we wait?
Lake now with himself.
Alone. He thinks.
He is afraid.
He will be more afraid.
More fear, more talk.
More talk, more chance for us.
What else can you expect but to have your throat cut when there's murdering men... climbing all over the house?
Roger said he looked like a nice, kind gentleman.
Kind? He's a sneaking, murdering-
Look at him now, creeping about.
Why did he leave the house at 6:00 and pretend he wasn't coming back till afternoon?
Oh.
- Good morning.
- Why, what-what are you doing down here?
What I am asked to do.
You-You mean you're helping Pam- Miss Gray?
That is humble endeavor.
But may I return question to giver?
What you do here?
Well, I- I wanted to see Pamela, but I was thrown out.
- Thrown out?
- I mean, she wouldn't see me. She gave orders.
But you're still here.
Yes, I-
Yes, like the fool that I am, I-
Oh, what's the use of trying to explain?
You wouldn't understand.
No, there are many things
I do not understand.
- What do you want?
- To see, please, Mr. Lake and talk to him.
You can see him, but you can't talk to him.
How this?
Suicide. And what's it got to do with you?
There's no need to take that tone, Thacker.
This is Mr. Chan. He's staying with me.
He's a detective himself.
Chan, this is Detective Sergeant Thacker of the county police.
- Delighted to meet.
- How are ya?
What on earth induced Lake to kill himself?
- When you talked to him last night, did he-
- One moment, please.
Yes, it is all there.
Nearly good imitation.
- Imitation? What do you mean?
- Murder.
- Murder?
- Mr. Chang enjoys his joke.
Murder not very good joke.
Quite unfunny.
I don't understand what your idea is.
No idea. Facts.
Little things tell story.
See? Money talks.
What are you driving at?
Man in lowly station... does not kill self when possessing much money.
Aren't you rather jumping at conclusions?
No. Conclusions jump at me.
Note man's hand.
Observe. Gun held with finger on trigger.
But death wound in center of brow.
Only way to make that wound... use thumb on trigger.
- So.
- By Jove, you're right.
To make that wound with... finger on trigger, impossible.
But who on earth would want to murder Lake?
Answer to that question highly desirable.
I see what you're driving at, Mr. Chang.
You mean it wasn't suicide.
That was humble deduction.
I must make a note of this.
That's our method here- make notes of everything.
Large sum of money.
Wound, center of forehead.
Humbly suggest only authorities should know this not suicide.
I don't quite understand.
Let murderer feel safe.
That's a good idea.
Dead against regulations, sir.
I'll have to take this up with the chief constable.
It's all right. I'll speak to him.
He'll understand.
- Hello, Geoffrey.
- Hello.
They told us in the stables about poor Lake.
Awful thing.
Anything we can do?
No. Nothing, thanks.
Everything's been done.
I'd have said he was the last fella in the world to kill himself.
- If you're sure we can't help- - Quite sure, thanks. Everything's been taken care of.
Thank you.
I noted it all down,
Mr. Chang.
Thank you so much.
Oh. Mr. Phillips.
- What do you want?
- Have they told you about Lake?
I heard that the unfortunate man had committed suicide.
Suicide or not, it's death.
Don't forget the words of Alice Perkins.
There'll be death in this house until we get rid of that... creeping, murdering foreign man.
This is no time for gossip.
Go on about your work.
Who's gossipin'?
- Oh, Phillips.
- Yes, madam.
- Have you seen Mr. Chan?
- No, madam. I have not.
But, uh... lowly Chinaman here.
Saints alive!
Really, madam.
I had no idea the, uh... gentleman was here.
Habit of being sometimes invisible.
Very useful.
Oriental. Not British.
Is there anything further that you require, madam?
- No, thank you. Nothing.
- Very well, madam.
- Mr. Chan, have you seen Lake?
- Yes.
What did he say?
What did you find out?
Nothing. He is dead.
What?
Someone killed him, trying to make it seem as if he killed himself.
Lake dead?
Then all that you hoped for last night-
Oh, I told you to see him then.
I'm sorry.
I was wrong.
- We must start again.
- Start again?
With less than 48 hours?
Oh, I wish to heaven
I'd never seen you.
You give me hope and then-
Hope is not gone.
Lake cannot talk, but death talks.
It tells something we did not know before.
That real murderer of Hamilton is here.
Oh.
- It does.
- For lowly man, Lake had too much money.
Hush money... given by murderer.
When I frightened Lake, murderer must kill.
Couldn't we tell them about Lake's murder?
And make them see that this proves that Paul is innocent?
Wait, please.
Murder of Lake proves nothing.
Except to us who believe your brother innocent.
But what are we going to do?
There's so little time.
I work here.
Your work is to see that brother is told of hope we have for him.
Yes.
Yes, you're right.
And thank you.
- Good morning, Phillips.
- Good morning, sir.
Good morning.
Morning.
Want something?
I'm busy. A lot of hunt business to attend to.
Yes. I see.
Business of chasing fox.
Very interesting.
Yes. Last meet tomorrow.
Hmm.
Military training useful for business of chasing fox?
Now, what the deuce do you mean,
"military training"?
You are major.
Therefore soldier.
You are hunt secretary.
Therefore I think perhaps-
Now look here, my good fellow.
In the first place, foxhunting has nothing whatever to do with the army.
- No?
- Second, I was never a soldier.
Third, would you mind not interrupting me?
So sorry, but understood major army title.
If you must know, I was in the air force, not the army.
Thank you so much.
- Pam!
- Paul, darling.
- What have you come for?
- To tell you that Mr. Chan has-
Has he found out anything?
What's he on to?
- Wait, darling. He has found out something.
- What is it?
- There's been another-
- Speak up, lady.
I'm sorry. Something's happened down at Geoffrey's.
Something that makes it certain that the real murderer is still there.
Has he told them at the home office?
If they knew-
His case isn't strong enough yet, Paul.
They wouldn't realize any connection with you.
But he knows.
Oh, Paul.
There's no time.
It's all useless.
Oh, but it isn't useless.
There is time.
Two days.
Not quite two days.
Why can't they kill me now?
Why do they make me wait?
Please, darling.
Please take hold of yourself.
Get out! Don't worry about me!
Don't think about me! I'm dead!
I've got a rope around my neck, and in 40 hours, they're gonna pull it tight...
- and my neck's gonna break, and I'll be dead, dead!
- Stop! Stop!
- For heaven's sake, stop!
- You best leave him be, miss.
- Do you really think I should go?
- Yes, miss.
He's much better when it's quiet-like in here... with just me and Bostock to look after him.
All right.
I'll go.
- Is Miss Gray with her brother?
- Yes, sir.
Thank you. I'll wait.
Pamela.
Please, dear.
I've got to talk to you.
Why wouldn't you see me this morning when I was down at Richmond's?
Please leave me alone.
But you've got to listen to me.
- You must give me a chance to explain.
- Let me go.
Haven't you done enough? Can't you understand
I never want to see you again?
But how could Lake's death possibly be connected with the Gray case?
Case like inside of radio- many connections, not all related.
Do you mean you've got something?
Much.
But do not know what is.
Frequent state of mind for detective.
I want to think you're right about Gray, but sometimes I-
Well, I can't imagine all that evidence was wrong.
Lot of evidence.
Too much.
You can lend automobile in morning?
- Why, of course. Where do you want to go?
- To airdrome at Farnwell.
Air force camp?
What on earth for?
Charlie Chan very curious man.
Want, uh, answer to many questions.
Yes, but what-
Oh, Geoffrey.
I've been looking for you.
- Good evening.
- Chan and I were just talking about-
Humbly suggest such topics not interesting at moment.
Excuse, please.
Don't think about it, dear.
But, Geoffrey, what's happening to us?
All these dreadful things one after the other.
- You mustn't worry so, Mary.
- But-
Well, I'm frightened. I-
I keep feeling some other dreadful thing's going to happen.
Oh, darling.
Don't be foolish.
But, Geoffrey, with poor Pam in the house...
I think it's awful to be leading our normal useless lives.
Why, we're even going to hunt tomorrow. It seems-
We're only doing exactly what Chan wants us to.
- I suppose I'm being really silly.
- No, darling.
You're being what you can't help being- a very lovely person.
Now, madame, bed for you.
It's going to be a hard day tomorrow.
What on earth?
Excuse, please.
When death enters window, no time for life to go by door.
- What do you mean?
- I will show you.
Intended for my address.
Very curious missile.
From strong air pistol.
Yes, but why should anyone want to-
Someone is afraid.
Here.
What's going on here?
Have been acting part of bull's-eye.
- I don't follow you, Mr. Chang.
- Somebody's just tried to kill Chan.
- What?
- We must have the grounds searched immediately.
- I'll call my men.
- Wait, please.
Whoever tried to kill humble self... has had much time to hide.
- Good night, Phillips.
- Good night, sir.
Now come on here.
Let's have a look at ya.
As I was coming up from the terrace,
I didn't see anybody... but I heard this drop.
- What's that?
- I think original home of this.
I must make a note of this,
Mr. Chang.
- Excuse me, sir.
- What is it?
Two of the constables are asking for Sergeant Thacker.
They've captured a man lurking in the grounds.
- Tell them to bring him in here.
- Very good, sir.
There you are, Mr. Chang.
My men got him after all.
Maybe.
Howard!
I don't know these affectionate gentlemen... but if they'd let me alone for a moment,
I might take off my hat.
You needn't hold him.
Who are ya?
Explain yourself.
Uh, surname: Howard.
Christian name: Neil.
Profession: Barrister-at-law.
Financial position: Sound.
Health: Good.
Social standing: Somewhat-
Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
I can't write as fast as that.
- Oh, this is ridiculous, Thacker.
- I'm very sorry, sir. I got my duty to do.
This man has got to explain why he's loitering about in your grounds at this time of night.
- Mr. Richmond's a friend of mine, and I-
- Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
Excuse me, sir, but were you aware of this gentleman's presence in the, uh, vicinity?
I- I know
Mr. Howard well. He-
What is this? What's half the county police force doing here anyway?
The police are here because Lake's dead... and they are investigating his death.
And what's more, a murder has just been attempted in this room.
Immediately afterwards, you're arrested in the grounds... having no satisfactory explanation for your presence.
- I shall have to detain you.
- Excuse, please.
But Mr. Howard has business here.
Why? What do you know about it, Mr. Chang?
- He come to see me.
- To see you?
Certainly. I want private talk with Mr. Howard...
so I telephoned him this morning.
I see, Mr. Chang.
I see.
But why didn't he come to the house in the ordinary way?
Answer that.
- Well, I- I, uh-
- It is plain.
Mr. Howard is man of feeling.
He does not want to disturb household.
I must say I can't follow this, Mr. Chang.
- Well, it's perfectly simple, isn't it?
- I'm very sorry, sir.
I know my duty under regulations.
I shall have to detain this gentleman.
Please.
Before you make arrest... there is something you should see.
There is nothing to see.
- Well, what-
- Shh.
Not loud, please.
Want to talk to you privately.
I follow, Mr. Chang.
I follow.
Very smart trick,
Mr. Chang.
If you insist that marksman was Mr. Howard...
I insist whole affair one great big joke.
Meaning that you won't give evidence or make a charge, Mr. Chang?
You are good marksman,
Sergeant.
You hit bull's-eye.
Regulations are clear.
I ought to detain him.
If you want wild bird to sing, do not put him in cage.
Wild bird... sing... cage.
- Good morning.
- Good morning, Colonel. How are you?
Of course it's true.
Richmond just told me so.
Under the circumstances, do you think we should hunt?
Yes. They particularly want us to go on as if nothing had happened.
Say, what's all the trouble? You fellows look as if you're going to a funeral or something.
Someone tried to kill
Chan last night.
- What?
- Yes. Shot at him with some sort of an air gun.
Through the window of that study.
Have they any idea who did it?
Apparently not.
It was very late and nobody was about.
- Why should they want to kill Chan?
- I haven't the remotest idea.
Thank you.
Oh, Phillips.
Have you seen Mr. Chan?
Not since 7:00,
Your Ladyship.
- He went away in the Rolls-Royce.
- Did he say when he'd be back?
- No, Your Ladyship.
- All right, Phillips. Thank you.
Mary, whatever's the matter?
You look as though something awful had happened.
Oh, I don't know what to do.
If only Chan had been here.
But what is it? What's happened?
Last night, just before I went to bed...
I happened to look out of my window, and... I saw someone.
It seemed strange at the time, but I didn't think anything of it until... just now
I overheard something.
But what is it?
If I leave a note for Chan, would you promise to give it to him as soon as he arrives?
Of course I will.
- Morning, master.
- Morning.
Well, Mr. Chan, what can I do for you?
You were here when there was unfortunate young officer, Hamilton... who was murdered?
- Yes, I was.
- He was good officer?
Excellent.
Splendid in the air and brilliant at theory.
He was quite an inventor too.
Inventor?
Very interesting.
What are things he invent?
Oh, small improvements.
Gadgets, you know.
Uh, one of them was the adaptation of the Merton gyroscopic stabilizer.
Do not understand, but, uh, sound useful.
I should say it was. It was taken up by the Air Ministry and is now in general use.
I see.
Can you say, please... when was last invention made by Hamilton?
Oh, let me see. Oh-
I think about 18 months ago.
No more inventions since?
No. About that time he got a lot of new outside interests.
Took up foxhunting.
Got tangled up with that girl and so on.
Been better for the lad if he had stuck to his work.
He was, uh... in habit of talking about invention work?
To you? To anyone?
No. He was a queer chap.
Kept pretty much to himself.
And not very popular with his brother officers.
- He had no friend?
- One.
Flight Commander King.
Commander King.
He is still here?
- Oh, yes.
- Uh, may I see him, please?
Yes.
Please think.
There is perhaps man's life on your answer.
There was one thing.
But I don't know how far he went with it.
This was big invention, yes?
He had a wild scheme for silencing warplanes.
Silencing warplanes.
You remember he do work on this, drew plans?
Not that I know of.
But he'd never show anything to anyone until he was sure it was right.
Other question, please.
None of this was mentioned at trial of Mr. Gray?
Why, no. Of course not.
Why should it? That had nothing to do with anything-
I don't catch your drift,
Mr. Chan.
Drift catch me.
Thank you so much.
But I tell you. Chan has made me realize that Paul is innocent.
- Oh, it's all so useless.
- But, Pam, dear.
Even if Paul is saved, I can't ever forget that you told Chan he was guilty.
- Suppose he believed-
- But I did that to help you.
I believed Paul was guilty.
But I didn't want anyone else to have the chance of making you believe it.
Oh, please understand.
I love you, and I-
I'm trying to help you.
Oh, Neil. My darling.
Then you-you do believe me?
Yes. But... don't you realize that there's less than a day and a night before they take Paul and-
Don't lose hope, dear.
I believe Chan's going to save him.
But there's so little time.
Only 22 hours.
Good morning.
I have looked for you.
- Oh, Mr. Chan. What-
- Wait, please.
- No time to lose. You have fast car?
- Yes.
You know this fox chase today, which way they go?
- I could make a good guess.
- You must guess right.
- You take me now?
- I'll get the car.
- Oh, Mr. Chan, what's happened?
- I return to house just now.
They give me this.
- What does she mean?
- Lady Mary in much danger.
If murderer find she know something, he will strike.
Remember Lake?
Remember attempt on humble self?
Must find lady at once.
- This is speedy automobile?
- I've got 120 out of it.
120? How very nice.
There you are.
Told you I'd find them.
And nearly find ancestors.
They must be going off to draw another cover.
What are you doing here, Chan?
Where is Lady Mary?
I don't know. I haven't seen her for the last 15 minutes.
- Say, Garton, where's Mary?
- I can't say.
I haven't seen her since we passed Old Spinney.
- Have you seen Mary?
- Perhaps she's cast a shoe.
The last I saw of her she was going strong.
- I say, where's Mary?
- I don't know.
Richmond!
- Hellcat, Mary- the chalk pit! Come on!
- What?
- Look at her. Right here.
- Oh!
There she is.
Look at her. Right here.
Look. We can get down around over the other side.
Great. Come on.
- Can't you tell me something?
- A serious fracture at the base of the skull.
With care and luck we may pull her through.
- There is a chance then?
- Oh, a very good one.
- Nurse.
- Yes?
Is there-
How is she?
I think she has a very good chance.
- Has she come to?
- Oh, no.
She'll be unconscious for at least 24 hours.
Only few hours to save Mr. Gray.
Therefore this conference necessary.
This is all nonsense.
You've got no facts.
Why, you're no nearer anything than you were when you first arrived.
Oh, yes.
I know why real murderer kill Hamilton.
You mean you know definitely that Gray didn't kill Hamilton?
- Yes.
- But Gray was the only person...
- that had a motive for killing him.
- You are wrong.
There was another who had big motive.
Today I find...
Hamilton had secret invention to silence warplanes.
What's all this got to do with the murder?
Plans of invention stolen to sell for much big money.
Hamilton find thief, then thief must kill.
- This is all wild theorizing.
- Let him go on, Jardine.
Remember. He's trying to save Gray's life.
Everything nice for murderer until I come.
Then certain people to be made quiet.
Lake because he knows truth.
Me because I near truth.
But where does this all lead to?
To this.
Someone here, in this room... is murderer.
This is just another of your asinine tricks.
You pretend to find out all sorts of things, but really you know nothing.
I know this: I can catch murderer if I find plans stolen from Hamilton.
But how would finding the plans prove anything?
On plans will be fingerprints.
And fingerprints will match those of someone here.
- Is he asleep?
- I don't know. Shut up.
I'm not asleep.
- What's the time?
- Pretty early.
- I said what's the time?
- Quarter to 5:00.
Quarter to 5:00.
5:00 to 6:00. That's one.
6:00 to 7:00. That's two.
7:00 to 9:00.
Four more hours.
Would you like anything, mate?
A cup of tea?
No, I don't think so.
No. I don't want anything.
What in the deuce do you want?
No noise, please.
I want your help.
It didn't seem like that to me when all the others were in here.
You looked at me as if I might be your man.
Much regret, but necessary to point suspicion to all.
I don't see what you expected to gain by telling everyone everything you know.
There is, uh, one thing
I have not told.
Today murderer tried to kill Lady Mary.
What do you mean?
Mary's accident?
No accident.
Alone with lady, murderer blinds eyes of noble animal.
- You mean-
- Tonight I examined defunct noble animal.
On face were dry tears.
And something else.
I wipe it off.
Mr. Howard take it to analyst.
He telephone me just now report.
It was pepper.
- Pepper?
- Yes.
- Who was it? Tell me!
- I do not know.
- That is why I want your help.
- Yes, but how?
Now murderer much afraid of fingerprints.
He will try to destroy plans.
We catch him then.
Do you mean you know where the plans are?
Downstairs.
Somewhere in study.
But that's impossible.
Attempt on my life made there.
Must have been nearing hiding place.
I see.
All right.
What do you want me to do?
Come with me to study.
We wait for murderer.
- Shh.
- What's the matter?
Look.
Someone has been here.
Perhaps we're too late.
I was here in this room before I go up to fetch you.
That was not opened.
Here. You watch.
Please excuse blank cartridges in pistol.
Stand back there. Stand back!
The police are in charge.
I find these plans earlier this evening... but regret no fingerprints.
Now fingerprints not necessary.
Thank you so much.
Geoffrey Richmond,
I arrest you on a charge of murder.
Better get him right,
Sergeant.
Richmond's an alias.
He's not even an Englishman.
His real name's Paul Frank.
And you?
You have real name?
I'm Captain Seton, military intelligence.
We've been after Frank for years.
We nearly caught him when he worked England before.
But this time he'd put us off with all this front.
- Very expensive front.
- Yes. He was playing for high stakes.
But he won't play anymore.
All right, Sergeant.
Take him away.
You call the governor of the prison.
I'll get in touch with the home secretary.
Yes.
Perhaps I return to London, uh, by and by, and bring family.
Twelve children and one wife.
And I've got another toast.
To the greatest detective in the world.
Oh, not very good detective.
Just lucky old Chinaman.
Well, I think it was miraculous the way you built up that chain of evidence in three days.
Chain not complete.
Most important link not yet in place.
Whatever do you mean,
Mr. Chan?
Link you dropped in my hotel room.
Observe, please.
Case now complete.
Joe, Bill’s here.
- Hello, Bill.
- Hello, Joe.
Bill’s here.
Come on, Baby. Scram.
- Boy.
- What’s the matter, cold feet?
- Am I glad to get rid of those!
- Take a drink!
- Did you get it all?
- 250 Grand.
Is that all?
From that mail job delving polls in New Orleans,...
...from that Casey Bank robbery and that purple mob,...
...stock we’ll get later.
Listen Jake, if I were you
I’d unload those as quick as possible.
What’s the matter?
Well, I have a hunch that
Dick has been tailing me.
Don’t worry, hide out
‘till I send for you.
Take another drink.
- Fill them up.
- Who’s this one on?
The guy who can’t turn the egg.
Oh, I see, go ahead.
- Watch this. There you are.
- You did pretty good, Tony, but...
...me! I'll blow this over Telegraph Hill.
Izzy, the great world egg blower.
Come on, turn it over.
One… You’ll never make it that way, Izzy.
Two, this is your last chance.
Come on, turn it.
- Three, you’re flop.
- Yeah, I guess it must be the wrong egg.
All right, set them up.
The drinks are on Izzy.
- Silver Fizz for mine.
- Clover Club for me.
- Atsap Flip for me.
- Go ahead, drink up, drink up,...
...I’ll have a headache.
No, wait a minute. The drinks are on the house.
It’s ok with me, boys, I don’t care how many drinks you mooch of me,...
...but you’ve been laying down on my space lately.
Why don’t you kick in with some notices?
- Go jump in the lake.
- I can’t swim.
The journals have given you plenty of publicity in...
...the last 2 years, but you ain't so crazy about it!
Why, boys, this is a new deal, ain't it?
Well, Arlene Bradford, it's good to see you again.
- I thought you'd forgotten us.
- Well, aint' that Joe,...
- ... it's marvellous to be here.
- Come this way.
Come on, boys, head it up for Arlene.
Hello, Arlene.
- Thanks, Bill.
- That's all right.
Gee, Arlene Bradford and Spencer Carlton.
I haven't seen her in a night-club since they became engaged.
Oh, a perfect set up from here, perfect.
Hello, Arlene.
Where have you been lately?
Hello, dear, it's good to see you.
Well, Joe, same old place!
Same old place, but your old friends have missed you.
- That's encouraging.
- Of course we've been glad to hear about...
...your engagement but it's sure been bad for business.
- Hello, Arlene.
- Hello, Tony.
- Tony, this is a pleasant surprise.
- Val, what are you doing here?
Spencer, you know Tony Sterling.
- Of course, how are you?
- Hello, Carlton.
- Won't you sit down?
- Thanks.
- Have a cigarette?
- Thank you.
- Hello, Arlene.
- Hello, Dick.
- What do we play for you?
- Oh, let's have...
..."Why don't I dream those dreams"?
All right. You can have anything you want in this place, you know that, don't you?
That's a rash promise.
Anything you want, Arlene.
All this hobnobbing,...
- ...that's why I didn't want to come here.
- They're just good pals of mine,...
Don't crap, darling, don't be a whim!
Let's dance.
City desk, Gertrude…
Hello, Joe, this is Archie. They got a hot little squib on Arlene Bradford.
Back on the primrose path and acting as mentor to her little sister.
Yeah, make it spicy.
When did you start running around with Arlene?
Please, Charlie, don't think
Arlene is a bad influence.
Her engagement proved a marvellous thing. She is really a dear.
You'd never know Arlene, she's changed entirely.
It's about time.
Hey, society! Who's the gal dancing with Tony?
She's the only real Bradford daughter. Arlene's her stepsister.
She must be respectable.
I never saw her before.
I picked Arlene off the blather for everything. From speeding...
...to being pinched in Chinatown raids.
- Oh, that I were young…
- And old Bradford's got more millions...
...than there were Indians out here when his family landed.
I'm sorry to trouble you, Miss
Bradford, but your car is blocking...
...in a couple of others in the parking space. May I have your keys to move it?
Surely.
- Thank you..
- Cheer up, darling.
I'm alright.
- Did you get your picture?
- I'm just getting it now.
- How do you like the wine?
- Fine!
- Vintage 1911, right?
- Right, Arlene!
Oh, Spence!
- Well, let's go.
- That suits me. Cheque, please.
- But we've only been here a minute.
- Well, Spencer doesn't like it here,...
...and besides I have a headache.
- All right.
- I'm darn sorry you have to hurry away.
I might go dancing with you alone some day if you'd think to ask me.
- That's a bet. How about Saturday?
- All right.
Oh, hold it. Hey, hey, hey. Just a minute. Hold it.
- Everything's ok now, Miss Bradford.
- Sorry to have troubled you. I didn't...
- ... know we were going home so soon.
- Well, that's alright.
Only don't be such a stranger.
- Miss Bradford's car.
- Saturday then?
You promised to keep
Arlene's name out of all...
...the newspapers. Be fair, give her a chance.
- I'll pass the word around among the boys.
- Ok, so long.
Good night.
Good night, darling.
Sorry I was the bad girl.
- It's quite alright.
- See you tomorrow. Shall I drop you off?
- No, I'll take a taxi, thanks.
- Night, darling.
- Night.
- Thanks for the good time.
Good night!
Hold it, hold it, hold it!
That's you…
- The crack still goes.
- Oh, yeah?
Grand tune, isn't it?
It's grand for dancing.
Arlene, I'm so glad I went with you tonight.
It was good to see Tony
Sterling. You like him?
- Don't you?
- Fit, rough and ready, but...
- ... I suppose he'll settle down.
- Say, Arlene, you think there's much...
- ... of a future in reporting?
- Probably for Tony.
If his uncle dies, he'll own the journal.
I didn't mean that.
Hello you, Radsy, old rascal, you'll wake father, come here.
- Be a good boy.
- Good night, Val.
Good night, Arlene.
Good night, Arlene. Hope your headache goes, let me know if there's anything you need.
Thanks, I'll be all right.
Listen to this, boys. Just came:...
..."Chief O'Malley, police department, San Francisco,...
...believe country wide organisation using San Francisco as distributing...
...point for stolen securities.
Stop. Appreciate you cooperation.
Walling, departing of justice".
What do you think of that?
- I wonder where he got his tip.
- Never mind, we'd better...
...get right on it. You cover the bank and security houses.
Whatever you do, don't tip your mitt.
- Good morning, everybody.
- Good morning.
- How are you, dad?
- Did you have a good time last night?
Oh, lots of fun. Spencer's so cute with Arlene.
Oh, we ran into Tony
Sterling, he's a grand fellow.
- What kind of time did you have?
- Oh, I had lots of fun too,...
...with my rheumatism.
It must have been quite a party to have caused this story.
Arlene, you promised to turn over a new leaf after...
...Now you're dragging...
- ... Val's name into your notoriety.
- Let me see it, Arlene.
You're asking too much, both of me and of Val.
But father, we didn't stay in Bello's half an hour.
- Long enough to cause plenty of damage.
- This is not Arlene's fault.
It was the most innocent party in the world. We were with Spencer and...
...the only other man we spoke to was Tony Sterling.
Don't try to alibi me, Val.
Trouble with you is you have too many of your mother's qualities:...
- ... unstable, violent...
- Please, father, please!
- Bad blood. A rotten heritage.
- Sour grapes.
You couldn't hold my mother because you're a mean worn out…
Shut up!
I'm sorry if I hurt you but it had to happen.
Well, I think you were unnecessary cruel.
No, we had to have it showdowned.
Aren't you making it terrifically difficult for Arlene's fiancé?
Well, there's another face of this situation I haven't discussed with you.
What's that?
Carlton's work has suffered greatly in the past few months.
They tell me at the office he's been worrying.
And we can only attribute it to his association with Arlene.
- What?
- Yes, Arlene.
I tell you the girl is a pathological case fit for a sanatorium…
...and I'll have her commited for insanity if...
...she gets mixed up in just one more scandal.
She's really been wonderful lately and I want to help her.
I'm going down to the journal and give those reporters a piece of my mind.
We're trying to trace some stolen securities...
- ... said to be floating around.
- We'll inform you immediately...
- ... if anything suspicious occurs.
- Yeah, but we got orders to make...
- ... that third checkup here.
- Having a very conservative clientele,...
...we naturally take the greatest precautions to protect it. Just a moment.
Carlton, will you come into my office a moment?
All right, I'll be there just as soon as I can.
Really, I was anxious about you last night, darling.
I'm perfectly fit, thanks.
Frightfully worried.
Arlene, you... havent started that again...
Now, don't start moralizing.
I swore I'd never touch a stolen bond again and I mean it.
I've been going crazy to get rid of all this stuff in the vault now.
Truly, sweetheart, I was forced into this.
That's what you told me two years ago when you first started this.
Arlene, you tricked me time and time again and I won't stand for it.
- Honestly, this is the end.
- Oh, that's what you said so many times.
Darling, you've got to help me this time, 'cause I'm in a jam.
Arlene, how did you get tangled up in this racket anyway?
Well, I went into it with my eyes open.
You can't imagine the terrific thrill out of walking around under the nose...
...of the police carrying hundreds of thousands of dollars worth the blute.
Do you realize what you're saying?
Well, it's all over now, we're going to be married.
Arlene, you return those bonds.
No, I gave my word of honour I'd get rid of them.
Oh, you gave your word of honour. Well, that's easy, you're in the clear,... they can't touch you. I'll be the one who'll take the blame.
Spencer, don't be such a child.
And another thing: I've made personal aid for you over eight hundred thousand...
...dollars in the market and what have you done with it? You've hidden it from me.
I've told you I'm putting it away in a safe place for my dowry.
Should certainly satisfy you…
Be a good boy and write me out a check for fifty thousand…
A. B Bouchard usual.
Good morning, Mr. Bradford. It is very good to see you again, Sir, we missed you.
It's good to get back occasionally, Jim.
- Do be careful, darling.
- Don't worry, dearest.
Val, I had nothing to do with this.
Your attitude towards life and people is cheap and cynical.
Honestly, Val, you got me all wrong.
It must have been Archie Van Ness.
It sounds like him, he saw you at Bello's.
Don't put the blame on anyone else. I know reporters.
They put their papers above everything fine and decent.
I'm terribly disappointed in you.
Young lady bought out young man. I should have had a picture of that.
Where's that rat, Archie Van Ness?
I saw him going just exactly where he belongs.
Come in.
A radiogram for you, Miss.
Oh, thank you, Thorne.
Thorn,...
...if you don't stop snooping
I'll have you discharged.
Hello!
What are you looking at?
Why, Arlene, you're trembling!
- Arlene, what's the matter with you?
- I want you to do something for me.
- Come here.
- I was afraid you'd be upset after...
- ... the scene with father this morning.
- Never mind that.
Oh, and by the way, I gave Tony Sterling the...
...devil for allowing that story to be printed.
Oh, don't be too hard on the poor boy.
Reporters make enough for a bust in their lives as it is…
...here, I want you to take care of this. It contains some valuable papers...
...and you're so much more dependable than I.
Are you planning to go away or elope with Spencer?
You romantic child, of course not!
I'm too commercial, think of wedding presents.
- Arlene...
- Well, if it's too much trouble…
Not at all, I'll put it in a safe place gladly. Bye.
Bye.
And please keep away from father until
I can get things straightened out.
Will I?
Thorne's speaking.
Thorne, I'll take here any incoming calls this afternoon.
Very well, Miss.
Is that you, Arlene?
Did you get my message?
Be careful, darling, might be overheard.
- When are we going to get together?
- Ten thirty, Bello's.
All right, ten thirty at Bello's. Be good.
Bye, darling.
I'll take it.
- Thorne's speaking.
- Thorne,...
...will you come up to my room, please?
Come in.
- You wanted me, Miss.
- Yes, Thorne.
Will you have a messenger deliver this to Mrs. Spencer Carlton...
- ... at the Sherman Arms?
- Sherman Arms, yes, Miss.
Hello.
You'd better come right over.
We want to talk to you. Hurry up.
He'll be right along.
Good.
How did you come to know all this?
It was really by accident that we discovered...
...stocks and bonds lists had been stolen...
...among the deliveries from the home office at the Honolulu branch.
- We cabled you immediately.
- Being a comparably recent addition...
...to Bradford and company, I feel doubly upset over the situation.
You've done fine work at the islands. It's we at this end...
...who are entirely to blame.
It's going to be a delicate job to make restitution...
...without injuring our reputation.
We have an organisation capitalized at twenty-five millions,...
...every penny of which will be jeopardized if we lose the confidence to our clients…
This scandal must not become public property.
- Oh, by no means.
- There will be no prosecution.
I personally will bear the losses because
I feel that I am personally responsible.
You've not been actively in charge.
We'll all contribute.
- How much is it?
- May amount to two o three millions.
Well, no wonder Carlton was worried.
I have a strong hunch we haven't scratched the surface yet.
Pardon me, gentleman.
Hello, Spence.
I want to have a talk with you before we go in to Maynard and Porter.
- Maynard is here?
- Yes, we sent for him.
I don't care. Have me arrested.
I knew it!
Now you must pull yourself together. We're going...
...to straighten this out from a different,...
...angle but you must tell me the truth: is Arlene implicated?
The truth, she got you into this mess.
I knew it.
I knew it, if it weren't for your engagement…
There isn't any engagement,
Arlene has broken it.
What? Thrown you over?
After wrecking your life?
I'd shoot her. Thorne!
- Sir?
- Is Miss Arlene in her room?
No, Sir, she isn't in the house, Sir.
Hold on to yourself, son. Go home now.
I'll take care of Maynard and Porter alone. Keep away from the office...
...until this blows over. And don't worry, I'm protecting you, son...
Good night.
Hello, Spence, is Arlene…?
Well, what's the matter?
- There you are…
- How much are you making out of this?
You had your cut, don't ask questions.
Listen, Arlene, I'm not one of those society punks that'll take...
...anything you wanna give them, including the air.
You can take what you get and like it!
Come this way.
Well, I hope you care to enjoy this. This is my last job.
- What do you mean?
- Just that.
You ought to know you can't get out of a racket as easy as that.
Lots of important guys are dependent on you.
I've got personal reasons and…
- Who's there?
- Bill.
Arlene, he's waiting in the private room.
Thanks so much.
Darling,...
...how wonderful to see you! Had a good trip?
- Perfect.
- I was so surprised to get your wire.
I came on business. I can only stay a few days.
- Well, what's the matter with you?
- Nothing.
- Are you trying to high hat me?
- No, but things have been...
- ... different the last few months.
- Different? Not with me.
What about your engagement?
You know that was purely for business reasons.
- Now give me my letters.
- No, not in a million years!
Now, don't be obstinate. Those letters don't mean anything.
Nothing to you perhaps, but everything to me!
You seem to forget that it was I that got you a job at Bradford and Company.
You were marvellous to me, I realize that.
I just don't love you any more.
- You mean that?
- Of course!
- You're not joking?
- Now, let's be reasonable.
You used me when you needed me and now you're through with me.
Perhaps the same plan that you followed with the young Carlton.
- How did you know that?
- I've been to the house tonight...
...and there is a very devil to pay.
You take my advice. Stick to young Carlton who loves you.
Go away and start life again a long way from here.
- I'm going to the Islands with you.
- That's impossible.
Perhaps you'll change your mind by tomorrow.
Give me those letters. Let's call this incident closed.
Arlene.
Arlene, you can't go like that. Arlene.
Arlene.
Yes, it certainly is. It's a ghastly business all around.
The personal problem with Arlene and
Spencer worries me more than anything else.
Oh, don't let that worry you.
It's decidedly for the best.
- You can't mean that.
- Yes, I do mean that. I'm glad...
...the engagement is broken.
- Thorne, you give me my hat and coat.
- Yes, Sir.
I'm going out for a breath of fresh air.
- I'll be back in a few minutes.
- Yes, Sir.
- Good night, Everett.
- Good night, Oren.
Oh, that's Arlene.
Be still, Ragsy!
Be a good boy. I'll be right back.
Arlene.
Now keep quiet, Ragsy.
Arlene!
Why don't you answer me?
- Thorne.
- Yes, Miss.
Thorne, who was using the elevator?
I was just going to see, Miss. I thought it might be Miss Arlene.
- I thought so too.
- I'll see if her car is in the garage.
I'm going with you.
It couldn't have been
Mr. Bradford, Miss.
Isn't father in the library with Mr. Porter?
No, Miss. He left with Mr. Porter a moment ago. Said he was going...
- ... out for a breath of fresh air.
- Oh, no, it couldn't have been he...
...I can always tell when it's father.
It must have been Arlene. But I can't...
...remember her ever going in like this and going right out again.
Just seems rather strange, Miss.
Her car is here.
- Then she must have come back.
- But where is she?
The doors are open.
There's nobody here.
- There's a taxi.
- Oh, no, it couldn't be.
Arlene. Arlene.
Arlene.
Are you sure Miss Arlene used her car this evening, Miss?
I'm positive. It wasn't here when I came home.
Strange she didn't say something to me.
Who is… Oh, father…
What on earth are you doing here at this hour?
Something very funny has happened.
Arlene came home in her own car...
...and then went away in a taxi without saying a word to anyone.
- And I hope she never comes back.
- Oh, father.
I won't talk about it know, but
Arlene has reached the end of her rope.
But you'd help her if she needed it, wouldn't you?
I tell you all about it tomorrow.
Good night, go to bed.
Good morning, Ragsy.
How are you this morning?
Dear Val. I'm through.
You have been kind to me.
But I can't stand your father's way of living. Keep...
...the envelope I gave you.
I may send for it but...
...I'm not coming back. Ever.
Good bye. Arlene.
Father, Arlene has left, left for good.
- I almost wish that were true.
- Oh, you don't mean that. Be fair.
Oh, don't worry about Arlene. She's like a cat: bound to land on her feet.
I'm afraid something terrible has happened to her.
- No doubt, no doubt.
- Oh, but father this is serious.
Oh, you're wasting your sympathies, my dear.
We can't leave her like this.
- ¡Thorne!
- Yes, Miss.
Get me the journal on the phone right away. Hurry, please!
Right away, Miss.
Louise, quick! Get my things. I'm going out.
Oui, mademoiselle, tout de suite.
Hello. The journal?
Tony Sterling, please.
What? He's not there? Oh, no. No, I'll get him later.
Hurry, Louise, hurry!
One moment. Mr. Carlton's apartment does not answer.
Perhaps he's on his way down here, Mrs. Bradford.
All right. Will you get me Tony Sterling at the journal on the phone for me?
Tony Sterling at the journal. Quickly, please.
Just tell Mr. Carlton when he comes in that I may be back to see him later.
And do me a favour, have this put that on the vault for me.
Yes, indeed.
One moment. Mr. Sterling is not at his office just now.
- Would you like to leave a message?
- No. No, thank you.
That's all.
You've no idea, Miss
Bradford how many of these...
...scares turn out to be simple misunderstandings.
Oh, I know it sounds silly, but I know something's happened.
- Arlene has never acted this way before.
- We'll do everything to locate...
- ... your sister.
- I'm very grateful to you.
Everything will be all right. In fact, I wouldn't be surprised if she was at home...
...when you got there. You leave everything to me, Miss Bradford.
Thanks, Chef O'Malley.
I feel much better now.
I've been driving around for hours trying to make up my mind to come through.
- Oh, and one more important thing. …
- What is it now?
Don't say anything to the
Newspapers. My father hates publicity.
- Oh, not a word.
- Thank you.
Hold on your cigars, boys. Here's O'Hagen.
Oh, yeah? Well, you guys will loosen up with...
...a box of cigars when I tell you what I'm gonna…
- You.
- Right.
All right. Come on, boys.
You. No?
- You.
- Wrong.
All right. Try it again.
All right, boys, let's go now.
It better…
You.
Right. And don't let it happen again.
Your phone is ringing.
Hello.
Hello, Joe? This is
Spike. Got something for you.
Spill it.
Well, now comes a hot young blond mama-
...named Valkyr Bradford.
Then disposes that…
Named what?
- You better call her Val.
- Go on.
Well, this dame's all blows in the Chief O'Malley's office...
...office just now and tells him that someone walked off with her sister,...
- ... Arlene Bradford, you know her.
- Hold on, Spike.
Say, Ed. Rip off that front story. We got a good kidnapping story coming in.
All right, Joe.
Wilson, get me the clips and the pictures from the morgue and Miss Arlene Bradford.
And Drew, jump on your horse. Take a camera down to the hall of justice,...
...get an interview with and a photograph of Miss Val Bradford, who's down there...
...interviewing the police about her missing sister.
Listen, Boss, let me go down there, will you?
You stick right with that phone and write everything that Spike's got.
Get me all you can for the first run. I got...
...about twenty minutes left before deadline.
But I'm a personal friend of the Bradford's.
That's swell! Sneak in all the inside stuff you know.
Come on, Spike. Is this Joe on the level?
Well, looks like your playmate got in a jam.
Hall of justice. Step on it.
There are no pictures and no information...
...on the younger girl.
These are all Arlene's.
Joe, the Bradford dame dodged the boys...
...at the hob before they could snatch a picture.
- Here's the stuff, I'm gonna beat it.
- Sure you are. Get an interview...
...of the old man
Bradford and his daughter.
Take Izzy Wright. Take pictures of them both,...
...especially the daughter and keep it exclusive.
Ah, you mean futuristic pictures…
Get out of here. And don't forget you're newspaper men.
Oh, are we?
Look, those buzzards beat us to it.
Come on, Tony, take it easy. Val isnt here yet.
Oh, is that so?
Well, we'll se you later.
Drive around the corner.
You see that stuff? You can't get to anybody here,...
...not even that old man Bradford.
You hide in the garage. I'll stand here and catch her if she comes in.
Ok.
Hello, Val.
Got it. Come on, Val, give me the story, quick.
- Is that your man?
- Sure, but…
- Give me that camera.
- Oh, Val, listen.
Give me that camera. Will not have my pictures on the paper.
Val, Val, dont take it so big.
So that's the way you help me, is it?
Tony, don't take it so big.
Val, wait a minute, let me explain. Val, please.
Val, you know I wouldnt let anything get...
...in the papers that would hurt you. Val, Val!
- Come on. Izzy, let's get out of here.
- Wait a minute, Tony.
What's the matter?
You don't suppose…
Good Lord!
Cold. Dead for hours.
This is the car Miss Bradford's been running around in?
Sure, Val used Arlene's car and she's been...
...driving this way all over town.
- Oh, what a picture, what a picture.
- Thorne, this is Tony Sterling,...
...let me talk to Miss
Bradford, it's important.
Just a minute, please.
Miss Valkyr, Mr. Sterling on the house phone for you.
I don't want to speak to him.
Hello…
But I tell you it's…
All right.
Tony Sterling's speaking, city desk.
Hello, Hogue, this is Tony. I'm in the Bradford garage and I have the…
- ... biggest story printed since…
- As for the next, I've seen it once.
Izzy and I just found Arlene
Bradford dead in the back of her car.
Her sister was driving all over town not...
...knowing she had the body right there with her.
- Hold it, hold it. Got it.
- Izzy has pictures of everything.
How's that for a break?
Shall I call the cops?
Call the cops? You do it and you're fired!
Don't tell anybody, not even the Bradfords.
You and Izzy get down here with those plates as fast as you can and...
...lock that rumble seat until the deadline of the last edition.
All right.
- Gotta get another one right from here.
- The boss says to keep everything…
Yeah, well the… get these plates printed.
- Open it up.
- Hey, are you crazy?
- There's somebody coming.
- Is it?
Tony, what was it you wanted to say to me?
Listen Val, there's something you should know.
- But it's for you only. Arlene…
- Arlene!
That is, I mean, Arlene's car…
What he wants to say is leave everything to the journal.
They'll do more towards finding your sister than anyone in the world.
Oh, that's wonderful of you.
Oh, Tony, I've needed you all day, I've been so worried.
And father wouldn't pay any attention to me. He was furious when I…
Well, Val, we'll straighten everything out.
Miss Bradford, your father wishes to see you.
All right, Thorne. I'm in for it now.
Oh, Tony, will you come with me? Father's been so upset of my going to the police...
- ... that I dread facing him alone.
- You bet I will.
That's a swell idea, swell idea. Tony's the best man in San Francisco for the job.
Tell Hogue I'll be along in about half an hour.
You'll bet, I'll see you later.
- Val, what made you go to the police?
- Some very odd incidents that happened...
...happened last night and a note from Arlene that I found in her room.
And then there was Spencer
Carlton, he acted so queerly.
I havent been able to reach him all day.
Well, that's the way it looks to me. Don't worry about Carlton,...
...I told him to keep away from the office 'till things get cleared up.
The accounts will be finished either late tonight or in the morning...
...and we'll need him then.
- Better not.
- Don't be afraid, I'll handle him alone.
Sterling, how the devil did you get in here?
I came in place of Miss Val to talk to you about…about Arlene's disappearance.
Val made a great mistake in going to the police.
You're making the mistake.
There's absolutely nothing to have fears.
But the journal is in possession of vital information...
…which leads us to believe that Arlene is…
- ... well, at least in great danger.
- Sounds like a newspaper trick.
- If this a hoax…
- Believe me, it isn't.
Oh, I cant give you information now but...
...I want to know what happened exactly last night.
Literally nothing.
- Come on, be a good fellow.
- He's a tough fellow that guy.
Well, Louise, we know just as little now as we knew this morning.
Come in.
- A telegram for you, Miss Bradford.
- Thanks.
Dear Val, I'm in trouble and
I want to come home. Stop.
Bring my car and that envelope
I gave as soon as you can...
...to the end of the Butcher Town
Bridge. Stop.
Come alone. Love=Arlene.
It's from my sister. She's all right. I'm gonna go and pick her up.
Quick, my hat and coat.
Thorne, wait a minute.
Yes, Miss.
Thorne, give this to father and tell Mr. Sterling I'll be right back.
Yes, Miss Bradford.
Then you can't tell me anything?
Well, I'm not at liberty to divulge the reason.
Arlene's departure was no surprise as these gentlemen will agree.
- It was a natural move to expect.
- Of course I'm not the police,...
...but it's a mistake for you to withhold any information.
It's not relevant. Don't say anymore, Everett.
Come in.
Pardon me, Mr Bradford,...
...Miss Valkyr was called away suddenly. She told me to give you this.
Didn't I tell you the journal's fears were groundless?
Arlene is alive and will be home shortly.
Give me that wire.
That's marked 2.50. That's only an hour ago. She couldn't have sent this.
- It's a phoney.
- What the devil do you mean?
Arlene is dead. Murdered
I think. Her body is...
...is in the rumble seat of her car.
Don't sit there like idiots. Do something!
Butcher Town Bridge. Don't you understand? The murderer's after Val.
Mr. Bradford, Sir, I'll get your car.
Press room. Spike Smith. Spike,
I want cops and lots of cops.
At the Butcher Town Bridge. And hurry!
The Bradford case is blown wide open.
- Let's go. Let's go!
- Yes, Sir.
Start the motor, driver!
Butcher Town Bridge and hurry.
- Hey, wait a minute, that's my cab.
- You mean it was…
You're sure you're headed for Butcher Town Bridge?
- I couldn't miss, boss.
- Give it all she's got.
We're flying now.
Come right along with me over the bridge.
Don't worry. I'll take you to your sister.
- I am very sorry, Mr. Bradford.
- Not a lucky day for you, Sir.
What are we gonna do now?
Listen. I'll hide out so she won't spot me. You grab the letters...
...from the girl. And then get what's in the rumble seat.
- Ok, boss.
- Look out, here she comes.
Whatever you do, don't hurt the girl. We don't want her on our hands.
Where's my sister?
Where is the envelope you were supposed to bring?
I haven't it. Where's my sister?
Come on, cross her.
I'll get what she got.
Let go off me.
- Come on, give us that envelope.
- I couldn't get it, it was too late.
- Come on, where is it?
- On the phone, at my father's office.
Let go off me. Let go off me I say.
- Where is my sister?
- Gimme your hand. You take her hand.
- Jake. Jake, there ain't no letters.
- Don't let her tell you that.
- Jake Bello!
- Get them, slug. Why did you call me?
Now we've got to take her along with us. Go grab her.
- The cops are coming.
- Arlene is stiff for long…
Take the sister, take the dame with us.
Help! Help!
Help!
- Val! Hold out.
- Help!
Val, hold out!
- Help!
- Grab him, grab him. Easy, easy.
Help!
Help!
Help!
Grab him, grab him. Easy, easy.
Is he all right?
Yeah, he's got a bad gash back at the ear,...
- ... but I guess he's ok.
- Pull it over here. Now catch...
...that boat before they get away with the girl. Come on. Pull it here.
Go on. Shove off!
Bradford sisters victims of murder and kidnapping.
Police launch loses abductors in fog.
Arlene Bradford slain;
Step-aister abducted!
Murder and kidnapping strike prominent family.
Arlene Bradford murdered.
Step-sister kidnapped.
We have a few details on the Bradford case which has shocked the whole city.
Arlene Bradford, step-daughter of the multi-millionaire...
...banker and philanthropist was murdered.
And Valkyr Bradford, the younger daughter kidnapped by a gang of thugs.
Mr. Bradford had offered a reward of fifty-thousand dollars.
No, madam. We've heard nothing new.
Wipe your shoes, men. This way.
- Clean your feet!
- I didn't step on anything. Right?
Be careful with those boxes of yours and don't scratch the furniture.
Now after shoving the body of Miss
Bradford in the rumble seat of the car,...
...the intruder came up in the elevator and stood quietly into the suite here.
- Coming up in the elevator. Are you sure?
- Miss Val and I were affected...
...by the sound of the elevator running.
Seeing no-one on the upper floors,...
...we both went down to the garage to investigate.
When we got down there we found no-one.
But I did notice that the garage doors...
...were open. In any event, he read the note left...
...by Miss Arlene for Miss Val.
It was pasted on the mirror there.
- But it was found here.
- Hold it! Hold it!
- What the devil are you doing?
- I just wanna give it a futuristic touch.
- Get down!
- But I gotta be up.
You'll be up for thirty days if I I get my hands on you.
Come here!
The telephone conversation you told us about, Would you recognize...
- ... the man's voice if you heard it?
- Well, I'm not sure.
But I do know where the rendez-vous was.
Come on, who is the guy she met here last night?
- I don't remember and that's the truth.
- Maybe Jake saw them.
Sir, who are you and what are you sticking your nose in this for?
Come on, come on. Lay off the butler.
- We wanna see Jake.
- Oh, well Jake isn't here at all.
- He left yesterday for Sacramento.
- Yeah, where is he stopping up there?
I don't know. He said he'd be back tomorrow.
You tell him we wanna see him...
...and don't you be taking any little trips.
Well, according to his brother,
Jake Bello, he went to Sacramento.
Send out a dragnet for him. He might be any place but Sacramento.
I'm not taking any chances.
- Who was around the house that night?
- Mr. Bradford, Mr. Porter -one of his...
...partners, and Mr. Maynard- manager of this Honolulu branch and Mr. Carlton,...
...Miss Arlene's fiancé
- at least he was until yesterday.
- Don't forget yourself.
- Fortunately Mr. Bradford,...
...and Mr. Maynard, Porter and I were all at the house when the telegraph came.
That's a punk alibi. Carlton looks like the best bet. Where does he live?
Sherman Arms.
Dead since some time last night.
Shot right through the temple.
Ah, the girl's ring.
- Might have been the motive.
- "Forever in my heart, Arlene"
Hah, chief. Looks like an open-and-shut murder suicide case.
No, no, Carlton has been dead too long.
Mr. Bradford might know something about the gentleman.
- Don't forget the guy from the Islands.
- Yeah, the fireworks didn't start until...
- ... he showed up.
- He brought bad news.
Carlton and Miss Arlene were up to their necks in the stolen securities racket.
You sure got good ears.
We had a tip on that.
- Go on, spill the rest of it.
- Well, there is a lot of money involved.
You see, Carlton's system was to substitute... stolen securities for bona fide bonds...
...and stocks belonging either to us or held for our clients...
He then sold the good securities and credited them...
- ... to Miss Bradford's account.
- Except in our case.
He shipped off the stolen stuff, never dreaming we'd check...
- ... the serial numbers.
- No news, eh?
Keep up the search.
Increase the reward if you think best.
Do anything. Anything to save my daughter.
Well,...
...Let's go home, Everett. We can do nothing more until the vault opens.
I don't want to go home now. I feel closer to things down here.
We've been checking over Arlene's personal account. It's staggering.
She's had over eight hundred thousand dollars to a credit at one time.
And practically all of it has vanished into thin air.
That's the least of my worries.
Well, son, did you get fixed
- up?
Never mind me. Is there any word about Val?
No! And if you hadn't put your rotten newspaper above common decency,...
...Val's life would be in danger.
Don't rub it in.
I'm sorry. I know you did fine work in trying to save her live,...
...and I know how you feel about Val.
Oh, thank you. Just put them here.
They belong to Arlene.
I want to look at them.
To whom it may concern.
January 12th, 1932. I leave everything to my husband.
- Who?
- Arthur Burchard.
Signed, Arlene Bradford- Burchard.
Married? Impossible.
Married and engaged to another man at the same time.
- Who is Arthur Bouchard?
- I haven't the faintest idea.
I've never heard of him.
I do remember Arlene mentioning this man three or four years ago.
- But I never met him.
- Where did he live?
Los Angeles. I think. I'm not certain.
Say…. I better get down to the office. Get a line on this.
Well, thanks. So long.
Good morning, boys. Let's get going. Listen to this:...
A.B. Burchard hasn't been around
Los Angeles for several months.
Plenty of money. Mysterious financial connections.
Owns a hundred-foot cruiser yacht, the N.H. Siwon.
Slim thinking, boys.
What do you make of it?
- The yacht.
- Mmh. The N.H. Siwon of Los Angeles.
I think Tony's hunch is right. Now you two boys get down to the walk...
...the first thing in the morning and if you find...
...anything that looks like the N.H. Siwon, let me know.
We can spill the story to the police and we...
...can get photographs of them boarding the boat.
And if there is a rescue of the
Bradford girl, you'll be there to cover.
Val Bradford still missing.
Where is Jake Bello?
Who is Arthur Burchard?
Have you seen this man?
The greatest man out in the history of the...
...state marks the progress of the Bradford-case.
Every law enforcing body has been pressed into service.
Airplanes will assist as soon as daylight permits.
Say, look at that one!
That answers the description of the
N.H. Siwon but it's got the wrong name.
NOWISHN. What a screwy name for a boat.
Now if that was only the N.H. Siwon, Oh, what a beautiful picture that would make.
Hey, holy smoke, take a look at that!
Well, what do you know about that!
Hello, chief. This is Daly, Harbour
Detail. I've got some news for you.
What? Are you sure? Well, that certainly fits Jake Bello.
Now get up to the Bradford girl!
Then our case is knocking into a cock hat.
The Harbour Detail has just fished Bello out of the bay.
Well, Carlton is out and Bello is out.
Goes right back to Bradford.
No.
- No, no, no!
- Mr. Bradford, weren't you at the scene...
...of the crime a few minutes after it'd been committed?
And didn't you say your stepdaughter should be shot?
- Now, this is outrageous here!
- Be quiet, please.
How dare you imply Mr. Bradford?
Somebody waited for Arlene in the garage and killed her when she came home.
And then I suppose I kidnapped my other daughter.
Thorne, have you been giving the police all this information?
He has. That's his business. He is a secret service operative assigned to...
...breaking up the stolen securities racket.
And after he had gotten the goods on Jake Bello, Arlene and Carlton,...
...all this happened.
Then I think you should concentrate on Jake Bello.
- Ah, somebody bumped him off.
- What?
Bello may have had something to do with the stolen bonds but...
...he has nothing to do with the murder of Miss Arlene.
There's only one mayor suspect: a mysterious bird that...
...met Miss Arlene the night before out at Jake Bello's.
Well, if it's any help to you I might say that I…
You're the man!
I recognize your voice.
- You'll have to do some explaining.
- Gladly. You see, I tried...
...to get Miss Bradford to return some intimate letters of mine.
- She refused and then you had a fight.
- An argument, rather.
You see, I expect to be married next month. And those letters in the hands...
...of a woman like Arlene Bradford…
…Had you on the spot. What happened?
She left the room in a huff, and
I returned to my hotel. That's all.
- Those letters must be very important.
- Only to me.
Where are they?
I wish I knew.
Gentlemen, I just recall. Val had me place an envelope belonging to Arlene...
...in the vault. Could that be?
Right under the nose.
Let's have it.
The vault will be open in a few minutes.
I think we're jumping at conclusions.
Where the devil is O'Hagen?
He ought to be here by now.
Gentlemen, I doubt whether I can be of any further service. If anything...
...comes up, get in touch with me. Good morning.
- I am sorry, but I think you'd better stay.
- Your order, chief?
- Yeah.
- Here are some letters from the vault...
Oh, thank you.
After me, Mr. Maynard.
Come on, boys.
- Let's look these things over.
- Ah, they are nothing but a lot of sappy...
...love letters, chief.
I protest against having my intimate correspondence...
- ... bandited in this manner.
- Be quiet.
You're mixed up in a murder case.
Arlene, darling. I hope you will be able to meet my agent from St. Louis.
He has been a lot of help to me in times passed.
Particularly at Bello's fall some years ago.
He informed me that quick action on the deal is necessary.
We don't seem to be getting anywhere.
Well, this doesn't seem to be all there is to it.
We'll see how it raids under the rays...
Why don't you hunt up Arlene's husband? This man Burchard.
That's exactly what I intend to do.
Hello, hello, hello!
Go on, scram! There's nothing for you in here.
Hello, chief. We've located Arthur Burchard.
What? Where'd you find him?
- He'll be here in a few minutes.
- You don't say.
Would you like to see some pictures?
- I'm sorry.
- You're sorry? What did you do?
...He is sorry...
Take a peek at these.
- They're pictures of my cruiser.
- Yeah, I took them this morning.
I thought you might like to see them.
Have you had it long?
About five years. I use it for business on the Islands.
I've just sailed it over from Honolulu.
Oh, some more pictures of my boat…
Yes and no. Look at that negative through the light.
You see, that's the way Izzy caught it through the finder in his camera.
NHSIMON or NOWISHN. The letters are reversible.
A very easy matter to change.
Just turn the boards over.
NHSIMON and NOWISHN are the same. So are the owners.
Gentlemen, meet Joshua Maynard alias Arthur Burchard,...
- ... Arlene Bradford's secret husband.
- Keep your hands off!
I did nothing you can hold me for!
Val! Poor Val. How did you get here?
Don't move!
Stay here!
- Well, he tried to shoot it out.
- Good work.
- Hold it! Hold it!
- Get an ambulance for O'Hagen...
- ... and call the coroner.
- Ok, chief.
Well, I guess that finishes my butler job.
Thorne, you better watch yourself, you're liable to become...
...a well-known secret service man…
Here is to crime.
Ah, they did nail you, didn't they, O'Hagen?
Ah, it's just a little nickle in the arm, that's all, chief.
Don't mean nothing to a guy from the south of the slug.
Gosh, O'Hagen, I'm sorry. We have the cops staked out,...
- ... but I couldn't tiff you off.
- It's ok, Tony.
Val, dear. Where have you been? What's happened?
I've been enjoying Mr. Maynard's hospitality on his yacht.
Jake Bello extended the invitation.
On that boat, I heard of everything that took place.
Jake Bello followed Mr. Maynard and Arlene home. They continued...
...to quarrel about the letters which, written in code, implicated Maynard...
...in the bond racket.
Jake left his taxi outside. It was the one we saw driving away.
Maynard must have lost his head completely,... for he killed her.
Jake saw everything that happened inside.
. Maynard, realizing what he had done, shoved the body...
...body into the rumble seat and using
Arlene's keys, he took the elevator...
...to her room.
During his quick search, he discovered Arlene's note to me,...
...pasted on the mirror, which told him that the letters have been left in my care.
He must have hidden when I came in.
Jake Bello waited in the garage until Maynard came down,...
...and then Jake tried to blackmail him.
I see. Maynard was too smart and hooked him,...
...into the deal with a promise of big money.
He got Jake to send that phoney telegram.
They didn't mean to kidnap Val at first, but she recognized Jake...
...at Butcher Town Bridge and they had to take her along.
Then Maynard's men threw Jake into the water and he couldn't swim.
Did you get it, chief?
I guess that's it.
Ah, Mr. Bradford, how about the reward money?
What, you?
Yes, sure. You know what, my picture was responsible for the evidence.
You know, the futuristic touch.
What, you aren't laughing me out, are you?
- All those angles.
- Give me the city desk.
Tony Sterling speaking.
Gee, it's good to see you again sweetheart.
Joe Hogue, hurry. And
I'm gonna marry you.
No, no, no; not you Joe.
Hang on a minute. How about it sweetheart, yes or no?
- The story is important!
- I don't suppose I dare...
...spoil a good story.
Listen, Joe, tell that rat Archie Van Ness...
...to announce the approaching marriage of Valkyr Bradford and Tony Sterling.
Yeah!
Well, that's not all.
Here's the real story:...
...Joshua Maynard alias Arthur
Burchard, yeah sure, that's the one!
Well, he was shot to death...
- ... while trying to escape from…
- Hold it!
Just a minute!
Got it! Got it!
I've got it!
I've got it!
Subtítulos creados por
Scaramouche.
Yes, sir. It's the biggest little city in the world.
And by gosh, it's the liveliest.
I guess these divorcées figure that as long as they're changin' partners... they just might as well dance.
- This your first trip here?
- Yes.
I thought you were strange.
Some of them come back so often,
I was thinkin'of printin'up commuter's tickets.
Oh, well.
I guess divorce ain't much more than a matter of traveling.
You check out of the state of matrimony and land in the state of Nevada.
I ain't got no complaints though.
Owe my livin' to divorces, same as most of the people in this town.
And, by gosh, it's the one business that even the depression don't hit.
- Now, you take me for instance-
- How much farther to the hotel?
Oh, you in a hurry, are you?
Don't matter how soon I get you there, lady, it still takes six weeks.
- Good evening.
- Good evening. I'm Mrs. Curtis Whitman.
- I have reservations.
- Oh, yes, Mrs. Whitman. We have your room ready.
I'll notify our social directress that you're here.
Is that necessary?
I'm rather tired.
Not necessary, but we try to make each guest feel that he or she is more than a guest.
Especially during these trying days.
If you'll just register, please.
Miss Wells' office.
- Try the bar.
- Try the doc's office, I'd say.
Ring Dr. Ainsley.
Dr. Ainsley, this is the front desk.
Does Miss Wells happen to be there?
Certainly. It's for you.
Hello? All right, I'll be right out.
Another lost soul here for the cure.
- Shall I give her the bright approach or the sympathetic?
- I prefer the bright.
So I've noticed lately.
I'll leave the sympathy for you.
You do it so well.
106. You'll find there's never a dull moment at the Hotel Sierra, Mrs. Whitman.
We have sunrise trips to points of interest... alimony breakfasts, bridge luncheons or-
Oh, here's Miss Wells.
Mrs. Whitman.
How do you do? You've had a long trip, haven't you? Let's have a drink.
Thank you, but I don't think I care for one.
L- It's rather late.
Oh, come on. You don't want to spend your first evening in that room alone.
- You're right. I don't.
- Fine.
It's this way.
I'll show you your room later.
Seventeen and the black.
Well, that washes me up.
- Oh, it's you.
- Oh, hello, Ainsley.
You're a doctor. Save my life and let me have a hundred, will you?
Sorry. My office hours are from 2:00 to 4:00.
But I'll buy you a drink.
That's awfully generous of you.
Here. Cash these for me.
Maybe that'll help your credit.
- Meet you at the bar.
- Place your bets.
- The same, Mrs. Bentley?
- Yes.
- Where's your shadow?
- Shadow?
The official greeter.
Greeting a decidedly attractive new arrival.
I wouldn't mind having her job myself.
What's the matter?
- I'm amused.
- That must be obvious to everyone in the place.
- Do you know her?
- Know her? I'm going to marry her husband.
Want to meet her?
Come on.
Number 25 and the red.
Well, well!
Greetings, salutations, and my heartfelt thanks.
Curt wrote me he'd finally talked you into a divorce... but I didn't expect you so soon.
Dr. Ainsley finds you so attractive, he asked for an introduction.
Since you're doing so much for me, why shouldn't I do something for you?
The doctor's a bachelor. You'll find him most amusing while you're here.
I know I have.
- Mrs. Whitman, Dr. Ainsley.
- How do you do?
I'm sorry, Mrs. Whitman... but this seems to be one of those situations that we try to avoid here.
Why, going to marry her husband.
So what?
This is 1939. We're modern.
Let's talk things over.
Besides, there's lots of things
I want to ask you about Curt.
You know, how he likes his eggs and toast.
And is he sometimes cross in the morning or always as charming as I've found him?
- And all the little things you did that upset him.
- Let me out, please.
Mrs. Whitman, what are you doing here?
- Thanks.
- Don't you know?
- Why, no.
- I haven't had the heart to tell the poor boy.
Tell me what?
I've decided that Curt will make me a better husband. He's more mature.
Why, you cheap, lying-
- Don't you call me names, you stupid fool!
- Oh!
My goodness!
Is it my fault you're sap enough to trail me everywhere I go?
Will you show me my room please?
Are you both going up and have a good cry?
- Shut up.
- I won't shut up!
Mrs. Bentley,
I have to ask you to leave my hotel.
- What?
- You've done nothing but cause trouble since you came here.
- Why, you can't-
- I shall expect you to be gone by morning.
Behave yourself and sit down.
- I want a drink.
- You've had too much to drink already.
And you've talked too much.
You used to be smart.
Keep on like this and you'll hang yourself.
What's the matter?
Afraid you'll hang with me?
Where have you been? Mrs. Bentley's been ringing for you all evening.
What was she ringing for?
She knows it's my night off.
- She's leaving the hotel. You've got to pack.
- Tonight?
And if you want to know, she was thrown out.
Oh. Now she'll really be hard to work for.
What happened?
Mrs. Bentley won't be leaving until morning.
All right, Mrs. Russell.
I'll have her bill ready.
Mrs. Bentley.
- What's the trouble? Is someone hurt?
- Mrs. Bentley.
- What's happened here?
- In there-
- How did it happen?
- I don't know. Mrs. Bentley.
- Keep back everybody.
- Who is she?
- What's going on?
- Did they send for a doctor?
- Is she dead?
- I think so.
Get Dr. Ainsley.
I'll telephone the police.
Don't look at me like that.
I didn't do it.
Don't! I didn't do it, I tell you!
I didn't! I didn't!
Lieutenant Chan,
Mr. Curtis Whitman is here to see you.
Always pleased to see Mr. Whitman.
This way, please.
- Hello, Charlie.
- Please pardon experiment... but must reproduce elusive Easter rabbit for number one grandchild.
So glad-Words of welcome freeze when friend appears troubled.
You couldn't have seen the papers, Charlie.
Please forgive question, but is concern for living or the dead?
Mary is still my wife, in spite of what we'd planned.
But she didn't-
She couldn't have done this.
Man yet to be born who can tell what woman will or will not do.
But you know her.
You've known her all her life.
Yes. Very difficult to believe ill of those we love.
Oh, I knew you'd feel that way, Charlie.
That's why I want you to go with me.
Why, they might build up a case against her that we can't break.
- Oh, she's in a jam and it's-
- Please.
Ancient ancestor once say,
"Words cannot cook rice. "
Then you will go?
Swell!
I've reserved seats on the Clipper for both of us.
Can you be ready in an hour?
Will go pack and notify family in person... just so honorable wife will not misunderstand contemplated visit to Reno.
Oh!
Phew! Very objectionable odor,
Mr. Chan. Ah, what is it?
Just one of my experiments in chemical criminology, sir.
You see, I'm working on a new method to bring out fingerprints on cloth.
Bring them out?
My dear boy, that'll drive them out.
I'm sorry, sir.
I don't think it turned out just right.
Hey, a telegram just came for you, Jimmy.
Telegram?
Oh, gee, thanks.
Whew!
Do you have to make that stuff?
Hey, listen to this.
It's from Pop.
"Honorable sprout, unexpectedly find self on way to Reno, Nevada.
Will visit you before return home. "
Reno? Is your Dad gonna get a divorce?
Oh, gee, no.
I- I don't think so.
Say. You know that murder we read about and I said I knew the people?
- Yeah.
- That's what Pop's on his way to Reno for.
- No kiddin'!
- No foolin'.
Say, Jack, the Easter holidays start tomorrow, and you're not going anywhere.
- Can I borrow your car?
- Well, the tank's empty.
- I'll fill it up.
- How long are you gonna use it?
Oh, I'll be back before vacation's over.
Hey, wait a minute!
That's a week.
Oh, don't worry. With me helping Pop, it won't take that long.
We'll have this case cleaned up in no time!
Young man, you'll clean that up before you clean up any mysteries.
Yes, sir.
- Oh!
- What's the trouble?
My pal here got smacked by a hit-and-run.
- Oh!
- Is he hurt bad?
Looks like it. I got to get him to a hospital.
Say, we're only 20 miles from Reno.
I'll be glad to take you there.
- Thanks, buddy.
- Hey, I'll help you.
Oh!
Hey!
You can't do this to me!
Yes, sir. It's the biggest little city in the world, Mr. Chan.
I knew you was the famous detective the minute I seen you.
Congratulations upon penetrating humble disguise.
Aw, you're kiddin'.
We got a pretty smart police force of our own.
Eager to make acquaintance of same.
Would kindly drive us there first?
- To the police station?
- Please.
All right, but if you're here to solve the killing at the Hotel Sierra, you're too late.
'Cause they've already arrested the woman that done it.
Has unfortunate lady confessed?
Nope. Too smart for that.
But they got her dead to rights.
Motive and everything.
It seems her husband and this-
Yes. We read all about it in the papers.
Yeah, but you didn't see her the night she got here, like I did.
I knew there was something wrong, even then.
She didn't say nothin'.
Just sat back there quiet-like and stared out the window.
I figured she was unhappy about a divorce... but of course, now I know she was just sittin' back there cooking up the murder.
Very interesting evidence.
This man will prove most valuable on witness stand.
Witness stand? Who? Me?
I ain't getting mixed up in any murder trials.
No, sir. Not me!
I ain't saying another word.
Thank you so much.
- What's your name?
- Mr. Jones.
Yeah? And I suppose yours is Smith?
Correction, please.
Lieutenant Chan of Honolulu Police.
I thought so.
Lieutenant Chan! Oh, yes.
The chief is expecting you. This way, sir.
Well, Charlie! You old son of a gun.
I'm glad to see you again.
Sincerely hope status does not change.
- Why should it?
- Quite possible I make large nuisance of self.
Chief of Police King,
Mr. Curtis Whitman.
- How do you do?
- How do you do? L-
Whitman? Oh.
Well, I'm sorry to meet you under these circumstances, Mr. Whitman.
I know you're anxious to talk about the case, but I'm on my way to the show-up.
- Like to have you come with me. Won't take long.
- Thank you.
Disorderly conduct, drunk, heaving brick through window, hitting two police.
Take him away, Clancy.
Wow, that helps me.
Boys, we've got a distinguished visitor today- an old pal of mine from Honolulu,
Charlie Chan.
- So this is Charlie, eh?
- How do you do? It's a pleasure.
- So pleased.
- Sit right down here, Charlie.
And we'll show you the choicest collection of con men and crackpots you've ever seen.
- Uh, meet Sheriff Fletcher.
- Most honored to meet illustrious Sheriff.
Oh, are you?
I've heard a lot about you too.
And, uh, this is a friend of Lieutenant Chan's, Mr. Whitman.
- How are you?
- Whitman? That name sounds familiar.
It ought to.
That's the case you're on.
That's where I heard it.
Well, Chan, I reckon you ain't here with Whitman for nothing.
Excellent observation.
Then we might as well understand each other right now.
Me and King got this case well in hand, and we don't need no outside help... or interference.
Don't mind him, Charlie. He's known as "Tombstone. " I guess you can figure out why.
Tombstones often engraved with words of wisdom.
Yeah, and ain't all of them covered with moss either.
Now that you're here, young fella... there's a couple of questions
I'd like to ask you.
- I know as little about this as you do.
- Yeah.
All right, let's get on with the show-up.
Bring 'em in, Mac.
All right, come on, you guys, and make it snappy.
- Get up on there.
- Quit pushing!
Quiet!
Hurry it along.
- You're gonna be sorry for this.
- Get up on there!
Take off your hats.
- Anything wrong, Charlie?
- Sudden shock to eyesight. Not permanent, I hope.
Step forward.
You too!
What's the charges on this kid?
Violation of ordinances 106, 109, 214-A.
And suspected of being nuts.
I am not nuts.
I told 'em how some hitchhikers stole all my clothes, and-and a car I borrowed.
Violent too.
What's your name, bub?
It's Jimmy Chan, sir. And my father's
Charlie Chan. Everybody's heard of him.
Mm-hmm, and I suppose you'd recognize your famous pa if you was to see him?
- Of course I would.
- Well, here.
Pop! Am I glad to see you!
You mean, he's really your son?
Must admit to dubious honor.
Pop, tell these guys I'm not crazy.
Parent must first convince self of same.
Possible to release offspring in my custody?
Sure, now that he's been identified.
Thank you. Now, will kindly explain presence here?
I just came up during the holidays to help you catch the murderer.
Pop appreciates valuable help of number two son... but first use talent to catch new pair of pants.
Thanks. Don't do anything on this case until I get back.
Is he gonna be on the case too?
- Self-appointed.
- He ain't the only one.
What's your name?
Who me? I'm Charlie Chan's number three son.
Me go home now?
Charlie. Oh, Charlie,
I didn't do it!
You know I didn't do it!
Have brought somebody.
Curt.
Thank you for coming, Curt.
Are you all right?
I mean-
Don't worry about anything.
Charlie's here to help you.
Sit down, please.
Now, want you to tell me exactly what occurred on night of murder.
Well, I was in bed, but not asleep.
- What time, please?
- About 12:30.
While I was lying there,
I- I heard a scream... not loud, but close to my room... and it was cut off sharply.
It frightened me, and I got up to see what was wrong.
How long after scream before you reach hallway?
Oh, I don't know.
A minute, maybe longer.
You saw no one in corridor?
No. But the door opposite mine was open a little, and the light was on.
I looked in and saw her lying on the floor.
Even when I reached her,
I didn't recognize her at first.
She was wearing some sort of beauty mask that completely covered her face.
Police have pictures?
Yes. Here.
You can have this set.
Thank you so much.
Continue, please.
I started to touch her, and- and I saw the blood... and then I recognized her by her hair.
Oh, it all happened so fast, Charlie, and it was such a shock to me.
I don't know what I did.
I just stood and looked at her, I guess.
And then suddenly the Chinese maid was screaming... and people ran into the room and... they accused me.
Police have reason to doubt truth of story?
We ain't got no reason to believe it.
She had plenty of motive too.
Why, only an hour or two before Mrs. Bentley was stabbed... this woman and her had a fight in the hotel bar, over her stealing her husband.
Oh, but I wasn't the only one she quarreled with.
You were the only one found standing over the body.
May humbly request one more favor?
Please arrange for Mrs. Whitman to return to hotel.
What? Turn loose the only suspect we got?
Can promise she will not attempt to leave Reno.
Chief, this Oriental's loco.
If you think you're gonna take her out of here like you did your son...
- you got another think coming.
- Please.
Victim was stabbed, you say?
Victim?
Oh, she was stabbed all right, with some kind of a knife.
Was weapon found on Mrs. Whitman?
Well, no, but she might've got rid of it.
Exactly what kind of knife, please?
How should I know?
We ain't found it yet.
That's what has us stumped, Charlie.
The knife is still missing.
Then police believe Mrs. Whitman foolish enough to kill... leave room to hide death weapon... then return to be discovered beside body of victim?
Well, my theory is, she came back for something- something she dropped.
Such as?
You can ask the doggonedest questions!
Chief, are you gonna be taken in by a lot of polite bowing and scraping?
You know we haven't got enough evidence for an indictment, Tombstone.
Yeah, but who's going to be responsible for her?
Suggest husband number one man for job.
Her husband? First thing I know, you'll be asking me to swear Whitman in as a deputy.
Can think of no one with better reason for wishing to capture murderer.
- I'll see what the D.A. Says about releasing her, Charlie.
- Thank you so much.
Doggonedest detective I ever saw.
He's taking 'em out of here faster than we can put 'em in.
Oh, excuse me, Sheriff.
What you hiding for?
Are you shadowing someone?
I ain't hiding. I got orders to stick around and help your pa... so I'm giving him plenty of rope.
- Where is he now?
- In there talking to the owner of the hotel.
Oh.
So right after the quarrel in the bar,
I took Mrs. Whitman up to her room.
I stayed with her for some time because she was pretty upset.
And I don't blame her. She took an awful beating from that Bentley woman.
- Mrs. Bentley very unpopular.
- That's putting it mildly.
Believe unlamented lady here to divorce self from present husband.
Yes. A George Bentley from San Francisco.
So far, we haven't been able to locate him.
- No one claim body?
- Her family. The police shipped it Back East yesterday.
Murder room still intact?
Yes. And locked, of course.
- Would like to visit same now.
- Certainly.
Mind if I snoop along?
Charming company turn lowly sandwich into rich banquet.
Hiya, Pop.
How do you like my new hat?
Off head at present.
Oh, sure.
Sorry.
Excuse, please. This is number two son, masquerading as Lone Ranger.
- Hello.
- How do you do?
Say. Are you getting ready to visit the scene of the crime?
Yes. Would honorable Sheriff wish to come?
Heck, I been through that room so much
I could search it with my eyes shut.
Thank you. Will search then this time with eyes open.
Oh, Mrs. Russell!
Somebody's took the passkey off my ring.
- The passkey?
- Yes, ma'am. I left it hanging outside while I did 108... and when I come out, it was gone.
Gee, maybe the murderer took it.
- The murderer! Oh, oh!
- Quiet!
Call the desk and see if it's been turned in there.
I did, and it ain't.
Oh, ma'am, do you think-
I think you'll find it.
And please don't mention it to anyone.
Why, Dr. Ainsley!
What are you doing here?
I just remembered something that happened the night of the murder.
- Oh, uh, this is Charlie Chan, the detective.
- How do you do?
Most gratifying to meet hostess who remembers job at all times.
I get it. You think I was trying to warn him for some reason.
Is there any reason to warn honorable doctor?
Say, you don't waste any time, do you?
Well, I'm not any good at hiding it, so I may as well confess.
I'm rather fond of the honorable doctor.
But I must admit this doesn't look so hot.
What were you doing here?
Looking for the money Mrs. Bentley won the night she was murdered.
Don't you think you'd better leave the searching to the police?
They did search this room... but it occurred to me that no mention was made of the money.
You see, Mr. Chan, the jealousy angle was so strong against Mrs. Whitman... that no one thought of a simple robbery motive.
Most happy to consider same.
Was it large sum lady won?
Large enough for her to be paid off in a stack of hundred dollar bills.
Wally Burke cashed in her chips.
And handed her the money during the quarrel. I remember.
Hey! Cut it out! That hurts!
Take your hands off me, you big hick!
I haven't done anything!
Come peaceable now, or I'll get rough.
What's all this about, Sheriff?
Burke knows he ain't supposed to leave town.
Yet I just caught him trying to pay his bill and check out.
- Pay his bill? With what?
- Money. What do you think?
- That's funny. I thought he was broke.
- What gave you that idea?
You tried to borrow some from me the other night.
I wired home for it.
Any business of yours?
No. But it might be of interest to Mr. Chan.
- Well, what is all this?
- Was under impression Mrs. Bentley was friend of yours.
She was.
Surprised then, you unwilling to assist police by remaining in hotel.
Since you put it that way, of course I'll stay.
You'll stay no matter which way we put it.
Did Sheriff notice if Mr. Burke have hundred dollar bills?
He was downright filthy with 'em.
- I better lock him up.
- No.
Most inadvisable.
If want wild bird to sing do not put him in cage.
Maybe he won't sing, but leastwise he won't take off either.
Check later with telegraph company concerning story of Mr. Burke about cash.
Okay, Pop. I'll handle that.
If I can be of any further help, I'Il-
I'll trouble you for that passkey you took from the maid.
The maid?
I didn't take any key from her.
This is the one I used. The night clerk gave it to me last week on an emergency case.
I forgot to return it.
It's been in my desk ever since.
With gracious permission of hostess, will resume conversation later.
All right, and I'll be looking forward to it... because never have I so politely been told to scram.
And now, please, would like to occupy this room during stay in hotel.
- This room?
- Yes.
Gosh. It hasn't been three days since Mrs. Bentley was killed in here.
Yet room continues to attract visitors, and passkey still missing.
You mean we're gonna sleep in here and wait for somebody to sneak in on us?
Perhaps sleep more attractive in university classroom?
Oh, no. I don't mind.
Those things don't affect me!
I was just thinking about you, that's all. It might be dangerous.
I agree with him, Mr. Chan.
When searching for needle in haystack, haystack only sensible location.
Very well. I'll have her things packed and moved out when you're ready.
One moment. Have kept
Mrs. Whitman's room?
- Yes. Why?
- Expect her here this afternoon.
- She's being released?
- In custody of husband.
- Oh, I'm so glad.
- Perhaps somebody else not so glad.
Request no mention be made of release as yet.
- I understand.
- Thank you so much.
These police pictures sure are spooky.
- Death usually grim.
- What was she wearing the mask for?
Lady using new psychology on wrinkles.
Scares them away.
Oh.
Gee, this Mrs. Bentley sure liked herself.
She kept a publicity scrapbook, just like a movie actress.
- Where you find scrapbook?
- Hmm? Right here on the trunk.
Police pictures indicate scrapbook on vanity when body discovered.
Then somebody's moved it since the murder.
Say, do you suppose this Burke fellow might've killed her for the money?
Possible. Look for scissors among lady's effects.
Okay. Uh, any particular kind?
Straight edge indicate use of long desk shears.
You mean it might have been used as a death weapon?
If closed, would leave wound as described by police surgeon.
Gee, then I'd better look hard.
And if I don't find any, it'll look like we're right.
I don't see any in here.
Find something important, Pop?
What I do not find is more important.
- What do you mean?
- Pages covering 1935 and '36 have been removed.
Why, do you suppose?
Someone strangely anxious to conceal lady's activities during those years.
- Continue search for scissors.
- Okay.
What's the matter?
What's happened?
Get a load of that
Honolulu bloodhound.
Sounds good.
- Well, what about him?
- What about him?
Looks like his nose just led him straight to the bar.
Did you get me over here just to show me that?
- Ain't it enough?
- Listen, Tombstone. I knew Charlie was throwing this party.
He's doing it for a special reason... and I want you to stay out of it.
I'll stay out of it, but while he's wasting his time in there drinking... where's that murderer he was so sure of catching?
- Well, he may be drinking with him.
- Then why don't he arrest him?
Relax, will you? And for heaven's sake, don't call me again unless it's important.
- There.
- Thank you.
What's in it, Mr. Chan?
Something to loosen the tongue?
Humble Hawaiian drink.
Very mild.
- I'll stick to bourbon.
- Do we toast with humble drink, or just dive into it?
Suggest toast to very gracious woman and unhappy husband... now entering.
You don't have to hold your chin quite that high, Mary.
But they stared so.
How long do we have to stay?
Well, Charlie said for just one drink.
We can go someplace else for dinner.
I just want to get back up to my room.
All right, Mary.
Anything you say.
So, tell me, Mr. Chan, have they dropped the case against Mrs. Whitman entirely?
Police realize evidence very weak.
Personally, I don't think much of the motive.
You do not find
Mr. Whitman attractive?
I couldn't be attracted to any man who was stupid enough to fall forJeanne Bentley.
Well, thanks.
Perhaps acquaintance with murdered lady too brief to learn real character.
It took me a couple of months, but I finally found her out.
It didn't take me long. The minute she walked in the hotel, I had her labeled.
- That was first meeting with Mrs. Bentley?
- Yes.
And you, Dr. Ainsley?
I never knew her before she came here.
Why should you ask me?
Was only asking if you required to have glass refilled.
Oh, uh, yes.
Yes. Thanks.
That was slick, Mr. Chan... but if you're trying to find someone who knew her before she came here, why don't you ask?
Have asked all except Mrs. Russell.
- I didn't know her.
- Mr. Burke, it looks like you're still leading the pack.
- What are you trying to do?
- Oh, don't be stuffy.
If you did do it, I'm all for you.
That woman had at least one murder coming to her.
Would you have killed Mrs. Bentley?
Probably. If she'd annoyed me enough and the knife had been handy.
Lady killed with scissors, not knife.
- Scissors?
- What kind of scissors?
Very sharp. Pointed on end and long enough to inflict very deep wound.
Implying surgical scissors?
Found doctor's office well-equipped with same.
- I didn't know you had called.
- So sorry, doctor not in.
Are you accusing me?
What possible motive could he have had?
None. But Mr. Burke seems to have had plenty.
- Mr. Burke.
- Just a minute.
This is the second time you've tried to pin this thing on me. What's on your mind?
Well, you never explained where you got the money.
Come on. I don't want you to get mixed up in this.
- You stay out there!
- Curt!
Hello. Give me the police station, quick!
Hello. Give me the chief. Hurry!
Yes. King speaking.
What?
I said you knew he was throwing a party... but did you know he was staging a riot?
Well, stop it, you fool, before somebody gets hurt.
Okay. But you told me to keep out of it.
- Think he's hurt badly?
- I hope not.
- Who hit me?
- Are you hurt, Mr. Fletcher?
You're darn tootin' I'm hurt.
I got a good mind to arrest the whole bunch of you.
I'll take him to his room.
All he needs is a sedative.
He'll sleep it off.
Perhaps you had better assist doctor.
If honorable sheriff will permit... think head need examination.
It's not my head that needs examining.
It's the people's that let you come in here and stir up a lot of trouble.
Regret accident, but sometimes must strike innocent to trap guilty.
Yeah? Well, if you think you're gonna use my skull for bait, you're crazy.
Thank you so much.
- Mr. Chan?
- Yes?
- Telephone.
- Oh.
- Yes?
- Hello? Pop?
I just got the report from the telegraph office.
Wally Burke's family cabled him $1,500 yesterday.
- Oh.
- Can I join the party now?
Party all finished.
Hey, Pop, somebody's trying to get in here.
What?
Oh, gee. I-I'm awfully sorry.
- Hello, Pop.
- Pop humbly suggest you assist young lady to rise.
Oh, sure. Gee, I hope
I didn't hurt you.
My dignity is slightly bruised, but no bones broken.
Excuse please.
Can explain presence in this room?
Yes, honorable sir.
Are you Charlie Chan?
Praise in any language very sweet... but young lady have not yet explained presence here.
My name is Choy Wong, honorable sir.
Gee, that's a pretty name.
Uh, isn't it, Pop?
- My name's Jimmy.
- Jimmy Chan is also a nice-sounding name.
If Choy Wong will be so kind... have not yet explained presence in this room.
I was told that I'm now free to pack Mrs. Bentley's clothes.
- Obtain key from clerk?
- Why, yes, sir.
- Gosh, Pop, you don't think that she-
- Shh.
Was personal maid to deceased lady?
- Work for her in 1935 or '6?
- Why, no.
She engaged me in San Francisco a month ago and brought me here.
Ever glance through lady's scrapbook?
I looked at some of the pictures.
Were pages torn out when Choy Wong look at book?
- No, I'm sure they weren't.
- Is it all right for her to pack now?
- Yes.
- I'd better help you.
We might find something important.
You'd better clear out the closet first.
All right.
Oh, Charlie.
We've got something to show you.
I found this in Wally Burke's room.
As you see, the scissors are missing.
Gee, they'd be just the size we're looking for.
And it's got his initials on it too.
Mr. Burke aware of discovery?
No, the doctor spotted it while I was trying to quiet Burke.
- Administer sedative?
- Yes. He'll be asleep for some time.
Will question young man when he wakes up.
Thank you so much.
Assistance greatly appreciated.
Burke's in the clear about that money he got... but he'll have a tough time explaining this.
Can recall last time
Mrs. Bentley wore riding boots?
The day before she was killed.
She went out early in the morning and didn't get back till noon.
Say, if she was on a horse, where'd she get all that mud?
- And those scratches?
- Most clever deduction.
Lady did not remain on horse.
Hold boots, please.
- Do you think we've got something, Pop?
- Time and analysis will tell.
- Can reach me at police station if needed.
- Okay.
Don't worry.
I'll keep an eye on things here.
Am certain can depend on same.
Pop sure is smart. He doesn't miss a thing.
Except his son moving the furniture.
Oh, you mean that bench over there?
That wasn't anything. I just dropped a cigarette and burned a hole in the rug.
Does honorable father think you're too young to smoke?
Oh, no. I'm no kid.
I help him solve his cases.
- You do?
- Yeah.
I've got an idea how to solve this one.
Do you want to help me?
Yes- If I don't get killed.
I wouldn't want you to do anything dangerous.
- I think you're very nice.
- What do you want me to do?
Well, I haven't got it all doped out yet.
Do you mind if I smoke?
It helps me to think.
Drive to police station, please.
Okay, but I still ain't talkin'.
Excellent.
Aw, now, Priscilla.
I told you not to follow me.
I'm workin'.
Well, I just talked with the New York police.
They're putting men on the 1935 and '36 newspaper files right away... and they're going to check up on
Mrs. Bentley's bank account.
- Thank you so much.
- Oh. What did you find on the boots?
Plenty of sand, some pollen from desert flowers, red clay...
- a suggestion of copper shavings and-
- Horsefeathers.
And minute splinters from very old wood.
Copper and old wood suggest abandoned mine.
Yes, well, there are lots of those around here... but the red clay narrows it to someplace south of town.
Distance also limited.
Lady must ride there on horse, transact mysterious business...
- and return to hotel by noon.
- I see.
Honorable chemist suggest... old wood might possibly indicate ghost town.
Yes, that's right.
Oh, wait a minute.
I know one.
Yes. Here it is.
Yeah, there it is, right there.
It's up in the hills, about four miles off the main road.
It's beyond Dead Man's Canyon.
Yes, there's plenty of red clay in that district.
And the old Sully copper mines were there too.
That fits the analysis, and it's about the only one that fits the distance.
Say, if you're interested...
I'll have Tombstone drive you up there in the morning.
Visit to Dead Man's Canyon with Tombstone-
Very appropriate.
Will consider same tomorrow.
You want him to drive you back to the hotel?
Have hotel driver waiting.
Thank you so much.
Good-bye.
Hey, what are you going to do?
I'm going right along after that guy.
He started one riot tonight, and I aim to see he don't start no more.
Darned if I can figure why you want to drive way out here... at this time of night for.
Have strong desire to visit real ghost town.
But it ain't nothin' to look at even in the daytime.
You'll see for yourself in a minute.
It's just around the bend.
Please turn off all lights when entering abandoned village.
- What for?
- Do not wish to alarm sleeping ghosts.
Wish to wait here?
If you don't mind, I think I would.
Oh. It's only you, Sheriff. Hello.
Where is that Chan fella?
He's wanderin' around somewheres...
- lookin' for ghosts.
- Ghosts nothin'.
He's up to something, and I aim to find out what it is.
He can't give me the slip and get away with it.
Are you tryin' to be funny?
I don't think so.
I ain't laughin'.
- What's that?
- It ain't mice.
Come out, whoever you are, with your hands in the air.
- What was that?
- That ain't no... c-c-cow.
You're darn tootin' it ain't. Come on.
Light a match, Chan. I got him bulldogged.
- Why, this is a mining engineer's kit.
- Wait.
Wait'll you get a load of these papers.
Bentley-The dead woman's husband?
How did he get away?
Regret scuffle which occurred in dark... to Mr. Bentley's advantage.
But have written description of car with number of license.
Suggest you circulate same.
And how, I'll circulate it. This puts an entirely new light on the case.
He's been out there all this time in hiding, and I want to know why.
Also why wife visit him in secret.
Mmm. Send out a general alarm for this car.
The driver is thought to be George Bentley... wanted in connection with his wife's murder.
He'll try to leave the state, so notify state and county highway patrols...
- to be on the lookout.
- Yes, sir.
I've got a hunch that when we get him we'll have our murderer.
Sure be a relief to me to get off of this merry-go-round.
Don't you ever solve any of your cases in the daytime?
My feet hurt.
Chief King speaking.
What? All right.
We'll be over right away.
That was your son.
Something's happened at the hotel.
Must hurry.
Excuse please.
All right, break it up, folks.
Break it up. One side, please.
- What's wrong, Peters?
- This fella tried to sneak out of the hotel.
With these, Pop-
The ones we were lookin' for.
I told the officer that somebody might try to do this... and sure enough, it was him.
You've got a lot of explaining to do, Burke.
I want a lawyer.
That won't be hard.
Half the population of Reno is lawyers.
- These are yours?
- Yes.
But I didn't kill her.
Someone's trying to make it look like I did, and I know who it is.
- Just a minute, young fella.
- Sit down.
Please.
Have not explained scissors.
Jeanne borrowed them from me over a week ago, and never returned them... so when I heard she'd been stabbed with scissors, why-
Who said she was stabbed with scissors?
Lieutenant Chan-
And the police surgeon confirmed it.
Go on.
Don't tell me anything.
I'll just wait till the whole thing is solved...
- then read about it in the papers.
- I'm sorry, Tombstone.
I thought you knew it.
All right, go on, Mr. Burke.
Well, I naturally figured she was killed with my scissors.
Explain present possession and attempt to dispose of same.
Dr. Ainsley gave me a sedative... and when I woke up, the scissors were on my table.
Someone put them there, but with all the accusations... that have been made against me, no one would have believed that.
L- Well, I had to get rid of'em.
- Mr. Chan, there's something queer about this.
- You bet your life there is.
Somebody planted these in my room... and if they did it for a joke,
I don't think it's funny.
Excuse please.
You were speaking when lady interrupt.
I was just going to say that I found a pair of desk shears...
- exactly like those in my room tonight.
- What?
- Doctor also find similar pair?
- Yes.
But how did you know?
- Have theory.
- It better be good. They couldn't have all killed her.
Would like to see scissors, please.
- Bring the ones up from my office too.
- Certainly.
Number two son finally win jackpot?
- What do you mean?
- Scissors cost money.
Oh, I had some money left after I bought this suit.
- What are you talking about?
- Think ambitious young detective... can explain confusion of scissors.
Well, I figured that if all the suspects found scissors in their rooms... the one that was guilty would try to get rid of'em.
- And it worked too.
- You mean you planted 'em, son?
- Yes, sir.
- I'm as much to blame as Jimmy is.
He thought of it, but I'm the one who did it.
Oh, boy, am I relieved.
I found these under a cushion of a chair in Mary's room.
But we didn't put any scissors in Mrs. Whitman's room.
What?
- You didn't?
- No, sir. We couldn't get in.
That policeman was on guard outside the door.
Yeah, on my orders.
It looks like I was pretty smart too.
Now what have you got to say, Mr. Chan?
But I didn't have them there.
I didn't know anything about them.
Have you got that leather case, Charlie?
Uh, on desk.
Here they are.
What's happened?
Bring scissors, please.
- These the ones that were found in Mrs. Whitman's room?
- Yes.
These have the same trademark as the letter opener.
I'm afraid there's no doubt that these are the ones she was stabbed with.
You're afraid?
You got the goods on her the second time... and you got him trying to hide incriminating evidence.
So you apologize. Horsefeathers!
I ain't losin' no more time.
Wait a minute, Tombstone.
What are you going to do?
To see the district attorney. I'm gonna tell him everything we got on this woman!
I'll lay you 10 to 1 he'll have it... before the grand jury by morning.
Curt, stop it, please.
You're blaming yourself for showing them the scissors.
Of course I am.
All I want is to help you, and, oh, I've made things worse.
I know you wanted to help.
But what did you think when you found them?
That's what matters.
You must have thought I was guilty.
I didn't think anything except that I was responsible.
Come in, Charlie.
Sometimes tears from woman very happy sign.
I'm pretty scared, Charlie.
No need to be.
At moment police are searching for man who is very likely suspect...
- and when-
- What is it?
Have burned sleeve.
Well, you don't smoke, Mary.
How did you do it?
I don't know.
I- I didn't even notice.
I haven't had it on since-
Since when?
Since the night I... found Mrs. Bentley.
Please, return with me to room.
Jimmy.
Lone Ranger's hat bad enough without wearing horse's blanket.
Oh, you mean these pajamas, Pop?
I didn't buy 'em.
I found 'em in your bag.
They're the ones Mom gave you for Christmas.
Although 3,000 miles away, honorable wife still make presence felt.
Please.
Mary, would like you to repeat actions on finding body.
All right.
I, uh- I saw her from the hall... and crossed over to the dressing table.
She was lying here between the bench and-
Well, the bench wasn't here.
Can remember exact position ofbench?
Not exactly, but, uh-
It was something like that.
What's the matter?
What is it, Charlie?
- First bright light in very dense fog.
- You mean a clue to the murder?
Gee, Pop, I can't let you get sidetracked that way.
I burned it with a cigarette.
Rug burned with acid...
- not cigarette.
- Acid?
How about Mary's sleeve?
Also acid.
Why, there is some there. It must have been spilled here and dripped down.
If Mary leaned here, that explains the burn on the sleeve.
Gee, it's a good thing you didn't get any on your arm, Mrs. Whitman.
Nitric acid leaves a nasty burn.
Number two son think it nitric acid?
Well, it could have been.
It eats through anything but glass.
Have seen one bottle nitric acid tonight... but bottle full.
What would acid be doing here?
Think answer may be found in second bottle-
Not so full.
Nitric acid?
Yes, I have some.
That's funny. I could have sworn this bottle was full.
No one have occasion to use same?
No.
Excuse.
What is purpose of gauze?
It prevents breaking and leakage. Why?
Gauze on this different weave and quality from gauze on other bottle.
It shouldn't be.
They're all shipped from the same firm.
With permission, will keep till morning.
Certainly.
But do you think it's connected with the murder?
Person who remove pages from Mrs. Bentley's scrapbook...
- may have answer.
- Pages from her scrapbook?
Covering years 1935 and '36.
Thought doctor may have noticed when searching lady's room.
No, I didn't.
Thank you so much.
Label this "Gauze from Wally Burke's Room. "
Okay.
- Who's next?
- Miss Wells, but you'd better search her room.
All right.
But what if they catch me?
Oh, don't you worry.
I'll be right behind you.
- Yes? Oh! Good morning.
- You bet your life it's a good morning.
- We've got Bentley, the husband.
- Good.
Tombstone's on his way over to Tonopah to pick him up.
- But I've got some real news from New York.
- Yes?
The police checked on Mrs. Bentley's
New York bank account.
She wrote two checks this month... for 1,500 apiece.
And who do you think they were made out to?
Dr. Ainsley.
That is highly interesting.
You check on newspaper files?
And how. Say, no wonder somebody wanted to get rid of the pages of that scrapbook.
They're dynamite. Get this.
In 1935, Jeanne was married to a man named Russell.
Russell?
Related to Mrs. Russell here?
Her ex-husband.
And he died suddenly in 1936.
What was cause of death?
According to the attending physician,
Russell died of a heart attack... but the attending physician was our old friend Dr. Ainsley.
Must see Mrs. Russell at once.
Very urgent.
Pop!
- They just found Mrs. Russell in her room, strangled.
- Lady dead?
I don't know. The maid found her and called Dr. Ainsley.
- Dr. Ainsley?
- Doctor with her now?
- Yes. - Hurry.
- Come along.
Lift her arm to the outside of the covers, please.
- Doctor. One moment.
- What are you giving her?
Adrenaline. She's got to have a heart stimulant.
- Will take, please.
- What's the matter, Mr. Chan?
Have you gone mad?
Examination of hypodermic will determine that.
- Jimmy!
- I got it, Pop.
- Thank you so much.
- Let me have that, please.
Keep this man covered, Peters.
I'll call the police surgeon.
Choy Wong, stay with lady.
Can help when police surgeon arrive.
Jimmy.
You search rooms for gauze?
Yeah. This was in
Wally Burke's room.
I guess the doctor used it last night to patch him up after the fight.
And this was in Miss Wells' room, in the wastebasket.
Neither one of them matches the gauze on the nitric acid bottle... but I brought them along anyway.
We didn't get a chance to look in here.
- Can look now.
- Yes.
Pop! This is it.
It matches.
That means that Mrs. Russell took the acid from the Doctor's office.
- Do you suppose that she-
- Please.
You will take all exhibits to room and guard carefully.
If lady recovers sufficiently to talk... bring all suspects to scene of crime.
Oh. Also request... everyone wear same clothes as night of murder.
All right, Bentley, come on.
What are you bringing me here for?
Oh, ain't you heard?
We don't put people in jail no more.
We take 'em to the best hotel.
Give 'em music with their meals... and hot and cold running water and-
Horsefeathers.
Come on.
Stick around if you like, Mr. Whitman, but Charlie doesn't want you inside.
Okay. I guess Charlie knows what he's doing. I'll wait downstairs.
Joe, keep your eye on the elevator and the stairs.
You boys stick here and don't let anybody leave this room.
- You understand?
- Yes, sir.
- What's goin' on?
- Charlie's called all the suspects together.
He's going to produce the murderer.
He's going to produce the murderer?
After I drive to Tonopah to pick 'im up?
Go on in, Burke.
Well, I'm a cockeyed son of a gun if this don't beat all.
- What's the matter?
- I knew that Chan fella was fancy... but if he can't hold an inquest without making it formal, I give up.
Relax, will you?
All right, go in, ladies, please.
Come on. He's probably serving cocktails again.
Have been called together because each of you... had very strong reason for hating Mrs. Bentley.
One of you had motive powerful enough to kill.
Here is lady whose husband was stolen from her... by murdered woman five years ago.
Here is young man, blindly in love... until eyes rudely opened by ugly insult in public.
Miss Wells, impulsive young lady in love with Doctor... has admitted she would have killed Mrs. Bentley... if given sufficient provocation.
Just a minute. Just a minute.
If you're takin' 'em from left to right... you just skipped your friend Mrs. Whitman.
She's still the only one found with the body.
Will neglect no one.
Here is husband.
Most anxious to get rid of wife.
Only in a legal, straightforward manner.
Then why were you hiding out in that ghost town?
I'm a mining engineer.
I got a job to look over those mines... afterJeanne had established residence in Reno.
I was afraid if I was seen here it would look like collusion... and the divorce wouldn't be granted.
Or maybe you thought you had a perfect alibi-
That no one would suspect you of murdering your wife if she was giving you a divorce.
Yeah. If you're so all-fired innocent... why did you put up such a scrap last night and then run away?
I didn't know you were connected with the police.
I found a man sneaking around my place, so I jumped him.
- You would have done the same thing.
- Horsefeathers.
- I'm arrestin' you.
- Tombstone.
He's already under arrest.
Why did wife visit you on day before murder?
She was panicky.
Said she needed $5,000 right away.
- Did you give it to her?
- I didn't have it.
- Did she say why she wanted it?
- No.
Think Dr. Ainsley can furnish answer to that.
What do you mean?
Doctor said had known
Mrs. Bentley only three weeks... yet signed false certificate on death of first husband...
Wayne Russell, three years ago.
False certificate?
You mean she killed him?
Canceled checks prove
Mrs. Bentley... paid Dr. Ainsley large sums of money to keep guilty secret.
- If I'd known that I-
- Didn't you?
No.
Then please explain why you visit Mrs. Bentley... with acid bottle.
How did you know-
We know you were here.
I came to disfigure her.
When Mrs. Whitman arrived at the hotel and I saw what happened...
I realized thatJeanne was going to ruin her life... the same as she'd ruined mine.
All the hate I'd felt came back to me.
I got the acid from the doctor's office.
But found lady's face protected by beauty mask.
That's it.
Then you grabbed the scissors and stabbed her.
- Mrs. Russell, I arrest you in the name of the law.
- I didn't kill her.
When Jeanne saw the acid she grabbed for it.
Said she'd give me a dose of my own medicine.
I kept her from getting it, but some of the acid was spilled.
When I left her, she was very much alive.
But now I understand what happened.
When she couldn't get the $5,000 from Bentley...
- the doctor killed her.
- He didn't.
Missing $100 bills found in doctor's room...
- prove he was here on night of murder.
- What ifhe was?
If he was blackmailing Mrs. Bentley, would he kill his meal ticket?
- You keep out of this.
- I won't keep out of it.
Excuse.
Miss Wells very calm young lady... except where doctor is concerned.
Do you think I'm going to let a bunch of blundering fools pin a murder on him?
What time was it when you brought the acid up here?
- After 12:00.
- And she was alive then.
Dr. Ainsley came up here at 10 minutes of 10::00... and left at 11:00.
I know, because I was waiting for him in the office.
- Waiting with watch in hand?
- What do you mean?
Such careful check on time highly suggestive of jealousy.
What are you doing now, accusing her?
Have accused no one as yet.
Merely search for truth.
What about Mrs. Russell?
She admits coming up here with the acid.
Yet you take her word for it that she left without killing her.
Please.
Can explain bandage found in room?
Who found it in my room?
Number two son-
Most ambitions amateur sleuth.
A lot of people found scissors in their room... and they were planted by number two son... so what does that prove,
Mr. Charlie Chan?
Look out!
Your-Your sleeve's on fire.
- Look out. Fire.
- Stop it. Let go of me.
- Stop it! Leave me alone.
- What is it?
Leave me alone.
Stop it!
What happened, Charlie?
Merely experiment with liquid smoke.
Quite harmless, but highly successful... in trapping murderess.
Honorable sheriff may now make arrest.
Who? Her? Uh-uh.
I ain't makin' no more arrests until I got the evidence.
Burn on arm received from nitric acid... when Miss Wells reach for scissors to stab Mrs. Bentley.
Evidence of guilt... quite apparent in desperate desire to hide burn.
Sorry to resort to trick, but lady make fatal mistake... by wearing jacket she did not wear...
- on night of murder.
- Just a minute.
Where do you think you'll get with that evidence?
Never mind.
Mr. Chan's right.
I did kill her.
But I didn't intend to.
I didn't even bring a weapon.
I only wanted to find out what was between... her and Dr. Ainsley, but she wouldn't tell me.
She was drunk and nasty, and when I threatened... to get the truth out of him, she went for me.
She'd have killed me, so I grabbed up... the first thing I saw to defend myself.
You've got to believe me.
Sincerely hope will convince jury of same.
One moment, please.
- May also arrest doctor.
- What for?
Analysis of hypodermic revealed deadly poison, not adrenaline.
What? Has there been another murder?
No, Tombstone.
Attempted murder.
- Dr. Ainsley tried to kill Mrs. Russell.
- Why?
Doctor guessed it was Mrs. Russell who removed pages from scrapbook.
He feared exposure of old guilt... in connection with Wayne Russell's death.
Where was I when all this was goin' on?
- In Tonopah.
- Horsefeathers.
Wait a minute.
Where are you going?
Back to Tonopah. They got a nice, easy case of cattle rustling over there... and I know I can pin it on the guilty guy... because they found him under the cow.
All right, Doctor.
Is it over?
Are you cleared?
Did you think of that liquid smoke gag all by yourself?
Pop and I worked it out together.
Oh, Jimmy, I think you're wonderful.
Number two son's present idea strictly his own... but not bad as example.
Chief.
─ Make it snappy.
Is the verdict in yet?     ─ No.
They're taking a chance.
You keep on writing.
That verdict will come in alright.
No loopholes in this case.
I'm going to beat The Times to the street this time, if it's the last thing I do.
Miss Colby, Ruth come here.
Get a lot of pictures. Gazotti and his women. Gazotti and his family.
Make a big spread.
─ Okay.
Put some prison bars in front of that.
Make this a 3-column spread.
Gazotti sitting in the electric chair.
Go on. Make it snappy.
We've only got 20 minutes to get it on the street.
Hello, Murphy? Got your 60-point banner?
Okay, put it out to print as soon as the page setup hits the lead.
Go to it. Get it out on the street!
Hey, Johnson. Put that in the chute.
Now wait a minute.
Wait a minute. Hold the wire.
Hold the form. The verdict just came in. Gazotti lives.
What?
Hold the press.
The verdict just came in. Gazotti lives.
Hey, what were you doing?
Playing a hunch?
Unblock it.
Put on the other headline.
"Gazotti Lives".
Stick on it. Let me know what happens every minute.
How did he do it, Chief?
I don't know. It was that
Houdini lawyer of his.
He must have done it with mirrors.
Alright. Forget Gazotti. We got something better in Durant.
Spread him all over 1, 2, and 3.
It's great stuff.
Society lawyer stuffs jury in his pocket and frees a racketeer.
Get pictures of Durant at Newport,
Palm Beach, tennis matches.
Go on, get him. Snap into it.
─ Sure.
Boy, this brings me out in the old sunlight again.
Hello, Lefty.
Hey .. where do you think you're going?
Today, you're coming right along with me, angel.
You can speak to me.
You don't want me, Andy.
Check the counselor.
He's the guy that brought home the bacon.
Boy, I said you'd get plenty.
I'm sending a check for fifty grand inside of an hour.
Say, with you as my mouthpiece we can run this town.
No, no. Keep your money.
─ What's the matter?
I don't want it, Tony.
I had too much fun.
Can't you let me do anything for you?
─ Why, you can drop me off at the office.
I mean, something real.
I gotta do something.
Maybe there's somebody you don't like?
There, there. Be careful now.
─ Ah, you'd get me off.
Get that idea right out your head.
If you're ever guilty I'll help to send you to the chair.
I bet you'd let me fry if the
Cops had the goods on me.
You know it. I'd give three cheers if you got what you deserved.
You're a bad citizen, Tony.
Public welfare would be improved if you were rubbed out.
Yes, and you two fellows also.
Turn around there, you mugs.
Gee .. I never ran across a guy like you.
You'd put the burn-up on me and not only make me take it, but like it.
Why don't you reform and be my partner?
─ Alright, I'll think it over, Tony.
After all, I ain't a bad guy, am I?
You are a menace to civilisation.
Boy, I like you.
Well you just keep on liking me.
Well, see you later, Tony.
─ Wait a minute.
Let them take a look around.
See if the coast is clear.
Hey, when are we going to celebrate?
─ Not now. I'm taking someone to lunch.
Oh, Miss Leonard?
─ How did you know that?
Say.
You probably know what kind of toothpaste I use.
You don't. You're an old-fashioned guy and use tooth-powder.
You sure go into things.
My boys looked you over plenty when you took my case.
I even know the mark you got for algebra in your second year at St John's school.
But you tell me .. what is algebra?
Ha ha. See you later, Tony.
Alright. Goodbye Tony. See you later.
So long, angel.
Well, goodbye gentlemen.
I'll .. see you later.
Morning, Mary. Get Miss Leonard on the phone, will you.
Mr Carston and Mr Rutherford want to see you immediately.
Alright, when you get her say I'll be there in an hour to take her to lunch.
Hello.
Well. I won my case.
Aren't you going to congratulate me?
─ You know the way we feel about that.
Yes, but I won my point.
I proved that he was innocent.
What's it matter if he was innocent?
He was guilty a hundred times before.
We told you not to take that case.
We've lost three of our oldest clients.
─ Alright.
I'll bring you in a hundred to take their place.
We don't want to handle racketeers and gangsters.
Your father and your father's father built this firm.
How would they feel about you now?
Have you been to your club or talked to decent people?
You'll find we're not the only ones who feel this way.
Why waste time talking.
Do you intend to continue to handle such cases?         ─ Certainly.
I know they don't make choice clients.
But I'd rather work for them than write wills for old people like Mrs Welton.
Who left a million dollars to her favorite pekingese.
It wasn't pekingese, it was a collie.
Gentlemen, gentlemen.
Let's keep to the point.
There is a kick in fighting for a man's life.
There's mystery, intrigue.
I like the troubles of bootleggers, chorus girls and head waiters.
They're human. They're alive.
─ And you refuse to give them up?
Absolutely, positively and definitely.
Then we'll have to ask you to withdraw from the firm.
Exactly.
You know me.
─ We most certainly do.
We will not have this office used as a refuge for all the riff-raff of society.
Very well then.
We will draw up the papers immediately.
─ That will be soon enough for me.
Well, Mary. So long. I'll see you anon.
Oh, Mr Durant.
Miss Leonard isn't in town.
She isn't?
No, she's spending the weekend on Long Island at Mr Siddall's place.
Oh, that's a good idea. If anyone wants me, they can reach me out there.
Say what .. what is this?
We're your bodyguard.
I don't need any bodyguard.
Tony don't want nothing to happen to you.
Nothing going to happen to me.
That's mighty nice of Tony but you'd better go on back to him.
He'll get sore.
We got orders.
You just tell him thanks.
I don't need you.
Is that alright with you?
Okay.
Goodbye.
Goodbye.
So long.
─ Goodbye.
Well, you've got another guest.
─ Yes, sir.
Where is everybody?
─ On the veranda, sir.
Right. Bring those things in the car, will you.
Hello, everybody.
Hello, Jack.
─ Hello.
Why this is grand after that old stuffy city.
Where is Sue?
─ I think she's playing tennis with Tom.
Well alright, I'll look her up.
Never mind. I'll get it.
Welcome home.
Please, Jack.
I always knew you were beautiful, but I didn't remember how beautiful.
Well, I don't wonder you've forgotten.
─ Let's duck the gang and go for lunch.
Well, I can't leave here.
─ Oh, sure you can.
Hello, Tom.
─ Hello, Jack.
That's it.       ─ Is it over?
─ All over.
Did you win?
─ Yes.
Congratulations. Boy, you're a wizard.
─ Thank you.
So that calls for a big celebration, doesn't it?
I've been trying to get Sue to leave the party for a while.
Well go ahead, I'll get another partner.
─ No. I want to play.
Oh, snap out of it. I'll see you later, Jack.     ─ Alright.
Alright darling, what do you say?
You haven't come near me in 4 weeks.
I telephoned.
You haven't tried to see me in all that time.
Now you suddenly turn up and expect me to drop everything.
Darling, I know it. I've been rotten.
But I've been eating and sleeping this case. Honest I have. Now what can I do?
You could have given it up if I'd asked you.
Darling, I don't like to rub it in, but ..
I won. Doesn't that make any difference to you?
No .. you know how I hate you working for people like that.
The lowest, commonest type of people on earth.
Gangsters, racketeers, chorus girls.
Darling .. I've had one battle today.
Don't let you and I fight.
You know, I've missed you terribly.
I love you more than anything else in the world.
You've got a funny way of showing it.
Right. I'm going to make it my business to show you for the rest of my life.
Alright.
You can start right now.
Promise me one thing.
Sure, anything.
─ Give up these criminal cases.
Uhoh. Oh no, no. I can't promise that.
More than anything else in the world?
No, darling, this is different.
It's my business, my work.
I can't be dictated to about that.
Very well.
─ Oh Sue, really.
Don't act that way, please.
─ I mean it, Jack.
I've had weeks to think this thing over.
I can't see myself married to a gangster lawyer.
Gee, I'm sorry you feel that way about it.
So am I, but ..
Well.
Let's call it a day, Jack.
Alright .. just as you say.
Get my things. I'm going back to town.
─ Yes, sir.
Come here.
I thought I told you ..
─ We know, boss.
Aren't we going to stay here, boss?
─ No.
What is it? She not treat you right?
─ Wait a minute, wait.
Everything is alright. Aright.
Alright. We'll be right behind you.
─ Wait a minute. Wait.
If you've got to do that, get in here.
You might as well be comfortable.
Hurry up, step on it.
Will you have a smoke?
Do you smoke?
Sorry I haven't got a drink to offer you.
Alright, put those things right in here.
Are you boys comfortable?
You got a rope?
Got a map?
Not good .. not bad.
Say. Say, you oughtn't to drink so much.
I'm celebrating.
Now, don't go crazy.
Just because your girl tossed you out on the kerbstone.
Oh, so they reported that too, did they?
Why don't you lay off that stuff?
What you ought to do is to tie up with some friendly little gal.
Something loving around the house.
What do you say?
You can have any one of them you want.
Tony, you're a dirty-minded little rat.
There you go again.
Why, I like you.
Good evening, ladies and gentlemen.
This dance music is coming to you.
From the Pinnacle Club at
52nd Street and Broadway.
This is the playtime spot of the elite.
[ Radio: ]
"Come over and join the merry throng."
"It's a big night. Let’s go, boys."
Sue.
You know, I think you were crazy to do that this afternoon.
What difference does his business make?
Oh, it isn't only that.
It's everything. It's his whole life.
He likes different people, different things.
If we got married, he'd probably bring detectives home to dinner.
I know, but don't get so grand about it. He's human.
So am I.
Let's have a cigarette.
Of course I know I'm talking against my own interest but ..
What are your interests?
You know perfectly well.
You've known for years.
Tell me.
I've forgotten.
Don't use me, Sue.
What do you mean?
Don't use me to make him jealous.
I'm not.
I tell you. This whole thing has been over with me for weeks.
Sue.
If I thought ..
Stop thinking that.
You are making an awful mistake.
He's a better bet than I am.
─ Hmm.
Don't be so modest.
Darling.
I can't remember when I haven't been in love with you.
Tom.
Yes, dear?
Aren't there some odds and ends you ought to tie up?
You mean .. Mimi Montagne?
Uhuh.
Oh, it doesn't bother me, but ..
But I would like to know if it's definitely over before we got married.
That's over right now.
I shouldn't like any trouble with that type of girl.
She won't make any trouble.
Sure?
I'll make sure.
─ Ha.
How do you do, Mr Siddall.
Hello, Lili.
Hello, honey. Be right out.
Hello darling.
What are you doing?
Mimi, I'd like to talk to you.
Oh, Lily.
Yes, ma'am?      ─ You can go.
─ Yes, ma'am.
What's the idea?
Mimi, you're a grand girl. We've had a lot of good times together.
But .. what?
Well.
Things have got to be different.
Something has happened.
Oh.
You've got another girl?
No.
─ You're lying.
Mimi, don't take it like this.
Holy mackerel. You come and tell me it’s all over ..
And expect me to break out laughing I suppose?
We knew it couldn't last.
─ I don't see why not.
You've no kick coming. I've been absolutely square with you.
I haven't looked at another man.
─ I know. You've been grand.
But .. I'm going to get married.
Oh .. that's it?
Well, who is she?
One of those high-hat dames I suppose?
I'll show you. You can't give me the run around like this.
I'm not trying to.
I'll take care of you.
I'll make a settlement on you.
─ You can't get rid of me that easy.
I gave up a soft bird to come to you.
I gave up a guy that was nuts about me.
A decent guy.
Crelliman?
─ Yes, Crelliman.
Oh Mimi .. a racketeer?
What of it? He's alright with me.
He wouldn't have pulled a rotten trick like this.
And you'll not get away with it.
I'll show you. I'll spread this thing all over the newspapers.
I'll show that lady friend of yours.
─ If you dare ..
Don't dare me! I've got nothing to lose.
I'll do plenty.
Now see here, Mimi.
You can hold me up for money. I expected that.
And I'm willing to pay.
I said I'd make a settlement on you and I will.
You can take it or leave it. I don't care.
But .. if you want to make any trouble for me, I warn you.
Take care.
You dirty, stuck up snob!
I want to speak to Jim Crelliman.
It's Mimi Montagne.
"Hello?"
It's Mimi, Jim.
"Well, where have you been?"
Oh, I've been around.
"How is your boyfriend?"
Who do you mean?
"Park Avenue."
You must be thinking of my twin sister.
I was wondering what you were doing.
"Same old thing."
Well, I thought I'd call you up.
"Thanks."
I'd like to see you sometime.
"Any time you say."
What are you doing tonight?
"I'll be here. Why don't you come on over?"
I'll try to make it.
Goodbye.
"Goodbye."
How's the little angel?
─ I'm fine.
Where is Jim?
─ I don't know, but I'm buying them.
Oh, I see him.
Hello there.
Hiya, Mimi.
How are you? Glad to see you.
Hello, baby. Nice to see you again.
Hello, Jim.
Hello.
What will you have?
What have you got?
─ Well, anything you like.
You know what I like.
A Martini, not too much Vermouth.
That's a very pretty dress, you have on.
Oh, this?
I couldn't remember what I had on.
Well, you look very charming tonight.
Thank you.
Have you changed your .. hairdresser?
You .. remember?
Of course I do.
Well, here we are.
Happy days.
So it's all over?
What do you think?
─ I don't know.
Do you want me to put it in writing?
─ No, that isn't necessary.
He ought to be here any minute now.
Who?
─ Siddall.
Who asked him?
─ You did.
I did?
─ Oh yes. You did.
You wanted to tell him something.
Tell him it was all over.
Oh, I see. You have it all planned.
You expect me to put it on a scene in front of this whole mob?
No, you can do that in private.
Private? Here?
─ There are other places.
The roof for instance.
Just so that I know that it's all over.
Okay.
Come on, let's dance.
Mr Siddall to see you, Miss Montagne.
Take his hat and coat and tell him to come in.
You're alright, Jim.
You're twice the gentleman he thinks he is.
Mr Siddall.
Hello, Tom. Glad to see you again.
I've come here to see Mimi.
─ That's alright with me.
Don't you want to take off your coat?
─ No thank you.
But you will stop and have a drink?
No thanks.
You don't have to act like that you know.
─ Forget it, forget it.
Let's get this over with. What is it?
There's a few things
I would like to tell you.
But not here, not here.
Come on out here.
She's got a lot of nerve.
Busting in here.
It's alright with me.
I haven't got any strings on Mimi, and ..
Mimi hasn't got any strings on me.
Now don't be old-fashioned.
Why don't you drink up?
[ Gunshot! ]
What's up with the music?
─ Did you hear that?    ─ What?
Sounded like a shot.
─ Yes, I heard it.
[ Scream! ]
What's the matter? What's going on?
Who is it? What ..?
What happened?
Mimi .. Mimi!
Jackson.
─ Yes, sir?
Send for the police.
Good morning, Layton.
─ Good morning, sir.
As a matter of idle curiosity, will you tell me why I slept at that end?
You said you wished to sleep with your head towards the engine, sir.
Yes, I vaguely remember I went to a party last night.
Where was it?
Right here, sir.
Did I have a good time?
─ Yes, sir.
Good.
You were in a very generous mood, sir.
But I persuaded the young lady to whom you gave the grand piano ..
That it would be difficult to get movers so late at night.
Quite commendable.
I also persuaded the other young lady ..
That it might ruin the Whistler etching to carry it out in the rain.
That is all, Layton.
Oh.
What time did they leave?
Right after you passed out, sir.
Well I hope you took over my duties as host, Layton.
Yes, sir. I took the big blond home.
I must say the young ladies conducted themselves very well.
There were only six broken tumblers and three plates cracked.
And five holes burnt into the rugs.
Come, take this away and get me a drink.
Mr Durant, are you going to continue this drinking?
I'll drink as long as I have a hangover.
And I'll have a hangover as long as I drink.
It's a vicious circle, Layton.
Mr Durant. Mr Durant. Oh, Mr Durant!
Will you please stop that screaming.
Return to the pantry immediately.
Mr Durant, Mr Durant!
─ Yes, yes. What is it?
Mr Siddall, sir.
He's in terrible trouble.
[ Doorbell ]
Answer that.
─ Yes, sir.
Layton, where is Mr Durant?
I've got to see him right away.
Right away!
Yes, madam. Right away.
Oh Jack. Have you heard what's happened?
─ I've just this minute seen the papers.
I'll go out of my mind.
─ Tell me about it.
I haven't had a chance to read them.
─ Tom's been arrested.
They say it is .. murder.
─ Now, now. Here, sit down.
Tell me.
Your picture is in the papers.
What did you have to do with it?
Tom and I are engaged.
I see.
Rather quick, wasn't it?
I know if I had any pride
I wouldn't come to you.
Only I was so desperate I didn't know what to do.
You see. I feel responsible.
I told him to go to her. I wanted to be sure she wouldn't make trouble.
They had a fight yesterday. He started drinking. I'm afraid he got angry and ..
Oh, it's so awful.
Everything is against him.
Yes. It sounds pretty bad.
Jack.
Jack, you'll help him, won't you?
Won't you?
You wouldn't let them ..?
I know it must seem funny to you after those things I said about those cases.
But Jack.
This is different.
This is Tom.
You wouldn't let your feelings against me keep you from helping him?
You don't have to do that.
─ What?
Oh, I'm sorry.
I am so desperate I don't know what I'm doing.
I'll go right down to the tombs and see him.
Oh thank you, Jack.
Layton, call after a cab.
I'll drop you home.
No, don't stop for me.
I'll get home by myself.
Jack, I wonder.
Could you forgive me?
What do you care whether
I forgive you or not?
As long as .. I do what you want.
Why, of course I won't forgive you!
Why, you speak as though you hated me.
─ Why not?
Why should you expect my love to last any longer than yours?
I never knew you could be so cruel.
You've changed.
Yes. I salute the maker of that change.
You're not the only woman in the world you know.
There's lots of other attractive women. Hundreds of them.
Oh, Sue. If you ..
A dreadful thing, isn't it, sir.
Yes, it is. Get ..
Get Lieutenant Stevens of the Homicide
Squad and ask when he can see me.
Yes, sir. Do you think he's guilty, sir?
I hope not, for her sake.
But I'm afraid he is.
Hello .. who is speaking?
No, this isn't Mr Durant.
Who is speaking?
Who is it?
He won't say. He says he wants to speak to you personally, sir.
Hello?
Yes, this is Durant speaking. Who is it?
Never mind names.
Just a friend of yours telling you that if you know what's best for you ..
You'll lay off the Siddall case.
Understand?
"Leave it alone.
Don't touch it."
"If you do .. we'll strew your body from the Bowery to the Bronx."
"Got it?"
─ Who is this?
Hello .. who is it? Hello, hello?
What is it, sir? What is it?
Someone just convinced me that Siddall is innocent.
Call Lieutenant Stevens and tell him I'll be down right away.
Here they are.
─ Let's look at them.
Careful, they're not dry yet.
The roof. The body of the girl.
That's where she got it.
─ Good looking girl.
Why do these guys always bump off the good-looking ones?
A private meeting, or anybody ..?
Well, well. Mr Durant, how are you? Glad to see you.
Nice seeing you, Steve.
─ How are you?
Hey, you didn't think of handling this?
─ Siddall is a friend of mine.
Lay off. Lay off. A man like you don't want to be tied up with a sure loser.
What's the low-down?
I just sent for him again. We got some new dope. Come on, I'll take you in.
Tell me .. have they questioned Crelliman yet?
Plenty .. Crelliman says he don't know why Siddall came.
While he was there he went out of his way to be nice to him.
Nice to the fellow that stole his girl?
─ Ah, that was all washed up.
He didn't have any grudge.
─ What do the others say?
Same thing. Crelliman was swell.
But the kid came in with a chip on his shoulder. He was looking for trouble.
A boy like Tom enters a nest of gorillas with a chip on his shoulder, huh?
Yeah. Can you imagine?
No, I can't.
Tell us again just what happened.
What did you do when you got on the roof?
Well, when we got out on the roof.
She told me that she didn't ever want to see me again.
She was through with me, completely.
She was going back to Crelliman.
And .. then as she was talking, suddenly she put her hand up to her heart.
And when she took it away it was covered with blood.
I seem to remember hearing something like a shot.
But I thought it was a backfire from the street.
Then, something struck my foot and ..
I was in a sort of a daze, and ..
I .. didn't know what I was doing.
That blood and everything. I ..
I reached down to get it, and it was the revolver.
A .38?
I don't know. I'd never seen it before.
─ She was killed with that gun.
But I didn't do it. I haven't got a gun.
You've a permit, right?
─ Yes, but I never bought a gun.
Oh yeah?
Send in ..
Levitoff.
─ Yeah, Levitoff. Send him in.
Didn't you stop at a pawn shop on your way home yesterday afternoon?
No, I didn't.
Levitoff.
Did you sell a .38 gun yesterday afternoon?
Yes, sir.
─ What time?
About 4 o'clock.
Can you identify the man who bought it?    ─ Yes, sir.
Was this the man?
Yes, sir.
Why, that's a lie. He's lying. I never saw that man before in my life.
That's all, Levitoff. We won't need you anymore. Thanks.
Well, what do you think now?
Isn't his story a beaut?
It's so crazy it might be the truth.
I'd like to talk to him.
─ Okay.
I'm sorry he's a friend of yours.
He's going to get a nice, quick trial and a pleasant walk the chair.
Wait a minute, Dan. Someone to see him.
See you later old man.
─ Yes.
Oh, Jack ..
─ I know. Sit down.
I know, but they got me nearly crazy.
They've been at me and at me.
Until they've almost got me believing that I did do it. Just now ..
I know. I heard it.
─ But it's a lie!
At 4 o'clock when he said he sold me the gun I was walking up to the office.
Have you any witnesses?
─ No, I was alone.
Well, did you meet anyone or go into any shop?
No. But Jack, I swear to you I didn't do it.
I know you didn't, old man.
Do you believe me?
─ Yes, I do.
You're the first one round here that has.
Alright, don't you worry.
We'll get you out of this.
You mean you'll help me?
─ Of course I will.
Even .. even after Sue?
Oh, don't worry about that.
Mr Durant.
─ Yes?
Buck up now, old man.
Oh, hello there. How are you?
How are you?
─ Glad to see you.
I'd like to speak to you a moment.
─ Yes, certainly.
Are you handling this case?
─ Yes.
Oh, I see. I didn't know that.
Miss Leonard came to me and ..
I don't want to seem to be born again, but I will do anything I possibly can.
We've been talking things over and ..
─ Yes, what?
You want it straight from the shoulder?
─ Yeah. Those are the easiest to block.
We don't want you on this case.
We feel that you would only prejudice the jury.
You're known as defender of the guilty.
─ That's straight enough.
Frankly, there's not much anyone can do.
We are going to try to get him off on a plea of emotional insanity.
Emotional insanity?
Then you're going to plead guilty?
─ What else can we do?
Well, you might use that plea of insanity ..
For yourself. So long, old man.
Hello?
"This is Jackson Durant, Tony."
Hello there, angel. How are you?
"Alright. Say, can you get me some dope on Crelliman?"
From the cradle to the grave.
"I want to know everything he did yesterday."
It's a cinch.
"When can you have it?"
Well, meet me tonight about ten at the Pentacle Club.
"Okay. Thanks, Tony."
─ Wait a minute. What's up?
"Well, I'm interested in the Siddall case."
Uhoh. Lay off of that one. Lay off.
The guy's as guilty as they make 'em.
─ "So I've heard. So long."
Wait a minute. You'll be losing your name as ..
Big boy is waiting for you.
─ Good evening. Hello, May.
Hello, Molly.
Good evening, sir.
─ Good evening.
Hello there, angel. How are you?
─ Fine, thanks.
Sit down, get comfortable.
─ Wait, somebody with you?
A couple of ladies.
You have to have two of them now, huh?
─ Oh, yeah.
Look at that. Anaconda is up two points.
You know, I think I'll put a little dough in this here investment.
Oh, wait a minute. I'm not interested in stocks. Tell me.
Did you find out anything on Crelliman?
─ Not a thing.
He had a perfect alibi for every minute of the time.
So has everyone else on his party.
─ You're not sticking up for him?
You and Crelliman haven't buried the hatchet?
If I ever bury it, it will be in his skull.
Perfect alibis, huh?
Well that's that, then.
Wait a minute. I got a little surprise for you.
What?
Look.
The one in the black and white.
Ah, pretty.
You care for that?
Ah, I have to work.
─ Now wait a minute, pal.
She was at Crelliman's party.
You go to work on her.
She's a grand kid.
The kind you can take home for dinner and ..
And no hard feelings if you don't ask her to stay to breakfast.
And no hard feelings if you do, huh?
─ Ha ha.
Girls, I want you to meet the guy that took the scorch right out of my pants.
You know Lottie, of course?
─ Yes, I know Mr Durant.
And this is Gertie Waxted.
How do you do?
I couldn't do better.
Well, that's just the way I feel about you.
I am expecting you two to be great friends.
You're not going to disappoint Tony, are you?
I'd be scared to.
Well, Lottie.
We got to blow.
Oh. That's too bad, Tony.
─ Yeah.
Ain't it.
I hope you can struggle through without us.
Well, we'll try.
Don't do anything I wouldn't do.
─ Goodnight.
There goes the big boy.
Stay here.
Yes, Mr Gazotti?
I wouldn't want for Mister
Durant to get that check.
Yes, sir.
And if he don't have a good time,
I'm holding you responsible.
Yes, sir.
You don't have to go, do you?
No.
Good.
You could get plenty for what's on your mind right now.
What did I call you?
A dirty-minded little rat.
And darned if you don't go out of your way to remind me of it.
Oh, you're a great guy.
So long, Gertie.
I hope no-one ever hurts him.
─ He's alright. I like him.
Have a cigarette?
─ No thank you.
Oh. May I cool your wine?
─ Not yet.
Would you care to dance?
That's better .. I'd love to.
Music is certainly a wonderful thing.
I meet you and five minutes later you're in my arms.
Do you have to have music?
I don't know. Do I?
I refuse to answer on the grounds that it may incriminate and degrade me.
So you're the man, who put a grand piano in a girl's vanity case?
Oh, is that news all over town?
Don't worry. I heard you were alright.
You didn't demand a down-payment.
Well, don't you count on that.
If I give you anything,
I'll demand payment.
I'd hate to be a desk.
You tired?
Did you ever do a dozen hours ..
With the Cops questioning you to see if you slip up with your story?
If I were a nice refined girl ..
I'd be at home in bed putting on a swell hysterical act.
Instead of which, I'm here drinking champagne.
Well. That's life in the big city.
Where do you we go from here?
Well.
Of course, I'll stay here till dawn if you want me to.
I'd whole lot rather go somewhere and cook a dish of eggs.
You want me to take you home?
Your home or my home?
Anywhere you like.
I hate the thought of going back to mine.
Mimi's picture is in my room.
If I see that, I'll probably ball.
Were you great friends?
Like that.
I loved her.
Ah it's tough, I know.
Well then, your place is out.
How about mine?
You know, I've got some eggs at my place ..
That are just longing to be scrambled by you.
Well, I'd hate to keep an egg waiting. Let's go.
Alright.
Is everything alright, sir?
─ Yes, perfect, thanks.
I'll put you on early if you like?
No, no. We're tired.
I wouldn't like Mr Gazotti to think we hadn't treated you well.
Oh no. You treated us beautifully.
Would you tell Mr Gazotti that?
─ Yes, I'll tell him. Thank you.
Goodnight.
─ Goodnight, sir.
Are we alone?
─ Yes.
Do you mind?
─ No.
A nice place.
Yes, I like it now better myself.
Oh, I'll see about those eggs.
─ Skip it.
Come on, let's get it over with.
What do you mean?
The cross-examination.
Really, I ..
─ Don't stall.
You didn't ask me up her because of my fatal fascination.
I was Mimi's pal.
I was at Crelliman's party.
You want to help Miss Leonard.
It adds up too smoothly.
You want them to get the man who killed Mimi, don't you?
They've got him.
And I hope he burns for it.
Siddall didn't do it. I know that.
Then who did?
That's what I want to find out.
Will you help me?
I'd do anything to get the man who did it.
The trouble is, I came to the party after Mimi had gone out on the roof.
I'm no good. I don't know a thing.
─ Oh yes. You know a lot.
There's a lot of things you don't know you know.
Things .. that don't seem important to you.
But they might mean a great deal to me.
So you can help me by just going on talking.
You think I might tell something?
Exactly.
It might take weeks.
Well .. I'll be patient.
Make yourself comfortable. Oh, I want to show the house. Come on.
Over here is the porch.
There is where you can take your sun-bath.
And.
Here .. the bar.
Over here is the ..
The radio.
Where you can drive yourself to distraction.
Nice.
And ..
Here ..
Very nice.
─ Hmm.
You think you can be comfortable?
Oh, yes.
Isn't it going to be pretty dull, just talking all the time?
Well, I'll try to break the monotony.
How?
Why, but telling you how charming you are.
It will still be just talk.
Oh, I'll get you a drink.
Funny, no host would let ..
Hey ..
What is this?
I'm going back to my place.
Oh. Oh, please don't.
What's the matter? Don't you like me?
Sure.
Then, why are you going?
To get my things.
Oh come on in here.
I'll lend you some things.
Here we are.
Pyjamas.
I haven't much of a variety, but ..
You may have a preference.
How about that?
─ Only pyjamas?
Yes, that's all.
─ And you a bachelor?
What do you think, these?
─ They'll look better on you.
Alright .. here, I'll take that for you.
Well.
It's getting late.
─ I think you'll be comfortable.
Oh.
Is it broken?
The crystal is cracked.
─ Oh dear.
Never mind. I'll have It fixed for you.
I wouldn't have anything happen to that.
It was Mimi's. She gave it to me.
One of the few things
Levitoff didn't get.
Levitoff?
Yes. A pawnbroker.
Poor Mimi always had her stuff in hock.
Why did she go to Levitoff?
Because he gave her more money. He was a friend of Crelliman's. Mimi thought ..
What? Have I said something?
Yes.
One of the things I didn't know I knew?
Yes.
─ What is it?
Levitoff is the one who swore he sold Siddall the gun.
I may be dumb, but it doesn't mean a thing to me.
Oh never mind. You're tired.
Go to bed.
I hate to quit on you.
But cheer up. Maybe I talk in my sleep.
Oh, that's an idea.
Well. Goodnight.
Tut, tut, tut.
Is that so?
What do you mean?
Tut, tut, tut.
Did I say that, sir?
You certainly did.
You went: "tut, tut, tut".
Did I?
─ Yes.
I mean I'm sorry, sir.
[ Doorbell ]
That's Stevens. Show him right in, will you.
Stevens.
Morning. Did I get you up?
─ You didn't. Want breakfast?
No thanks, I must be on my way.
Get me some coffee Layton, will you.
And take those things out of here.
Here is those pictures.
─ Oh, fine.
Any reason not to talk?
─ No.
Is that man of yours okay?
─ Safe as the church. Why?
I've been thinking.
It don't look good me coming here if anybody should know.
Oh you came here to ask my advice about putting money into a musical .. comedy.
How'd you know I was sprouting wings?
You've been on the Broadway squad for 5 years. You ought to be ripe now.
Bullseye.
My advice to you is put your money into government bonds.
You can't cuddle up to a government bond.
Well, that's right, too.
─ Anything else I can do?
Not a thing. Thanks.
I hope to do as much for you someday.
─ Oh, yeah?
I don't suppose you did anything when you told the Commissioner I was framed?
You don't owe me anything.
─ Thank you.
Mr Durant!
Don't think of doing such a thing.
You have everything to live for.
You idiot! Here, put that tray down. Come over here.
Come on, put down that tray.
Come here, I want to try something.
Stand up here.
Now the bullet would go about through there.
Please, sir.
Don't be silly. It isn't loaded.
Go straight through there.
At that angle. Turn around.
Then it would come out there.
Please, sir.
─ Here.
Come on, now. Get down.
A little farther. Farther.
Alight. Hold it there.
Ah ..
Maybe she was sitting down?
No, there were no chairs.
Come on, stand up. Stand up.
Hold it. Hold it right there.
Now that .. that bullet would go right straight through.
Come on, stand up.
Now I ask you.
I'd have to do this.
You couldn't do it, sir.
─ No, neither could he.
She must have been shot from above.
Come on, clean this stuff up.
Are you up?
─ Come in.
Good morrow.
─ Good morning.
I didn't want to wake you.
Oh, I've been awake for hours.
I'm all bathed and everything.
You got another one of those?
Oh, I'm sorry.
Say, I'm hungry.
Why didn't you yell?
I didn't want to spoil your beauty sleep.
Thoughtful as well as alluring, eh?
Alluring?
Well, do you doubt it?
Well I did last night. I didn't exactly have to fight for my honor.
A few more weeks of this and I'll be out of condition.
Say, are you still in love with someone or are you just decent?
Well, maybe I think you are decent.
A girl who comes into a man's apartment at night?
You may have come here just to look at the Chrysler building.
That must have been it.
I'm going to take a shower.
I'll be with you in just a minute.
I'm going out as sharp as a button.
I'm very much afraid I approve of your house.
Thanks.
And its appointments.
─ Thank you.
And you.
Thank you.
And ..
And ..?
Now you may say something nice about me.
─ Oh, that wouldn't be very difficult.
Mr Durant, please.
─ Yes?
If you will pardon me.
Good morning, Madame.
─ Good morning.
May I speak to you?
─ Yes, certainly. Go ahead.
I mean privately, sir.
Of course.
Pardon me.      ─ He's positively upset.
─ Yes, he'll get used to it.
Don't wait for me. Go right ahead.
Miss Leonard is outside, sir.
─ Why don't you show her in?
But ..
Don't be a fool. I wish you wouldn't try to do all my thinking for me.
Sorry, Sue. Come in.
I hate to bother you, Jack.
But it's terribly important.
─ But it's no bother at all.
What is it? What's on your mind?
I want you to get off the case.
Get off?
─ Hmm.
I want you to get off it immediately.
─ You're the one that made me take it.
I know. I know, but I've changed my mind.
Alright. Tell me what happened?
A man just called me up.
I don't know what his name was.
He said if you didn't quit the case, you'd be killed.
Did he say more?
He said you're working for Gazotti, who has a grudge against Crelliman.
And that he's out to get even with him.
─ That's their story, is it.
Please give it up.
I know you took it just for me. I don't want the responsibility on my shoulders.
It won't be on your shoulders. I won't give up this case now for anything.
But your life is in danger.
You're not worrying about that .. are you?
Yes, I am.
Oh, I know I've been headstrong and wanted everything my own way, but ..
I've made mistakes.
Bad mistakes.
I don't want to make another.
Yes, we've all made mistakes.
But they aren't irrevocable.
Don't worry.
Everything is going to turn out alright.
We'll get Tom off and you and he are going to be very, very happy.
I wonder.
Of course we'll get him off.
Hello ..
Oh .. sorry.
I think maybe I'm ..
─ No, not at all. Gertie.
Come here, please.
Gertie, this is Miss Leonard.
Miss Waxted.
How do you do?
─ I'm afraid I interrupted.
No. No, you didn't at all.
Miss .. Waxted is here because ..
─ Why try to explain?
You don't have to account to me.
Miss Leonard.
─ No. Please, Gertie.
Please let me talk to her. Miss Leonard.
Miss Leonard.
─ Yes?
I don't want you to go like this.
Not on account of me.
It doesn't matter about me.
─ Well then.
But it does matter to him.
He's in love with you.
He wouldn't think of another woman.
I'm only here because
I can help on the case.
I must go.
I don't blame you for not believing me.
I can hardly believe it myself.
It's the truth.
He didn't think of me for one minute.
I don't know why you're telling me all this. I'm not interested.
He can lead his own life.
It doesn't matter .. to me.
I'm awfully sorry.
─ Oh, that's alright.
Let's finish our coffee.
You really can see the Chrysler
Building from here, can't you.
Yes.
Tell me some more about Mimi.
Oh yes. Where was I?
Well, when Mimi left ..
I wish I could do something.
About Miss Leonard.
Oh, forget it.
Sit down won't you.
Alright. Go on.
Well.
When Mimi left Crelliman, he didn't seem to mind.
But then you never could tell about Crelliman.
You never knew what was on his mind.
That isn't very definite, is it.
I don't think I'm much good.
─ Never mind. You're tired now.
Sugar?
─ Please.
Darned nice of you to let me stay here last night when I had the heebie-jeebies.
If you knew what a relief it was not to have to look out on that roof.
What roof?
Well, my apartment looks right down on the place where Mimi was ..
You got a cigarette?
Looks right down on it?
Yes. It's right in front of me.
Let's not talk about it.
I'm going to get out of that place.
Crelliman can whistle for the rent.
I'm going to move.
─ What did you say?
I'm going to move.
No, you said something about Crelliman.
─ Oh. He owns the building.
He does?
Yes. Does that surprise you?
─ Yes.
Those boys all sink their money in real estate now.
They don't put it in the bank where the government can check on it.
Why not give me your key?
I'll go down and get your things.
Oh, that's terribly sweet of you.
I'll get them in a minute.
You'd be an angel. I'd love something beside that evening dress.
Say Layton, get my hat and coat, will you.      ─ Yes, sir.
Look.
When I leave, I don't want anyone to come in or out of that door. Understand?
Yes, sir.
Did you find it?
─ No.
It's here somewhere in all this litter.
Ah, here it is.
The Oklahoma block.
─ Yes, I know.
Apartment 26A.
Now you'll find a suitcase in the closet and my clothes are in the bureau.
Bring .. oh, bring two of everything.
There is a little street dress .. a blue one.
No, there's two.
Two blue ones in the closet.
You know the one I mean.
It has red piping on the collar.
A gourd skirt and accordion pleated sleeves.
Well .. in other words, you want the little blue dress?
Yes.
Bring anything and a couple of hats.
─ Oh no. I'm not bringing any hats.
I don't want you to go out at all.
Please, Mr Durant.
No, no. I've got to be frank with you.
I don't want you to leave this room for any reason whatsoever.
Until I say so.
Now you guessed last night ..
That I brought you here to question you about Mimi.
Someone else might have guessed the same thing.
And they might object?
─ Exactly.
I'll take a chance and stick with you.
─ You are a peach.
Am I?
─ Oh, give me the watch.
My watch?
─ Yes, yes. Give it to me.
Yes, to be sure. Anything you like.
Would you like my bank book too?
I'm afraid you think I'm taking advantage of you.
I'm afraid you won't.
Goodbye.
I'd like as much as you can give.
Not interested.
What's the matter? Isn't it any good?
─ Sure. The watch is alright.
Well, can't we make a deal?
You don't want to pawn that watch.
You see, I know you, Mr Durant.
You don't need money.
I wish you'd take the watch and get out.
─ Wait a minute.
What if I offered you 500 dollars?
─ Get out.
Get out before I call the Police and tell them you're trying to bribe a witness.
Get out!
─ Say, wait a minute.
Follow that black and white.
─ Step on it.
What's the matter?
Where did he go?
─ I don't know.
Where did that black and white go?
─ I tell you I don't know.
Say what have you got eyes for, mug?
Hello, Mr Durant.
Hello. I want to see Gazotti.
Well, little Lord Fauntleroy.
─ You want to see the big boy, sir?
Yes. Yes, my Lord.
What do you want me to do? Kick it for you?
Hello, angel.
─ Hello.
That thing was driving me nuts.
Well, well.
Turn around.
Beautiful.
You're telling me? Tell him.
He made me wear it.
He thinks it's "class".
Come on in, I want to see you.
Gertie just phoned me.
She thinks you're swell.
─ I think she's swell too.
Well then, it's fifty-fifty and nobody is hurt.
She's helped me a lot.
─ Yeah?
Tony, they're letting out sewer contracts in Brooklyn.
You could sell your mind at a nice profit.
Now, angel.
Let it never be said of Gazotti that he intimated that a lady may be indiscreet.
Hey, did you get that lingo?
A gentleman would never insinuate that one of the fair sex may be lacking in ..
Honor .. Your Honor.
Boy, I can even talk like you.
Hey, Tony. You said you'd do something for me.
I'd give you my right arm and I ain't no southpaw.
Well, I want to break into somebody's apartment.
Second story stuff, eh?
─ Yeah.
I thought maybe a friend of mine may have a bunch of keys and one of them might fit.
Is that all?
─ Yeah. Have you got any?
Say, the best in New York.
Now I want you to do something else for me.
Just name it.
I want you to make Levitoff talk.
Uhoh .. ask me something easy.
Is that all your promises mean?
You said you'd do anything.
I ain't no miracle man.
Well you can try, can't you?
I tried and he won't talk to me.
When did you see him last?
─ About 15 minutes ago.
Well, ten minutes ago, a guy walked into his shop and pumped him full of lead.
No? Who did it?
I don't know, but it's a cinch
Crelliman's got an alibi.
Give me those keys.
─ Now wait a minute.
Why don't you drop this before something happens to you? Let that guy fry.
I will when Crelliman's arrested and charged with Mimi's murder.
Say the word, I'll rub him out.
Say, what good will that do that poor kid down there in jail?
I have to prove he didn't do it.
Crelliman framed him, put Mimi on the spot, and made it look as if he did it.
Say, you racketeers can think of more rotten ways of getting even with people.
You're not satisfied with just killing a fellow. You must torture him.
The more horrible, the better.
Come now. Don't put me in Crelliman's class.
Where are you going with those?
─ Oklahoma apartments.
Why, that's owned by Crelliman.
It's crawling with his mob.
Yes, I know that. But I must see Gertie's apartment.
If not right, I'll check the one above.
Who lives there?
─ I don't know.
Now wait a minute, you can't take a chance ..
Joe. Joe!
Yeah?
Tell those mugs to stay close to Durant.
"Hello?"
Is that you, Gertie?
─ "Yes."
That guy of yours is off his nut.
Who lives in the apartment above you in the Oklahoma?
"Murtoch."
Murtoch? Why that's one of Crelliman's gunmen.
Why?
─ "Plenty."
"He's going up there."
He's going up there?
What do you think we ought to do?
We ought to tell Tony.
You know what he'll do to us.
I know.
I won't tell him.
Don't think I'm going to.
Let's flip.
Heads you tell him. Tails I do.
Heads.
Give me another drink.
Which way is 26A?
Down that way.
─ Thanks.
I'm going out.
But Mr Durant left instructions.
─ I don't care. I'm going out.
Begging your pardon, Miss Waxted, but
I have my instructions. You can't go.
Oh I can't, can't I?
Well, who'd think of finding you here?
You would.
I just dropped in to see Gertie.
I thought she'd feel bad about Mimi.
Is Gertie here?
No.
What do you want?
Oh, that's all.
But since we've met like this I thought it would be a good idea ..
Well, if we ..
Had a little talk.
How would you and Gertie like to take a trip to Europe starting immediately?
With a retainer of 200 grand you could buy that girl a lot of pretties.
A pleasure trip?
No, not entirely. There would be some business involved.
I want you to go there and contract with ..
The best distilleries in
England and Scotland.
It will take about a year.
Siddall would have got the chair by then, wouldn't he.
200 grand is a lot of money.
No. Not interested.
Well, let's sit down and talk ..
─ No, I told you I wasn't interested.
You know, a sea voyage ..
Would be swell for your health.
You know a man isn't safe in this work.
How do you know when a taxi is liable to hit you?
And the shooting?
You never can tell when a stray bullet is liable to push you over.
You may be dancing sometime with that little Waxted girl.
The place gets stuck up. And she and you get yours together.
Like Levitoff, huh?
I don't know what you're talking about.
No .. I don't suppose you would.
But if you don't mind, I'll be going.
Have it your own way, mug. I tried to be nice and you wouldn't have it.
You wise guys can't learn a thing.
You have some luck and think it sticks forever.
Won't be lucky when I'm done with you.
─ Your threats are getting weaker.
But my actions won't.
─ Neither will mine.
Now wait a minute.
I wouldn't do that if I were you.
That's a rap you'd find it hard to beat.
Well, what do you want?
Oh, I thought it was somebody at my door.
Did you get him?
─ No.         ─ Why?
He didn't come down.
Did you bring a man down from 26?
I answered the call, but he wasn't there.
He's still in the building. Get him.
If he's in one of the apartments, let him have it. The law's on your side.
Now you two, go to the 27th floor, particularly Murtoch's apartment.
Right.
Down.
Wait a minute. I said down.
─ I heard you.
You want to go down? With the lobby crawling with Crelliman's mugs?
You socked Jim Crelliman didn't you?
─ Yes, I did.
Well, anyone that hits him is a pal of mine.
Come on over here.
Get in there. Ride this down to the basement and get out the back way.
Thanks, old man.
Give me a crack in the eye so it won't look phony.  ─ I can't.
Come on, do it!
Don't be gentle.
─ You mean it?
It's for my own good.
─ Boy, here it comes.
It was a beaut.
You're going to give me heartburn.
If you ever lose him again ..
─ He got away.
Wait a minute. It's my fault, Tony.
Did you find out who lived in that apartment?            ─ No.
Well, I'll tell you. It's Murtoch. One of Crelliman's killers.     ─ Yeah?
He went out of there just minutes before you went in.
Where is he now?
─ At Conley's.
Where is Conley's?
Why?
─ I must talk to him.
Lay off this thing will you, Mr Durant.
─ What's the address?
I'll not tell you.
Come on. It's Something new. I must hear it.
I'm not helping you into trouble.
─ Right. Stop the car. Let me out.
You can't ..
─ Stop the car.
No, no, no. I know what I'm doing.
You know where Conley's speakeasy is?
Yes, I know where it is.
─ Okay, then take me there.
Well, what are you waiting for?
Go and follow him.
Deliver this grip to this address.
My man will pay you off.
Hi, big boy.
Hello, John.
─ Hello, Mr Durant.
A glass of beer, please.
Hey, come on, hop up the service!
Come on, will you!
Hey, tell the guy Murtoch to either shut up or get out.
Listen, Murtoch, you're not such a big-shot to me.
If you don't like this place, get out.
─ Oh yeah?
You heard me.
Wait a minute now. Wait. What did I do?
If you dislike the place you can go out.
─ You listening?
Say, don't give me no ..
─ Come on.
Don't get bothered about it. I'll be back and clean up the joint a bit later.
I want to see you.
Now look here, Tony.
─ What's the matter, angel?
Now I know why you didn't want me to come here.
You don't want me to see your little spy
Waxted slipping Murtoch the low-down.
Well, if you can't keep your hands on my side, keep them off the other.
Another thing. You can tell your friend
Gertie she needn't come for her clothes.
I'll send them down to her.
Oh, it's funny, is it?
─ Sure.
A jealous guy is always funny.
Jealous?
You're crazy.
Not me, but you are.
Crazy about that Waxted girl.
Layton.
─ Yes, sir.
What struck you?
─ Miss Waxted, sir.
And I thought she was such a charming lady.
Well, I wasn't the only one fooled. Get me a drink.
But ..
─ Get me a drink.
I thought you stopped drinking.
─ Well, you thought wrong. Get me one.
I'll answer that.
Boy, if you only knew how good you look to me.
Well, it's good to be home.
It's a wonder they didn't run me in decked out like this in broad daylight.
Oh, don't be sore.
I know you told me not to go out, but I had to.
I don't blame Layton for being sore.
I didn't injure you for life, did I Layton?
I hope not, Madame.
Well, aren't you glad to see me back safe and sound?
I'm just amazed that you had the nerve to come back at all.
What do you mean?
I hate a double-crosser.
A double-crosser?
─ I saw you with Jim Murtoch.
You're a very clever girl but you can't get away with it forever, you know.
May I suggest that you pack your things.
I'll see that Layton brings them over.
I don't suppose you'd like to hear my side?
No, I ..
I don't think you could tell me any story that I'd believe.
So you're going to drink, eh?
Because I'm a double-crosser, you're going to drink?
Well. I didn't know I was that important to you.
You're not.
You can make a tramp out of yourself after I'm gone if you want to.
But you will stay cold sober until you hear what I have to say.
The trouble with you is you mix with gyps, double-crossers and two-timers ..
Until you don't believe anybody anymore.
Just because your girl ditched you, you think we're all the same.
Shall I have Layton pack your things?
No, I will do it myself.
Before I go.
I'm going to tell you something you don't deserved to hear.
I didn't want Murtoch to plug you when you went into his apartment.
So I called him up .. and asked him to meet me at a speakeasy.
I kept him there until I thought you were safe.
Now, I'm going.
─ Gertie.
Tony was right.
What?
How I've missed you.
Very stupid.
Of course .. you're a man.
You shouldn't have done that.
Something might have happened to you.
I knew.
That was one of the things I knew I knew.
You are the strangest girl I've ever met.
You're a new one on me, too.
Why did you do it?
Your life is just a little bit more important to me than mine.
I realized last night that nothing matters except you.
I was yours for the asking.
I don't know why.
You see.
I'm what they call "straight".
I know you are.
I thought I could be happy if I got you.
It didn't matter if you cared for me or not.
But it does matter.
No, don't kiss me.
Don't ever kiss me.
Not if you don't mean it.
Not unless you're crazy about me.
Tut, tut, tut.
Did you wreck it?
No, there is a mirror.
I want you to know this.
There aren't any fences around me as far as you're concerned.
I know what your world is.
I know I don't belong in it.
You'll be just as free as before you met me.
Well, why don't you say something?
Gertie.
You are fine .. you are nice.
But what?
But I couldn't.
If I don't mind, why should you?
You rate something ..
Something better than that.
What?
─ Marriage.
You're asking me?
I'm telling you what you rate.
[ Doorbell ]
Just a moment.
My usual luck.
Hello? Oh, hello Tony.
Tony, I want to apologize.
I was all wrong.
Yeah.
But if Gertie ever double-crossed you ..
She'd be playing a harp with her pal Mimi.
Say, listen. Here's some news for you, hot off the grapevine.
Murtoch is due for a ride any minute.
Crelliman knows you're on to him.
And he'll not take a chance on
Murtoch spilling anything.
Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
Tony says they're going to get Murtoch.
I must see him before that happens.
I've an idea, but don't know if it will work.
What is it?
─ I must get Crelliman out on his roof.
And have him there while I talk to
Murtoch .. I don't know how to do it.
I can do it and get him out there.
No, I couldn't let you do that. Too dangerous.
Oh, Crelliman wouldn't dare touch me in his own place, would he?
No, I don't think he would.
I'll call him and say I want to see him about something important.
He'll buy.
─ You think it's safe?
As safe as I am with you.
And that's saying plenty.
Hello, Tony?
No, never mind.
Gertie is going to help me.
Okay. Okay. See you later.
It's a long shot.
A hundred to one.
I'll take a chance.
Are you sure you want to do it?
If it comes to a showdown between you and Crelliman, I'm betting on you.
You may be betting your life.
When I bet, I bet all.
Shall I call Crelliman now?
─ Yes. Will you, please.
[ Doorbell ]
Excuse me.
My luck is changing.
Oh, hello boys.
─ Here I am.         ─ Yes.
Wait here. I'll be with you in just a minute.
Gertie is phoning Crelliman.
─ Crelliman?
What's the matter? Is that a new idea to you? Wait here.
Yes, Jim.
But what about the boys who are waiting for me? Will you call them off?
Yes, it's very important.
Alright.
In five minutes? Alright, I'll leave in five minutes. Thanks, Jim.
Good girl. That will give us just time to get there.
What shall I do when I get there?
─ He offered me a job abroad with you.
Tell him I'll take it, and you persuaded me. I don't care. Tell him anything.
But get him out on that roof.
Do you think you can do it?
I don't know, but I'll try.
Gertie, you're the grandest girl in the world.
I'd rather be the cutest.
─ Goodbye, and good luck.
What's up?
I'll tell you on the way down.
Know Jim Murtoch?
Tough hood. Knocked off Curly Masters.
Couldn't pin it on him.
He knocked off Mimi Montagne and it can be pinned on him.
He wasn't there.
Didn't have to be, he shot her from his window. Threw the gun on the roof.
Siddall picked it up.
─ Who can prove it?     ─ Murtoch.
What you trying to do, make a sucker out of me?
I'm going to make a Captain out of you.
─ I hope you're not wrong.
Duck, duck.
Alright boys, frisk them.
Get them out of here quietly.
Come on. Down here further.
No shooting, boys. I want to take this fellow alive.
[ 2x Gunshots! ]
So, you're going to be tough, eh?
Give me that gun!
Take it easy, Murtoch.
Did he get you, Mr Durant?
─ No. I'm surprised at you, Murtoch.
Hey, what's the idea?
─ We just want to look out your window.
There's a law against this.
What you do, call the police?
─ Wait. He must be tired.
Bring him around here. I want him to see the show. Give me his gun, will you.
What you doing?
Ready to bump off the guy who stole my girl.
That's my gun.
─ Exactly.
Say, what is this?
Ain't you guys Coppers?
Ever hear of Cops doing stuff on the side?
They want Crelliman out the way like I do.
Crelliman?
Yes. That double-crossing
Gertie is on her way down here.
When she steps out on that porch I'll get him.
Say, wait a minute.
You can't do that here.
It will be pinned on me.
─ Sure it will.
That's the big idea Murtoch. Now aren't you a bright boy to guess it.
You can't get away with this.
─ I can't huh?
Now you be a nice little boy and I'll tell you how we can get away with it.
You were with Gertie in a speakeasy.
The barman will testify you got so ugly he had to throw you out.
You told Gertie you're done with Crelliman's dirty work.
You were to do your own and get him.
─ It's a lie. I never said that.
She told me and I told the police. We came here to stop you but were too late.
We got here in time to see you shooting out that window. We looked out ..
And saw Crelliman dead his porch.
─ I'll say it's a plant.
What if you do with 3 witnesses against you? How far will you get with that?
But Gertie is two-timing you. I'll tell them that.
Come on now, why not take it nice and easy?
You were bound to get it sooner. A man can't be a killer without being killed.
What difference if it's a bullet or the chair? It's coming to you.
I thought you had more nerve.
You can't do this. You can't.
Well, I'm a little disappointed in you.
Why if you framed me as beautifully as this I'd be lost in admiration.
You can't let him get away with this.
─ Wait a minute. Don't you understand?
Crelliman has plenty on these men.
He's threatened to expose that they took bribes. He's a poor sport, Crelliman.
I know one man that did a killing for him and went to the chair for it.
As he couldn't prove that
Crelliman was involved.
And Crelliman wanted him out of the way.
─ I'm going nuts. Give drink, will you.
I know, and I feel sorry for you.
I know it's hard on your nerves.
But you see, we have to get rid of Crelliman.
It's better for us to have a man all ready to take the rap.
Oh, you'll enjoy it, Murtoch.
After I've killed Crelliman and the boys grab your hand ..
And force this gun back into it.
That's a little touch that ought to appeal to you.
Honestly, I defy anyone in the history of crime ..
To point to a more complete frame-up than this.
Point number 1: you had to get Crelliman before he got you.
Point number 2: your window overlooks Crelliman's porch.
Point 3: we entered the room just after you fired the shot.
Wait a minute, wait a minute.
Would it be more artistic ..
If we said we entered the room just before you fired the shot?
No.
No, we don't have to see you do the actual killing.
We hear the shot.
Crelliman is dead, the gun is in your hand and we break open the door.
Steve, I forgot one little thing.
As Murtoch struggles, we beat him up.
That should be a very thorough job.
It's funny that such a perfect plan should show a flaw.
You bet it shows a flaw.
When I talk to the jury, you'll ..
We don't have any jury. That's it.
Why have a jury? We don't need one.
In the struggle after our entry into the room, the murderer is killed.
He shoots at us, puts up a battle until we kill him.
That's simple, plain and economical.
That's the way we'll do it.
Now, just take it nice and easy, nice and easy.
And we'll wait.
You can't do that to me.
There she is now.
─ Shall we get our hats on?
Wait until I hear what she has to say.
Let her in.
Hello, boys.
Hello, Jim.
─ Hello, Gertie.
You want a drink?
─ No. No thanks.
Gee, it's warm in here.
I don't see how you stand it.
Are you getting sensitive?
─ I guess so.
I've been doing some work for you.
─ Yeah?
Let's go outside where it’s cool.
I want to tell you about it.
It's alright. These are all friends.
I know. But I want to talk to you alone.
Come on, spill it.
Well, you know I've been with Durant.
He's crazy about me.
I've been trying to find out what he had on his mind.
Well, I found out.
─ What?
Come on, let's go outside and get some fresh air.
Open one of the windows.
You found out what?
He's losing his nerve.
I've got him scared blue.
Telling him what will happen to him if he doesn't get out of this town.
He told me to come and tell you he'd like to take that trip you offered him.
Yeah?
And he's going to take me with him.
Just what I need. A nice little trip.
Yes, you're going on a trip.
But it's not going to be the kind you think.
It's a shame, Gertie.
If you'd kept your nose clean.
It would have been alright.
Are you kidding?
─ No.
Jim, you couldn't mean that.
Get your things on, boys.
So I'm going on a nice little ride, eh?
─ That's it.
Can I make one last request?
A man on his way to the chair gets what he wants for dinner.
What is it?
I'd like to take one last look at that skyline.
I've had some good times in this town.
So you're going to take a dive, huh?
─ No!
I'm on the level.
If you think it's anything phony, come along.
Leave me alone, will you.
I'm going nuts.
There they are. Bring him over here.
Hold him tight and keep your hand over his mouth.
It's only fair that she should have her chance to see me kill him.
He'll be dead in a couple of minutes.
It ought to cheer you up to know that he went before you did.
Wait. Maybe he's got something to say before his lights go out.
If he screams, shoot him first. I'll get
Crelliman right away. The gun is ready.
Wait a minute. Wait a minute, will you?
Give me a chance, give me a break.
I don't want to die or be shot at.
If I finger Crelliman, what would you do for me?
Quit stalling. We want Crelliman dead.
─ I'll get him dead, give him the chair.
If he hired me to kill someone, he'd get the chair, wouldn't he?     ─ Of course.
I wouldn't, would I? I'd only get life?
─ That's right.
Well, I'll talk.
Alright. Put it down,
Steve. Get it down.
Crelliman hired me to kill Mimi Montagne.
I did it. I did it from this window.
I waited until she sat down ..
─ Wait a minute. Wait ..
[ Gunshots! ]
Take it down Steve and make him sign it.
[ Gunshots! ]
Gertie!
Gertie!
Yes?
Gertie. Are you alright?
She's alright.
What happened, Tony?
I'm sorry.
I had to do it.
I had to get Crelliman.
But you'll get me off.
Won't you?
Tony.
Tony!
Take it easy, old boy.
I'll get a doctor for you.
Wait.
What am I?
Call me that again.
You're a dirty little rat, Tony.
Yeah .. you're a great guy.
Mr Durant is back, Madame.
Is he on his way up?
Yes, Madame. Mr Durant is talking to the reporters now.
I've never known so much excitement.
Telephones, telegrams, congratulations.
Much different to the last time.
I hope this will teach Mr Durant only to take murderers from the best families.
Can I help you, Madame?
Yes Layton, do. I want to sneak out of here as soon as possible.
I hate to see you go, Madame.
After that bump on the head, Layton?
I don't know how I'll ever explain that to my wife.
She'll say that I've been up to my old tricks.
Are you a family man, Layton?
We have four children at home?
─ Four?
And another on the way home from boarding school.
[ Telephone ]
There it goes again.
Hello? Hello?
Oh is that you on the extension, Mr Durant?
Oh, excuse me.
Miss Sue speaking to Mr Durant.
So they lived heavily ever after.
Tell me, Layton.
Pal to pal, do you like her?
Well, she never struck me ..
I beg your pardon, Madame.
I mean she always seemed pretty and ..
Very nice. She never did appeal to the beast in me.
Oh!
Layton.
Take care of him.
Take good care of him, won't you.
I love him, Madame. As much as you do.
No you don't.
[ Door knocks ]
Entre-vous, Monsieur.
Hello.
Layton .. call up the steamship lines.
Get a reservation for me for tonight.
Cunard Line, the best ..
What? Are you listening to me?
─ Yes, sir.
Hurry up and make reservations for tonight. Any line at all.
Well, Siddall is sleeping in his own bed tonight.
I satisfied the reporters and everybody's happy.
Only ..
Poor Tony.
Well, you've been a peach. You did it all.
Thanks for everything.
I hope you have a nice trip.
Goodbye.
You little idiot. You're going with me.
Uh ..
I'm going with you?
─ Why, sure you are.
Oh.
Well, how about Miss Leonard?
Well.
Well, she's a bäd sailor.
How about Paris?
With you?
─ Hmm.
I'd love it.
They'll talk.
─ Of course they will.
Do you mind?
Not if you don't.
Tut, tut, tut.
Laytoñ.
The bridal suite.
For Mr and Mrs Jackson ..
Durant.
Why, I can't marry you. I'll ruin you with all your friends.
I'm not even a lady.
─ You're not, huh?
Well, you'll do until a lady comes along.
T-G
Thanks for the lift.
Any time, Mrs. Reardon.
And how does your husband like having his own office?
Fine. Clients are just pouring in.
Goodbye.
One fine little woman, that Mrs. Reardon.
Please, let's not have a scene.
Look, it's just as tough on me as it is on you.
Listen, let's face the facts.
You're a luxury.
I can't afford a luxury.
I can't keep you any longer.
After all, I'm a married man
I've got to think of my wife.
And about time.
Oh, Mrs. Reardon.
Sally.
What's going on here?
Maybe you can explain to Miss Jacobs that I'm letting her go only because business is so bad,
I can't afford to keep a stenographer.
Oh.
Now don't cry, Miss Jacobs.
Someday this will be the largest detective agency in town, then my husband will take you back at a bigger salary.
Now look, here's a bonus for you.
Oh, thank you.
Thank you, Mrs. Reardon.
I don't mind anything, but your husband shouldn't have called me that name.
What did you call her, Bill?
I didn't call her any name.
You did too.
You called me a stenographer, and I'm a private secretary.
Listen, I gave her a week's salary.
Why the extra $5?
$10, for being here six months without flirting with you.
Oh, yeah?
Lady, you've been robbed.
Why that little...
Well, that settles it.
From now on, I'm your secretary.
No, no. No thanks.
I don't need a secretary.
I don't even need a stenographer, so you go on home, see if you can't think up a good menu for a change.
I'm tired of going home, cooking for you.
I want to go out in the world and meet people.
Oh, no...
No, it's no life for a girl like you.
Millions of clamoring clients, the white lights, the gay night life!
Oh no, go home...
Go home little girl, before it's too late.
Mister, for better or for worse from now on
I'm your secretary.
All right, take a letter.
To whom please?
Oh, what's the difference?
Oh, Bill, keep your chin up.
Rome wasn't built in a day.
Who cares about Rome?
All I'm interested in is in the career of William H. Reardon.
Now listen to me young lady, six months ago I was making $3,500 a year as special investigator in the district attorney's office.
Doing all the work while the DA got all the glory.
Now you listen to me, Bill Reardon.
I did once, now look at me.
My own boss, no work, no glory, and nothing a year.
Success.
Someday you'll thank me for making you go on your own.
You're the best detective in this town, and you know it.
Yeah, I know it and you know it.
The trouble is nobody else knows it.
Some day they'll find out.
Now tell me something, Snooks.
If I'm as smart as you say, how did I happen to fall for a dumb dame like you?
Believe me, I've sat up nights worrying about just that thing.
Well, there you are.
If I'm really a good detective,
I'd be able to explain how the whole thing happened.
You are a good detective.
You're just stupid.
Oh, now I'm stupid.
About some things.
A minute ago I was the smartest guy in town, now I'm stupid.
Well, make up your mind, which is it?
Both. You are the smartest guy in town, but it's publicity you're stupid about.
Nobody knows you have an office.
How do you expect to get any clients?
I bet I could get more publicity in two minutes than you've gotten in six months.
Oh, yeah?
Yeah.
All right, young lady, from now on suppose you take charge of the whole office.
Hmm, for two cents I would.
Well, if I had two cents...
Maybe that's a customer.
Maybe.
Yes, sir.
May I see
Mr. Reardon, please?
Yes, sir. Mr. Reardon, here's a client.
I'll get those letters right out, Mr. Reardon.
Oh, pardon me.
Oh, dear.
Well... Oh, excuse me.
Right there.
Oh, yes, yes.
Oh, busy days these.
Good afternoon.
Good afternoon.
Good afternoon.
Goodbye.
Goodbye.
Goodbye.
Oh, Bill, did you get it?
I'll say I did.
Oh, what is it?
A divorce case?
No. They want us to do some collecting for them.
A fellow owes them some money.
Well, anything is better than nothing.
Did you get an advance?
No, no. It's not the sort of thing you can ask for an advance on.
You dope, you can get an advance on anything.
Yeah? All right, see for yourself.
Oh, Bill, what are we gonna do now?
I'm doing it.
Hello? Is the
District Attorney there?
Don't talk to that guy.
Don't talk to him, Bill!
Hello, Joe? Yeah, this is Bill Reardon.
When will he be in?
Half an hour?
Okay. Thanks.
Where's your pride?
I just swallowed it.
Listen, honey,
I'm not going on relief when there's a good job waiting for me.
Come on.
Well, you can quit if you want to, but I'm going to carry on here.
All right, baby, you carry on until the first of the month.
You might take care of this, too.
I'll call you in half an hour.
Wish me luck.
Yes, I do. I hope you don't get the job.
Well, if we don't there's a cute little bench in Central Park where we can spend the winter.
Oh, Bill.
You'd better start packing.
Pack up?
What's there to pack?
A lot of silly pictures as far as I can see.
Never could run an office.
He's just a schlemiel, that's all.
I beg your pardon, is Mr. Reardon in? No.
Well, can you tell me when he will be in?
I want to see him on business.
Business?
Oh, won't you sit down.
Mr. Reardon has gone out for a moment, and a...
When will he be back?
Well, he won't.
That is, right now he is out on a very important case and I don't know exactly when he will be back.
Would you like him to call you?
I prefer not to leave my name.
Oh, just as you wish, Mrs. Fraser.
How did you know my name?
Your picture was in the paper when you were married.
It is a detective's business never to forget a face.
Are you a detective?
Oh, yes. Yes.
I'm Mr. Reardon's chief operator.
I handle all the women clients.
You see, women often feel they can talk more freely to another woman.
There may be something in that.
Do sit down.
There.
You'll promise to keep the matter confidential?
I won't even discuss it with Mr. Reardon.
Oh, he'll have to know, won't he?
Not unless you want him to.
Your case will be entered on our books as a number.
Just a moment.
Our last case was No. 375.
Your case number will be 376.
Now what can I do for you?
There's someone I'd like to have followed.
Her name is Anne Calhoun.
Has this inscription anything to do with it?
She was engaged to my husband before I.
I'm beginning to understand.
There hasn't been anything to understand until recently.
Suddenly, Mr. Fraser has been getting letters and phone calls from her.
I haven't spied, but I know her handwriting and I know her voice.
There's something going on between them and you've got to find out what it is.
376, I'll stake my reputation on it.
If I don't solve this case before the first of the month,
I'll retire from business.
Fine. Tomorrow I'm going away on a two week trip and when I get back, I want a complete report on Anne Calhoun, everybody she sees and where and when she sees them.
You go away and forget it.
Maybe I'll have good news for you when you get back.
Any news will be better than this suspense.
Oh, by the way, my husband and I are going to the
Skyline Club tonight for dinner with believe it or not, Miss Calhoun.
If you want to get a good look at her.
I'll be there.
Thanks for the tip.
I don't know what your rates are, but this should do until I get back.
Oh, thank you.
Thank you Miss...
Operator number seven.
Goodbye.
Goodbye.
One, two, three, $300.
$300! One, two, three.
Well, what this office needs is a few pictures on the wall.
This will go here.
Oh, Bill, we should have done this a long time ago.
Reardon Detective Agency.
Operator...
Oh, hello, Bill.
You sound awfully happy.
Oh, you landed that job with the District Attorney?
Why, that's very nice.
What's the salary?
75 smackers a week and every week.
What's the matter?
You don't sound very enthusiastic.
Oh, I think it's wonderful.
Yes, I really do.
And how's the Reardon Agency coming along under its new management?
Splendidly, thank you.
Customers are popping in all over the place.
Customers, ha.
Name one.
Why, Bill, I'm surprised, the Reardon Detective Agency never reveals the name of its clients.
That's our policy.
What did you say?
Any more bills come in?
Why yes, three of them.
Aw, forget them.
What do you say we celebrate tonight?
Oh, gee, that sounds swell.
Where do I want to go?
Well, let's see.
How about the Skyline Club?
Can we afford that?
No, we cannot afford the Skyline Club.
Don't be silly.
Bill, just this once please.
All right, if you promise to have one drink and the regular dinner.
None of that a la carte stuff.
I promise.
All right.
The Skyline Club.
Little gold-digger.
And then I'll take some filet mignon.
Oui, madame.
Ixnay.
Oh yes, ixnay.
You mean instead of filet mignon?
Do you have any ixnay?
Ixnay? Pardon?
Well, never mind if you haven't any.
I'll just take filet mignon.
Madame.
You see, they're all out of it.
And, uh, chiffonade salad.
Salad chiffonade, madame.
Then I'll have strawberry parfait and coffee.
Pork chops on the regular dinner.
Any wine, monsieur?
No.
Oh, I'll take some.
No, no wine.
Thank you, monsieur.
You mean, no wine?
That's what I mean, no wine.
Not even a teeny-weeny itsy-bitsy?
Not even a teeny-weeny itsy-bitsy.
You mean, no wine.
Yeah, that's it, no wine.
Religious scruples?
No, no, just mathematics.
Filet mignon, $3.50, strawberry parfait, 75 cents, six martinis.
I only had three.
But they're charging me for mine, too, you know.
And all I've got in my pocket is a 20 dollar bill.
You don't happen to have a couple of dollars in your purse, do you?
Money?
Why didn't you say so?
I've got half a dollar.
Hand it over.
I'm in no mood for quibbling.
Oh, Shane.
Hello, Mr. Reardon.
Just the man I want to see.
Will you cash a check for me?
Sure. What do you want?
Oh, not much, 25.
You better make it 50 in case we want some wine.
Yeah. Oh, Mr. Shane,
Mrs. Reardon.
How do you do?
Here's your 50.
Thanks.
Got a pen?
Yes.
You're taking an awful chance, Mr. Shane.
I don't think he has
$50 in his account.
Say, she has a great sense of humor.
Yeah. Can I buy you a drink?
No, thanks.
Have one on the house.
Oh, no, we couldn't do that.
Oh, you can have one more, Bill.
I'm taking you home.
What will it be, Mrs. Reardon?
A martini, please.
Same thing.
Jim, three martinis.
Haven't seen you around lately.
No, no, I've been pretty busy.
How do you like being on your own?
Well, I'm not exactly on my own anymore.
I'm back with the DA again.
Say, you don't happen to have his home phone number, do you?
Why, yeah.
Lexington 28672, but he won't be home till pretty late.
Thanks.
To you, Mrs. Reardon.
Oh, to you, Mr. Shane.
May your checks never bounce back.
Remind me to talk to you when we get home.
Pardon me, sir, but you are wanted in the office.
Oh, excuse me.
I'll probably see you around later.
Yeah.
Nice personality.
Yeah, most gamblers have.
Gambler?
He happens to own that casino across the river.
Oh, why didn't I marry a man like that instead of a prohibitionist.
Your table is ready, monsieur.
All right, thanks.
Come on.
Psst, psst.
Come on, that looks swell.
This one will be all right.
Wouldn't madame prefer the table over by the window?
No, we can't see anyone over there.
I like this one right in the center of things.
We can watch people coming in.
As you wish, madame.
Monsieur.
I don't know why we couldn't have had a decent table.
What's wrong with this table?
Oh, nothing, this is great.
Nice draft, too.
I knew you'd like it.
Do you remember way back when I said I'd take you to the Skyline Club and you promised you would go light on everything?
Oh, that was before we made the $50.
Hmm. Yes, it was.
Of course, we didn't quite make the $50.
There's just a chance that
Mr. Shane might deposit that check.
Well, even if he does that's
$50 more than we came in with.
That's certainly a profit.
Hmm.
Yes, it certainly is.
Do me a favor, will you?
Don't mention it to the income tax people.
Oh, you can trust me, Bill.
Puree mongole?
No, my name is Reardon.
Good evening, Mr. Fraser.
Good evening.
Your table is all ready.
Oh, thank you.
I wish you weren't going away, darling.
I'll probably be sorry myself.
Why don't you get yourself a pair of field glasses?
As long as I'm paying 90 cents for that puree mongole,
I'd like to see you eat some of it.
Why don't you watch where you're going?
Anything wrong, madame?
I should say there is.
If you think I'm going to sit here and be jostled about by everyone you're mistaken.
But the guy never came anywhere near you.
I don't see how you have the nerve to offer anyone this table.
I want to sit over at that table.
Come along, Bill.
Sorry, madame.
Your wife?
You want to make anything out of it?
Breast of guinea hen and heart of artichoke in butter sauce.
This is more like it.
Are you angry at something, Bill?
Me? No, what have
I got to be angry about?
Well, I don't know.
You just look like you're ready to sock somebody in the jaw.
No, no, I got over that an hour ago.
Now I'm looking for an axe.
I think it's silly getting mad at a waiter.
You haven't by any chance found an answer to that question, have you?
What question?
How a smart guy like me happened to marry a dumb cluck like you?
I don't think there is any explanation.
That's what I thought.
But you did like my dancing.
Oh, did I?
All right, let's try that.
Oh, don't be silly, Bill.
You couldn't dance these modern dances.
Not at your age.
Oh, not at my age.
Maybe I'm too old for you?
I wouldn't want a younger man.
I don't know why we come to these places anyhow.
I do.
I like to dance.
That's a good idea.
Come on.
Oh, but I just promised this dance to Walter.
Didn't I, Walter?
Oh, yes, of course you did.
Say, who's engaged to her anyhow?
Oh, don't be so jealous, Jerry.
All right, Bill.
What are you trying to do?
But this isn't one of the new dances.
Sure you can do it?
Well, if you didn't want to dance with me, why did you ask me?
Well then, I'll dance by myself.
That's my little gentleman.
Did you bring it?
Yes, it's right here.
Well, how am I doing for an old man?
Now don't you be nervous, Bill.
You just follow me.
I'm sorry, I should have brought my running shoes.
New step.
I don't have to say thank you, do I?
Not to me.
Applaud, Bill.
What have I got to applaud?
You want to dance again, don't you?
This time we do it my way.
Well, what now?
Oh, you'll have to excuse me.
Are you finished, monsieur?
I certainly am. I've taken about all I can stand for one evening.
Hey, listen, never mind the rest of the dinner.
Just bring me something to drink.
Champagne.
The best champagne and one glass.
Yes, but madame?
One glass.
Yes, sir, one glass.
Good night.
Good evening, Miss Calhoun.
Good evening, Mr. Shane.
So nice to see you.
I didn't dare hope it'd be so soon.
What's that?
Champagne.
Where's my glass?
Hmm, I only ordered one.
Not a taste even?
Ah, here she is now.
About time.
What's the matter?
Oh, nothing.
I just told him I didn't mind letting him have my girl, but I thought he ought to return her.
Did you think I was lost?
Well, it wouldn't be the first time he lost you.
What do you mean by that? Walter. Walter...
I'll tell you what I mean by that.
I'm engaged to Anne now, and I'll kill the first man that horns in.
It's all right, gentlemen.
It's just my wife.
Well, why didn't you pick me up, you big lummox?
I picked you up once and now look at me.
Are you hurt?
No.
Everything is under control.
I'm sorry to have intruded.
Please go on with your quarreling.
I thought I married a gentleman.
Well, live and learn.
Anyway, it serves you right for snooping into other people's affairs.
I haven't snooped.
You have, too.
You've been snooping all evening.
You're just a snoop poopity-popp, that's what you are.
Of all the selfish, beastly pigs I ever met in my life, Bill Reardon, you are about the lowest form of... Hello, Reardon.
Hello, Schuster.
How are you? Who's that?
There you go snooping again.
What's it to you?
His name's Schuster.
I know his name's Schuster.
What does he do?
What difference does it make what he does?
He's a lawyer.
What kind of a lawyer?
What difference does it make what kind of a lawyer?
He's a divorce lawyer.
Wait a minute.
I want to see that guy.
Get me two bottles of this and one glass.
Oui, madame.
What did the lawyer say then?
Well, in New York
State the grounds are desertion, insanity, and a couple of other things.
In California, it's mental cruelty.
What's mental cruelty?
Refusing to dance with your husband when he wants to dance, dancing with him when he doesn't want to dance, snooping.
Snooping when he doesn't want to dance and dancing when he doesn't want to snoop.
Yeah.
In Russia, the man gets the alimony.
Oh, let's go to Russia.
All right, Sally, let's go to Russia.
Waiter. Time table.
Where is our waiter?
Sally.
Oh.
Sally!
I tell you what.
What?
Let's go to bed.
That's a very smart idea.
How did you ever think of that idea?
It just came to me.
Do you really think that's a good idea, or are you just saying it?
Oh, no, I really think it's wonderful.
You know, I get a lot of good ideas, but I'm afraid to mention 'em.
You shouldn't be afraid, Bill.
If you can't tell your wife, who can you tell?
I could tell my mother.
A boy's best friend's his mother.
There you go sticking up for your mother, instead of your own flesh and blood.
Come on, let's go to bed.
I've got to get up early for the DA.
And I've got to get up early for my office.
I know what.
I'll get us some hot milk.
That'll make us sleep.
There's just nothing...
There's nothing in the world like hot milk.
Bill. Bill.
Bill!
Huh? What?
If I get you some hot milk, you'll go right to sleep.
Leave me alone.
Hot milk is the only thing.
Say, how do you expect to go to sleep with that tight collar on?
What's going on?
I'm just trying to put you to sleep, honey.
There must be something I can do for poor little Bill.
I know.
Bill!
Might have turned off the alarm before he left.
Bill!
Wake up, Bill, it's late.
Poor Bill.
Oh, poor Sally.
Walter Fraser.
I'll kill the first guy that horns in.
I'll kill the first guy that horns in.
I'll kill the first guy that horns...
I'm sorry, Bill, but business is business.
Mmm.
Hello. Dispatch?
Give me the City Desk.
City desk.
Good morning.
Could I interest you in the Fraser murder?
You might. Why?
Did you kill him?
No!
But I think I know who did.
Sally Reardon of the Reardon
Detective Agency, you know.
No, I don't know, but go ahead.
Eh? What?
Say that again.
63rd Street.
We'll be right over.
Fine. That's great.
Stay right where you are.
And you say Marlowe made this threat in the presence of witnesses?
My husband and I both heard him.
Where is your husband?
He's down at the DA's office covering the case from their angle.
How did Marlowe look when he said it?
Don't quote me, but he had a very ominous glitter in his eye.
And you were close enough to see this ominous glitter in his eye?
Yes, I was.
My back was right toward him.
Marlowe would have killed
Fraser right then and there if I hadn't stopped him.
How could you stop him?
Well, I threw a chair at Marlowe just as he was getting ready to draw his gun.
Interesting, if true.
Don't forget to put in the Reardon
Detective Agency gave you your clue.
Publicity helps, you know. Oh, yeah.
Oh, that's not fair.
He has no pants on.
Hey, give me that plate.
Come on, Joe.
You ought to be ashamed of yourself.
What happened?
What's going on?
Oh, Bill, you haven't got your pants on.
What was that noise?
What was that noise?
Oh, you finally heard something, did you?
I've been slamming in and out doors all morning trying to wake you up.
You were supposed to be down at the District Attorney's.
Do you know what time it is? Ow.
Bill, are you all right?
Yeah, yeah, get me a clean pair of socks, will you, Sally?
And bring me the morning paper.
Oh. There isn't any.
What, no clean socks?
No. No paper.
You see, the boy forgot it this morning or else the neighbors stole it again.
Let me help you with your socks.
Bill, do you love me?
Yeah, only don't ask me in the morning.
No, I mean really love, no matter what happens?
Sure, sure.
And no picture could ever come between us?
And no picture...
Say, what's the matter with you?
Are you crazy?
What picture?
Well, any picture.
You know, like when you and I go to the movies and we see a picture, and I like it and you don't and you make an awful fuss.
Oh, let me alone, will you?
Here I am trying to get to the DA's office on time and here you are bothering me about a moving picture and can it ever come between us.
Hello. Yeah.
What? Holy smoke.
Yeah, yeah.
I'll be right down.
Say, Sally, you know that party that were sitting right next to us in the cafe?
Yeah.
One of them was a guy named Fraser.
He was murdered last night.
No.
Yeah.
Bill, this is your chance.
You pick up the trail from the time they left the restaurant to Marlowe's house.
Oh, that's all I got to do, eh?
We can break this case in no time.
If we solve it before election, we'll be heroes.
If we don't...
I know.
If we don't, I'm the goat.
Oh, I wouldn't say that.
I know you wouldn't say it.
Now, suppose a miracle occurs and I do crack this case.
Do you think you might mention me in one of those interviews?
Save it, Bill.
I'll give you all the publicity in the world.
Yeah, well,
I never got it before.
Hey, wait a minute.
You've got it now.
What?
"No picture can ever come between us."
Who's your tailor, Reardon?
"Blonde Sleuth accuses Marlowe."
Why should I hire anybody who says that?
So she'll stop saying it.
I don't want any part of it.
Say, who's the lawyer here, you or I?
You made the threat, didn't you?
Yes, I made the threat, but I didn't kill him.
Well, whether you did or not is unimportant.
The important thing is to make sure that you're not convicted.
- Yes?
- Mrs. Reardon is here.
Send her right in.
Now you be nice to her.
Nice to her?
I'd like to kill her.
That's the sort of talk that got you into trouble before.
Mrs. Reardon.
How do you do, Mr. Ketterling?
How are you, Mrs. Reardon?
You know Mr. Marlowe?
Oh, yes, we met last night, didn't we?
Won't you sit down.
Thank you.
Mrs. Reardon, I have explained to Mr. Marlowe that you've agreed to do a little investigating for us.
Yes, I have. Of course, we're very busy at the office right now, but this is such an interesting case,
I felt I couldn't afford to turn it down.
It is interesting, isn't it, Mr. Marlowe?
That's very generous of you,
Mrs. Reardon. Isn't it, Jerry?
Oh, yes, it's very generous.
Oh, well, money isn't everything.
We agreed upon 200 a week and expenses, didn't we?
Oh yes, yes. I have your check all ready for you, Mrs. Reardon.
No, wait a minute.
How are you going to fix that newspaper story?
Oh, that.
May I use the telephone?
Sure.
Thank you.
Don't you worry about a thing.
I can fix it.
Hello, give me the City Desk.
Hello, this is Mrs. Reardon.
Yes, I have a new story for you.
Have you a pencil ready?
All right.
"Marlowe is innocent" says blonde investigator.
What?
I know I said he was guilty, but I've just picked up some new evidence.
Hello, Bill.
Oh, it's dark isn't it?
Oh, that one's on.
There you are, honey.
What about this?
Bill, you promised that no picture would ever come between us.
Yes, but I never said anything about shorts.
Well, anyway, it shows you have nice straight legs.
Never mind my legs.
Why did you repeat that crack of Marlowe's to the reporters?
Well, I told you I was going to get publicity for the office, and anyway, Marlowe did say it.
He was drunk.
I always tell the truth when I'm...
When I've had a few drinks.
If you do, it's the only time.
Yes, it's very obvious.
If you're going to kill someone, you don't advertise it, do you?
Have you had any dinner?
No, I don't want any dinner.
Maybe you'd feel better if you had something to eat.
I'd feel better if I murdered you.
Making a monkey out of me with the DA.
I'm sorry, Bill.
I won't butt in again, really I won't.
If I thought you meant that, I'd be the happiest guy in the world.
Oh, I do mean it, Bill, honest I do.
Okay.
Okay, you can live.
If you really mean it.
Of course, I mean it.
I appreciate how you feel, Sally, but it's a man's place to make the money for the house and the woman's place to take care of the man when he comes home.
Oh, you're absolutely right, Bill, and to prove it I'll make you the best supper you ever had.
How do you like your coffee, weak or strong?
Strong. I got things to do tonight.
What things?
I thought you were going to do the housework.
Well, a wife ought to take some interest in what her husband is doing, don't you think?
No.
Well, if that's the way you feel about it, all right.
Are you and the DA going to arrest anyone tonight?
No, we're not going to arrest anyone tonight.
We don't arrest people on a lot of flimsy evidence, and we don't accuse them till we are pretty sure they're guilty.
Oh, I think that's a very nice attitude, Bill, but don't forget to question the butler.
What butler?
I don't know.
All I know is that when I read a detective story there's always a butler.
Open the sardines, Bill.
Butlers.
I thought you were going to take care of the housework.
Hurry up, will you?
I've got a date with the DA.
We are going to re-enact the murder tonight.
Ow!
Oh, Bill, did you hurt yourself?
No, I just lost a hand.
Oh, well, do be careful.
Where are you going to re-enact the crime?
In Central Park.
Oh, that's very silly.
You ought to re-enact it where the crime was committed.
Oh, don't, that's the last can.
It might be easy enough for anyone to get up on this terrace from the other building.
Yeah, but the doors were locked from the inside.
The glass isn't shattered.
So it couldn't have been done from here.
There's Mrs. Fraser.
Oh, you can't go in there.
Isn't this the
Marlowe apartment?
That's right.
Well, I have to take this in to Mr. Reardon.
It's very important.
I'm from the District Attorney's office.
Well, just a minute.
I'll take it to him.
You wait here.
What I want to find out is just where each person was when the shot was fired.
What about you, Miss Calhoun?
I was in the kitchen mixing a drink.
Where did you last see Mr. Fraser?
Here, in the living room.
It's true, isn't it, that you were once engaged to Mr. Fraser?
Yes, I was.
And now you're engaged to Mr. Marlowe?
Yes.
What of it?
Nothing, only I may have to dig into these relationships.
So if I ask a few personal questions, it won't be out of idle curiosity.
Where were you, Mrs. Fraser, when the shot was fired?
I was in the library.
I was just reaching for the phone when...
That's all right.
How about you, Marlowe?
Frankly, I'd had a few drinks.
I couldn't swear just where I was.
Why, Jerry, you were in the kitchen with me.
But, Jerry.
Yes, Mrs. Fraser?
Nothing.
But you were about to say something.
Well, Jerry had walked through the living room with me to show me where the phone was.
The shot came almost immediately and I didn't think he'd had time to get back to the kitchen.
He'd just come back when the shot was fired.
Well, what about it, Marlowe?
I really don't remember.
Nobody seems to remember much around here.
Mr. Reardon, a lady brought this.
Huh?
She's waiting for an answer.
No answer.
What are you two talking about?
Is it against the law for me to give an order to my butler?
Where were you last night?
I was asleep.
The shot awakened me.
I put on my bathrobe and I... I came down.
How long have you worked for Mr. Marlowe?
I engaged him in
London two years ago. Let him talk for himself.
Who did you work for before Marlowe hired you?
For a Dr. Murray.
There is nothing wrong with your memory now, is there?
You might try remembering a few things about last night.
I'll take another look around.
I'll see what I can do.
You know Jerry's innocent.
I know only one thing, that Walter is dead.
I have been all over this place, too.
That gun ain't nowhere in here.
It's got to be someplace.
I looked in there.
I think I've found the gun.
What are you talking about?
You just don't know where to look.
What a place for a gun.
I just found something.
Where did you locate it?
Sit down.
In the butler's pantry.
Take this downtown for fingerprints. Yes, sir.
Well, how do you account for that?
I don't know, sir.
Ever handle a gun?
No, sir.
Oh, you say you never shot a gun?
No, sir.
Well, here's your first lesson.
Shoot this.
Oh, no, sir, I wouldn't know how.
I... I couldn't.
Just pull the trigger.
So you never shot a gun before?
No, sir.
But you knew enough to release the safety catch before you pulled the trigger.
Take him downtown.
You can't do that.
Are you trying to hang this on him?
Oh, do you want to go along? You bet I do!
Fine. It might help you to remember where you were when that shot was fired.
It's all right, darling.
That's all for the present.
We're very grateful to you, Mrs. Fraser.
I hope we won't have to bother you again.
Will it be all right if I go away for a few days?
Certainly, as long as we know where you are.
Miss Calhoun, we'll get in touch with you when we need you.
I'd like to go away for a few days myself.
No, I think you'd better stay in town, Miss Calhoun.
Very well.
Whatever made you think of the butler?
Whatever made me think of the butler?
Why, I suspected him from the very first moment.
Stop that!
How did the gun get in the butler's pantry?
I don't know.
But you were the only person who cleaned the pantry.
Never mind, we don't have to ask him any more questions.
All we need now is a confirmation of the facts we have.
On the 2nd of this month, you went to a pawn shop located at 374
Hillcrest Drive, Newark.
No, no. You bought a revolver there for $15.
No, I didn't.
The pawnbrokers identified your photograph.
It's a frame-up!
But before you bought the gun you examined several rifles.
I didn't. He tried to sell me a rifle... Oh!
I thought you'd walk into that.
Okay, let's have it.
Come on, you've admitted you were there. Come clean.
I bought the gun for Mr. Marlowe.
You mean to say Marlowe sent you to a pawn shop?
No. He gave me
$20.00 to buy a gun.
Oh, I see.
He gave you $20 to buy a gun and you only paid $15 for it.
You chiseled him out of $5.
Well, I hid the gun for him, didn't...
All right. Now let's have it step by step.
After I bought the gun,
Mr. Marlowe kept it in a drawer in his room.
About a week ago the gun was missing.
Did you say anything to Marlowe about it?
No, I didn't think it was any of my business.
Go on.
Well, when the shot was fired,
I put on my bathrobe and rushed down.
Fraser's body was lying on the ground.
A woman was screaming and Mr. Marlowe...
Yeah. Tell us about Mr. Marlowe.
Oh, he was trying to keep the ladies quiet.
Then I saw a gun lying by the French window.
The gun you bought from the pawn shop?
Yes. I picked it up, slipped it into my bathrobe and I hid it in the pantry.
Marlowe asked you to hide it? No.
Now, what did he say when you told him where it was?
I didn't tell him.
A three year old child could make up a better story.
And you expect me to believe that?
I don't care what you believe.
It's the truth.
I did have Grigson buy a gun and it disappeared about a week ago.
Oh, the gun just walked out of the desk, eh?
I don't know what happened to it.
Did you ask Grigson about it?
No. When I saw it missing I was glad.
Oh.
And why were you glad?
Because I was afraid
I might use it on Fraser.
You bought it to use on Fraser, didn't you? Yes.
Why?
Because he was up to something with Anne.
And she'd been writing to him.
How do you know she'd been writing to him?
I was in his apartment when the maid brought the mail in.
I know Anne's handwriting.
He didn't open the letter, he just looked confused and slipped it in his pocket.
Any idea what it was all about?
No. She denied everything. He lied.
I was going crazy, I tell you.
I'd have killed him all right.
I'm only sorry I didn't.
Cheer up, Marlowe.
Maybe we can prove you did.
Will you please tell the District
Attorney that Mrs. Reardon is here.
Sorry, he's busy.
You'll have to wait.
How do you do, Mrs. Reardon?
Oh, Mr. Shane. Well.
And what is a night club owner doing in the District Attorney's office, if I may ask?
Oh, I get around.
Oh, you're not complaining about my husband's check, I hope?
Oh, no, that hasn't bounced yet.
Well, that won't be a bounce, that'll be an earthquake.
What might you be doing in the District Attorney's office, if I may ask?
Some new clue on the Fraser murder?
Say, maybe you could help me.
Well, I'd appreciate the opportunity.
What was in that letter that Anne
Calhoun gave you the other night?
Letter that Anne
Calhoun gave me?
Oh, Shane, I'm sorry I won't be able to see you.
When I called you the other night, you told me to be sure and drop in to see you this morning.
I know, I know.
That was before the Fraser case turned up.
Come and see me next week sometime.Okay.
I'll tell you what, I'll call you when I'm ready for you.
Okay.
Goodbye, Mrs. Reardon.
Goodbye, Mr. Shane.
Think it over.
Mrs. Reardon.
Oh, I'd like to talk to you.
I've got some very valuable clues.
Yes, I've been reading all about your clues.
But this is a new one.
Well, tell it to your husband.
Maybe he'll listen.
It's no use.
He isn't speaking to me these days.
Smart fellow, Reardon.
I think Shane is mixed up in this case.
Shane? Nonsense.
But you...
As it happens,
I was talking to
Shane over the telephone just about the time the murder was committed.
What do you think he was doing, holding a revolver in one hand, and a receiver in the other?
Maybe he's a ventriloquist.
A ventriloquist?
Hello, Mr. Ketterling.
I have some marvelous news for you.
I tried to get you earlier, and then later I was busy myself.
Uh-huh. Shopping.
What?
The good news?
Oh, well, it isn't exactly good.
No, it looks pretty bad for poor Mr. Marlowe.
But don't you worry.
I have a wonderful plan.
If I can get rid of my husband by 8 o'clock,
I'm starting out and... Huh?
Well, I can't tell you.
No, because I'm not sure what the plan is.
Bye, Mr. Ketterling.
Bill!
Bill. Bill, darling.
Bill, darling, speak to me.
All right, you little double-crosser.
Why you... You acrobat!
Ow!
Wait a minute now,
I can explain everything.
You were doing so well with the case that I...
Well, I just got so discouraged
I hid in the closet.
You heard that phone call?
I heard part of it.
I wasn't interested much.
You weren't interested much?
No, when a man discovers that his wife's been double-crossing him, nothing she can say is of any interest to him.
Anyway, there's been a man from headquarters listening in, taking down the full conversation.
You mean, these wires have been tapped?
Hello, Mike, did you get it? Okay.
Well, then you know everything.
Oh, no, no, I'm not that good.
But I know Ketterling and Marlowe hired you.
How did you find out?
Oh, well even a boob would get suspicious of his wife when he finds her giving out interviews, sneaking around when he's trying to question people and behaving in general like a madwoman.
Besides, I'm the smartest detective in town.
You said so yourself, remember?
Of course, that was before you began to think you were the smartest detective in town.
Anyhow, I got some clients.
One client.
A potential murderer.
How do you know
I haven't got more?
Because nobody would hire you except somebody who wanted to spy on the DA's office.
Is that so?
To me, the most convincing proof that Marlowe is guilty is the fact that he hired you.
Only a desperate man would do that.
But he's not guilty.
That's what you think.
But of course, you're paid to think that.
He has his man buy a gun in order to kill Fraser and Fraser's killed.
That adds up, doesn't it?
No, it doesn't add up.
Someone stole that gun a week ago.
Yeah, that's what he says.
I can prove it.
If you do, you're a better man than I am, Gunga Din.
If I do prove it will you take orders from a better man?
Sure. I know when I'm licked.
All right. You quit the DA's office and I'll give you a job with the Reardon
Detective Agency at a big salary.
And if you're licked, will you go home and look after the kids?
It's a bet.
What kids?
Oh, I'm sorry.
A woman with a career wouldn't have time to bring up a lot of children, but if you ever decide to give up that career, Mrs. Sherlock Holmes, come up and see me, we'll have a nice, long chat.
Oh, I suppose it's only fair to warn you that wherever you go tonight, you'll be shadowed by one of my men.
Oh, that's not fair, Bill.
All's fair in love and war.
Well, this is war in a way, isn't it?
Mmm-hmm.
I guess it must be love too, otherwise I'd have killed you long ago.
So long, dangerous.
Bill.
Yeah?
Doesn't this remind you of those Civil War stories where the Northern captain falls in love with the beautiful Southern spy?
Well, I think it's romantic.
Gee, we sure miss
Mr. Fraser around here.
Oh, I'm awfully sorry, Mrs. Fraser.
Stick 'em up.
One move and I'll plug you.
Let me go, please.
I didn't know anyone else was in here.
You think you'll ever leave this room alive?
I'm married to the greatest detective in the world.
He'll track you down to the ends of the earth.
You mean Bill Reardon?
Bill! Oh, I was never so glad to see anyone in all my life.
It's lucky for you I was here or that fellow would have plugged you.
Oh, my legs are shaking.
I was really scared.
What are you doing in that get up?
I'm a lone widow who forgot her keys.
Plain idiot who lost her brains.
Oh, these widow's weeds are hot.
I hope, darling, I never lose you in the summer time.
Oh, any other season,
I suppose, would be okay.
It would be much more comfortable.
I know what!
Shh.
We'll do our searching together.
If you find a clue you tell me and if I find a clue I'll tell...
I know if you find a clue you'll tell the newspapers.
You nit wit,
I believe you'd answer it.
Maybe it's a clue.
Mrs. Fraser's stockings aren't any better than mine.
Are you searching or sightseeing?
This is the kind she wears all right.
"Love's Temptation No. 5".
Oh, you get me some for my birthday, Bill.
It's only $25 an ounce.
Hey, come out of there, you thief.
I thought it was a wall safe.
What are you hiding from me?
Shh.
Good evening.
Don't touch me or I'll shoot.
Oh, my letter.
Give it to me. It's mine.
Sally, Sally, come back here!
Never mind.
I'll get that later.
Sit down, please.
Do you want to tell me about it?
No, you wouldn't believe me anyhow.
Maybe not.
I'll tell you what I do believe.
I believe that you wrote
Fraser a blackmailing letter.
Blackmail?
And when he wouldn't be blackmailed, you killed him.
No. No.
Oh, yes, you did.
No!
I'll tell you.
All right.
You might as well tell me the truth.
I'll find out anyway.
I was desperate.
I had lost $2,000 at roulette.
Roulette? Where?
At Shane's place across the river.
And I gave him a bad check for it.
So I wrote to Walter asking him for old times' sake to lend me the $2,000.
And he did?
Yes.
If that was all, why did you take your life in your hands and steal in here?
Because I thought Lola would find the letter and give it to the papers.
I didn't want Jerry to find out.
Can't you understand that?
Are you sure Jerry doesn't know and suspect the worst?
You're trying to trap me into saying he killed him.
He didn't. He didn't.
If anybody did it was Lola.
She was jealous. She...
Oh, I don't know what I'm saying.
Oh, yes, you do.
I'm afraid I'll have to place you under arrest, Miss Calhoun.
You can't.
You've got nothing to arrest me for.
Have you a permit to carry this gun?
No.
Then I can hold you on the Sullivan act.
Oh, no, no, no.
That's better than suspicion of murder, isn't it?
Oh, hello, Bill, home so early?
For the last time, are you going to give me that letter?
What letter?
All right, boys, get to work.
Rip the place wide open.
Bill Reardon, I won't allow strange men to search my apartment.
I know my rights.
You don't know anything.
I thought you'd pull some cockeyed idea like that, so to save an argument I brought along a search warrant.
Oh, it's pretty.
Will you autograph it for me?
Fogerty, take the kitchen.
Flannigan, the bedroom.
Be sure and put everything back where you found it.
Empty everything in the place, including the garbage can.
Aw, I wish I'd known you were coming.
I just emptied it.
All right, off with you.
That's a fine way to treat my husband.
Boo!
What are you looking for?
A letter.
Imagine a big man like you wanting to play Post Office.
You're getting warm, Mr. Flannigan.
Am I?
Mmm-hmm.
Warmer. Warmer still.
Hot, very hot, red hot.
Cold.
You're getting warm again.
Warmer, hot, hot, cold, cold. Ice cold.
Well, now am I getting hot?
Just under the collar.
Go on.
Listen, don't pay any attention to what she says.
Just search every inch of this place.
You play by yourself.
I'm busy.
Hello, Mike, are you there?
Oh, you aren't there.
You old faker.
I thought you said this wire was tapped.
Hello 376,
I'd like to make an appointment to see you.
Well, if it's about that other matter, just forget it, won't you, and keep the money.
Oh, but this is very important.
Just a moment.
Who is it?
Oh, it's that dumb Reardon woman.
You see, I'm not seeing many people these days.
I've just come across a letter that I'm sure will interest you.
See her. Find out what's it about.
Well, I'm going out, but I'll be back about nine o'clock.
Will that be all right?
Nine o'clock is fine.
I'll be there. Goodbye.
Hey, Flannigan,
I'll finish in here.
I want to keep an eye on her.
I can tell when she gets nervous.
How you doin', honey?
Mr. Flannigan, you're still cold.
All right, it's your turn.
You want me to help search?
Oh, no, you're going to be searched.
Oh, Bill, you wouldn't dare.
All right, if you'd rather have the boys do it.
Oh, Bill!
Take your shoes off.
Bill, stop it.
Don't you dare!
I haven't any letter on me.
It would rustle.
Bill, don't take any more off me.
Don't you dare take another thing off.
Bill, listen.
Bill, you old meanie.
Give me that search warrant.
I'm gonna take it home and read it.
I've been here four hours and we still haven't decided when I get the 50 grand.
I can't pay you until the estate is settled, can I?
The question is, will you pay me then?
I'll pay you, all right.
I know I'll get my money.
Listen, if the police ever found out that your husband was writing out checks to Anne Calhoun and that you knew about it, they might even suspect you of the murder.
And if they ever found out that I left you to marry Walter, they might even suspect you.
Who's the man?
I don't know, but that voice sounds familiar.
What are you sticking around for?
She'll be here any minute.
Watch your step and don't say anything to the Reardon lady, because if you even say hello to her that dame thinks she has a clue.
The wrong clue, but a clue.
Whoever the guy is he certainly knows my wife.
Good evening, Mrs. Fraser.
Good evening.
Sit down please.
Thank you.
You said something about a letter.
Yes. A letter that Anne Calhoun wrote to your husband.
Even if it meant finding the murderer,
I wouldn't want anything cheap to be printed about Walter.
Well, I know how you feel, but see for yourself.
At least we'll find out what Anne Calhoun wrote.Yeah.
Oh, Mrs. Fraser, you had no right to destroy that.
I'm sorry, Mrs. Reardon, but I can't have any slurs on Walter's memory.
Don't you want your husband avenged?
Yes, I want him avenged, but I don't want his name dragged through the mud.
Well, that just means I'll have to find another clue, that's all, but don't you worry, Mrs.
Fraser, I get one a minute.
Perhaps I can give you a very good clue.
Wait a minute.
I wonder how a smart girl like me married such a dumb cluck as Bill Reardon.
Anyway, he's got more sense than that baboon he's working for.
There now, we can let our back hair down.
Who planted that Dictaphone?
Oh, probably that silly husband of mine.
As if anyone wouldn't have sense enough to look for a Dictaphone.
How long do you suppose it's been there?
I haven't the faintest idea, but it looks awfully new so I guess it hasn't been used much.
I don't like the silence.
You sure nothing is the matter?
It seems all right.
I don't like it.
Come on, Flannigan, let's go upstairs.
I'll tell you something, but you must promise not to reveal where you got it.
Why, 376, you can trust me.
When I went to the phone just before the shot was fired that night,
I heard someone on the line.
Wrong number?
No, no.
Someone was in the apartment talking on the extension.
Someone was talking on the phone?
Well, there was no one else there but you four and the butler.
The butler.
I knew it was the butler all the time.
No, no, it wasn't the butler.
I know his voice.
Well, who was it?
I don't know.
What was he talking about?
He was talking to the District
Attorney about gambling.
Talking to the District
Attorney about gambling?
Then it was Shane.
He was talking to the District
Attorney at that time.
He was in the apartment.
I knew it was Shane all along.
All right, Mrs. Fraser, get your things.
We're taking you down to headquarters.
Snooper. You can't do this to my client.
Shut up.
You're under arrest, too.
Is this yours?
You'll have every chance to explain later.
Don't talk, 376.
Don't talk.
Now, Mrs. Fraser, we know there was a man in your apartment.
Who was it?
Shane, Nick Shane.
Shane, huh?
And he wanted $50,000, didn't he? For what?
I owed it to him.
You owed it to him?
What for?
I lost the money playing roulette.
Shane had promised me that he'd...
He'd give me time to pay.
But when this happened he started pressing me.
I couldn't give him the money.
I didn't have it.
Shane seems to have done all right with that joint of his.
Did you know that Anne Calhoun had lost money there?
Why, yes.
We were there together when we both lost.
And what about the remark that
Shane used to be the boyfriend?
It's true.
I was a showgirl in Chicago then.
I thought I'd left all that behind me when I married Walter.
All right, Mrs. Fraser, that's all.
You won't be disturbed again.
I promise.
Thank you.
Goodnight.
Goodnight.
Well, that seems to let her out.
Whom do you suspect now?
What about this guy, Shane?
He keeps turning up in this case.
Shane is a gambler who uses strong-arm methods to collect, they all do.
Just the same,
I'm not overlooking the fact that Fraser took his girl away from him.
I wish somebody would do the same thing for me.
What did Lola Fraser tell you after you cut that wire?
It's a good reading light if I had anything to read.
Oh, you're out of matches.
Here's some.
What did Lola Fraser tell you after you cut that wire?
She made me promise not to tell anyone, so don't you repeat it.
I won't.
It was just by accident that she found out about it.
Found out about what?
Oh. Oh, no.
I couldn't betray her confidence.
It's my Girl Scout training.
Can you tie knots?
Hello, darling.
You're wasting your time.
What did she tell you?
What did she tell you?
What did she tell you?
Now, Mrs. Reardon, we know Lola
Fraser told you something.
Ten to one it wasn't important, but if you'll just spill it we'd...
Well, we can all get some sleep.
Are you sleepy?
Why don't you drink some strong black coffee.
That clock.
Bother you?
No, no, I just wondered if that's the right time.
I have an appointment, you know.
Fogerty, will you please stop that?
My, you're a nervous type, Mr. Flannigan.
What you need is fresh air and exercise.
Unless I can use a hose on her, I give up.
She's your wife.
Haven't you any influence with her?
I think she'd talk if I promised to resign this job and go back to our office.
Tell her you'll do it.
Promise her anything.
Okay.
Good morning, darling.
That's all, boys.
Well, it's another day, isn't it?
Listen, honey,
I want you to try to realize how serious this is.
Gosh, Bill, I love you.
Listen, a man has been murdered, the killer must be found.
Well, if you'd let me out maybe I could...
But this is a matter for the police.
Now, if you'll work with them I'll...
I'll promise to take another try at that office of ours.
Cross your heart?
Cross my heart.
Well, Lola told me that a few minutes before the shot was fired she picked up the phone.
A man was talking to the District
Attorney about gambling.
Shane.
Yes.
I told that fathead boss of yours so at the beginning and he wouldn't listen to me. Bless you.
Fogerty.
How much does that perfume of Mrs. Fraser's cost?
$25 an ounce.
I'll buy you a whole gallon of it.
Keep her here, Fogerty.
I'm coming, too.
Hang on to her!
Lola Fraser overheard your conversation with Shane on the Marlowe telephone.
But you checked on their phone, no calls came out of there.
I know there's no record of it.
I don't know where Shane phoned from or how the wires got crossed, but I do know that call was planned in advance as an alibi.
That means Shane is the killer.
That's what your wife said.
Well, even so it might be true.
Goodbye, angel. Keep her locked up before she gets another clue.
I like this one.
Put her in a cell.
It will be a pleasure.
I'm sure Mr. Shane didn't come in at all last night.
Give me the key.
You wait here.
Send out a call to have Shane picked up.
I'll take a look around.
Yes, sir.
Mrs. Reardon.
Well, what are they going to do to me now?
It's Mr. Ketterling.
He's arranged for your release.
Calling all cars.
Calling all cars.
Arrest Nick Shane, wanted for murder.
Description, 40 years, dark complexion, slight build, armed and desperate, take no chances.
Well, keep on ringing.
How long ago was
Mrs. Reardon released?
About a half an hour ago.
Ketterling showed up with a writ of habeas corpus.
Well, take a man with you and get over to the Reardon apartment right away. Yes, sir.
And send another man over to
Shane's hotel to warn Bill.
Yes, sir.
No, no, no, keep on ringing.
He might answer it.
Perfume.
It's no use, Bill Reardon,
I wouldn't forgive you for all the perfume in the world.
Bill. Bill.
Where are you?
Bill, oh, don't hide.
Where did you put the perfume?
Oh, quit horsing around will you, once is...
Break it in.
It's Nick Shane.
I'm glad you're doing a little investigating around here.
It's been awful lonesome.
Yeah.
Hold that.
What's that?
It's a handy little instrument for unlocking doors.
It works.
Give me that.
What are you going to do now?
Try to find out where Shane telephoned the DA from.
I found it.
Perfume.
I guess this guy got what was coming to him.
We got orders to keep you right here.
I'm weak in the knees.
Don't faint, lady.
Smelling salts in the bathroom, will you help me?
Oh, sure.
Of course. Certainly.
Please.
Oh, excuse me.
Are you all right, lady?
What's the trouble, Mrs. Reardon?
Oh hello. It's nothing.
Um, uh, how's the baby?
Oh, just fine.
He's got a tooth.
Oh, swell.
Are you by any chance going down Park Avenue near 54th Street?
Well, it's a little bit off our beat.
But seeing it's you.
Thank you.
Everything's dead around here anyway.
I'm calling the DA's private wire.
Will he be surprised.
Hello. Hello, chief.
Listen, I think I've busted the Fraser murder wide open.
Yeah. I got Shane right where we want him.
I think I know who hired him to do the job, too.
I bet you can't guess where I'm phoning from.
No, I can't, but you'd better get home.
Shane was just found murdered in your apartment.
What?
Well, where's Sally?
Where's my wife?
The police have her in your apartment.
Hey, where are you going?
Thanks a million.
You don't know what you've done for me.
Okay, Mrs. Reardon.
Any time.
There's one fine little woman.
I want to see Mrs. Fraser.
I'm sorry, she isn't in. I'll wait.
Who is it, Mary?
Mrs. Fraser is packing up to go away.
She can't see anyone.
Just tell her it's Mrs. Reardon.
She'll see me.
I'm sorry, Mrs. Reardon, but I'm terribly busy.
This won't take a minute.
It's very embarrassing when a client commits a murder, especially when they think I did it.
What are you talking about?
Nick Shane.
Why'd you kill him?
Are you crazy?
You don't seem very surprised that he's dead.
As a matter of fact, I'm not.
He was always being threatened.
People were afraid of him and hated him.
And you hated and feared him, too, didn't you?
Yes, I did, but I didn't kill him.
Where did you get that?
I'm sorry, Mrs. Fraser.
I found it beside the body.
All right, I did kill him.
Now don't you worry, we'll plead insanity.
Yes, sir, that Mrs. Reardon is one wonderful little lady.
You bet she is.
That Reardon is a lucky guy.
You know, if I wasn't married so happy, I...
Calling all cars.
Be on the lookout for Mrs. Sally Reardon.
Height five feet, three inches, weight 110 pounds, complexion blonde, suspicion of murder.
Pick her up, bring her in.
If you wasn't married so happy...
Hey, Bill, your missus is up at
Park Avenue and 54th Street.
How do you know?
We took her up there.
That's Lola Fraser's place.
That crazy kid'll get herself pumped full of holes. Step on it.
Come on, get back.
All right, and don't forget my picture on the front page.
Yes, I have an awfully cute one in a bathing suit.
Any time. Goodbye.
Sally, are you all right?
Of course.
Here's her confession.
But she did it in self-defense.
She came to my apartment to see me with no intention of killing anyone.
She was minding her own business, but this fellow Shane came along and made an awful row because she told me that he was guilty.
Then he pulled a knife on her and the first thing you know, one thing led to another and here it is in the confession. See?
And you are dope enough to believe all that?
I'm ready.
Ready for what?
Ready for the truth?
Walter Fraser wanted to divorce you, his lawyer is willing to swear to that, but you weren't willing to accept the settlement he offered.
You knew as his widow you could get a lot more than that, so you offered Shane
$50,000 to kill him.
That was a gambling debt.
Yeah, that's what you told me before, but Shane's books show that you never lost over $200 at roulette.
Then after Shane had killed him, he began threatening you, pressing you for the money.
You realized that $50,000 was just the beginning so you deliberately killed him.
Take her away.
Wow, what a client.
Listen, honey, how did you happen to suspect her in the first place?
Yes, do you mind telling an old baboon?
Well, when I got home the apartment was still full of her perfume.
Then when I accused her and she didn't ask how or when he was killed,
I knew she'd done it.
And you managed to get a confession with no more than that to go on?
Well, I pretended I'd found her handkerchief beside the body.
Where did you find it?
Right here in her grip.
There are a lot of them, see?
Mr. Reardon, how about one with your pants on?
Sure.
So it was the widow, eh?
Yes, yes,
I suspected her at first.
That is,
Mr. Reardon here had traced a previous connection with Shane, so he and
Mrs. Reardon had...
What are you signing?
I'm going to get
$500 for the story.
For this story?
No, the love life of a girl detective.
Bill, don't be angry.
I wasn't going to give them any of the real inside dope.
Come on. Let's get.
Hi, Murray.
Hello, Sam.
Well, hiya, Bill.
Hiya, Murray. Hiya, Captain.
How 'bout a splash of hot java?
Coming up. Hiya, Doc.
How are you, Baggs?
Why, you old ticket puncher, I thought you'd pulled the pin on us and left.
Sure have, Murray. Got myself as pretty a piece of land as you ever saw.
Say, who's the new brakie?
Him? Oh, that's Willie Figg.
Willie, meet Mr. Murray Sinclair, our wrecking boss. Glad to know ya, Willie.
And don't forget, Willie. When you pile 'em up, there's a poor goat that's gotta clean up the mess
What are you doing out this way,
Murray? There was a wreck, wasn't there?
Nah. Just a rock slide and a broken arm. Lost a couple of empties.
- Hardly worth the trip, was it, Doc?
- No. Hardly. Hardly.
- You sound disappointed, Murray.
- Yeah. The bigger they are, the better I like 'em
It ain't like the old days, Bill.
The roadbed's as flat as a pool table.
All this new equipment, inspections every time you turn around...
In a few years, we'll be railroading in a dress suit, the way things are goin;
Get this: "Warning, all personnel, Rocky Mountain division.
"Barton Brothers held up Cheyenne
Express last week. Guard murdered.
Barton's heading your vicinity. "
Why, the dirty, murdering snakes.
Yeah, but look what else it says:
"Luke Smith detailed to case.
'Give him every cooperation.
Luke Smith?
Signed,
P.L. Bucks, President. "
Let me see that.
Good old Smitty.
Now, there's a guy.
You know him?
You hear that?
He asked me do I know him. Why, we were practically weaned off the same bottle.
Came west, started railroading together right here on this division.
Yes. Smith rode shotgun for us in the payroll car. Sure.
A couple of years, me and Smitty roomed together at Emmy's. Remember?
Yeah. Yeah. That was before
Marian and I were married.
Now he's way up there...
Whispering Smith.
Trouble-shooter for President Bucks himself.
Guys like Smitty they don't make anymore.
What's he like? Well, he's sort of quiet and gentle-like.
Till somebody spits in his eye. Then he's like a rattler.
He just naturally unwraps himself.
Why, I've seen him toss six slugs into a gent's belly button and never even seen him draw his guns
Yeah, but why do they call him "Whispering Smith"?
Sonny boy, if you ever run off with the company payroll... and you hear somebody behind you talkin' low and quiet, it's Whispering Smith and you're in trouble
What in the blazes? What does he think he's doing up there?
Hey, you, Willie. Get forward and tell that hogger to keep rollin'.
Maybe somebody's trying to flag us down. Yeah. Maybe the Barton Boys.
Better get back.
Looking for someone?
Smitty! Smitty, we were just talking about you.
How are ya, anyhow? Get away from me, you big buffalo.
What have you been doing with yourself? Hello, Baggy.
Hiya, Cap. Well, Doc, this is just like coming home.
Come here, sweetheart. Let me look at you. Boy, it's good to see you.
You too, Murray. Here. Let me help you off with these wet things.
Get him a cup of coffee, Cap. You sure picked a fine night for a walk.
Sit him down. What's the matter with you? Don't you like horses anymore?
Sure. I had one, but they shot it out from under me.
The Bartons?
Yeah. The Bartons.
How do you know?
This wire.
They won't get very far in this weather. The way I see it, they'll hole up in Williams Canyon.
Then maybe you'll be around for a spell, huh? Maybe.
That's great. Boy, when I take you home, Marian's gonna just naturally fall flat on her face.
How is Marian? Wait till you see her, and wait till you see my ranch.
I've got a spread that'll knock your eyes out.
- Where's the next open telegraph station?
- An operator at Coyote Creek, but we don't stop.
I guess we have to. I gotta wire the sheriff at Medicine Bend.
Yes, sir.
Coyote Creek it is.
When's the next train?
Which way?
- Either way.
- There's one due about now, but she don't stop.
She'll stop.
Get out your lantern.
Well? Get out your lantern.
Get movin;
Looks like she's stoppin'.
Sure enough is.
You and Gabby unhook the engine.
I'll see nobody gets off.
Come on. Let's go.
All right, hogger.
Back her up.
I said back her up.
Gabby, stand by to unhook her.
What's the matter, Barton?
Did your horses play out on ya?
Drop that gun on the seat.
Come on.
Get over here.
You hold him.
Smitty.
Smitty, you all right?
Get Barton. The operator...
They've shot him.
Go get Doc. Don't just stand there. Go get him.
Doc can't do anything.
The poor guy's dead.
Hey, Doc! Doc!
They got him!
What? Are ya a crazy fool?
Why didn't you call for help?
Always tryin' to fight the whole world single-handed.
Marian.
Hello, Luke.
Hello, Marian.
The doctor said to keep you warm.
This your place?
Yes. Murray brought you.
Oh.
It's good to have you here, Luke, even if it did take a bullet to bring you.
How bad is it?
You're lucky. By rights, you oughta be dead. Look.
Oh. Oh, I should've had this in my side pocket.
Remember?
Yes, if it's the one
I gave you.
It's the same one, all right.
It was such a long time ago.
Five years is a long time.
Where's Murray?
Asleep.
Oh.
You'd better get some sleep too.
It's almost daylight.
The doctor said the only thing to worry about was fever.
You're gonna be just fine.
Good night, Luke.
Good night, Marian.
Marian?
Yes?
Nothing.
I just want to say thanks for... everything.
Hi, Marian, how 'bout that hot water?
Coming.
All right. All right.
So one of these days, you'll stop a couple of bullets with your teeth, and you'll end up...
I know. I know. I'll end up probate, with coyotes chewing the buttons off my pants.
Luke, such talk!
It's not me. It's Murray.
That's all he's been saying the last two days.
I wish you'd think up some other words.
Now, on the level, Smitty. When are you gonna give up riding herd... on express car bandits and get somethin' for yourself?
Such as what? Well, for one thing, you could quit the railroad and throw in with me.
Huh? Sure. I've got more ranch than one man could ever handle.
You put in with me, you can write your own ticket. We'll run the Circle "Z" 50-50.
What do you say? Well?
Nice offer, Murray.
It just isn't in the cards.
- Why not?
- Well, l... For the first thing, I've got my job.
Job. You call that thing you've got a job? A railroad cop?
I like the railroad, Murray. It's in my blood just like it's in yours.
- You talk to him, will you, Marian? Tell him he's crazy. - I think Luke should decide for himself.
Well, how about it, Smitty?
- Sorry, but thanks just the same.
Well, I'm not begging'.
- You must be out of your mind, though.
- Look out, Murray. You'll cut his throat.
Well, maybe I should.
Let some sense into him.
There.
Now you can pretty him up.
Thanks for the shave.
But next time, use a pair of pliers.
They'll pull out easier. Say, what are you whacking into this skirt for, honey?
I'm shortening it. Ho, ho, ho. You see that, Smitty?
You haven't been here five minutes, and already, she's wanting to show off her legs.
Murray, please!
- All set, Murray?
- Yeah. I'll be right with you.
Where you goin'? Into town. I'm three days late with my report on that wreck.
Old shiny pants'll be bawling' like a stuck calf. "Shiny pants"?
Yeah. The new division superintendent,
George McCloud. You know him? No.
He's a college guy. Got a little book called How to Run a Railroad. Bye.
Take good care of him,
Marian.
What's the trouble, boys? It's that sheepherder,
Rostro. He's back up in the North Flats again.
Yes, and them stinking', woolly maggots has grazed off better than a half section of good cow feed.
- What did you do about it?
- Nothing'. We...
Nothing'? Why, you dumb beef heads, what do you think I'm paying you for?
Go on. Get back up there. Take the dogs and run those blasted sheep clear into the river.
But, Murray, the North Flats don't belong to us. That's government range.
- Rostro has as much right to graze there...
- You keep out of this, will ya?
The trouble with Marian, she been mixing in things that are none of her business and I'm stopping her
Go on! Get goin'!
Don't feel badly, Marian.
He didn't mean it.
You know, sheep'll make any good cattleman edgy.
Thank you, Joe. Cigars in the back. Thanks, Murray.
Hi, Murray.
Hello, Bob.
Hello, Murray.
Hey, George.
Hi there. Hiya, Chief.
What's been keeping ya?
Hello, Murray. How's Smitty?
Doing fine. Just his arm was nicked.
- The doc said it was mostly exhaustion.
- Oh, that's great.
- Why don't you drive back with me and see for yourself? - That's a deal.
- Is all that equipment back from Frenchman's
Flats? - Just checking in now.
Good. Hey, out in the buckboard, fellas, there's a whole mess of cigars.
The crate's a bit mashed, but the smokes are fine. Help yourself.
Thanks a lot, Chief.
Thanks, Murray. Thanks.
Don't thank me. Thank the insurance company. Hey, you'd better get your report in to McCloud.
- He's been yelling his head off.
- Let him yell.
- Good morning. - Well, come on in, McCloud.
Save me a trip to your office.
I suppose you want that report.
Yes.
As a matter of fact, I was rather expecting it day before yesterday.
Oh, you did? Well, I've had a sick man on my hands.
Smith. Yes, I know.
Here it is. And it's all there, unless you'd like it in violet ink.
No, Sinclair. All I'm interested in is its accuracy.
And hereafter, I shall expect these reports immediately you come off a wreck.
Get your hat and coat and let's go.
Rebstock, huh?
Yeah.
Four-X. That's his brand.
Hello, Barney! Hi, Whitey!
Well, hello, Murray.
If this ain't something, huh?
And old Bill Dansing.
How're ya, Bill?
Hello, Rebstock.
You remember Whitey Du Sang.
Yeah. I know him.
- You going to town?
- Oh, just shipping another bunch of cattle.
Say, what's this I hear about Whispering
Smith? Got himself shot up or something, huh?
Yeah.
Pretty bad, huh?
No, no, no, no.
Nothing at all.
Oh, uh.
Well, I'll be seeing ya.
Say, why don't you take a ride out to
Williams Canyon some night for a hand of poker?
Been a long time since me and the boys seen any of that railroad money.
Yeah, I'll do that, Barney.
Well, so long. So long, Whitey.
Giddyap.
Fine.
What's the matter with you, Bill?
I don't like your friends, Murray...
Rebstock, Du Sang.
I know that Whitey. He's as cruel as a soft-nosed bullet.
He'd shoot a dying man just to see him squirm.
He's a beauty.
Did Murray raise him?
No. He's a present from
Barney Rebstock. Rebstock?
You remember him.
Yeah. I remember him.
Quite a spread Murray has here. He's very proud of it.
I'll bet he is.
Luke?
Yes?
It's just a woman's curiosity, but why haven't you ever married?
Well, I never thought
I had enough to offer, at least to one girl
I had in mind.
Then you did have someone in mind?
Yes. l... I had someone in mind, all right.
Was she attractive?
I thought so.
Then you never got around to asking her... to marry you, I mean.
No, I never did.
Do you think that was fair to the girl?
Maybe she was just waiting for you to ask her.
Why didn't you let her decide,
Luke?
Why didn't you?
Well, don't blame the girl too much, Luke.
You can't blame her.
The years pass so quickly.
I know.
Well, there's nothing can be done about it now.
No.
Hiya, Hank. Hello, Smitty!
Am I glad to see you.
Hello, Bill. How are you?
Got yourself another touch of lead poisoning, huh?
Sure look good on you, though. You certainly do.
How's Emmy?
Oh, Emmy's just fine.
Said for me to tell you your old room's all ready and waiting'.
Ah. Having you two kids together again, I could spit nickels.
Go ahead, Bill. Here, Smitty.
Here's a present for you.
And always carry it in your shirt pocket. Oh, well, thanks, Murray.
Well, look at this.
Ready, boys?
Let's go.
Acquaintance be forgot
And never brought to mind
Should auld acquaintance be forgot
In the days of auld lang syne
Met a friend of yours coming out, Smitty. Barney Rebstock.
Uh, Barney heard you'd been shot up. He asked after you.
Yeah. He seemed mighty disappointed when he heard you wasn't buried yet.
Was he headed for town?
Shipping a bunch of steers.
I'll drive back to town with ya, Bill. What for?
A word with Rebstock.
Why don't you keep your big mouth shut? Yeah, why don't I?
Now, wait a minute, Smitty. What's the rush to see Rebstock? I want Barton.
What? Are you crazy? You think he's got
Barton in his hat or somethin'? Yeah.
Why? I got a hunch he's got
Barton holed up in Williams Canyon.
Come on, Bill. Now, look, Smitty.
Let me handle this, will ya?
If your hunch is right, maybe I can persuade Rebstock to turn Barton in.
What are you mixing in this for?
Well, you're certainly in no shape to.
Any other reason?
I don't want any trouble with Rebstock.
Since when has a man like Rebstock, a thief and a cattle rustler, meant anything to you?
If a man's railroading or in the cattle business, he's gotta be friendly with his neighbours.
All right, Murray. Take it easy. This is my job, remember?
This is what Bucks pays me for.
- Good-bye, Murray. Tell Marian thanks for everything. - Yeah. I sure will.
Well, hello, Smith.
Hello there.
Hopping around again, huh? Well, I'm certainly happy it's nothing serious.
- I'd like a word with you, Rebstock. - It'd be a real pleasure, son, but I'm a little busy now.
I wanna get the cattle loaded before...
All right. When?
Well, how 'bout Pete's right after supper?
I'd esteem it a privilege to buy you a drink. I'll be there.
Fine. Come on.
I don't like it, Smitty.
I don't like any part of it.
That Whitey. Did you see his eyes?
They were cutting your liver out.
I'm telling ya, Smitty, you're walking right into it. You, with only one arm.
Aw, take it easy, Bill. Sweet suffering
Moses, boy, why don't you get the sheriff?
Mac? By the time he got on a horse, Barton'd die of old age.
Oh, Mr. McCloud!
Mr. McCloud, I'd like you to meet
Luke Smith. So you're the great Smith.
I don't know about that. Glad to hear it was nothing serious.
Well, thanks.
Heard a lot about you, Smith.
All of it good, I hope.
Good?
Well, according to President
Bucks, you're practically a legend.
He just sent me a wire. He seemed pretty happy about the way you handled the Barton business.
You can tell him the score on the
Bartons is still two down and one to go.
I certainly will.
Luke.!
- Luke!
- I'll be seeing you.
Well, well. How's my boy?
Hello, Emmy.
Ohh.
Oh, Luke, it seems you're always in trouble.
One of these days, you're gonna... Don't worry about me.
The important thing is how are you? Oh, I'm fine, Luke, just fine.
And still got her looks, huh,
Smitty, even if she is falling apart.
Falling apart? You, with your store teeth and your hair coming out.
Say, Emmy, if you've got a horse, I could eat half of it. Supper'll be right on the table.
The sooner, the better, on account of tonight, I gotta see a man... about a dog.
Put him away, Seagrue.
Say, I was down the south meadow.
We'd better get those cattle out of there tomorrow
Take care of it first thing in the morning.
Hi there, honey!
Mm.
Oh, Murray, won't you ever grow up?
If you'll call Luke now, we'll eat. Luke's gone into town.
What for? He had some crazy idea he could nail Barton.
Barton?
Mm-hmm.
Murray, he's in no condition to do that.
That's what I told him, but you know Smitty.
But Barton's dangerous.
He's a killer.
Oh, Murray, why did you let him go? Why?
Anybody'd think Smitty was still in knee britches.
Well, I wouldn't worry about him if he was all right.
Murray, if anything should happen to him, we'd never forgive ourselves, never.
All right, honey. If that's the way you feel about it, I'll drive you into town.
And if you can talk him out of it,
I'll buy you a new hat.
Howdy, Mr. Rebstock. What'll it be? Oh,
I'll take a little of that special...
I thought I told you to stay out of town.
So you did.
So I'm in town.
So what about it?
So you'll be picked up, that's what.
Picked up?
I'm getting out of here.
Did you hear him, Whitey?
He's getting out of here.
Where'd you think you'd be going, son?
There's lots of states in the Union, ain't there?
Son, you can hit the trail from here to China, and every mile of the way,
Whispering Smith'll be breathing down the back of your neck.
Smith?
Yes.
The guy that as long as you live'll be keeping you on the jump.
Hiding out in back rooms. Afraid to walk up to a bar and take your liquor like a man.
Yeah. Smith.
Maybe Blake likes to run.
Who's running'?
You are.
And that's something I've gotta see. A growed-up running from the guy that killed his two brothers.
Why, if you had the guts of a grasshopper, son, you'd call Smith's hand.
You're better off dead than sweating every time a door opens.
And it's gonna open pretty soon now, because Smith's on his way over here.
Where ya goin', son?
Outside.
Me and Smith are gonna need plenty of elbow room.
Say, Blake...
What?
If you need any help...
You wait out here.
Smitty, why don't you listen to reason? You wanna help me, don't you?
You know I do. You stay out here and keep your eyes open.
Well, well. So here you are. Sit you down, son.
Sit down.
Well, you see, Whitey and me's all ready for you.
There we are.
Now then, son, just what's on your mind?
Any favour me and Whitey can do for ya'll be a real pleasure.
- Won't it, Whitey?
- Rebstock, I'll not waste your time, and I'll thank you not to waste mine.
You've got Blake Barton.
I want him.
Well, that's just fine, son, just fine and dandy.
And how would you like him wrapped up... fancy-like, with pink ribbons, or just plain?
Don't be a clown, Rebstock.
- Ain't you got enough troubles?
- Yeah. You want part of 'em?
Keep your hands on that table, or I'll blast you out of the chair. Now, boys, boys, boys. Listen.
Listen, son. You got me all wrong. If we had
Barton, it'd be a pleasure to turn him in.
I know enough polecats without hiding out one of his stripe.
No, sir. You certainly have got me all wrong.
I'll tell you what I'll do, Rebstock.
I'll give you 48 hours to run Barton out of Williams Canyon.
If you don't,
I'm coming in after him.
And that might not be too good for you.
Give me three cards.
Hello, Bill.
Hello, Doc.
Smitty, just saw him walking' down the track... looked like Barton. Don't look.
Get under cover.
Smitty.
You heard me.
I said get under cover.
Good night, Doc.
Hey, come on! This way!
You got him.! Good boy.!
Nice goin', Mr. Smith.
I heard the shooting', and l... Yeah, we know. So you stopped to shine up your badge.
Take over, Sheriff. I certainly will, Mr. Smith.
And don't fall down no gopher holes.
What's the matter, Du Sang?
Are you losing your touch?
Quit worrying', Marian.
Quit worrying'.
Did you see them?
That's Rebstock and Du Sang.
Aw, stop acting like you were his nurse or somethin'.
Hi there.
Luke! Luke!
Luke. Why, Marian, what's the matter?
Oh, I was so afraid. I was so worried that... There's nothing to worry about.
I'm all right.
See? I'm all in one piece.
Hiya, Smitty.
So long, Luke.
Oh, where have you been
Billy boy, Billy boy
Oh, where have you been charming Billy
I have been to seek a wife
She's the darling of my life
She's a young thing
And cannot leave her mother
- Emmy, what's the time? - It's an hour past breakfast, that's what time it is.
He could stay in bed all day.
Can she bake a cherry pie
Billy boy, Billy boy
Can she bake a cherry pie charming Billy
She can bake a cherry pie quick as cat can wink its eye
She's a young thing
And cannot leave her mother
You shouldn't have bothered, Emmy. I've gotta make the most of ya while I got ya.
Ohh, bless you.
Drink your coffee before it gets cold.
Good morning, Doc.
Emmy.
Hello, Doc.
How are you, Smitty?
Hello, Baggs.
How's that flipper coming along?
Oh, good as new, thanks.
Fine. Fine.
You know, that's four slugs I've dug out of him. Sort of saving them up.
Bobby, shake hands with Mr.
Smith. Bobby's my grandson.
He's been batching with me out at the ranch a spell. Oh. Glad to meet you, Bobby.
Say, are you Whispering Smith?
That's what they tell me.
Aw, gee.
Is this your dog?
Yeah. That's Holy Moses.
Hmm. What's he got in his mouth?
Huh? Well.
You oughta take a lesson from your dog, learn to save your money.
Smitty, we've gotta be running along. All right, Doc.
So long, Luke.
Bye, Baggs.
Take it easy, boy.
Good-bye, Bobby.
Bye, Mr. Smith.
Come on, Bobby.
We'll try again later.
Hiya, boy.
Good morning, Bill.
You still thinking' about leaving town today? I think so.
Oh, Bill?
Yeah?
Before I go, there's something I've been meaning to ask you. What is it?
It isn't easy. It's...
Well, it's about Murray.
Since when's there ever been anything about Murray that wasn't easy?
- Now, don't get sore.
- I ain't sore. I'm just asking'.
How do you explain his friends? Rebstock,
Du Sang... the Williams Canyon outfit?
Murray's a growed man, ain't he?
- Or we still gotta pick his playmate?
- Look, Bill. This is your house.
You don't have to listen if you don't wanna. I'm listening.
All right. How much do you figure he makes railroadin'?
I don't know.
I never seen his paycheque.
120 a month, maybe 200, but not any more.
- What are you getting at?
- His ranch.
How do you figure he can build up a spread like that?
- Not on what the railroad's paying him.
- Smitty,
I ain't sore and I ain't mad, but I'm telling ya, see...
Whatever Murray's doin' or ain't doin',
I don't think it's any of your business.
You're wrong, Bill.
He's the best friend I've got, the greatest guy that ever pulled on a boot.
When I see him heading' for an open switch, that's my business.
And it's yours too.
Yeah. Yeah,
I guess you're right.
Here. Quit loafing and get to work.
Well, Smitty, if I don't see ya... I'll see ya before I leave.
Good-bye, Emmy.
Bye.
Well, where do you think you'll go from here?
Utah, Nevada, California.
- I'll let Bucks worry about that.
- Oh, Luke, why don't you stay?
You know why
I don't want to stay, Emmy.
Never wanted to come here in the first place.
A wreck!
Baggs!
Anybody hurt?
Smith, I'm taking a run out to the wreck.
I'd consider it a favour if you'd come with me. I'd be glad to.
Slack off!
Give me that hook over here, Bill.
Okay. Take it away!
It's all yours, boys.
Look out below.!
Check this one, will ya, Bill?
How we doin', Seagrue? First rate.
Here, Seagrue.
Here you go, men.
Cigars on the house.
Seagrue.
Thanks.
Now, look. When you get a load, take it over to Rebstock's place and come right back here.
Sure will.
Where do you want this barrel?
Let's set it up over here,
Frank.
Easy, Murray.
That case ain't even damaged.
Well, it is now.
Look, boys! Come and get it!
Hiya, Murray.
Hi, Smitty. Why, you old buzzard, you. What are you doing out here?
I thought I'd come around and kick the lead out of your pants.
Sinclair, is this brandy?
Yeah, sure. Have some.
It'll make a man out of you.
You realize, of course, that drinking on the job is against the rules.
Sweating out here in the hot sun like this, a man needs more in his guts than plain water.
Isn't that right, fellas?
That's right.
- These cigars. Are they off the wreck too?
- Where else?
Sinclair, I'll give you five minutes; then I'll expect these men back at work.
Why, you...
Take it easy, Murray.
He's only trying to do his job.
He's got a lot to learn yet.
Maybe I should learn him with a pick handle.
Why don't you try giving him a break?
Maybe he'll learn as he goes along, huh?
What's that you're loading?
Oh, just some stuff that... some stuff that got busted up in the wreck, I guess.
You got a match?
Driver?
Yeah?
Whose wagon is this?
- Hey, Murray!
- Yeah!
Fella here wants to know whose wagon this is.
It's mine, and these men are off my ranch.
What is all this? It's just exactly what you see... damaged merchandise, mostly junk.
Where are you hauling it?
What's it to you where we're hauling it?
Junk, huh?
Personally, I'd call it loot.
McCloud, I don't like that word.
Hauling away about $2,000 worth of perfectly sound merchandise,
I think loot's the right word.
As long as there's been a railroad, stuff like this has been for the wrecking crews.
Am I right, boys?
That's one of the things
Bucks sent me here to stop.
Sinclair, you'll unload that wagon.
Dansing, set this stuff back on the right-of-way.
All right, boys... I'll brain the first man that lays a hand on it!
That's right, Murray!
Murray, I think we can talk this over quietly, the three of us.
Now, you stay out of this, Smith.
This is between me and McCloud.
No, Murray, it's between you and the railroad. And I'm afraid that cuts me in.
All right, boys. Clear the tracks.
And lay off my crew, will ya?
If you want my job, say so, and I'll quit.
No, Murray. I'm only asking to talk this over. Come on.
Anything you got to say, you can say right here, but say it fast.
That wreck's gonna sit across the tracks until this thing's settled.
You mean, it's either your way, or you'll tap the whole line, is that it?
That's it. Murray, I still think we can talk it over.
Sure, we can, but it'll never be your way.
Bill, you heard what
Mr. McCloud said.
Start unloading that wagon. All right,
Seagrue. Get movin'. Haul that load out of here.
Seagrue, if you move those mules,
I'll shoot them from between the traces.
All right, Bill.
Unload that wagon.
You want this stuff, huh?
By Judas, you'll have it!
Come on, boys! Lend a hand!
Here's a dress for ya!
- Sinclair, you're fired.
- That suits me fine, just fine!
And me too! And give 'em mine.
Sure, I'm sticking with Murray!
You boys were through the moment you got on that wagon.
You know the trouble with you, Smith. You've worn a marshal's badge so long, you now smell like one.
All right, Seagrue. Let's go. We'll cool off at the ranch with a few drinks.
Hyah.! Here we come.! Giddyap, there.! Come on.! Giddyap, there.!
Come on. Break it up!
All right, men. Get back to work!
Sinclair's a pretty tough customer.
No, he's not tough.
Just hog-headed stubborn, that's all.
Get back to work.! Come on. Clear off that track.! Right or wrong, once Murray starts something, he'll finish it, regardless.
Somehow, we have to fix this up, McCloud.
He's too good a man to lose.
That McCloud, sticking his big nose in.
I bet he just about busted his neck getting his report into Bucks.
You know Murray.
Try shoving him around, and he'll beat your brains out just for the fun of it.
McCloud just doesn't know how to handle him.
- It's past 8:00.
- Bill should be back.
Do you think he'll have talked
Murray into coming with him?
There's a chance.
Like I said the other day...
Marian!
Hello, Emmy.
Hello, dear. Hello, Luke. Hello, Marian.
I just got in with Murray and Bill.
They stopped off at Pete's to have a drink.
Poor Murray.
I guess he really needed one.
He'll be right over.
Bill told us that you'd wired Bucks, interceding for Murray.
I've been praying all the way into town that'll it'll work out all right.
Now, don't worry, Marian.
Bucks has never turned me down yet, and he won't now.
When do you expect an answer from him?
Any minute.
He... He knows I'm leaving.
Leaving? When?
Tonight.
Oh.
Come on, Bill.!
Oh!
Emmy!
W- Well.
How's my sweetheart?
Phew! How many you boys had? We only...
Liar!
Hi there!
Hi, yourself.
I guess I sort of jumped the tracks a little this morning, Smitty.
I'm sorry.
Forget it, Murray.
Smitty, you're all right.
Same ol' Smitty, huh, Marian?
Always turning the other cheek.
Not always, Murray.
Say, Bill tells me you wired Bucks.
Yes, we should have an answer by now.
See, honey? There's nothing to worry about... not a thing.
Smitty wired Bucks, and what
Smitty says goes, huh, Smitty?
Hello, Bill.
Telegram for Mr. Smith.
Thanks, Mickey.
All right.
Thanks, Bill.
I'm... sorry, Murray.
Looks like Bucks is getting himself quite an education.
There are some pretty fancy words here.
"Appreciate your intervention,
"but am convinced that Sinclair has outlived his usefulness.
This decision is final."
Well, you didn't do so well, did you, Smitty?
I'm sure
Luke did all he could.
Yeah, I'll bet he did.
Murray.
Luke is leaving town tonight.
Oh?
Yeah?
I'm afraid Bucks has made a mistake...
a big mistake.
Luke, that'll be your train.
I'd better be getting on it.
Come on, girls.
Let's go see him off.
Good-bye, Emmy.
Good-bye, Luke.
Sure felt like coming home.
God bless you.
Come back soon. Promise, now. Sure.
All aboard.!
Good-bye, Marian.
Take care of yourself.
I'm sorry
Murray acted the way he did.
You can't blame him.
He's disappointed, and so am I.
Tell him I'll try again when I get to Chicago.
Thanks, Luke.
Please write.
Sure. You do the same.
All aboard! So long, Bill.
So long. Take it easy, boy.
Oh, Bill!
Yeah?
Take care of Murray for me, will you? I sure will, Smitty. I sure will.
If you've got the price, we've sure got the thirst! Well, Murray.!
Come on down here.
Sit down, son.
Waiter, another glass here for Mr. Sinclair.
Well, son, I hear you've been having your troubles.
As I always say, when a man's having his troubles, that's when a man needs his friends.
They fired me, Barney.
I guess it's somethin'
I haven't got through my head yet.
So they fired ya, huh?
Well, well.
You know, from where I sit, it looks as though that McCloud just did ya a big favour.
He done me a big favour too.
'Cause it gives me a chance to speak what's been on my mind for a long time.
Listen, son. I'm getting old, kind of stiff in the saddle.
I need a partner, a man with some guts under his belt, like you.
Come on in with me, Murray. What we've made before will be just nothing'.
We can make ourselves a real killing'.
Well, one thing I'll tell you:
Bucks thinks he can run this division without me.
All right. Let him try.
What was it this time?
Same old thing.
Stock train piled up this side of Smoky Creek.
You look a sight. I saw you comin' and put the coffee on.
Fine.
I guess bad luck, like they say, comes all in a lump.
This ain't no "bad luck"... bridges burned, switches left open, journals sanded, freight lost in shipment, cattle stolen from right out of the cars.
No. This is something that's all been figured out.
Do we know who's doing it?
Don't ask me that. Of course we know who's doing it!
And so does everybody from here to Cheyenne!
If he only had the wit to realize it, the fool!
Guaranteed
Cherokee Indian snake oil!
Folks, it'll cure anything that happens to be wrong with you.
I had a woman who come to me not long ago. This woman suffered from insomnia.
I've got a letter from her here.
I want to read you this letter.
It says here,
"Unless you leave town immedia..."
No, that's not it.
That's a personal letter, my friends.
I'll drop you off here, huh? I thought we were going to spend a quiet evening with Emmy and Bill.
This genuine Indian snake oil... Maybe that's what you need, honey... a shot of snake oil.
You've sure been looking kind of puny. Have I?
Yeah, kind of mopey, puttering around the house like a sick hen.
I'm sorry, Murray.
And stop being sorry so much.
Every time I open my mouth, you're sorry.
I'm sorry, honey.
Now you've got me doing it.
Hello, Murray. Hi there! How's my big boy?
The wife.
Friends of Rebstock's.
Yes. I should imagine.
Well, if it ain't the little lady herself, slick as a daisy and twice as pretty.
I sure am sorry if the boys have been disturbing your sleep these nights.
I keep telling 'em, but sometimes they don't realize they're not at home.
Well, l... Maybe I'll go and get myself a drink, and, uh, I'll be seeing ya, huh?
Yeah.
Why didn't you just spit in his eye and get it over with?
Marian, what's come over you lately?
Nothing.
You're not fooling me.
A man knows when he's not wanted, when he's being treated like he was poison or something.
That's not true, Murray.
Yes, it is.
Instead of sulking around like a spoiled kid, if you've got something against me, why don't you say so?
All right. I'll tell you.
I haven't changed, Murray.
You have. Something terrible has happened to you.
I knew before you opened your mouth it would be my fault.
I didn't say it was your fault... not entirely. It's your friends'.
My friends? Suppose you leave them out of it? But I can't, Murray.
Because, whatever you're doing, and I'm sure it's something terribly wrong,
I know these men are the cause of it.
They're wicked men, Murray!
I said, leave them out of it.
I'll talk to you later.
Oh, Luke.
Now, Marian.
Oh, Luke, I'm such a fool.
Please forgive me.
When did you get in?
A couple of hours ago.
What brought you back?
Bucks wired me to come.
Bucks?
Is it that bad? I'm afraid the division's had about all it can take.
Murray.
Oh, Luke, please talk to him.
You're his oldest friend.
He'll listen to you. He must!
Marian! How's my honey?
Where'd you pop up from?
I came in with Murray. Is
Emmy inside? Yeah, go on in.
She'll be glad to see you.
Bill, you... you doing anything special?
No.
Come on. Let's take a walk.
Mr. Smith.!
Hello, Sheriff.
Say, you look a little peaked.
Well, if I ain't glad to see you.
Since you've been gone this dang railroad has been running me ragged.
We sure have. One time, we almost had him on his horse, only he'd lost his horse.
Now, that ain't kindly, Bill.
It ain't for a fact.
Have you seen Murray? Murray? Yes, he's in Pete's Saloon. I just left him.
Now, Mr. Smith... Eh... Thanks.
Well...
Care for me, care for me
If we meet in Laramie
Maybe she'll marry me
Gotta go and see, whoo, whoo
- Hello, Smitty.
- Hello, Murray.
- So you're back, huh?
- Looks that way.
And, boy, it's a sight for sore eyes to see ya. Yes, sir.
- What'll it be, son?
- Not a thing, Rebstock.
I'd like to talk to you, Murray.
This Smith, he's gonna start crowding us.
All right. We'll see who can crowd hardest with the most.
Murray, you've been around the railroad a long time.
You know how powerful they are.
You can't buck 'em.
Yeah? Go on.
Well, a lot of things have happened since I've been away.
What's that got to do with me?
I, uh... I just came in from Crawling Stone Flats.
Yeah?
You were there when that last trainload of beef was ditched.
You're crazy.
No, Murray.
The sorrel gelding of yours threw a shoe. I picked it up at the wreck.
I also talked to the man who reshod the horse the next day.
- Are you figuring' to tie me into that wreck?
- No. It's a little tougher than that.
I'm figuring on giving you some advice.
Well, what do you know?
Murray, this town's gone sour on you...
Medicine Bend, the whole territory... and I don't know how you can sweeten it.
You just got off on the wrong foot with the wrong people.
Wrong people?
So Marian's been crying' on your shoulder, huh?
Marian has nothing to do with it.
I've had Rebstock taped out for a long while.
He's poisonous... murder.
Yeah. Go on.
But keep it funny.
All right. You and Rebstock are in this up to your necks.
I could pin it on you from any angle.
You know, Smith, I was just wondering why I ever thought you were something extra special.
Well, here's my advice, Murray.
Pull out. It's a big country.
Go someplace you like.
Get a fresh start.
- Pull out?
- Yes, pull out. I can cover up for you.
My old pal.
Just full of brotherly love and charity, aren't you?
Why, you're trying to frame me, that's what.
You know better than that, Murray.
Sure, you are.!
Me out of the way and you have a clear track with Marian.
Slipped a long ways, haven't you?
What's the matter, Smith?
Does he make you nervous?
You losing your touch?
Don't let it worry ya.
That's only the first round.
Oh, hello, Bill. Luke.
Emmy.
Emmy.
It wasn't any use, was it?
No.
I'm gonna leave him, Luke.
Marian, you can't do that.
If you leave him now, he's finished.
What else can I do?
Every night, he's with those unspeakable men, here in town, out at the ranch.
They're destroying him, Luke.
Marian, I know how you feel.
Half the time,
I feel that way about him myself.
But we can't let him down now.
Right now, he needs you more than he's ever needed anybody in his life.
But what can I do?
Take him away, make him sell the ranch, leave here.
I've tried and failed.
Now it's up to you.
Is that what you really want me to do?
It's more than that.
It's what you must do.
It's his only chance.
Marian.! Marian.!
Let's finish the game at Murray's.
I say, do you think she's gonna like this?
We'll wait for you, Murray.
Okay.
Yes.
Look, honey. Did you really mean what you said on the way home tonight... about us leaving here?
Yes.
You're sure that's what you want?
It's the only way, Murray.
I'm sure of it.
Well, that's all I want to know.
Where are you going?
I'm gonna ride a ways with Barney.
There's a... little deal
I've got to clean up with him.
You better get yourself some sleep.
Let's go.
Come on.
All right. Don't move.
Put 'em up!
Second section of Number Three. They jumped her while she was taking water at Tower "W."
Killed the guard and got away with all the money.
"They"? Who's "they"? We don't know. They were all masked.
Sheriff, how long would it take you to round up a dozen men who can ride and shoot?
Why, uh, you'll have all the men you need in half an hour.
Good. Bill, you get an engine and two stock cars.
Have them spotted at the loading corral. Right away.
McCloud, I want a clear track from here to Tower "W."
Smith, I can ride, and I can shoot.
I wish you'd let me come along.
I feel partly responsible for this.
Sure, I'd be glad to have you.
Thanks.
Got that straight, Sheriff? We ride to Williams
Canyon, turn back anybody who tries to get in.
That's right.
We'll pick up the trail at Tower "W."
If it's Rebstock's outfit, we should have 'em between us this afternoon.
All right. Good luck, boys. Same to you, Mr. Smith. Come on. Hup!
All set? They've got a three-hour head start on us. We've got to travel.
Luke, take care of him, won't you? Bill, I mean. Sure, I'll keep my eye on him, Emmy.
Look out for yourself too, will you? Yeah.
It's hard to tell, Mr. Smith. It all happened so fast. How many were there?
Not more than six.
Anyone you know?
Uh-uh. Anyone you could identify if you saw 'em again?
No. You see, they all had handkerchiefs over... Wait a minute.
Yeah, one of them had long hair, sort of whitish.
Yeah,
I could nail him anyplace.
Du Sang. Well, thanks,
Woody. You've done fine.
Well, that kind of ties things together. Yeah, the Rebstock outfit.
All right, boys. Get goin'. A little fast riding, you can catch up with the sheriff's outfit.
I'll meet you at Williams
Canyon. Good luck, Smitty!
So long, boys! Good luck!
Good hunting, boys!
Smitty, is Murray in this? I don't know.
That's what I gotta find out. Come on.
Hello, Marian.
Hello, Luke.
Murray home?
No.
Do you know where he is?
He rode out with Rebstock... last night.
Where's Karg?
He went with him.
And Seagrue?
Yes.
Have you any idea where they went?
To Williams Canyon, at least I think so.
You see, last night on the way home,
I talked to Murray, just as you asked me to.
I finally persuaded him that we should go away.
Then he got the idea of selling out to Rebstock.
What's the matter, Luke?
Early this morning at Tower "W,"
Rebstock's outfit held up Number Three.
Made off with a lot of money.
The worst of it was they killed a guard.
Do you think Murray had any part in it?
I wish I could say no.
Marian, you'd better go to Emmy's.
There we are. This is your share,
Murray, and this is for your ranch.
There's yours, Whitey.
Well, boys, I guess that's it.
What is it, Barney, the thin end?
Barney.! Barney.!
They're comin', Barney.
Who's comin'?
Smith, with a posse! I told you they'd be here, you murdering half-wit!
Well, it's no use talking about that now!
Get your rifles, men!
One man behind a rock is worth three in the open. Barney, you're crazy!
I'm getting outta here the back way! This is a hanging'!
I'm with ya, Murray. Me too. So you're running, huh?
Fine thing. A man thinks he's got men behind him, but when the chips are down...
Aw... Aw, well, never mind me. Come on, boys.
Get on your way. I'll tell you what I'll do.
I'll keep 'em here just as long as I possibly can.
So good-bye, boys, and good luck!
Barney.
Whitey, what are you doing here?
You'd better get out of here, son.
It's you they're coming after.
Got it fixed up all nice and pretty, ain't ya?
For yourself. You stay behind and give us a nice head start, then you meet the posse and throw it all off onto us.
Oh, now, Whitey, son, you know perfectly well that l...
They got Baggs.!
Give him the best ya got, Doc.
McCloud, you'd better stay here with him.
All right, boys. Let's go.
Sounds like somebody got behind us.
Keep pressing 'em, Sheriff. I'm going on back. Right. Come on!
Come on, Bill!
One of you boys better help me plug up this hole. I left a trail a blind man could follow.
I'll get it, Murray.
Looks like it went plumb through.
Come on. Let's get out of here! Yeah.
Ho!
What's the matter?
Out of range.
Out of range, my eye.
You could've hit 'im with a beanshooter.
Come on.
All right, Marian. Get your things together. We're getting out of here.
Well, what are you waiting for?
You want me to sell out and go.
You were at Tower "W."
What do you know about Tower "W"?
Who told you?
Come on. Who told you?
Was it Smith? Was he here?
Yes.
So that's it.
You were running out on me.
No, Murray! No, I was only...
Might as well get this through your head, Marian.
You'll never go with Smith or anyone else as long as I'm alive.
Now, pick up your stuff.
No, Murray! Don't! If you do, they'll never stop until they hang you.
Then go out there and get rid of ‘em. If you don't, I will.
- Why didn't you go to Emmy?
- I had some things to do. I had to pack.
Luke!
I suppose Murray hasn't come back yet.
No.
No, not yet.
If he does, tell him it's best he gives himself up.
Well, that's one time you kissed him off fast.
All right. Now, get the buckboard, and hurry.
Murray, you must give yourself up.
You can't go on...
Yeah, Smitty'd like that.
You heard me.
Get the buckboard.
Marian.
Luke!
Oh, Luke, why did you come back?
Why? Why?
Murray's in the house, isn't he?
Yes, but he's hurt badly.
You and Bill go get the doc.
I'll stay here and see if I can help him.
Oh, Luke, please don't go in there.
Please don't!
He's crazy.
He's like a madman.
Get goin', Bill.
Get that buckboard out of here fast.
Watch your step, Smitty.
Come on, Marian.
Giddyap!
Hyah!
Marian! Marian! Marian!
I'm coming in, Murray.
Hiya, Smitty.
Hi, yourself.
Is it bad?
Yeah. Bad.
Try to take it easy, Murray.
I sent for the doc.
You're wasting his time.
That last one almost cut me in half.
Here, let me...
Get your hand away!
I'm sorry.
Forget it.
Well, that's how it goes.
Ya gotta have the breaks.
You had 'em all, Murray.
I had one, anyway.
I had Marian.
That's one break you didn't get.
Get me a drink, would ya?
It's on the table.
Sure.
Smitty.
Murray, if there'd been any other way,
I'd have played it differently.
You know that, don't you?
The only cards I had were the ones you dealt me.
[Siren wailing]
[Tires screeching]
[Brakes squeal]
[Ambulance door closes]
- Car smash?
- Yeah.
Cement truck hit one of those baby austins.
Fractured skull, i guess.
You know, a man's a fool to ride in those miniature cars.
Be yourself.
This is the guy that drove the truck.
Aww.
- Boy?
- Little girl.
Ah. Ahem. Uh-huh.
Gee, i hope my baby's a boy.
- I'll do my best, archie.
Man: Attagirl, mumsy.
Why can't my son have a screen around his bed?
- It's against the rules.
- But this man has one.
- Yes. He's dying.
- Oh.
[Speaking in foreign language]
[Speaking in foreign language]
Oh, nuts.
What makes you think you want to be a nurse?
Why, nursing people has always seemed sort of a second nature with me.
This is your only recommendation?
Who is this gentleman?
What's his business?
- He's a grocer.
- A grocer?
[Clears thro at]
I'm afraid he knows more about groceries than about hospitals.
What does he mean
"the time you were at high school"?
Didn't you graduate?
No, i had to leave when my mother died in the third year.
Probationary nurse must be a high school graduate.
I can make it up easy.
I can go to night school.
You'll have neither the time nor the strength with work here.
- Oh, i'm sure i would...
- besides, it wouldn't be allowed.
But i'm sufficiently well educated.
There must be some way.
- Not here.
- Oh, i'm sure i can make good if... my decision is final.
[Clears thro at]
[Dillon clears thro at]
- Oh, i'm sorry.
- You are in a hurry, aren't you?
- Did i catch the name?
- Hart. Lora hart.
Hart. That's a good name for a nurse.
Sturdy instrument, the heart.
- Hello, miss dillon.
- Oh, good afternoon, doctor.
Now, what can we do for this young lady?
My dear, why didn't you mention the doctor?
Of course, doctor, anything you say.
Well, now, suppose you telephone the principal of miss hart's high school...
...and if everything is satisfactory, we'll waive the rest.
Oh, thank you, doctor.
I hope you realize what you're letting yourself in for.
Nothing can be too hard.
Now, you take care of her, will you, miss dillon?
I've gotta be going.
This lady will take care of you.
By the way, dillon, you're doing something wonderful with the hospital.
Everything runs like a clock.
Thank you, doctor.
I'm sorry you didn't mention dr. Bell in the beginning.
You'll find life here pleasant enough.
But there's one thing you must understand thoroughly:
Rules mean something.
- I understand.
- You'll be told about them later.
You'll have one hour to yourself each afternoon...
...and your evenings after 7.
But you're to be in bed and lights out at 10.
There are no exceptions.
This decision is final.
[Dillon clears thro at]
- I, ahem, see.
- Ahem.
You have one night out a week until 12...
...and quite a severe penalty if you're out later.
Miss maloney, this is miss hart.
Lora:
How do you do?
Take miss hart to the wardrobe and help her select some uniforms.
She hopes to be a probationer.
- Miss maloney will show you.
- Thank you.
Miss maloney, you have no one sleeping in your room.
Miss hart may go with you.
- Yes, ma'am.
- Yes, miss dillon.
Yes, miss dillon.
[Dillon clears thro at]
Hype, the new probationer.
- Heads or tails?
- Tails.
Heads. Life is going on for you in the same old way.
Say, i was afraid the hospital would burn down before i could get into it.
Now i have to watch myself with matches.
Well, if you hate it so, why do you stay?
It's the only job i know where they pay you to learn.
Oh, i'm sure in your heart you love it.
- Says you.
- Yeah, says me in a big way, sister.
Oh. Goodness. Isn't there a smaller one?
If you don't like it, buy your own.
- I can't. I haven't any money.
- Broke?
In a big way, sister.
Any advice?
- What were you doing with the big shot?
- Who?
Dr. Bell. Say, are you kidding me?
- No, why?
- You don't know bell?
He's the chief of staff.
One of the biggest surgeons in america.
Really?
Why, he just stopped me in the hall and offered to help me.
Hmm.
For a beginner, you're not doing so bad.
We'll see if we can find one that fits.
Here, try that.
- Oh, that's much better.
- You better slip off your dress.
Oh, it's okay.
Oh, i suppose so.
I guess everybody around here has seen more than i've got.
Oh, don't be embarrassed.
You can't show me a thing.
I just came from the delivery room.
Maloney:
What are you doing here, baby-frightener?
I come on behalf of this big institution to welcome the new sister to our midst.
You'll find we're just one big, happy family here.
[Eagan chuckling]
Maloney:
Beat it, eagan.
- You're not sore, are you?
Maloney: I'm not laughing, veterinary.
How'd you like to go back to your sick horses?
Sometimes i don't like you, maloney.
If only i could make that permanent.
What do you say, newcomer?
Lora:
The score is 2-0, favor of the lady.
Eagan:
Hmm.
Take my tip and keep away from interns.
They're like cancer.
The disease is known, but not the cure.
Really?
There's only one guy that can do a nurse any good, a patient with dough.
Catch one with a fever and a low pulse, make him think you saved his life...
...and you'll be getting somewhere.
- Will i?
- And doctors are no good either.
- Oh, no?
What for? They never marry nurses.
And the trouble with interns is they do.
All a wife means to an intern is someone to sit in his office when he starts practice...
...and play nurse the rest of her life without pay.
- Oh, i shouldn't like that.
- Thing to do is to land an appendicitis case.
- They've all got dough.
- Oh.
Gee, you look like an ad for sloan's liniment.
I don't care. As long as it means i'm not gonna be a probe anymore.
[Baby crying]
[Baby crying]
[Baby crying]
[Babies crying]
Oh, dear.
Don't cry.
Yes, it's a shame.
Yes, it's a shame. There, there.
[Crying stops]
[Sighs]
Gee, it's half past 1.
I was afraid old hatchet-face would see us.
You sap.
She'll be in here to see if we're in bed.
Oh. We better get in with all our clothes on.
No, no. Slip your dress off, put it on the end of the bed here.
If she sees that, it's okay.
Gee, if she switches on the lights and sees my makeup, i'm sunk.
- Well, turn your face to the wall.
- Oh, don't get funny.
My makeup goes around the back of my neck.
Hurry up, kid.
If we're caught this time, it means a month of no nights off.
[Lora screams]
Oh, some of that goofy eagan's comedy.
Jump in bed.
I bet hatchet-face heard you.
Oh, i can't. Not with that.
[Knocking]
Psst. Get in.
Come in.
Miss hart, is it possible you have a man in here?
You worm. I hope you get caught in the nurses' quarters.
- You know what you'll get for that.
Eagan: Boo!
[Knocking]
Here he is again.
Let him have it, and make it a bull's-eye.
Come in.
Who threw that slipper?
What, ma'am?
What, miss dillon?
What, miss dillon?
Dillon: Did you throw that slipper?
- I don't know what you're talking about.
Dillon: Well, hart?
- Well, you see, l... dillon: Take two weeks on the night shift at the emergency clinic.
[Laughs]
I thought so. You've both just come in.
- We had to walk home.
- This isn't your first offense, miss maloney.
You'll take four weeks on the same night shift.
- Thank you.
- And take two more for impertinence.
[Dillon clears thro at]
[Door closes]
See what you get for yelling?
Say, suppose you found a skeleton in your bed.
Maloney: If i could dodge that night shift, i'd live with one.
[Lora shivering and whimpering]
Oh, quit your trembling, kid.
It can't walk around.
Dillon's face took all the pep out of it.
Well, at least he can't clear his throat.
[Lora clears thro at and giggles]
[Siren wailing]
Just a scalp wound.
Man: Oh, doctor.
- Hold tight to my hand when it hurts.
You're certainly charitable with that hand of yours.
Was he hit anywhere else?
Sorry, but that's all.
Just put a bandage on him.
Give him a shot of anti-tetanus.
- What's that for?
- Prevents lockjaw.
Lockjaw?
Ask miss maloney about it.
She's been fighting it off all her life.
Grit your teeth, prisoner.
Just two more smart cracks and dr. Mayo is through.
[Man gro ans]
Policeman: Shall i take him to the station house?
Oh, i don't think we'd better.
Let's keep him here tonight.
Yeah, prison ward.
Come on.
Come on.
Policeman: Hey, hey.
Maloney: The tougher, the softer.
Better get us a lift, lunkhead, he's fainted.
Huh?
Oh, all right, florence nightingale.
Could a guy bum some bandages and iodine in here?
- Are you hurt?
- No. It's a friend of mine.
He got a little cut on his hand.
- Come in, i'll see what i can do.
- Oh, maybe i better wait here.
- Come in.
- Ouch!
You're the one that's hurt.
All right, i'll come in.
Let's see your hand.
You'll have to get up earlier than most bootleggers to fool me.
- Huh? How do you get that way?
- We get many like you in here.
- Oh, give us the iodine, will you?
- I'll fix it.
Say, i could do it myself if you'd just give me the... i guess i better sit down.
- Hey, what's the idea?
- It's the arm, isn't it?
Oh, all right.
This one here.
Thanks.
Say, that's silk.
That's how i know you're a bootlegger.
You win.
That looks like a bullet wound.
Well, it's a cinch it ain't a vaccination mark.
I'll have to make a police report of this.
Yeah? Why?
It has to be done on all bullet-wound cases.
- Oh, say, that ain't necessary.
- I have to.
Oh, listen, sister, what's the difference to you?
I could get into trouble if i didn't.
Listen, just give me some bandages and forget you ever saw me.
How did it happen?
Well, a guy was cleaning a gun and it went off.
Oh, nonsense.
Well, that's my story, and a couple of cops with rubber hoses can't make me change it.
Oh.
Where was this man cleaning the gun?
In a limousine.
It hit a bump and the gun went off.
Why did they wanna get you?
Oh, because i won't buy their bum alcohol.
I don't poison people.
Why don't you tell who these men are and have them arrested?
For the same reason you don't squeal about half the raw work you see down here.
What do you mean?
Well, do you?
Why, we have professional ethics.
Yeah? That goes for my line too.
The things my profession keep quiet about, we believe it's for the public's own good.
Yeah? Ditto.
Well, it's gone clear through.
You've lost a lot of blood.
What's up?
Say, that's a bullet wound.
Hey, nobody sent for you.
Go rustle your hot-water bottles.
This is no hot-water bottle.
- Did you get this bird's name and address?
- I don't think that's necessary.
Maloney: Don't you know that you're supposed to report all bullet wounds?
You didn't see any bullet wound.
I didn't?
Say, what's the idea?
Friend of yours?
Thanks, pal.
He'd have to be hot before i'd take a chance like that.
- You said something, sister.
- Hold quiet, will you?
Okay.
Hey, are you really taking a chance?
I'll say she is. All a nurse needs to do is to get into one jam and she's through.
Bootlegger: Yeah?
- Oh, don't talk so much.
You might as well turn in your uniform and quit.
Maybe 56 bucks a week isn't much, but it's 56 bucks.
Hey, is that all they pay you?
Better than selling apples.
That's probably what she'll be doing if she loses her diploma.
Lora:
Shh!
There you are.
It's a nasty cut, but it'll be all right now.
- Dump this.
- Thanks, sister.
My pal.
Eagan:
What's his trouble?
Lora:
He fell down stairs and cut his shoulder.
Eagan: Walks like he'd lost a lot of blood.
Lora: No, just drunk.
Eagan:
Oh.
Hey, maloney, don't forget to wash that bedpan.
And make it shiny.
Yes, do that.
[Maloney clears thro at]
[Bell ringing]
Maloney:
Oh, calm down, lora.
You've seen blood before.
Just because this is your first don't make it worse.
- I know...
- heaven's sakes...
...if you get dizzy or feel faint, keep an eye on me.
Remember, this is the final test.
And if you pass out this time, you don't graduate.
Okay.
Nurse:
Wait a minute.
I almost forgot this.
A man left this here.
He said it was to be given to you before you went into your big test.
He seemed to think you'd know who he was.
- Well, of all the...
- that's what i call a pal.
- What'll i do with it?
- Put it away for her.
But you're not allowed to drink.
What's it good for?
It's swell for cleaning teeth.
[Maloney clears thro at]
[Patient breathing heavily]
Boy, are we lucky to get in on an operation as big as this.
Well, i hope dr. Bell gets away with it.
He's got one chance in a hundred.
[Breathing stops]
Oxygen.
[O xygen hissing]
Does that happen often?
No. But when it does, it's bad news.
It's horrible.
Well, come on, let's get out of here.
My teeth need cleaning.
[Organ playing]
Dillon:
Now, young ladies...
...you who are about to graduate to the noble profession of nursing...
...will recite the florence nightingale pledge.
All:
I solemnly pledge myself before god...
...and in the presence of this assembly...
...to pass my life in purity and practice my profession faithfully.
I will abstain from whatever is deleterious and mischievous...
...and will not take or knowingly administer any harmful drug.
I will do all in my power to elevate the standard of my profession...
...and will hold in confidence...
...all personal matters committed to my keeping...
...and all family affairs coming to my knowledge...
...in the practice of my calling.
With loyalty will i endeavor to aid the physician in his work...
...and devote myself to the welfare...
...of those committed to my care.
Lora:
I'm the new night nurse.
Man:
Oh? For the two little girls?
Yes. I had them at the hospital some months ago.
Poor little kiddies.
It's a long time since i've seen them toddling up these stairs.
[Jazz music playing on record]
- Good night, kiddies.
Girls: Good night, miss maloney.
Lora: Hello there.
- Well, it's about time you showed up.
- I'm dying on my feet.
- How did you wangle me into this job?
I told svengali the kids knew you at the hospital and were crazy about you.
Thanks. Who's svengali?
Dr. Ranger. He's a new one on me.
He's not on any hospital staff i know of, but he's sure the boss around here.
Why did they take dr. Bell off the case?
That's what i'd like to know.
Certainly seems funny to me, replacing a man like dr. Bell with an unknown.
- Say, there's something screwy about this.
- What do you mean?
Since those kids got back from the hospital, they've been living on nothing but milk.
That's no cure for anemia, or malnutrition either.
- I'll say it isn't.
- They were all right at the hospital.
- Dr. Bell said they were getting along great.
- Aren't they improving?
No, they're getting worse.
And i'm beginning to wonder why.
But why should anyone...?
Oh, you're crazy.
Maybe. I don't know a thing.
I just work here.
Any more instructions, miss maloney?
No, miss hart.
Oh, yes, there's a chart pinned up...
...in the kitchenette beyond the children's room.
- Kitchenette?
- Yeah.
Kitchen, bathroom, sitting room with every bedroom.
This dump's a palace.
But not for those kids.
And, say, keep your eye open for old eczema.
- Who?
- Mrs. Maxwell. She's the housekeeper.
Wait till you see her.
Well, so long, honey. I got a date.
- With whom?
- Oh, you don't know him.
A gorgeous new boyfriend.
- Intern?
- I should say not.
I'm not all crazy.
[Lora clears thro at]
[Both laughing]
Children, what are you doing?
Nanny:
Miss hart. Miss hart.
Stop it. Lie down, both of you.
Nanny, you silly little girl.
You shouldn't try things like that.
- You're not strong enough.
- I tried all i could, desney.
Of course you did, nanny.
Poor little baby.
I didn't mean any harm.
I know you didn't, desney.
But now you must both be quiet.
We will, won't we, nanny?
- Yes. We will.
Lora: That's good.
Desney: We like you. Don't we, nanny?
Nanny: Mm-hm.
What's your other name?
You didn't tell us at the hospital.
It's lora. Lora hart.
Lora? We had a sister named lora.
But she's dead.
Oh, poor little baby.
You mustn't talk about her anymore.
Desney:
She was runned over. She was all cut.
Cut in lots of places, wasn't she, nanny?
All over, here and here and here.
Oh, you ought to seen her.
You mustn't think about her.
You must go to sleep, both of you.
Desney:
We didn't see her, but they told us.
Nick told us, and he showed us too.
- Who's nick?
Nanny: He lives here.
- That's not your father, is it?
- No.
Daddy's up in heaven too.
Oh, i'm sorry.
Now, come on, both of you. Into bed.
Nick's not like daddy.
Daddy was a nice man.
Isn't nick a nice man?
No. He's a horrid man. Isn't he, nanny?
[Nanny crying]
Lora:
Oh, nanny, darling, don't cry, honey.
Such a nice home, lovely things...
...and you're going to get well real soon.
It isn't a lovely home.
We didn't wanna come home.
Did we, nanny?
Nanny:
No.
Desney:
Nick scares us.
Doesn't he, nanny?
He says the most awful things.
Lora: You should tell your mother.
Desney: We can't.
She won't come and see us anymore.
Why aren't you two asleep?
- They shouldn't be kept awake like this.
- I've been trying to make them go to sleep.
Desney: That's true.
- Then why didn't you?
We were hungry. Weren't we, nanny?
Maxwell:
Hungry? Don't be absurd.
But we are hungry. We're always hungry.
- I want to speak to you.
Lora: Are you mrs. Maxwell?
Yes. I have charge of the children.
I don't want to hear another word out of you, either of you.
I wish we had something to eat.
Shh, or she'll come back.
Miss hart, i must warn you not to be upset by anything the children may tell you.
They've been very sick.
Yes, i know.
I had charge of them at the hospital.
Oh.
Since they've been home, they've had bad dreams. Nightmares.
Dr. Ranger says that's all part of their illness.
But they're too young to know the difference between dreams and facts.
You must realize that whenever they tell you anything.
I see. Thank you.
That's all i had to say.
[Man laughing]
[Woman screams]
[Knocking]
Who are you?
What do you want?
[Slurring]
A lady needs a little assistance.
What lady?
Shh. You'll never guess.
[Jazz music playing on record]
Lora: What happened?
Mack: She passed out.
Who is it, mrs. Ritchey?
The children's mother?
Hm? What did you say?
[Ritchey gro aning]
Are you going to be decent and leave?
I've got to undress her.
It's all right.
Just the type.
Huh?
What did you say?
- Come here.
- Cut that out.
[Mack grunts]
Lora: Leave me alone.
Mack: I want a kiss. I want a kiss.
[Lora grunts]
I tell you, i want a kiss.
Lora:
Stop it!
Let me alone.
[Punches landing]
[Mack grunting]
- Thank you.
- Never mind that.
- Get busy, give her a stomach wash.
- I'll call a doctor.
Listen. You'll do what i tell you.
- You trying to do what he did?
- No, but you're not gonna call.
- You're a nurse. You give her the wash.
- I can't, except under orders.
Oh, yes, you can.
And what's more, you will.
I can't very well with a broken wrist.
- Operator, get me a doctor, quick.
- End that or i'll break your neck.
- What right have you to?
- Plenty.
- Hello, big boy.
- Oh, shut up.
Oh, don't be sore, nicky. Kiss me.
- Get busy.
- I can't without the proper authority.
- I give you the authority.
- Who are you?
I'm nick, the chauffeur.
[Gasps]
Oh.
Operator? Operator? Operator?
[Smack]
[Lora gro ans]
Don't be sore, big boy.
Where you going?
You dirty, lousy... lora: And i tell you, i wouldn't go through another night like that again...
...for all the money they could pay me.
- Well, then what?
I locked the doors and windows and sat up until morning expecting that brute back.
- Well, did he?
- No, but... i see. It's unfortunate, miss hart, but not much likelihood of its happening again.
I'm going to make sure it doesn't.
- Forget it.
- The police.
- What'll that get you?
- You don't...
- who'd believe you?
- Believe me?
The ritcheys wouldn't let you get away with that.
Blackmail's a pretty dangerous game.
- Blackmail?
- You heard me.
- Well, then, you don't believe me?
- Why should i?
- But, dr. Ranger...
- i visited that house daily for months.
- And i see no evidence of all this rot.
- Oh, yes, you have. You know you have.
I thought you were a reputable physician.
I came here to ask your advice.
You shall have it:
Mind your own business.
You're in that house to watch two patients, not to oversee the conduct of its members.
Am i to take blows from its servants?
- I've said that wouldn't happen again.
- You guarantee that?
That'll do, miss hart.
You've forgotten your place long enough.
Quiet down, now, and i'll see that you're fully compensated.
- Is that all?
- It isn't.
- Well?
- Something's gotta be done.
- You speaking of my patients?
- You are the doctor.
The way things are going, those babies won't last.
Well, that's news to me.
Dr. Ranger, they're slowly dying of undernourishment.
- Aren't my instructions being followed?
- I suppose so. Here.
See about... yeah, quite correct.
But i know starvation symptoms when i see them.
- I take it you don't approve...
- no, i don't.
- It's your first case, isn't it?
- Well, what of it?
You've been on one night.
It's only natural...
...that you should get excited about something that puzzles you.
You know, miss hart, you talk too much.
You've picked up half-baked medical knowledge around the hospital.
All nurses do.
I wouldn't air it quite so freely.
You'll talk yourself out of your profession.
- Don't think you can muzzle me.
- I'm not trying to. I'm giving you advice.
- You don't wanna take it, get off the case.
- I resign.
I warn you, if you do, you're through as a licensed nurse.
- Oh, a threat?
- Exactly. Your kind is too dangerous.
I have no doubt of it, to your kind of doctor...
...but i'm gonna find someone who will listen to me.
Riverside 12468.
Hello.
Uh, nick, this is dr. Ranger.
Now, listen carefully and i'll tell you what i want you to do.
Lora:
I know it's my first case.
And i know dr. Ranger's a big man, but i've got to do something.
You got me the job, that's why i came.
- But, my dear child...
- i'm sorry to drag you into this.
But those poor little kids are starving.
Anybody can see it in their faces.
And if somebody doesn't do something, they won't last.
Don't get so worked up about it.
Don't you think i know starvation symptoms?
- Yes, i suppose you do.
- Well, then, won't you do something?
You know i can't interfere in another doctor's case.
Why can't you, when things like this are going on?
Why? It's about as unethical... oh, ethics, ethics! That's all i've heard since i've been in this business.
Isn't there any humanity in it?
Aren't there any ethics about letting babies be murdered?
Steady. You need proof when you talk that way.
What more proof do i need than what i've already got?
Well, why don't you cool down a bit?
Those kids were getting along when you had them.
- Why were you taken off the case?
- I don't know.
Ranger's a rotten doctor.
You know his reputation.
- I can't discuss that.
- It isn't ethical.
Well, i can. Why doesn't he belong to the medical association?
Why hasn't he got a job on some decent hospital staff?
Because he's shady, and you know it, as well as every other doctor in this city.
I know a lot of things inside the profession that i can't advertise.
I also know that dr. Ranger has a tremendous practice.
And that alone can keep him out of trouble.
If i stir things up, if i go to the authorities, what does it look like?
- Jealousy.
- Argue yourself out of your responsibility.
- I'll see this through.
- Will you be reasonable?
No! I won't see this go on another minute.
- I'm going to the police.
- Lora!
Don't you realize they'll only laugh at you?
You, a nurse on her first job, trying to pit your opinion against a man like dr. Ranger.
Oh, what'll i do? It's maddening.
Two little babies being murdered.
I could go out and yell it on the street.
Listen, you've got to convince people that what you say is true.
- How?
- Hysterics won't do it.
I'll calm down, if you'll only tell me what to do.
- My advice is for you to go back on that job.
- What?
If you are convinced of malpractice...
...you can do more good there than you can shouting around on the outside.
Go back and watch those kids.
We've got to play ranger at his own game.
It's a risky business, and it's right under ranger's nose.
But if he wants to murder those youngsters, we'll make him use a gun.
I came to apologize for the way i acted this morning.
So you've thought it over?
Yes, i'm terribly sorry.
I hadn't gotten over the shock of last night.
I didn't realize what i was saying.
I hope you'll overlook it.
Who were you talking to?
Why, i didn't discuss it with anyone.
I just sat in the park and thought things over.
I realized i was simply throwing my career away.
And i can't do that.
I thought you'd come around.
You're not the first hysterical nurse i've seen.
- You'll forgive me, then?
- Entirely forgotten.
On both sides.
- That little business of last night?
- Oh, yes, of course.
I understand that such occurrences are all part of a nurse's experience.
That's it exactly.
Let me give you a little friendly advice, my dear.
The successful nurse is the one who keeps her mouth shut.
You see, we doctors have to do it.
It's part of our professional ethics.
So naturally, we want nurses whose discretion we can rely upon.
I realize that now.
Good. Come on, run along, now, back to your case.
- I'm sure everything's going to be pleasant.
- You're generous to keep me on.
Ranger: Since we understand each other, miss hart...
...i shall probably have considerable work for you.
- Oh, do you think so?
- I like your spirit.
Just put it to use in the interest of your doctor, can you?
I think i can.
- Good afternoon, doctor.
- Good afternoon, miss hart.
How do you do?
I was told you wished to see me.
Oh, yes, i have wanted to talk with you...
...but, oh, my head hurt so.
Lora:
I hope it feels better now.
You know, if people only knew the tortures of neurasthenia...
...they'd forgive us everything.
You see, dr. Ranger forgot to send my bromides.
Oh.
I do hope you weren't too upset by the conduct of the chauffeur.
[Dog whimpering]
You know... now, listen, poochie, stop that.
You know, we discovered, for some strange reason...
...that nick seems to irritate me less than any of the other servants.
So as far as feasible, dr. Ranger wanted him to be my personal attendant.
Well, we'll just forget about it.
I'm sure you understand how much i'm depending upon you.
I'll do everything i can to help the children. Is that all?
- Oh, i want you to have this, miss hart.
- Why, l... just a little appreciation of your tactful conduct.
Oh, thank you very much. Is that all?
I'll be sending for you soon.
[Jazz music playing on record]
Well, poochie, now we can have a drink, huh?
[Speaking indistinctly]
Maloney:
Well, what'd she want?
- Gee, a hundred bucks.
- Yeah, isn't that a scream?
Hey, don't handle it like it's rubber.
I won't get very much kick out of spending it.
Listen, belle, for a hundred bucks, i'd take a couple of socks on the chin.
Funny what people think money will do.
Keeping our nose out of patients' private affairs is part of our professional ethics.
I'll kill the next one that says "ethics" to me.
- Says you.
- Yeah, says me in a big way, sister.
Will you make this up for me?
For the little girls, eh?
Are they any better?
I wish i thought so.
Bootlegger:
My pal.
Well, of all the places.
And drinking a soda too.
Why not? Have one?
Why not?
- One of the same.
Man: Yes, sir.
- How's your friend's hand?
- Oh, fine.
Good as new.
- Say, you're looking pretty hot yourself.
- Thanks.
Hey, where'd you get that?
Looks like somebody took a swing.
Oh, a chauffeur at the place where i work got fresh.
He socked you? On the level?
Well, not exactly on the level.
From a way down here someplace.
Why, the dirty...
- i'll get him.
- What do you mean?
Say, listen. I know a couple of guys who'll do it as a pleasure.
- You wouldn't do anything like that?
- I don't do a thing...
...but tell a couple of guys i don't like this bozo.
- Anyhow, you don't know who he is.
- All you gotta do is tell me.
I should say not.
I don't want you getting in a jam over me.
There's nobody i'd rather get in a jam over.
Well, maybe there's nobody i'd rather keep out of a jam.
- Honest?
- Maybe.
I tried to get you at the hospital.
Oh, i'm on private duty now.
- Nights?
- Mm-hm.
Then how about a buggy ride some afternoon?
Nurses have reputations.
Oh, i see.
What would you say if i told you i'd quit the racket?
- I'd say i didn't believe you.
- Well, i did.
A month ago.
So how about a ride some afternoon?
Tomorrow afternoon.
- What do you say?
- I'd like to, but i hadn't better.
Oh, come on. I've been crazy to see you ever since that night.
When i go riding...
...it isn't gonna be with anybody that's liable to get shot.
- But i tell you i'm all washed up.
- And i tell you i don't believe you.
On the level, sister.
Hey, you.
Those two mugs won't wait forever.
Okay, i'm coming.
- Say, we're just going to see the fights.
- Mm-hm.
Honest.
I'll find you sometime and prove i'm on the level.
- Hmm.
- So long, sister.
[Band playing jazz music]
- How is she?
- She dozed off at last.
Oh, thank goodness.
Say, when did you take to worrying so much?
I didn't realize it was so serious.
It's sort of gotten on my nerves lately.
It's about time.
And i heard something yesterday that i didn't like.
What?
Well, i'll tell you about it when i'm sure it's true.
Lora's late again. She would be.
Every time i've had a decent date.
I think i'll blow and let you watch the kids till she comes.
Oh, you mustn't, with nanny as low as she is.
- I wouldn't know what to do.
- Keep your chemise on, i didn't mean it.
If she wakes up, hadn't we better try paregoric?
A lot of good that'll do if she can't retain a murphy drip.
Oh, i wish dr. Ranger would come.
He'd know what to do.
Yeah. He would, all right.
I wish you'd try a milk bath.
My sister edna saved her baby that way.
- She did, i tell you, i was there.
- Well, let's not go into that again.
- But if it worked once...
- it was a mistake.
Well, it's about time.
- Good evening.
Maxwell: Good evening.
Where've you been?
That rich boyfriend of mine is waiting again.
Is that so? I just saw eagan downstairs.
He tried to duck, but i saw him.
I thought you was out delivering gin with that crush of yours.
I haven't seen him but once since that night in the drugstore.
Say, look, won't nanny love that?
Not the way she was feeling today.
- Is she worse?
- Yeah, took a nosedive.
I had to send desney to mrs. Maxwell's room.
- Nanny can't keep anything down or up.
- Did you try a murphy drip?
- Mm-hm.
- Oh, the poor little baby.
- Have you called dr. Ranger?
- Yeah, i can't get him.
He's in jersey on a case.
Well, i've done all i can do without orders.
You could give her a milk bath.
My sister saved her baby with one.
You've got her started again.
Well, good night, kid.
And good luck.
And if you need me, give me a ring.
Lora:
All right.
Why won't you try a milk bath?
Lora: She couldn't absorb nourishment through her pores.
But she might. We could try.
Oh, i didn't realize it was this serious.
- Poor kids, the way we treated them.
Lora: Shh. You'll wake her.
Nanny. Nanny.
Look what i brought you.
[Maxwell crying]
Pardon me.
Could you tell me where mrs. Ritchey is?
Say, what's going on here?
- A costume party?
- Well, as i live and breathe.
Now, wait a minute. Hold on... control yourself, big boy.
- You don't know her.
- Yes, i do.
One time, i had a pain and the doctor put a big cone over my face...
...and told me to take a deep breath.
And i did and i floated right up through the cone...
...and when i came out the other end, there she was.
- What have we here?
- Why, it's little miss iodine herself.
Do you know where i can find mrs. Ritchey?
It's important.
Well, if you're soliciting for a hospital, you're too soon.
Mrs. Ritchey won't need you till morning.
[Both laughing]
Woman: Do you belong here?
- Yes. Do you know where mrs. Ritchey is?
She's the latest innovation.
All the newest household bars have attachable sick nurses.
[Both laughing]
What's known as the morning-after pickup.
Pickup, yeah, whatever.
[Man speaking indistinctly]
Ritchey:
Mack, go back and be barkeeper.
Mack: Ah, shut up.
Ritchey: Go back and be barkeeper.
Tishy wants a drink.
- Oh, tishy wants a drink, mack.
- Mrs. Ritchey. Mrs. Ritchey.
- What?
- I wanna speak to you.
Yeah? Well, go back of the bar and give tishy a little drink.
Nanny is very ill. You must come up to the nursery with me.
- What?
- Nanny is dangerously ill.
Oh, you're crazy.
Oh, mrs. Ritchey, i wouldn't come here if it wasn't absolutely necessary.
Don't you understand?
Nanny is almost dying.
- It's my duty to make you come.
- Ridiculous.
Dr. Ranger is a grand...
...splendid, magnificent doctor.
He's a magnificent doctor.
Says she's almost well.
Don't be silly.
Dr. Ranger hasn't been near her for two days.
She's sinking very low.
You've got to come with me.
Shh.
Utter confidence in dr. Ranger.
He's a magnificent doctor.
A marvelous doctor.
Says you're an alarmist, an alarmist.
[Ritchey speaks indistinctly and laughs]
He says that i can't see the children...
...because it makes them so nervous and so upset.
Oh, don't you understand?
Nanny is dying.
Oh, go back of the bar and give tishy a little drink.
- Mack, give tishy a little drink.
- Who says i am?
Oh, hello. I remember you.
What are you waving at?
You get out of here. He's mine.
You get out of here.
Dr. Ranger's a stupendous doctor.
And i love my big boy.
Don't stand there staring at me like that.
I'm a dipsomaniac and i'm proud of it.
You hear?
I'm a dipsomaniac and i like it.
- I like it. How do you like that?
- You're a cruel, inhuman mother.
I'm a dipsomaniac... you're a rotten parasite, that's what.
Don't blame it on the booze. It's you.
Why do poor little children have to be born to women like you?
- How can l...?
- Shut up!
Mack, don't let her hurt my feelings... you're going up in that nursery if i have to drag you by the hair.
Let go! Mack, stop her.
Here, here, here. Just a minute, now.
Don't you realize that you're getting poor little miss all upset?
Oh, yeah?
Say, you can't...
- come on, now.
- Stop it, let go of me.
- I say stop it. Stop.
- Oh, snap out of it.
- Stay on your feet.
- Let me alone.
You mother.
Mack:
Say, you can't do that.
Man:
Bye-bye.
Lora:
Grand 2311.
Hello, is dr. Bell there?
Oh. Well, do you know where i can find him? I'm lora hart, a nurse.
It's very important.
Will he be at the hospital?
When does he come in, tell him miss hart wants him to come at once.
Tell him it's vital, because i can't find dr. Ranger. Thank you.
Hey, sister, where can i find nick?
Hello.
- Where'd you come from?
- I'm delivering.
I thought you quit.
Oh, well, i guess i kind of exaggerated.
- Say, are you working here?
- Yes.
And one of my little patients is dying.
Say, you might help me.
- Well, if i can do anything...
- come with me.
Say, is this the dump you got the crack on the chin?
- That doesn't matter now.
- Was nick the guy?
I've got to think of this little child and you've got to help me.
Okay, sister.
Dr. Bell wasn't in.
- Oh, what'll we do? What can we do?
- Just wait for dr. Bell, that's all.
No use sending for an ambulance, nanny couldn't be moved.
- Say, who is this bell guy?
Lora: Arthur bell, the surgeon.
Maybe i can find him.
I know a couple of guys... lora:
How could you find him? Nobody can.
I wish for once you'd stop acting as though you knew everything.
- Can't we try a milk bath?
Lora: Oh, that wouldn't do any good.
That's what saved my sister's baby.
- It's a crazy idea, but we'll try anything.
Maxwell: Oh, thank god.
But i'll need milk.
Ten, 12, 15 quarts of it.
Can you get it?
- Why, where do you buy milk?
Lora: In a grocery, a delicatessen.
- Oh, i get you.
Lora: Now, hurry, bootlegger.
This has gotta be the fastest delivery ever.
Okay, sister. I know a couple of guys... bootlegger.
Come in here, will you?
Where are you?
Where's he gone?
Where's our bootlegger?
[Slurring]
He left 10 minutes ago. He won't be back.
That's what's wrong with prohibition.
Oh, i wish i could find one of those doctors.
Don't get ranger. I don't like him.
- You don't?
- No more.
- Why not?
- Had my suspicions confirmed.
What suspicions?
What suspicions?
I heard, on the telephone... what did you hear? Tell me.
- I heard what i heard.
- Oh, talk to me.
What did you hear? What about ranger?
Not talking about him yet.
- It isn't time.
- Oh, it is time, if it concerns those kids.
Will you talk to me?
It's about nick, isn't it?
I heard him talking to dr. Ranger.
All right, you heard him talking to dr. Ranger.
- What did he say?
- To dr. Ranger.
Oh, will you pay attention to me?
What did nick say to dr. Ranger?
Nick don't want people to see her when she's drunk.
- Judge will take away the trust fund.
- Trust fund?
I had my suspicions.
Is mrs. Ritchey in charge of the children's trust fund?
Mm-hm.
So that's what they're after.
What's all the noise?
Maxwell: Nick, you let us alone.
Nanny's terribly sick.
Ah, shut up.
What are you up to with that kid?
I'm keeping her resting easily until a doctor comes.
- Have you anything to say about that?
- Depends on how you're doing it.
- I'm giving her a milk bath.
- Dr. Ranger tell you to?
No, i can't find dr. Ranger.
Strange, isn't it?
Nothing's gonna be done without orders.
Then you get ranger here so we can place the responsibility where it belongs.
- I'm responsible when he ain't here.
- I'll say.
- And i want ranger's orders carried out.
- You'll be responsible for a lot more.
Oh, yeah?
They use electric chairs for the kind of things you're responsible for.
Hey, just what's the idea behind that crack?
Don't you think i know deliberate malpractice when i see it?
- You're speaking right out, ain't you?
- Yeah, and i'll make it even plainer.
In your case, i'm talking about murder.
Why, you little... keep your bean. If you don't like what ranger's doing, talk to him.
- Don't bring me in.
Lora: You're in already, plenty.
If this baby dies, you're in with ranger.
Spill it, now. Come on.
How long did you think you could get away with this?
You think because you strong-arm women, you have the brains to put this over?
I had your number the minute i stepped in.
And i've reported my suspicions on the outside.
- Oh, yeah? Spit them out.
- You want those kids to die.
- Yeah?
- You want what their father left them.
That's why you keep the mother full of booze all the time.
You'll take her out and marry her and grab the trust fund.
- You're not gonna get away with it.
- Who said there was a trust fund?
So you've been shooting off your nutty ideas, huh?
- Get out.
- Nick, you be careful, now.
Get out!
I'm not afraid of you anymore.
[Door closes]
Maxwell:
No, nick.
[Thump]
[Maxwell gro aning]
[Door opens and closes]
- Now i'll tell you a few things.
- Beating me up won't get you any place.
[Drain gurgling]
Poor little nanny.
Nobody cares whether you live or die.
Gee, if you could only hear me.
I can. And i'm certainly glad i'm here.
- Doctor, you did get my message.
- No, i didn't get any message from you.
But from a strange man, a most extraordinary fellow.
What man?
He said if i couldn't see my way clear getting here...
...he'd call around some evening with a couple of friends and take me for a ride.
- Did he say that?
- Yes, he did.
And i didn't like the way he said it, either.
- Now, what's the trouble here?
- Oh, she's low, doctor.
Very low.
- Do you think there's anything we can do?
- Only one thing.
- A blood transfusion, and in a hurry.
- Take mine.
I'm type 4a. I've been typed.
- But we don't know the baby's type.
- I know it, it's 4a.
Oh, doctor, we've got to hurry.
Who's got to hurry?
- Who are you?
- It's nick, the chauffeur.
Oh, yeah.
I'm dr. Bell.
We're about to give a transfusion and i ask you to keep out.
You're not on this case.
You better get out.
Now, listen, this is a matter of life and death.
- I'd run along if i was you.
- Oh, i can't be bothered with you... oh!
Oh, you dirty, lousy... oh!
Hey, you.
Yeah, i mean you. Get out of here.
Come on, and make it snappy.
That's a good girl. Splendid.
Oh, l... did i wake you? I'm sorry.
- How do you feel?
Lora: All right, i guess.
- How's nanny?
- She's responded beautifully.
She'll pull out of it this time.
- Hello, nanny.
- Hello, lora.
Lora: Daylight. My goodness, have i been asleep that long?
Yes, and a good thing too.
You better go right home and go back to bed.
Losing all that blood can make you feel pretty miserable.
I can't. I have to hurry and get dressed.
- I'm going to the police station first.
Bell: Police?
Can't you see?
I've got all the proof i need now.
And i'm going to the bat for you.
Lora:
Gee, doctor, you're swell.
[Yawns]
No, just sleepy.
[Chuckles]
[Bootlegger snoring]
Cuckoo.
Oh. You.
Ah, go on, let me in, will you?
You know me, i've been here before.
Tony knows me too.
- Hey, what are you trying to pull?
- Nothing.
Only, you make any joint look like a speakeasy.
- Oh, dr. Bell.
- Take good care of nanny, maloney.
She's had a blood transfusion.
Keep in touch with me every hour.
Well, how about dr. Ranger?
I'm going to settle with him once and for all.
I'm going to engage a new night nurse.
A night nurse?
What's the matter with you?
Well, it's a certainty mrs. Ritchey will not want lora around...
...after she learns what lora has decided to do.
- Are you gonna sign a warrant?
- Lf it's the last thing i ever do.
Don't be a fool.
You'll never get another job.
One jam like this and even the patients are leery of you.
Will you give me a lift downtown?
I'm in a hurry.
Give you a lift?
I've been waiting for the chance.
Well, how about a date tonight?
You're not much to look at, but you do have a way of showing up when you're needed.
- Come here.
- By the way, what's your name?
- Mortie.
- Glad to meet you.
- Mine's lora hart.
- It's the last name i like.
You won't be able to drive with one arm.
Sure i will. When i say shift, shift.
[Whistle blows]
Shift.
Hey, stupe, look where you're going.
Try again.
- Happy?
- Uh-huh.
- But there's one thing.
- What?
I hate to think of nick being arrested and that dirt coming out in court...
...on account of those little kids.
[Siren wailing]
You know, i've just been thinking.
- Maybe nick won't be arrested.
- Why not?
I ain't seen him around since last night.
- Think he's run away?
- No.
- Well, what do you think?
- I ain't got an idea.
Only, i happened to be talking to a couple of guys...
- what difference does that make?
- Nothing.
Only, i happened to mention i didn't like nick so good.
[Siren wailing]
[Tires screeching]
[Brakes squeal]
- What is it, for us?
- Nope, for the morgue.
Some guy got taken for a ride.
Bootlegger?
No, he was wearing a chauffeur's uniform.
[Whistle blows]
Shift.
[Car horn honking]
[English sdh]
Paper, morning paper...
Morning Tribune paper.
How are we gonna know this guy?
Remember, the man in Mike's car gotta see him too.
Oh, that's all right.
I'm going to kiss him, and how.
Good, you might as well make him happy.
It'll be the last pair of lips that hit him.
No.
You don't think he could have gone away, do you?
Here he comes now.
Thanks, handsome.
I just couldn't pass you up.
Believe it or not,
I never saw her in my life before.
I must have overlooked something.
Bloody shame, sir. Close to annoying.
Right under me very nose.
Your nose?
I'll get the car, sir.
Save 'em.
Okay this time, Mr Avery?
How was it for you, George?
Okay.
Oh, Ray. Could we do it again?
Number 10.
Up high! Ninety-nine!
Quiet.
Do you wanna move in and take a close-up at the top of the stairs?
No, that was terrible.
I'll make it over.
Yes, sir.
We'll do it again, folks.
All right, scene 99.
Let's run it over. All of it.
Move that car back here.
Hold it! Come on!
Take it easy.
Mr. Brent... when you dive this time, let's have less gymnastics. and don't spin like a top when you fall.
Okay, let's go. Come on, folks.
Move that one over there...
What's the matter?
What's that?
What's the matter?
Stand back, everybody.
Call a doctor.
Come on, give me a hand.
Let's get him to his dressing-room.
We won't need a doctor, George.
He's dead.
Dead?
Round up every man that had a gun. get the property man and find out who loaded those guns.
And see that the body isn't touched.
I'm going to phone the front office.
Yes, sir.
All right, everybody. Line up over there.
And all you fellas with guns stand over there.
Keep that door closed.
And see that no one leaves the stage and no one comes in.
Yes.
My dear Mr Little,
Since I read your scenario
I have come to the absolutely conclusion
That your name, Mr Little, fits you something beautiful.
And furthermore and yet besides
Bahhh.
Yes?
Oh, yes, Mr Avery. Just a minute.
It's Mr Avery.
Tell him to finish on schedule.
He's two days behind already.
Talking to me is a waste in time.
But he says it's important.
That's the problem.
He's too important entirely.
Hello.
What?
Brent?
Shot?
Dead?
Oy, that's going to cost me a fortune.
What a calamity. Quick!
Call Steiner. Tell him Brent was killed, shot.
What a calamity, what a calamity.
I'll get it, Bill. Thanks.
Yes?
Myles Brent was shot on the set.
Killed!
Mr Grossmith has gone to the stage.
I'll be right there.
Myles Brent.
Killed.
On general principal, not a bad idea.
Except that he happens to be one of our stars.
Get back to your office and do what you can to keep the papers off this until we hear what happened.
Don't give out any story until you hear from me.
Sure, but rescue me as soon as possible.
They'll be on my neck just as soon as the police get the news.
Miss Molly.
Yes?
Phone the brigade on the lot.
And tell them not to let anyone in or out until they hear from me.
Very well.
Thanks.
Hey, why don't you watch where I'm going?
What's the hurry, gumshoe?
Myles Brent's been shot.
Now there's a job that should have been done years ago.
Oh...
You won't have to rewrite any stuff for The Death Kiss now.
Say, Marcia was on the set with him, wasn't she?
Sure, but I don't think she did it.
What stage?
Three.
Drop this stuff in my office, will you?
Myles Brent, huh?
Picture actor.
My wife always liked him.
I had that kind of trouble too.
Come on, let's go.
All right, fellas, here's something hot.
Myles Brent killed. Shot. Sound Stage number 3.
Tonart Studio.
Operator. Operator.
Hey, that's the Evening Star phone.
You're telling me?
Give me the journal, please.
Hello, Tonart?
I want Max Hill in the publicity department.
Come on, snap him.
You know me, Connelly I never held out on the Evening Star yet.
Yeah, I know all about your deadline.
You'll get the pack. Call me back.
Never mind, I'll get it.
Yeah.
Yes, Morris, I know. But can I help it if he's shot in the morning?
You gotta take those things as they come.
Yeah, I'm going over there right away.
The police oughta be here now.
Call me back in ten minutes.
Hey, come back here.
Pull down that door.
Ambulance coming.
Yeah.
Detective Lieutenant Sheehan,
Homicide Squad.
Who's in charge here?
I've been trying to get things straightened out for you.
My name is Steiner. Studio manager.
What happened?
Well, the company was shooting the scene during which several people fired guns at Brent.
And someone used real bullets, huh?
People do get hurt that way.
That's the director's guess.
Oh, the director.
Did he happen to guess who did it?
No.
That's unfortunate.
Looks like we'll have to do some guessing on our own.
Come on, Hill, loosen up.
Did someone really bump him off?
I tell you, I don't know.
Then let us in on the lot so we can find out.
I can't let anyone on the lot.
Marcia Lane was with him in the picture, wasn't she?
Sure, she was doing the lead opposite him.
Marcia, oh, his ex-wife. That helps the story.
What's the name of the picture?
The Death Kiss.
The Death Kiss. Gee, what a tie up.
Stage office on the phone.
Just a minute, boys, I'll be right with you.
Eight men with guns?
Yes.
Well, it might have been an accident, but...
Frank, you don't think it was murder.
Darling, I don't even know ***
Maybe he died of old age.
Maybe he never even existed at all.
Now you wait here.
I'm gonna have a look around.
Yours.
You break it.
Nothing but blanks left in these guns.
Any other guns on the set?
That's all I know of.
You see, Captain, it's strictly an accident.
Lieutenant Sheehan.
What's your name?
Leon A. Grossmith.
I'm the president of this concern.
Well, what about it?
Now look here, Sargeant.
Do you realize what this has cost me already?
You have no idea. It cost me up to now...
Yeah, and it cost Brent his life.
Which also loses me money.
I can't have no more Brent in my picture.
Pardon me, Lieutenant.
Mr Grossmith means to convey that this regrettable accident need not be converted into a Roman holiday for the rabble.
I assure you that Mr Grossmith feels deeply, very deeply the tragedy of this affair.
And his point is, naturally, not to throw consternation into that great and unseen army of Mr Brent's admirers.
Now that is precisely what Mr Grossmith means.
That's just what I was going to say.
Mr Steiner, Mr Steiner.
Pardon me.
What is it?
The peckers are on my neck.
I've got to tell them something.
There's no use stalling any longer.
And they've got a story now about a mysterious woman.
They don't know themselves, but they say it makes a great story.
Tell them it was an accident.
They won't believe it.
Then make them.
You don't know those boys.
They've got imagination.
I don't care if they got fallen arches.
Tell them the Brent shooting was an unfortunate accident.
Yes.
Is that satisfactory to you, lieutenant?
Nothing is satisfactory.
I can't tell what it is because...
I don't know myself.
Here's all he had on him.
Keep that.
Well, I'm sorry to gum up the works.
But it wasn't an accident.
It's murder.
Murder, oy.
What a calamity.
How do you know?
This is the bullet that killed him.
A 38 calibre, center fire.
All the guns the extras used were 45s.
And you can't fire a 38 bullet through a 45 gun.
It's an old Chinese principle.
Where did you get this?
Out of the wall of the set.
Don't you know better than to meddle in police matters?
Oh, I'm sorry. I didn't mean to meddle.
I just wanted to help.
You see, I like to dabble a bit in murder cases.
Well you just go and dabble some place else.
All right.
Who is he?
One of our scenario writers,
Franklyn Drew.
Oh, writes detective stories, I suppose.
Yes. How did you know?
They always do.
Well, this makes a difference.
Looks like we've got a murder on our hands.
You go and get that assistant director.
That brilliant young man who said there were no other guns on this set.
Right.
Who is Marcia Lane?
What?
You don't know who is Marcia Lane?
Over a million dollars we spend advertising her all over the nation.
She was on set just a minute ago.
Let's have a talk with her.
Howell, ask Miss Lane to come here.
Yes, sir.
Steiner and the detective want to see Miss Lane immediately.
Well, hurry.
I'm fluttering, sweetheart.
Bill. Tell Miss Lane Steiner and the dick wanna see her.
Okay, chief.
Oh, Pete.
Rush Miss Lane over to Mr Steiner and the dick.
Now?
No, next Tuesday, you sap.
Oh.
Come on, get going.
Oh, all right.
Pardon me, Miss Lane.
Mr Steiner and the dick wanna see you.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
What can they want with me?
They just want to annoy you with a lot of routine questions.
They always question people like you first to give the guilty ones plenty of time to make up good alibis.
It's part of the system.
Been going on for years.
Sit down, Miss Lane.
Thank you.
I don't wish to be unpleasant but there are a few questions
I'd like to ask you.
Certainly.
How long have you and Brent been separated?
We were divorced last May.
Why?
Well, I don't quite see...
Divorce is a matter of record, lieutenant.
I don't think we have to go into that now.
Say, will you go up to your office and write "bad little boy" 500 times?
When did you last quarrel with Myles Brent?
I don't remember.
Didn't you love him?
I wouldn't answer that, Marcia.
Say, just what is your interest in this case?
Personally I don't care who killed Brent.
But I would like to know how it was done.
Besides that, I'm...
I'm a friend of Miss Lane's.
Wasn't your name mentioned during the divorce proceedings?
No. Sorry to disappoint you.
What did you do with your gun, Miss Lane?
My gun?
Yes
I didn't have a gun.
Didn't you use one in the picture?
No.
But when you fired with the other...
As a matter of fact if Miss Lane had fired she couldn't have hit him.
She was around on the other side of the set when the shooting took place.
If you don't lay off,
I'm gonna take you downtown.
What for?
How do I know what for?
Good, I was beginning to be afraid you might say something sensible.
Hey! What are you trying to do there, huh?
Don't move, now.
I got you surrounded.
Don't lie, now.
What did you try to hide there, huh?
Why, nothing...
We'll see about that. Hold this...
Hey, wait a minute, wait a minute.
No, you don't.
Yeah? Oh, yeah?
This letter all ready to mail was found in Myles Brent's pocket.
In this letter he told his lawyer that Marcia Lane refused to sign a release as beneficiary of his life insurance policy.
So you stand to collect $200.000.
Miss Lane's lawyer wouldn't let her sign the release.
I know all about that.
It's too bad you weren't the one that was shot.
So that gives you a pretty nice motive.
No funny business, now.
Come on, keep moving.
Here's your man, chief.
I caught him red-handed.
He was trying to ditch this gun. Look.
Look. It's loaded too.
I tell you, I...
Save your breath.
Put the braces on him, Owen.
Now ain't that astounding?
Something told me to take a squint around.
I sees 'im trying to ditch his gun, see?
And I puts two and two together,
I says to my...
I says to myself, that's the man.
I guess I used uncanny skill.
38 caliber and loaded.
It's the gun all right.
Who is this fellow?
Name's Chalmers.
He was an extra on the set.
Why did you kill Brent?
I never killed nobody.
You can't alibi yourself out of this.
That's the only 38 gun on the place.
You killed him. Why?
I tell you I didn't. You gotta listen to me.
Shut up.
You'll have plenty of time to talk later on.
Do you know this man?
Why, yes.
Everyone on the lot knows him.
He was head electrician for years.
How much did you pay him to kill Brent?
Now wait a minute, lieutenant.
Why not pin the murder on the murderer?
That's not against the rules.
What are you talking about?
Chalmers didn't kill Brent.
How do you know?
His gun hasn't been fired.
How did this gun come to be loaded?
I loaded it for Brent.
I lost my nerve.
So you had planned to kill Brent, huh?
Yes, I wanted to kill him.
I had every reason in the world to kill him.
But he made no attempt.
So you can't arrest him.
Not unless you want to make a fool of yourself.
You know, I'm beginning to think you're giving us the rash.
Prove it. You're a detective.
Take them off, Gulliver.
And maybe we'll put them on him.
Well, we seem to be right back where we started.
Yes, perhaps you may have some very valuable suggestion.
Yes, I have.
What?
The cameras were photographing when Brent was killed.
There might be something interesting on the film. It wouldn't hurt to look.
Not bad.
How soon can we see the stuff?
We could get a print in, say, three or four hours.
Can we get them going?
Certainly.
Come, Mr Grossmith.
You take the name and address of every person on this set.
And warn them all about trying to leave town.
Right.
In any of your books, does the detective ever sock the novelist on the nose?
No.
Write it in sometime.
Seems to me like a good idea.
Marcia.
Oh, Frank.
It won't be very pleasant to see it all over again.
But it may help us a lot if we look carefully.
Is everybody here?
I think so, Mr Grossmith.
Mr Steiner is in the projection booth.
He'll be right in.
All right.
There he is now.
Are you ready, Mr Grossmith?
Yes.
Mr Grossmith's ready.
Quiet, please. Quiet.
All right, turn it over.
Rolling.
Mark it.
Action.
Can I get your car, sir?
It'll be right here.
Thanks handsome.
I just couldn't pass you up.
Believe it or not,
I've never seen her in my life before.
I must have been overlooking something.
Bloody shame, sir. Most annoying.
Right under my very nose.
Your nose?
I'll get the car, sir.
Lights! Turn on those lights!
Not hurt badly, but he must have received a sharp blow.
Yeah, it looks like it was done with a blunt instrument.
You know, I had an uncle once who was knocked out the same way.
Only he got hit with a shovel.
Whoever rocked your cradle overdid it.
A rouge smeered cigarette butt started it off.
Can you tell me if that's studio makeup?
Hard to say.
Perhaps we should call the makeup man to tell you.
Thanks.
How did it happen?
I swear I don't know.
I was leaning over the machine checking the focus
I thought the building came down on me.
How about another print?
Yeah, but we'll take care of it this time.
There was something on.
And whoever cut it off didn't want it to be seen.
If we have the laboratory man provide a new one right away.
Could you, Mr Glossmith?
Why, yes, there's no reason why we couldn't.
Will you come with me?
No, Hillicker will go with you.
I have another angle.
Where do I find this makeup man?
Makeup department.
Clear out in the other end of the lot, just at the end of F street.
Sounds like a sleeper jump.
I'll show you if you like.
Thanks.
It's a special panchromatic rouge of my own make.
Only two people on the lot are in the habit of using it.
Who are they?
Miss Collins and Miss Lane.
Who's Miss Collins?
She's one of our players.
Is she in this picture you're photographing?
No, I believe she's working in The Night Riders and they're out on location.
And the only other person on the lot that uses this rouge is Marcia Lane?
As far as I know.
I see.
Thanks.
You're welcome.
Wait a minute.
You have quite a stock of this rouge on hand, haven't you?
A few tubes of it.
Just as I thought.
Anybody could get at it.
Not very well. All the makeup that is not in use is kept in the cabinets.
And the cabinets are locked?
Yes.
It's hidden.
Hello? Just a minute.
It's for you.
Hello.
Yes, Hillicker.
How?
All right. You stick around there and see what you can find out.
Tell Steiner I'll see him at his office.
The negative of that last scene has been ruined.
Someone poured acid in the container.
This thing gets more muddled every minute.
You're telling me?
How do I get to Steiner's office?
I'll show you.
Thanks. And you're not going with me.
Right at the end of the street.
Right. You ought to have a map of this place.
Oh, Lieutenant.
You know that anybody could have taken the rouge from Miss Lane's dressing room.
Sure. A very interesting detail.
What do you make of it, Drew?
Got me.
It's more of a mystery than anything
I ever wrote.
What I can't undertsand is why anyone should want to murder Brent.
Not if it were a supervisor.
I don't see why anybody wants to murder anybody. It's a silly idea.
You're going to try and solve it?
Yes, why not?
It would be fun. Besides...
Marcia?
Yes. Oh, say, Tom.
If you see her, don't say anything about that director.
It would only upset her.
No, no, no, of course not.
If I can help you, let me know.
Thanks.
Has anything been moved on the set?
No. Police instructions were to leave everything undisturbed.
Well I'm gonna have another look around.
I want to find out just how he was murdered.
And with what gun.
I got an idea how Brent was killed.
You wanna hear it?
Some other time. Better go home and sleep it off, Chalmers.
That's what you think.
Chalmers don't know anything, huh?
But listen. I've been on the set and I've been seeing things.
Yeah, snakes and pink elephants, I'll bet.
Yeah, all right, be smart, be smart.
Now listen, you're gonna come to me later.
I'll see you in the morning. Go on home.
Poor boy. All he does is cash his paycheck and drink it.
Wanna have a look around with me?
No.
I'm not much of a detective.
Besides, Mrs Avery is waiting for me.
All right.
Good luck.
Thanks.
Go find Sheehan. He's someplace on the lot.
Bring him here.
Mr Drew. Mr Drew, what happened?
What happened?
Here, here.
Swell, ain't it?
I made it myself.
Who's in there?
It's all right, Sheehan.
Now...
I found the gun that killed Brent.
Where?
Right here in this lamp.
Why, it's gone.
Probably got tired sitting there and decided to take a walk.
No, I'm not kidding.
I came down to the set to take a look around.
Just by accident I noticed this... this... smudge on the lamp here.
So I looked inside.
Found a small Derringer fastened there.
Attached to an electromagnet.
There's the wire it was connected to.
And I got a bump on my head that knocked me out.
This proves one thing.
Whoever killed Brent knew a lot about electricity.
Who's in charge of these lamps?
The head gaffer.
What's that in English?
The chief electrician.
Who is he?
Al Payne.
Where can I find him?
Tom will take you over.
Come here, kid, let me take a look at that head.
That's all right.
Now listen.
You stop monkeying around with police matters.
It's a tough racket.
That head of yours won't stand another wallop.
Come on, let's get going.
Mr Drew...
I've been thinking.
No.
Yeah. The first thing I ask myself when I investigate a murder is whodunit.
That sounds logical.
And the next thing I ask myself is who could do it.
And then?
And then I ask myself again who wanted to do it.
And how do you answer yourself?
Well...
I ain't come to that yet.
You take Chalmers, for instance.
He didn't like Brent.
Why shouldn't he be an exception?
He didn't like Brent on account of Brent had him fired.
When was this?
A couple of months ago. When Chalmers was head gaffer they had an argument.
Head gaffer.
Yeah, Chalmers is an electrician, isn't he?
Yeah, Chalmers had a couple of drinks and him and Brent had an argument.
Say, Gully, you are a first-class gumshoe.
Investigator.
All right, investigator.
Right now, will you run up to the casting office investigate and find out where Chalmers lives?
Sure, what are you gonna do?
Put the finger... I mean apprehend him?
Maybe. You wanna come along?
Oh, boy, I'll say.
Got your gun?
Yep.
Got my gun, my badge...
We'll need those. Come on, let's get going.
The director hasn't anything to do with it.
The channel man really sets the lights.
You mean he tells you where to put the lights.
Yes.
When was this set lit?
The afternoon before.
They rehearsed the scene with the principals so they wouldn't hold when they called the extras.
Do you remember anything particular about that one light?
To be truthful with you, we had a lot of arguments on that set.
Mr Steiner didn't like the photography and he wanted more light.
Steiner? Was he there when it was rehearsed?
Yes.
Who else?
Well, they were all there with the exception of the extra people.
There were no extras there, huh?
No, only Chalmers.
You know, he's a sort of a privileged character around this lot.
He used to be our head gaffer.
Chalmers used to be an electrician?
Yes.
Miss Lane felt sorry for him and made
Mr Avery give him a bit in her picture.
Oh, Miss Lane got him the job.
Yes.
Could you give me the address of the cameraman and Chalmers'?
Sure.
And, by the way...
If a writer by the name of Drew asks you anything don't answer him.
Well, you can't keep me from hoping.
This is it.
Look. It's that Chalmers in trouble again.
Do you wish to see Mr Chalmers?
Yes, is he in, Mrs...
Miss Potts, and I don't know anything at all about his comings and goings.
Doesn't he answer the bell?
No, he doesn't.
I was just going in.
It's cleaning day today, you know.
I suppose he's lying stiff and the place all clotted up with gin bottles.
Let's go in and have a look around, captain.
As a tenant, he wasn't so bad until he lost his job. then he started acting queerlike.
See, I told you.
I laid it all down to him. I said, Mr Chalmers... my bungalow court isn't an alcoholic ward.
As I thought. Drunk again.
Well, this is the end.
This is no key to cure.
Out he goes.
I'm sick and tired of his carryings on.
The fellow's dead.
Dead?
Well, he didn't think of me, no not him.
I suppose my $28.50 back rent was all spent in booze.
Did I have Chalmers spotted.
All I did was ask myself whodunit.
Poison, all right.
Familiar smelling stuff too.
Boy, that guy would drink anything that wasn't too thick to chew.
Well, I guess this about washes up the case, huh, Mr Drew?
Looks like suicide to you, eh, Gully?
Sure.
I guess Sheehan would think so too.
He may be dumb, but he ain't blind.
He's not as dumb as he looks.
Do you wear a wristwatch, Gully?
Huh?
Do you wear a watch on your wrist?
Well... you see, it's a present from the wife.
I gotta wear it.
Why do you wear it on your left wrist?
Well, I use my right hand the most because I'm right-handed.
Did you ever try to write with it on you right wrist?
No.
Neither did, Chalmers.
Which makes this note a very interesting piece of fiction.
Say, Gully.
Come here.
Take a look in here.
Now, what do you see?
A bottle of gin and a piece of ice.
What else?
Use your powers of observation.
Oh, you mean that piece of lettuce in there.
Don't you notice that little service door in the back has been left open?
Whatever. The icemen probably left it that way.
My wife says you can't trust those icemen anyway.
If the iceman had left that little door open when he put in the fresh cake there wouldn't be any ice there now.
Oh, I never thought of that.
Let's have a look outside.
Look. Someone must have stood here a long time.
Them are fresh footprints, ain't they?
Step up there a minute.
Look out for those tracks.
Now what?
Look through the window.
Do you see Chalmers sitting there?
Yeah. The door's open.
Supposing someone stood here and doctored Chalmers' gin in the icebox on this side, and then stood here and watched him drink his last drink. through the window, what would you say?
And then watched him die.
Then wrote the note and put the pencil in his hand, huh?
Yeah. Only that's where he made his mistake.
Put the pencil in the wrong hand.
That's just what I was thinking.
Gully...
You know, if a car was parked here
It would entirely conceal that door and that window.
Yeah.
Then Chalmers didn't kill himself, huh?
Let's leave that to Sheehan.
If I'm any good of a guesser, he ought to be here by now.
We found him tumbled over the table.
Dead, huh?
Don't let Sheehan know what we found out.
I gotcha.
The captain got here 15 minutes ago.
Captain?
What are you and that Keystone cop doing here?
Now looky here, Sheehan, you can't talk that way about me.
Remember I'm chief of the studio police and I got rights.
I...I...
Nature in the raw.
Here's another opportunity for your skill, Lieutenant.
We've been waiting for you,
Everybody around here seems to know more about police matters than the police.
That's noble of you to admit.
Did you two losers touch anything around here?
Nothing important.
Good, then clear out.
And take that uniformed moron with you.
Come on.
Suicide, huh?
Looks like it.
Well, I always thought it was Chalmers right from the start.
Now who's the Keystone cop?
You don't even know Chalmers was left-handed.
Come on!
Left-handed?
Sure.
That starts it all over again.
I can remember when murders were nice, clean, simple things done with machine guns and meat axes.
But this case!
Keep coming.
All right.
What seems to be the trouble?
Battery's dead.
But didn't Miss Lane get a new battery just last week?
Yeah, I don't understand it.
It's bone dry.
The liquid's all gone.
Just as I thought
You were right.
Poison.
The electro... electrolytic *** 38%... distilled water 33%, electrolytic liquid 11% by volume the man said at least a spoonful would kill a man dead.
Electrolytic acid.
Did he say anything else?
No, that was all.
Hey. Ain't them the same kind of tread that left the marks under Chalmers' window?
There's probably a thousand cars in Hollywood that have that make of tire.
Yeah, I never thought of that.
Say, Gully.
I want you to get me the key to Brent's dressing room.
But don't anybody know it's for me.
Say, I'll get you the key to the city if you want it.
I have a couple of things to do.
I'll meet you here in half an hour.
Okay.
Who is it?
Frank, may I come in?
Just a minute.
Why all the locks?
I was just going through some old letters and didn't want to be disturbed.
Oh, I see.
Where have you been?
I've been waiting all afternoon for you.
Oh, I've just been doing a little sleuthing.
Marcia, you trust me, don't you?
Why, yes, of course.
You know I'd do anything in the world for you, don't you?
I believe you would, dear.
Then... is there anything you know about the murder of Brent that you haven't told me?
No.
I've just come from Chalmers' place.
He's dead.
Chalmers?
Poisoned.
You mean murdered?
If it isn't that, it's a good imitation on it.
Oh, how awful.
Whoever did it used electrolytic acid.
Acid out of a battery.
The unfortunate part of the whole thing is that... they used your car and the acid out of your battery.
My car?
That's why my car wouldn't start.
Yes. I only told you this because I'm afraid
Sheehan will find out and arrest you on suspicion.
That would mean headlines and scandal.
What do you want me to do?
I want you to get out of here.
Any place, just so Sheehan can't find you.
But that's running away.
Only for a day or two.
Just to give me time.
I'll go to Mary's at Malibu.
She'll help me.
That's swell.
Make it fast, will you?
There's no knowing how close
Sheehan is behind me.
I'll telephone you when I have it all worked out.
You may have a long beard by then, but I'll try and hurry.
Bye-bye, sweet.
Come in.
Leon.
I suppose you're surprised that
I'm here, huh, Marcia?
Frankly, yes.
You haven't come to see me since... since Brent's accident.
I should think you'd know why.
I don't.
I only know that I... that I want to help you.
I have all the help I need.
Marcia, you mustn't treat me like this.
I never said anything to you while Brent was alive.
But you should know how I feel.
You've succeeded in making your feelings quite plain enough.
Marcia, I...
I'm very fond of you.
Not the kind of fondness I care about.
Please go now, Leon.
I'm in rather a hurry.
Marcia.
Maybe some day you will come to me and ask for help.
Maybe you will apologize to me for laughing about how I feel for you.
Perhaps Brent wasn't killed for nothing.
No matter how smart they are they always slip up.
What's your name?
Pardon me.
Hello?
Yes, sir, I will.
Oh, wait a minute. Here she is now.
Miss Lane.
Mr Steiner would like to see you in his office.
Thank you.
What's your name?
Mr Wheatcroft.
Mr Todd, please.
Mr Wheatcroft calling to see you.
All right, thank you.
Pull down that blind.
Did you see Brent when he came in?
I see everybody.
What kind of a suit did he have on?
There it is.
Funny Sheehan missed looking in here.
You've been keeping him too busy.
See what those letters are.
Here's one from a dame named Agnes.
Agnes who?
She ain't that dumb.
She don't say much.
Except that uh... she can't live without him.
Married, too.
Says her husband don't understand her.
Well, it's that old, old story.
Two men and a woman.
The internal triangle.
What kind of place is the Cliffside Inn?
You know, one of those weekend places with all the Mr Smiths, and Mr Jones, and Mr Browns.
Brent wouldn't go there alone, would he?
Not him.
How far is Ocean View from here?
Couple of hours north on the Coast Road.
I guess that's our next stop.
Why?
I'm beginning to think there's a woman in the case.
No...
Mr Drew, this case is becoming complicated.
Even for me.
Come on.
Gee, it's 4:30.
I gotta check in.
Listen. Don't go away without me, will you?
All right, Gully. I'll pick you up at the gate on my way out.
Mr Drew, I've been looking for you.
Miss Lane wants to see you.
She's in Mr Steiner's office.
Thanks.
Yes, sir.
Go right in, Mr Drew.
When did you find out your car wouldn't start?
About an hour ago.
Well, with all your dabbling you didn't throw us off.
You've thrown yourself off if you think Miss Lane had anything to do with Chalmers or Brent either.
All right, all right, just sit down there.
And keep quiet.
Where did you go this afternoon?
I went downtown.
In your car?
Yes.
Where did you park it?
On the street. In front of Ellsmith's flower shop.
I ordered some flowers for Myles...
Mr Brent's funeral.
Then where did you go?
You went to Chalmers' house, didn't you?
Wait a minute, I won't stand for this.
You can't trick Miss Lane into answers.
And have little boy blue over there take them down.
Now keep quiet, Drew. We're trying to get to the bottom of this.
Oh, no, you're not.
Sheehan is trying to force Miss Lane into admission of things she's never done.
She might as well talk here as downtown.
I've got a warrant for her.
For what?
Suspicion of murder.
What's your theory?
It's as simple as ABC.
It would be if you thought of it.
Chalmers killed Brent because he hated him and she offered him money.
Then she got frightened and killed Chalmers thinking that he would get drunk and give it away.
Every piece of evidence we've got points to her.
It was her cigarette that blew the film, her car that made the tracks outside Chalmers' house, and acid from her battery that killed him.
Oh, that's a lot of bunk.
I know.
You've got to make an arrest.
It's okay with you.
Steiner, you can't sit there and... let them arrest Marcia.
She has nothing more to do with these murders than Lincoln had to do with the burning of Rome.
Mr Drew, we don't know whether
Lincoln burned Rome or not.
And we don't care.
But this man is a policeman, so let us hear what he has to say.
We are not paying you to quarrel with the police.
I don't care if you pay me a dime.
Sheehan, if you arrest Miss Lane now there'll be a lot of nasty newspaper headlines.
Hold out for another 24 hours and I'll be responsible.
Better than that, I'll prove she's innocent.
You're making yourself ridiculous.
I'm trying to protect one of your stars.
Wait a minute, Steiner.
Maybe he's right.
What about this scandal?
What about her box-office name?
Haven't we got enough trouble here already without having Marcia arrested?
Mr Grossmith, if you want to accept the responsibility, you can.
But remember...
This is a murder case.
Two people are dead.
And how do you know someone else won't be killed?
For my part, I believe that the police should not be interfered with.
Well, all I gotta say is that it's... a terrible calamity.
Let's go, Hillicker.
I guess the explosion's over.
Someone in this studio killed Myles Brent and Chalmers.
And he's trying to pin it on Marcia Lane.
But they won't get away with it.
Come on, Miss Lane.
Marcia. honey.
I'm sorry.
But I'll get you out of this as soon as I can.
I know you will, Frank.
I'm not worried, really.
Come on.
Special issue!
Read all about it... here.
Hollywood mystery.
Marcia Lane accused of studio murder.
Extra!
Read all about it.
How do you do, sir?
How do you do?
I'm from the publicity office at the Tonart Studio.
Yes?
I'd like to see a list of the people who sent flowers to the Brent funeral.
Oh, I think I have a list.
Thanks.
Terrible thing that Brent murder, wasn't it?
I hear they're investigating Marcia Lane.
Yes, I guess she'll be one who won't send flowers.
Yes, she will. She was here early this afternoon and ordered a big wreath.
Is that so?
Here you are.
Mostly women.
It's surprising many of them gave their names.
Oh, some of them didn't.
There was a lady here just now who signed a check then thought better of it and threw it out.
Didn't want the husband to see the cancelled check.
Perhaps. Oh, pardon me.
Yes, madam?
Do you have any gardenias?
Certainly.
Oh, good evening.
Alone?
Yes, I'm not stopping.
Oh.
I have a key here a friend of mine carried away with him.
Oh, thank you.
My name is Drew.
I'm from the Tonart Studios.
I'd like to keep this thing quiet.
Keep what quiet?
Brent's visit here the night before he was murdered.
You see, if the papers get hold of a story like this they'll play it up and it's bad for the picture business.
Well, it doesn't do us any good either.
All right, let's get together.
Sure, what do you want?
Who was the woman with Brent?
Mrs Brent.
There is no Mrs Brent. They were divorced.
Well, then I don't know who she is.
You see, I wasn't here when they checked in and they left in such a hurry
I didn't see them go out.
In a hurry? Why?
Well, a fellow came in here and started a row
Then he waited in that telephone booth over there and they came down and he stepped out.
At least that's what Charly says.
Who's Charly?
One of the night bellhops.
Could I see him?
Sure.
Oh, Charly.
Yes, sir.
This gentleman wants to ask you a few questions.
Shoot.
Do you remember seeing the man who waited for Myles Brent in the telephone booth the other night?
I just got a glimpse of him before the fight.
What fight?
When Brent hit him in the patio.
How did it happen?
The lady ran out to the car when she saw the guy came out of the booth.
Then the guy steps up to Mr Brent and says:
Brent, I wanna see you.
I thought it sounded kinda silly because he was seeing him right there.
Then what happened?
Brent takes the guy outside in the patio.
That's when he socked him.
Then did Brent get into his car?
Yeah.
And the other guy picked himself up.
Boy, was he mad.
And was his face red.
What did he say?
What didn't he say.
Listen.
It was awful.
And then he beats it.
Would you remember this man if you saw him again?
Well, I might.
And then again, I might not.
It all  happened so fast.
Would you remember the lady?
Sure. Say, she was a honey.
She talked kind of funny.
Like she was a foreigner, or something.
With an accent?
Yeah.
That's fine, Charly.
You've been a great help to me.
Here.
Thanks.
Good night, and thanks.
Say, are you a detective?
No, I'm just from the studio.
Will there be detectives here?
I hope not.
Call for Mr Wallace.
Calling Mr Wallace.
Which booth did that fellow hide in?
There.
How long has it been out of order?
Just since the guy hid in there.
I guess he kept pounding on the hook.
Shelf, shelf, that's all you can think about, shelf.
Already this picture cost me $239.351.
Better I put my money in the bank.
Can I get any interest from a shelf?
I'm not asking you to do anything.
But how can we finish the picture without print?
I told you 17 times that we can use a double.
And play the whole kissing scene in a longshot?
Why not?
Because it's all wrong.
It's terrible.
I've got my reputation to think of.
And I've got my money to think of.
Money, money. What's money?
Now, just a minute.
Let's take it calmly.
The New York office is of the opinion that the murder of Brent won't hurt the picture. if we can release it soon enough.
So why not shoot that scene with a double and wind it up?
It's the last scene in the picture.
It can't possibly do you any harm.
Exactly, Steiner's quite right.
Oh, all right.
What's the use of arguing with him?
Good. We can get the company together and shoot it tonight.
Wait a minute.
What about Marcia?
Oh, we can arrange with Sheehan to use her for that one scene.
She can come over with the whole police department if he likes.
Everybody is on call, everything on the set is standing.
They can shoot it in half an hour.
Todd. Oh, hold on a minute.
What time?
Seven thirty... say nine thirty.
Make it nine o'clock.
We'll save a half hour.
Todd, we are going to shoot the last scene of The Death Kiss tonight.
Round up the company for a nine o'clock call.
Sure, Mr Steiner.
Max, we're retaking The Death Kiss.
Get busy on the call.
Okay.
You have Brent's double on call, haven't you?
Yes, I'll have him all right.
But, say, what about Miss Lane?
I'll take care of her.
Hey, Mac, put that light over on the roof.
Screen 80, Joe.
Good evening.
You know Mrs Avery?
Yes, of course. How are you?
How do you do?
I'm surprised you've come to see the retake.
Put it down to morbid curiosity.
That's the woman of it.
She insisted on coming.
Well, come along with me.
I'll have Howell make you comfortable.
He's very good with the ladies.
Put that light high.
Put it up.
We'll do it the same way.
You two girls in the back.
On the left.
Watch out.
Gulliver.
Yes, Miss Lane.
Do you know where Mr Drew is?
He went away and left me after he promised he wouldn't.
Do you know where he went?
I got an idea, but I can't tell.
Do you know when he'll be back?
I don't know.
He'll turn up.
You can't lose that guy.
We're ready for rehearsal, Miss Lane.
All right, thank you.
Go ahead. We'll wait here.
Thank you.
And just as you reach here,
Miss Lane steps up and kisses you.
And much to your surprise, because you don't know her.
Then you turn, read your line to the doorman and walk out to the kerb.
Right.
Alas, I'm so sorry about it.
I know it's going to be difficult for you, but I'll try and help you all I can.
Thank you, Tom.
Oh, do you know Mr Johnson?
Yes, how do you do?
Shall we try it once?
Oh, George, let's have quiet, please.
Quiet.
Rehearsal.
Take your places, please.
Hit them on.
Everyone ready for rehearsal?
Okay.
Camera.
This business gives me a funny feeling.
What do you mean?
I don't know.
Just gives me a funny feeling, that's all.
Supposing it should happen somebody else gets shot?
That's ridiculous.
Well, maybe it is, maybe it ain't.
Anyway, I don't like the set and I don't like the title of the picture.
The Death Kiss, ugh.
From now on we have no more titles with death in it.
Getting superstitious?
Say, you ain't got no nerves.
I ain't afraid either. I'm just a little scared, that's all.
What can possibly happen?
That's it. Anything.
I must have been overlooking something.
A bloody shame, sir. Most annoying.
Right under me very nose.
Wait a minute.
What's the matter now?
I can't get it with the mike there.
Well, go ahead and fix it the way you want it.
Swing it in here farther.
Come on, farther.
Now down a little closer.
There.
Is that in your picture?
No, it's in place there.
Okay. Test it.
One, two, three, four.
One, two, three, four.
Microphone number two.
All right, let's go.
Okay for sound.
Oh, Lieutenant. Can I see you a minute?
Well, if it isn't our little mystery writer.
I knew you'd turn up.
Have you solved it?
Come over here a minute.
What's the revelation?
I went through the clothes that Brent wore the night he was murdered.
I found a room key to the Cliffside Inn in his pocket.
I went up to the Inn and found that he'd registered there the night before as Mr and Mrs Brent.
Not unusual for him, was it?
No, but the husband of the woman that was with him waited for Brent in the telephone booth in the lobby.
When Brent came down they had a fight.
Brent beat him up and left with the woman.
Now there's your motive.
The fellow who hid in the telephone booth is the fellow who murdered Brent.
It's a motive, sure.
But it seems to me that everyone around here had a motive.
Yes, but the same man knew a lot about electricity and a lot about film.
Now, Chalmers couldn't have thrown that cigarette butt in the film because he was nowhere around at the time.
Marcia couldn't have poured acid on the negative.
She knows less about film than you do.
But the same fellow, whoever it was, found out that Chalmers had discovered his contraption in the lamp.
Stole Marcia's car, took acid again, doctored Chalmers' gin, and then returned the car.
But why did he take Miss Lane's car?
To give himself a double headed out.
If you believed that suicide gag, it would be the end of it.
If you didn't, everything pointed to Marcia.
Whatever happened, he wouldn't be suspected.
Yeah.
But you have got to show me that the guy who is at the end is someone here at the studio.
And that he had access to the light, the film, the car and everything else.
That's easy.
The man who hid in the telephone booth left his trademark.
What's this?
Well, you know as well as I do.
Scribblings a man makes on a piece of paper are as identifying as a signature.
Oh, now all we've got to do is to find the guy that scribbled like this, huh?
I've done that too.
Take a look at this.
Where did you get this?
In Grossmith's office.
Now, Avery, Steiner, Grossmith and Howell were in there having a conference.
And you think one of those four killed Brent?
Yes?
This is interesting.
But I've only your word for it and that don't count for much.
Well, I'll keep your paper dolls.
But you've got to get me more substantial evidence than this before I can let Miss Lane go.
Take good care of these guns, boys, and don't forget to check them back to me.
Thank you.
Sure the gun isn't loaded?
You bet not. I just looked.
Mind if I look?
Not at all.
Is that clear to you?
All right, we'll take it.
Is everybody ready?
Let's make it.
Johnson, powder up, will you, please?
Sure.
Thanks.
You're welcome.
Frank. I've been so worried about you.
Darling, I'm hot on the trail.
I've got an idea.
If I'm right, I'll have this whole thing wrapped up and tied before you know it.
But don't go away before I'm through, will you?
You bet I won't.
Miss Lane, will you stand in a minute, please?
See you later.
It isn't loaded, is it?
What do you think, I'm crazy?
Mind if I look?
No, go ahead.
Thanks.
Say, Bill, those aren't the same guns you used before, are they?
I know. I couldn't get 38s before so I slipped in the 45s.
Nobody knew the difference.
You mean 38s were called for before?
Yeah, we made a row about it.
Who insisted?
Okay, coming up!
Come on with me.
Listen. I've got it.
This is Bill, the property man.
He tells me on the day that Brent was murdered he was definitely ordered to give all the extras 38 caliber guns.
Yeah?
Did you get it? 38 caliber guns were ordered.
Now, if Bill had supplied them, we would never have known that it wasn't an accident.
But he didn't.
He had to use 45s.
That's how he knew it was a murder.
Now, the fellow who ordered those 38s...
Say, who ordered those guns?
Go ahead, Bill, tell him.
Well, it was Mr...
Turn those lights on!
Lights. Give me a light.
Here you are, Sheehan.
There he is. There he goes.
Up there.
Come on, he went this way.
No, there he is. Come on.
There he goes.
Stand where you are or I'll shoot.
Avery.
Mr Avery!
He's the that who ordered the guns.
Yeah, and like a fool I told you about him under the microphone.
He was listening in with the earphones.
So it was him.
Don't look at him now. He's dead.
He's dead.
Yes, I am glad.
The woman at the Cliffside Inn, huh?
You stay here, Hillicker,
Come on. Come with me.
I got him. I got him.
There's your man.
Who is he?
You'll suffer for this.
You despicable cad.
So, you're a policeman, eh?
Pardon me.
I think I owe apologies, Miss Lane.
And to you too.
I'm sorry I was unpleasant.
You know, at first I could have sworn it was you.
I knew it and it made me quite angry.
But you're much more clever than
I gave you credit for.
Well, that sounds like a new contract.
We'll talk about that later.
Oh, Lieutenant...
Would you mind telling me why it is that detectives always wear their hats even in the presence of ladies?
Sure.
That's so we won't have anything in our hands or arms in case we have to use them.
That's one for the book.
Do you mind if I write it in right now?
Subtitles: Luís Filipe Bernardes
Hold it, hold it.
No, no, not you.
Come on, get out of here.
Get out of here!
Yes, that's fine. Thank you.
Mrs. Lucy, it's beautiful.
That's it. Are you the father?
- No.
- I am.
Get out of here.
This is nothing to the celebration this town ought to give for your leaving.
- Now, get out and stay out.
- Yeah. We don't want any more private detectives like you making public scandal.
Board!
If the towns on this road knew how much danger was headed their way, they'd all be out flagging this train to keep on going.
If you ever need me, boys, you'll know where to look.
Right where there's the most trouble.
Oh, my darling!
Mr. Nash,
I don't mind telling you, with all my jewelry, I'd be terrified of someone stealing it if I hadn't had you here to help me guard it.
If you're going to stay in San Morego, you'll be needing a bodyguard every minute.
I've always found it the most peaceful and respectable place in the world.
They've cracked down on racketeers in all the big crime cities.
And so they've moved in, whole mobs of them, on your nice, quiet, little city.
It's unprepared and unaccustomed to dealing with their dirty work.
Well, that sounds logical, all right.
And it's logical I need a bodyguard.
Most certainly.
Just be careful who you get.
In a city full of crooks, you might get a crook for a guard.
But how should I know?
You've lived there. Perhaps, you can recommend somebody.
- I could if you insist, Mrs. Arden.
- Oh, would you please, Mr. Nash?
I'd be so grateful.
And when you're in San Morego, don't forget to call me up.
I'm in the book.
Mrs. Arden, you're in the bag.
Hello.
- Can I help you?
- You're not a customer, are you?
No, sweetheart, I'm a detective.
Oh, that's just what we need, a detective to find us a case.
Something told me to come here.
Maybe it was because of you.
Something told me to get out of here.
Maybe it was because of you.
You're leaving because Ames can't afford to keep you on. Is that it, kitten?
The only case we've had in weeks was a woman...
Do you keep this?
The only case we've had in weeks was a woman who lost her pet poodle and wanted Ames to find it for her.
- And Ames couldn't find it, eh?
- No.
Well, perhaps that's a good thing.
A poodle would probably scare
Ames to death. Is the genius in?
- Yes, but he doesn't like to be waked up.
- Oh, that's all right.
I'll probably be just a part of his nightmare.
What's this?
- Shane.
- Your old partner come back.
What for?
To save you from further wild goose chases after pet poodles.
- Why didn't you stay where you were?
- I needed a rest.
Bet you'll get plenty of it here.
Ames Detective Agency.
Who? Mrs. R. Manchester Arden?
Honey, this is it. I'll take it in here.
Mr. Ames speaking personally.
Shut up.
Mrs. R. Manchester Arden?
Why, of course, I've heard of you.
Well, it was very subtle of the gentleman to recommend us. All right, Mrs. Arden.
Oh, yes, we should have a small advance. Say $250.
I'll handle your case personally.
Goodbye, Mrs. Arden.
Well, was that phone call another one of your practical jokes?
Yes, practical to the extent of $250. You heard me.
Well, maybe you'll let me know what this case is, now that you've assigned me to it personally.
Mrs. R. Manchester Arden is a grand dame. I met her on the train.
Very doughy, with flesh and money both.
Enough money to believe my story that she needed a bodyguard because this town was full of crooks.
- So, I told her about you.
- Well, what do we do now?
You follow her wherever she goes.
So she'll think she needs you, better hire a few mugs to appear in the background and scare her a little.
Some of your friends will do.
- Oh, I'm sorry.
- Hello, what's your name, little girl?
- Murgatroyd.
- Can you spell it?
M-U-R... No, don't tell me.
G-A-T-R-O-Y...
- D.
- Murgatroyd.
Sounds like the technical name for killing your mother.
Oh.
- Have you finished packing all your things?
- Yes.
And all the things that weren't yours, but that you thought you could use?
- Yes. I mean, I'm all packed.
- Good.
Now you can start unpacking because you're staying on, honey, in spite of your name and everything.
But not in spite of never having been paid. It's going on three weeks now.
A nice lady is sending down $250.
You'll be paid out of that.
All right. I start unpacking.
When the money arrives.
You'll be all right.
Things are going to start happening around here and we can use you.
In fact, I'd like to have you around even though things weren't happening.
Sort of taken things over, haven't you?
Office, business, secretary, everything.
- That reminds me, how's your wife?
- She's fine.
She hasn't thought about you for a long time.
I'll take you home to dinner tonight just to prove to you how completely she's forgotten you.
- Astrid?
- Just a minute.
- I've brought a guest home to dinner.
- All right.
- Hello, kitten.
- Shane. How nice.
- And tomorrow is your birthday, isn't it?
- Yes, how nice of you to remember.
- Do I get my birthday kiss now?
- You certainly do.
I wish somebody'd remember when my birthday is.
- Let me have your coat.
- Thank you.
Now, look here, Shane. I know she used to be in love with you, but that was three years ago, before she married me.
And all this reminds me that she might have married me.
- But you went away.
- Yeah.
But now I'm back.
Isn't it wonderful having Shane back with us again?
Yeah. Everything's gonna be all right now.
- Are you going to be home this evening?
- I certainly am.
Well, that's a fine way to tend to business, Ames.
Huh?
I told you, you should follow
Mrs. Arden whenever she goes out.
Yeah, but you didn't say anything about tonight.
Well, I meant to.
She's going to a piano concert tonight.
- Like the piano?
- No.
Is that nice?
After all the trouble I've gone through to get you your first case in months.
- Excepting, of course, hounding poodles.
- Have you really got a case already?
Oh, you wonderful darling.
It'll be just like old times if you can get the business going good again.
We're a cinch, kitten.
Aren't we, partner?
Oh, I'm sorry.
Kitten, how many times do I have to tell you to change the name on this door to "Shane and Ames"?
Since you landed,
I've had too much else to do.
Hello, what's this?
Oh, that reminds me.
What are you doing tonight?
I've got a date.
Break it, precious, and you and I'll have a lot of fun.
Oh, forgive me if I don't break the date I already had. it was with the most thoughtful fellow named...
Named Shane.
Then I didn't catch you after all.
I knew we had a date, I just wanted to see if you remembered.
- Oh, sorry. I thought you were sleeping.
- I was going to. I mean... No.
This is my partner, Mr. Shane.
- And this is Miss Valerie...
- Purvis.
Yes, Purvis, Purvis. Thank you.
Miss Purvis has got trouble.
- She wants us to take care of it.
- She came to the right place.
- Can you help me?
- If anybody can, we can.
- What's your trouble?
- Well, a man she met in Baltimore promised to marry her and ran out on her.
- Yes, I know his kind.
- Sure you do.
She followed him to this town, but she hasn't been able
- to get in touch with him.
- A rotten trick.
And, she thought... Yeah.
She wants us to find him for her.
- How?
- Well, she's been in contact with her boyfriend's pal, a man named Farrow.
- But Farrow won't tell her anything.
- We'll make him tell.
This means so much to me.
Could either of you take care of it personally?
Now, that depends on how much it means to you.
Well, I'll show you.
Would this...
Would this show you how much it means to me?
$100? I thought you really cared for the man.
Oh, but I do.
We'll find him for you. Now, tell us where we can pick up Farrow, and how do we know him when we see him?
Well, I have an appointment to meet him tonight at 8:00
- in the lobby of the General fremont Hotel.
- That'll peg him for us.
Then all we'll have to do will be to follow him wherever he goes, and he'll lead us, eventually, to your betrayer.
- Thank you so much.
- Thank you.
I couldn't find a taxi.
Let's go this way.
- What time do you finish tonight, kitten?
- Pretty late, daddy.
- Mr. Shane, telephone.
- Oh, thank you. Excuse me.
If you come back with some story about having to leave,
I'll know it's a frame-up.
You don't say. I'll come right out.
Now listen, kitten, I've got to go away for a little while, but I'll be back before the end of the last show.
- I'll wait for you near the dressing rooms.
- All right.
- Check, please.
- I knew it.
Remember to put this in the books, charge to expenses, for Mrs. R. Manchester Arden.
You'll have to take a cab home alone, honey.
Well, you might at least have given me some sort of an alibi.
I will. I've got a pip.
I have to go up to the graveyard.
The graveyard? What for?
To see about somebody who's dead, of course. Come on.
Poor dear old Ames.
It's the first time he ever did anything in an appropriate place.
You must feel kind of bad, losing your partner so suddenly,
- just when the firm was getting going.
- Well, Dunhill, what's the dope?
One pill out of that old Webley did the work.
- Right to his heart, through the side.
- What's...
What was he doing with his arm up like this? Parting his hair?
I don't know.
That big burn on his coat,
- that gun was poked right into his ribs.
- Let me see that.
- Oh, Dunhill, I didn't find anything yet.
- Well, keep looking.
Ames' gun was sorted away in his shoulder holster.
- Was he working on a case, Shane?
- He was trailing a man named Farrow.
- A man named Farrow. What for?
- For $200.
Don't you want to take a closer look at your silent partner?
No. No, you've seen everything I could see.
I'd better run along and break the sad news to the widow.
Murgatroyd speaking. Shane?
Well, moonbeam, where do we go from here?
I thought you'd know that.
You're supposed to be the man that knows all the answers.
- Anything wrong?
- No.
- Hello, Shane.
- Why, hello.
Honey, I thought you might like to join my friends here for a little party.
Sergeant Dunhill and Police Detective
Lieutenant Pollock.
- Gentlemen, Babe.
- Pleased to meet you, I hope.
I got out to the graveyard just after you'd left. Sorry I missed you.
Yeah, so am I. There's no place
I'd rather see you than in a graveyard.
Pardon me, please.
Roy here tells me that you were in an awful hurry to get away from that cemetery.
I couldn't bring Ames back to life no matter how long I stayed.
Oh, but you said you were leaving to break the news to the widow.
And you didn't go out there and tell the widow.
- No.
- No.
Instead, you phoned your secretary to tell her.
If this is boring you, sweetheart, we'll leave.
- Oh, no. Go ahead.
- Oh, Shane, don't be so stingy.
How do you expect us to turn up anything on the Ames killing if you don't give us what you got?
You needn't get a headache over Ames' murder.
- I'll bury my own dead.
- That's what I thought.
That's exactly why I came to see you.
Now, Shane, give us the lowdown.
- Where were...
- Pardon me.
Well, this is the best place in the world for third degree.
- Isn't it, Roy?
- I'll say so.
Now, wait a minute, Shane.
Your partner Ames was shot while tailing a man named Farrow.
And shortly after you left your partner's dead body, Farrow was killed.
- I killed him for revenge.
- Cut that out.
Farrow died before he could say who shot him.
Oh, but you're not a man to need his word for it.
Babe and I are trucking along if you're through.
- Not so fast.
- You're not ready to pinch me yet,
- are you, Pollock?
- No, not yet.
Swell. Come on, heartthrob.
Now will you have the name on this door changed?
Just "Ted Shane, Private Operator".
- You win by process of elimination.
- Anything important happen?
A great, big, tall Englishman called.
- Oh, what did he want?
- He didn't tell me.
- What was his name?
- He didn't tell me.
That was a lovely case you sent me out on last night.
I know, precious.
Widows are tough to initiate, but if she turns up here, keep her away from me.
- How could I?
- Hello, kitten.
Come in if I scream.
Well, I was just standing here and zip, she went in. I couldn't help it.
Poor kitten.
Oh, Shane, did you really kill him?
Who put that bright idea in your pretty little head?
Be kind to me, Shane.
Now you'd better go home and take some sleeping tablets and get some rest.
And you will be careful about coming here, won't you?
And I'll come to see you as soon as I can.
- How soon?
- Just as soon as I can.
How long do you have to wear black, honey?
Don't you like me in black?
Oh, you look so good that people will think you killed Ames just so you could have mourning clothes to make you look more gorgeous.
Well, now, don't worry about the insurance or anything.
- I took care of the insurance already.
- Oh, well, then you'll be all right.
- Be kind to me, Shane.
- Excuse me.
- Shane speaking.
- How you doing, Shane?
- How am I doing?
- "Be kind to me, Shane."
Well, anyway, you love me and know I wouldn't do anything wrong.
- Well, you might've killed Ames.
- Listen,
I'm supposed to be a detective solving a crime case, and everybody thinks
I committed the crimes.
Mrs. Ames thinks I killed her husband.
And the police think I killed Farrow to avenge the husband.
And now you start.
But you were late picking me up last night.
You know, precious, I wouldn't let a little thing like killing Ames make me late for a date with you.
Did you kill him? No kidding?
Hey, Shane, you better get over here right away.
That Purvis dame is checking out.
The porter went upstairs for her bags.
Here.
Union Depot.
- Running out on me?
- I remember now.
- You're the other man.
- That's me, sister.
I've been named as the other man.
Driver, forget the Union Depot.
Go to the Carondelet Apartments.
I didn't expect you.
I noticed you weren't exactly waiting around for me.
No. I mean, I expected to see Mr. Ames this morning.
Then you're on your way down to the morgue now?
- Oh, no.
- Well, that's where he is.
Just temporarily, of course, until they bury him.
- I knew.
- Sure you did.
You didn't really want to see either of us or you wouldn't be running out of your hotel.
Oh, I had to leave there. There was a man.
There probably always will be men where you are, child.
He came right up to my room when I came in and followed me in.
Oh, I had the most terrible time trying to get rid of him.
And then he kept phoning me all night, wanting to come up and see me, saying he was desperately in love with me at first sight.
Oh, I can understand that, but not why you didn't phone the house detective.
Well...
- Well, I couldn't.
- No? Why not, precious?
You see, the man who was forcing his attentions upon me, well, he was the house detective.
- Yes, I guess all us detectives like you.
- Do you?
Sure. Ames liked you, he's gone.
The hotel detective liked you, you're gone.
Maybe you and I could get someplace.
Yes, maybe the third time would work a charm. I do need somebody.
Probably me.
Just put them right down here.
Nice place.
And what a beautiful view from these windows.
The lights must be gorgeous at night.
You never realize how big a city is until you see it from way up high like this.
You aren't exactly the person you pretended to be, are you?
I'm not quite sure I know what you mean.
We'll never get anyplace if you insist on playing innocent.
All right. I won't play innocent anymore.
Good. Now, let's both quit acting as though the other were an imbecile.
That story you told us yesterday wasn't quite true.
Then you didn't believe it?
You gave us more money than you would have if it had been true.
- But enough to make it all right.
- Mr. Shane, I...
Now, tell us, without any phonus bolognus, why you wanted Farrow shadowed.
Well, I wanted to know whom he was meeting, what he was doing in this town and things like that.
You see, he was supposed to be helping me and I didn't quite trust him.
Now, what was he supposed to be helping you do?
Well, I'm afraid I can't tell you that.
You look lovely.
You'll make a charming hostess when the police visit you.
Oh, but Mr. Shane.
Mr. Shane, they don't have to know about me, do they?
- You will help me, won't you?
- How about you helping me?
Oh, you really do look gorgeous.
Tell me, did your pal Farrow kill my partner Ames?
Why, yes, certainly.
That was Farrow's old Webley gun the papers said was by Ames' body.
- All right, who got Farrow?
- I don't know.
Your enemies or some of his own personal enemies?
His, I hope, but I'm not sure.
You haven't told me a thing
I didn't already know.
I guess I iust came along for the ride.
Listen, I know I have no right to ask you to help me, but I might be able to pay for it.
- Of course, money does make a difference.
- How much?
- $500 to start.
- All right.
- Somebody robbed me!
- Me.
While you were in there fixing yourself all up to vamp me into helping you,
- I got the $500 we've been talking about.
- Did you?
Get going, Mr. Shane. Your taxi's ticking.
Teach me how to do that, and I'll knock that $500 off.
You better go out back and get the fire hose if you want to put out that seaweed.
Here, try one of these.
Get funny with me and I'll have to fog you. fog me?
That's what you've been trying to do, isn't it? following me around, smoking these smelly stogies.
I've got what it takes to do it.
If you're going to keep shadowing me, you'll have to smoke something better.
- I'm telling you, mister.
- And I'm telling you.
If you're going to tag around after me, you'll have to quit wearing that monkey cap.
- Good morning, gentlemen.
- How are you?
Say, tell me, what do you know about this Farrow fella?
- He's dead.
- Yeah, we heard that rumor, too.
Yes, sir. It's a good thing they don't do that to all our guests.
Ruin our business.
- How long did he live here?
- Three days, poor fellow.
- Did he ever have any friends visit him?
- He didn't seem to have any in town.
- Except one lady, a blonde.
- Blonde's been the death of many a man.
Yes, sir. You'll be surprised, gentlemen, but I remember her name.
Miss Valerie Purvis, Brandon Hotel.
Operator, get me the Brandon Hotel.
She used to phone him, and then he'd meet her here.
And that's what she did last night.
Hello, Brandon Hotel?
This is Police Detective Lieutenant Pollock.
I wanna check on one of your customers.
A girl named Valerie Purvis.
- Yeah, thanks.
- Oh, she seemed so nice.
I'd hate to think that she was connected with it.
Yeah? She did, huh? All right, thanks a lot.
She was connected with it, all right.
She checked out this morning.
Don't take it too hard, baby.
Say, are you sure that nobody else ever called on him?
That's all. Oh, wait a minute. Yes, sir.
There was another one, a big, tall Englishman.
- Got change for a five?
- Oh, I think so.
Shane is coming.
- There you are.
- Yeah.
Hello!
Good afternoon.
I just came round to apologize.
And very decent of you it is. For what?
For doing what I did to your flat.
Rather messy, isn't it? May I come in?
- At the risk of being carried out?
- Oh, that's just a minor risk compared to some of the dangers
I've had to go through, and the adventures in which I'm presently engaged.
- You'd want a whisky and soda.
- I'd like a drop of sherry if you don't mind.
- Sorry. I haven't any.
- What? No sherry?
This is delicious, old chap.
You should try it.
I'd like to have some champagne.
Have I got any?
No, you haven't.
Have you got a glass, old boy?
- Yes.
- Thanks.
- This is jolly, isn't it?
- Oh, you found it.
No, not yet.
I was looking for a certain horn.
Oh, you mean one of these things...
Yes, rather like that.
They've pointed the finger at me for a lot of dirty tricks, but never for a crime like playing the saxophone.
Let's be serious, Mr. Shane, shall we?
Actually, I tried to get the horn from you without paying for it.
Yes, that's natural.
And from your point of view, sensible.
Say, it's wonderful sherry.
Well, having failed to rob you of it,
I suppose I'll have to pay you for return of the horn.
- Should we say $2,000?
- Say $5,000 and you've said something.
Very well, $5,000.
You could offer me a million for a purple elephant,
- but that wouldn't mean a thing.
- Oh, I see, yes.
You need a retainer.
Oh, I beg your pardon, nothing personal.
- Shall we say $500?
- $500 settles it.
Very well.
I beg your pardon.
That's the right pocket.
Now, you'll hand me over the horn, eh, old boy?
- No, old boy.
- But you've got to. I just paid you for it.
There are others after it, aren't there?
How do I know I ought to hand it over to you,
- that you are the rightful owner?
- But I assure you.
Don't assure me. Prove it to me.
What do you know about Roland, the great french legendary hero?
Just this much.
If you're trying to frame him,
I'll find you plenty to pin on him.
My dear old fellow, in the eighth century, at the time of the powerful emperor of france, Charlemagne...
Oh, I've heard of Shelly, all right.
- Splendid.
- Oh, I see you found my address book.
- Did you copy down some of the numbers?
- Rather, including the marginal notes.
As I was saying, Charlemagne, as he's generally known, conquered practically all the land of Spain.
- Yes, I've heard of Spain, too.
- Amazing.
Well, the Saracen king of Spain...
Get me my sherry, will you?
Realizing he couldn't get rid of Charlemagne, offered him tribute of great wealth and promised him complete submission.
Of course, that promise was a phony.
Then you do know something about the history of that period.
Well, I know a double-cross when I hear one.
Well, unfortunately, Charlemagne didn't, old boy.
When the french withdrew, our jolly old friend Roland was in charge of the rear.
I say, that's delicious sherry.
Do have a sip.
When Charlemagne and his army got well back into france, the Saracens attacked Roland, and there was a terrific fight.
Oh, thanks for the reminder.
I've got to call up Murgatroyd about my fight tickets.
- Go right ahead. I'm listening.
- Well, it wasn't at all fair, you know.
Roland had only a few men and the Saracens had 40,000.
Roland had a horn made of ivory with which he was supposed to be able to signal for 50 miles.
It's a good thing you're paying me to listen to this.
Of course, the french never had a chance.
What's become of the little beast?
Have a shot yourself, will you?
I say, that's amazing.
How did you do that?
Roland, in spite of his shaky predicament, refused to blow his horn until he found he was the lone french survivor and knew he was dying.
But it was too late then for him to blow anything but taps.
Well, Charlemagne came back with his army and got his revenge by reconquering Spain.
But they never found Roland or his trumpet.
And now, 1,200 years later, we start looking for it.
- Hold that a minute, will you?
- Find anything in the divan?
Only a few hairpins and some small change.
Come across.
Very well.
The Saracens found the trumpet, and in revenge for their defeat, decided to fix it so that the trumpet wouldn't blow.
So, they stuffed it full of the finest iewels, which they stole from Roland's dead soldiers.
Well, now, if you're going to take us through the next 1,200 years, by the time we find the trumpet, we'll all be dead.
Yes. That's practically the true history of the trumpet.
And nearly everyone who's been connected with it has been killed.
Nice of you to cut me in on this.
But if that horn's really rammed full of jewels, it'll be worth plenty.
It'll cost you much more than $5,000 to get it from me.
- Then you have the trumpet?
- No.
- But you know where it is.
- No.
What?
You just inveigled me into telling you what it is.
I say, that's a pretty rotten trick, old boy.
That's not cricket.
How much of this is cricket and how much is racket?
And how much of that tripe you've been telling me is on the level?
The tripe, as you call it, happens to be the true history of the trumpet and its real value.
- And that's why...
- Darkies were born.
At least, that's why your partner Ames was killed.
And Farrow, too.
Take a letter.
Help! Help!
- That Englishman!
- Yes, Mr. Travers.
- He was here, too.
- But he locked...
He locked you in the closet.
Yes, I know all about it.
Come, sit down.
- You have an uncle, haven't you...
- Yes.
...who's a college professor, an authority on European history?
- Yeah.
- Take pad and pencil.
We're about to dictate a letter to him.
- To my uncle?
- Yeah. Ready?
"My dear professor.
Your niece, my secretary,
"has allowed me to take this liberty of writing you concerning
"a certain horn which has been brought to my
"attention.
"A fabulous trumpet reported to have belonged
"to the legendary hero, Roland.
"it is rumored that in the eighth century, the french muscled in on the Spanish,
"and made a deal for the big payoff.
"it seems that 50,000 frenchmen once were wrong.
"The Saracens crammed the trumpet full of valuable gems."
No kidding?
Well.
And I hope the same disaster will not befall me.
And that's the story, without the accent, as the English chap told it to me.
Say, which one's crazy?
You or the Englishman?
That's what I want to find out.
Just turn that story over to your uncle professor, and find out if any of it is possible.
Say, I've got a cousin that specializes in brain diseases.
- Maybe I better turn it over to him.
- I know it sounds silly, honey.
But for $500, they can tell me stories like that and wreck my ioint every day.
- For $500?
- Yes, I know. I know.
Hello. Miss Valerie Purvis?
This is Shane.
Yes. Look, I've got hold of something important, and I've got to see you right away.
Better meet me in the lounge room of the Buckingham Hotel as soon as you can.
I may be a little late, so don't leave until I get there.
Goodbye.
Honey, run down to the lounge room of the Buckingham, and lounge around and keep your eye on her without getting caught.
If she leaves, phone me right away.
But where will you be while she's waiting for you at the Buckingham?
- You can reach me at Westgate 7696.
- But that's...
Yes, darling, the little lady's apartment.
So, you're the new chambermaid?
What are you doing here?
I told you to meet me at the Buckingham.
Do you mind very much, Mr. Shane, taking off your hat in the presence of a lady with a gun?
And would you be charming enough to hold it above your head with both your hands?
What are you going to do? frisk me?
Why don't you make me do a handstand?
So you're the man I hired to protect me.
King Kong.
Hello? A lady for Mr. Shane?
Oh, by all means, operator, put the lady on.
Hello?
Hello, Shane? How you doing?
Well, here I am at the Buckingham, and she hasn't turned up yet.
I guess little Miss Innocence didn't fall for the mastermind's tricks.
You don't think so?
Oh, well, don't worry, kitten.
You know no woman ever made a chump out of Papa Shane.
Yes. Yes, I'll be careful.
Goodbye. You can hang up now.
You may not be a chump, but you'll be a corpse if you try anything funny now.
Remember, if you fail to guess my weight,
I get a baby doll to take home.
Now, may I stop chinning myself on this hat?
Go ahead.
Just what did you come here for?
To take a nap.
- Come in.
- I locked that door.
- You stay right here.
- Yes, ma'am.
- Put it right over there.
- Ma'am.
- A radiogram for you, madam.
- Thank you.
Bad news, I hope?
Oh, on the contrary, good news.
We're having a celebration.
Oh, splendid.
- Oh. Service for two?
- Yes.
I had a hunch that I was going to have company.
So, that's why you didn't meet me at the Buckingham.
I see. You preferred the privacy of your own modest, little home.
Yes, I've always been known as a regular old homebody.
- And a very thorough one.
- Yes, just an old custom of mine.
- What? No armistice? Even at dinner?
- Nope. Not yet.
Well...
Oh, did I tell you, your English friend called on me today? it seems he wants me to find him some old french horn.
I suppose if somebody paid you for it, you'd try and find Santa Claus.
Honey, if they paid me enough, I would.
Well, you'd have as much chance of finding him as you would of finding me with an old french horn, if there is any such thing.
You never heard of Roland or his trumpet?
Or how the Saracens filled it with gems?
Either I've hired the wrong detective or you usually have brighter ideas.
I don't think I was shooting so wild.
He said the trumpet and the killings of Farrow and good old Ames were connected.
You were connected with the two killings.
But just vaguely, of course.
So there was a chance that you and the trumpets were connected.
- There isn't any connection.
- There must be. Someplace. it wasn't for nothing the Englishman tore up my rooms, gave me 500 good dollars, and offered me a lot more.
$5,000. That's something to work for.
You know, we could mean something to each other, really, if the $5,000 didn't mean so much to you.
Darling, that $5,000 is only for the delivery of some silly old saxophone
I don't even know exists.
But I do know about you.
Maybe, after I've cleared up a few murders, you and I could have a lot of fun.
Isn't that a lot surer than looking for some silly old french horn?
Wouldn't that be worth working for, really?
While you're figuring that out, scratch your head, sweetheart, with both hands.
I'm going to search the place.
- What are you looking at?
- Nothing.
You've been here for hours.
That's a long time to look at nothing.
Have a cigar, Officer.
Thanks. Hope this doesn't keep me awake.
Well, I guess the trumpet isn't here.
I told you it wasn't, but you wrecked the place anyway.
Well, that's only what your English friend did to me.
Would you mind if I stop scratching my head now?
- Oh, no, of course not.
- Thank you so much.
You do trust me, don't you? A little?
If you want me to help you, you've got to tell me everything.
I can't tell you. Yet.
- That's an answer the police won't go for.
- The police?
And we were going to have such fun together.
So that silly offer of $5,000 does mean more to you than me or anything!
Well, I'm not sure yet. I...
I'm in a tough spot.
$5,000 is a lot of money.
- Who is it?
- King Kong.
Hello, Shane.
Good morning, boys.
You're looking foggier than usual.
You seem to be having plenty of trouble lately, Shane.
Even at home. Your ioint's all torn up.
Looks like I got married, doesn't it?
Well, maybe not that, but you certainly let yourself in for a lot of grief.
Or maybe you got mixed up with something without quite knowing what it was, huh?
Then you don't think I'm naughty.
You just think I'm dumb.
Ain't you gonna tell us a little bit of something?
Telling you anything would be like contributing to the delinquency of a minor.
- What'd he mean by that?
- Yeah, yeah.
I wasn't kidding.
I'll turn you over to the police if you follow me with that beanie on.
My boss wants to see you.
- Alive?
- Yeah, for just a few minutes.
Aunty? Here he is.
Mr. Shane, I believe?
I believe one thing now myself.
This is no snipe hunt.
We're after something really big if you're in on this chase, Madame Barabbas.
Oh, then you recognize me.
It's a face that haunts every detective and copper in the world in his worst nightmares.
Oh, that is a compliment, in a way.
It's the only sort of compliment this old physiognomy deserves.
Madame Barabbas, it's good to have you with us.
It's not often we're honored by a visit from one of the really fine masters.
I don't seem much of a nightmare to you, sir.
Not to me, Madame.
If you've come all the way to our quiet little city, somewhere about, there must be plenty of money to be made.
Plenty of money, Mr. Shane? Say when.
No?
We begin well.
I mistrust a man who says when.
If he has to be careful not to drink too much, he can't be trusted when he does.
Shall we drink to the trumpet?
If we're going to talk about that french saxophone, we'd better drink.
No kidding.
Are you really in this game of
"Bugle, bugle, who's got the bugle"?
I am.
You're here, I take it, as the representative of the beautiful Miss Valerie Purvis?
I'm working for her. And I'm working for an Englishman named Travers.
- Is he still after it, too?
- Yes.
Although, you couldn't exactly say that I'm here working for either of them.
- Who else is there?
- There's me.
Oh, that's very good.
I mistrust a man who says he isn't working for himself.
So far, the Englishman has paid me $500 to get the trumpet.
The girl has paid out $500 for protection.
- Protection? From what?
- She hasn't said.
I think it's from the police, from the Englishman and probably from you, Madame.
Very probably.
Did she mention anything about the trumpet?
She said she doesn't know anything about any trumpets.
- I take it for granted she's lying.
- She's lying all right, Mr. Shane.
You're not drinking your drink.
Anything wrong with it?
I was just wondering.
There might be a knockout powder in it.
There was. it would have laid you low before you'd finished it.
And that cigarette would have laid you low before you finished it.
Mr. Shane, I love you.
Now then, let's get back to business.
Mr. Shane, I spent six years tracing that trumpet.
I finally found the owner of it in Greece in the city of Salonika.
A man named Tyrilias Constantinidis.
I sent two people as my agents to get it from him.
The Englishman Travers and the beautiful Miss Valerie Purvis.
- They got it?
- They got it.
And decided to keep it for themselves.
Evidently, Miss Purvis further decided to keep it for herself and framed the Englishman.
I traced her here, as I suppose the Englishman did, and here we all are.
Oh, there it is. My pipe case.
So that's what became of it.
- You stole it, you little thief.
- I'm telling you, mister.
And I'm telling you.
You stole it thinking the trumpet was in it.
- I ought to box your ears off!
- Don't put your hands on me!
- Why you! Why you!
- I'll kill you! I'll kill you!
Sit down, Kenneth, and behave yourself.
What were we talking about,
Mr. Shane, eh?
Oh, of course, that french horn, as you call it.
Well, I assure you, it's worth the trouble.
Then it's worth paying me plenty for, if I turn it over to you.
- Then you know where it is?
- Well, I know where to get it.
At the right time, for the right price.
What would you say if I were to offer you $100,000?
- I'd say I ought to have an advance.
- Oh, of course. Of course.
- You say you got $1,000 from the others?
- That's right.
Supposing we double them.
You don't mean, by any chance, double-cross them?
Oh, Mr. Shane.
If you really need an answer to that question...
Supposing we let the $2,000 do the talking?
I'll be listening.
I'm telling you again, mister.
- Don't hit me. I'll kill you.
- Here, Kenny boy!
- I'll kill you! I'll kill you!
- Here!
It's nice to see you two getting acquainted.
This stuff makes it possible to get along with anybody.
And $100,000 more when you deliver the trumpet.
That makes it highly probable you'll be the one who'll wind up with the trumpet.
In fact, Madame Barabbas, that settles it.
- You'll get me that trumpet, all right.
- The easiest and safest way I can.
But you're not hiring me to do any murders.
If any difficulties arise that calls for violence,
- Kenneth will take care of them.
- Him?
You heard what she said.
You heard what I've been saying.
You won't be the first, but you'll be more pleasure.
Why, Kenneth, you shouldn't talk to Mr. Shane like that.
He's wonderfully effective with a revolver, you know.
I know. Now all he's got to do is learn to hold on to his revolver.
A crippled newsboy took this away from Kenneth on the way over.
Well, you won't need much help, will you, Mr. Shane?
No, Madame.
In a few days, you'll have your trumpet and I'll have my $100,000.
- Unless...
- Unless what?
Unless the girl's got you the way she's got all the others.
She hasn't got me any way.
You've got me.
The only way it's possible to get me.
I've got to cool that guy off!
I'm gonna blow him wide open!
- And you can't stop me!
- Stop it, stop it, stop it, Kenny boy!
Wait till he gets the trumpet for us and then,
Aunty will be glad to let you kill him.
I know, your name isn't on the door yet.
Never mind about the door, kitten.
We'll be moving into greener pastures if we can keep this treasure hunt going.
My uncle, the professor, says that story about Roland is a famous old legend.
There might be such a trumpet.
- No?
- Yeah.
Oh, and here's his answer all written out for you.
The professor says there might be such a horn, and $2,000 says there is.
- Only louder.
- Shane.
Another down payment on the saxophone?
Yes.
Maybe you can make a fortune by not finding the trumpet.
Baby, when I get this cleared up, you and I'll have a lot of fun.
Come in.
Don't be frightened, dear lady.
I just came by to apologize and say how awfully sorry I was I had to do what I did to your jolly, little place.
You know, all that messing about with your furniture.
So, I thought I better make some kind of atonement, so,
- I brought along this corsage.
- Oh, for me?
Yes, I thought it would probably brighten up the place.
- Because you tore up the furniture?
- No, because I locked you in the cupboard.
Oh, that just shows you how polite you are.
Yes, yes.
Well, I think I'd better be going.
Goodbye.
The way you scare people off,
I'm not sure you didn't kill Ames.
No kidding, when it's all over with, will you tell me why you did murder him?
I'll tell you right now, precious.
I murdered him so I could be alone with you.
Now get me Valerie Purvis on the phone.
- So you can be alone with her.
- And get that trumpet.
The others are still paying off trying to get it.
- All she's asking for...
- And paying for.
...is protection.
So, she must have it somewhere.
And Papa Shane is going to stick right with her until he gets his hands on it.
Miss Valerie Purvis?
Papa... Mr. Shane calling.
She's got it and I'm going to have it.
Hello. Valerie?
Look, darling, I'm coming right over.
Something's happened that makes me think that for the next few days, you're going to need my constant protection.
Right.
- Who's that fellow in the uniform?
- He's Dr. Steven fujiyama.
Oh, Fuiiyama, huh?
Oh, that reminds me.
That trumpet of Roland's.
- What did you do with it?
- Didn't I tell you?
I lost it the other day when I was taking a bath.
Yes, you know, I was blowing away on it and my hands were soapy and I...
I blew so hard that it slipped right out of my grasp and went down the drain of the bathtub.
That's because I wasn't there to protect you.
- Hello?
- Travers speaking.
What? Travers?
Wait a minute, I'll see if she's home.
- Are you home, Aunty?
- What does that crook want?
- What do you want?
- Probably wants to square himself.
If he's wise, he'll come right back home to Aunty and behave.
I'm coming over at once.
I have some very important news.
You know, even with me being pretty sure that you're trying to double-cross me, and you being pretty sure that I'm trying to double-cross you, being together has been grand.
Well, it's that double-crossing that's made us trust each other.
Oh, but the double-crossing's all over now, isn't it, Shane? it is, sweetheart.
But that's no reason that we have to break up just because we're playing fair with each other.
Oh, I have to go.
Shane Detective Agency.
Go right in.
Mr. Shane? Oh, no, I can't disturb him.
He's in a very important conference.
Oh, all right.
Cigar? Drink?
Mr. Shane, I don't know whether you're familiar with our organization, the City fathers, but it's dedicated to the preservation of the good name of our city, and the peace and prosperity of its citizens.
Oddly enough, Mr. Shane, trouble seems to have begun at just about the exact date you arrived here to settle down.
In the last three weeks, two murders have occurred in our city.
And you have been connected with each of them.
We're being laughed at by every other city on the coast.
Particularly, your old hometown, which was wise enough not to let you return.
I know, I've seen that in newspapers.
Everything about these two murders seems to point in some way to you.
But gentlemen, surely you're too smart to take the police so seriously.
But it happens that their theory that you might have killed your partner seems pretty sound.
We don't say that you did kill him, but we do say that you can tell us who did.
You give us the Ames killer, and we'll take care of the rest.
Gentlemen, you've come to the right place.
But whenever I undertake a case of this sort, I always get an advance payment.
All we're giving you, Shane, is 24 hours to give us the Ames killer.
What are you threatening to do to me, City Papa?
Take me down behind the woodshed and beat my pants off?
The City fathers have their own very definite way of taking care of people like you.
Papa Shane has his ways of taking care of himself.
Oh, you're not going?
Well, goodbye. Come back again.
I hope you're not going to become a father.
Take a letter. Allez-up!
Sears and Ward.
My dear...
Don't let me interrupt.
Oh, no.
Oh, I was...
Well, iust... Was taking a letter.
In the morning, remind me to take up where we left off.
Oh, I'll be here.
Oh, just a minute.
Shane Detective Agency.
I wanna speak to Mr. Shane.
It's very much important.
Can I take the message?
Oh, no, he's very busy now.
And all ready for that dinner you've been promising me.
You shouldn't have come here.
I've told you how dangerous it is.
Yes, I know, precious.
But the only way to be sure of you is to come and get you.
Besides, it used to be my husband's office, and I go with it.
- Detectives Pollock and Dunhill are here.
- You've got to go, sweetness.
Oh, always there's something.
Unless you want to have dinner with me in jail.
- But, darling, please, can't we...
- I'll call you up later.
- That was a pip, a nice, neat, little trick.
- Not this time.
Gentlemen. Walk right in.
Just put your feet up on the desk.
A man phoned with some sort of a Latin accent, and said it was very important for you to be down to a boat, the Fuiiyama, and ask for a man by the name of
- Eduardo Espinoza.
- That's all he said?
Well, there is a Fuiiyama.
Came in yesterday. I checked on it.
- Good girl.
- You're not going down there to the ship?
I have to be nice to visitors to our fair city, don't I?
Well, it's been nice knowing you.
If those two mugs want to know where I am, tell them I'm somewhere at the harbor.
Can you boys tell me where I'll find a boat to take me out to the Fuiiyama?
- You gonna hose the farmer's hut?
- Huh?
Well, there she is, brother.
That's the Fuiiyama.
And am I burning?
Come on, let's go!
I say, you're a good shot!
You got them both.
When I shoot, I don't miss.
Valerie, if you touch that bag,
I'll shoot you loose from it.
You'll have to.
Unless you want to be smart and split the trumpet three ways.
What?
And double-cross Madame Barabbas?
Certainly.
Stop, or I'll stop you!
Madame Barabbas. Come here, quick.
The trumpet!
- Where are you?
- In here.
- Where?
- Here.
Hello, kitten. Looking for something?
- It's her. She wants us.
- But where's the trumpet?
We're not going to leave you here.
Come on with us.
I say, one of the corpses is gone.
It's her again. We'd better hurry. Come on.
That whistle may mean something.
Did you hear it?
Yeah, let's see what it is.
- Well, Kenny boy.
- Shane!
Well, here, you're all together again.
Oh, I'm not with them.
I came here to see you.
I told the sailor to call you about Espinoza.
They were on the boat when I arrived.
We got to the boat before she did, but we could not get to Mr. Espinoza.
If Espinoza's the man lying out there on the pier, you got to him all right, Madame.
Yes. That's him.
He was very faithful to Miss Purvis and would not give up the trumpet.
So Kenneth set fire to the boat to force him to come on shore.
And here we all are.
And here we all are, and I've got the trumpet.
- You've got it?
- You've got it?
Certainly, when I'm hired to get anything,
I get it.
Shane, if you've got that trumpet, give it to me.
Here it is!
- Now you've got it!
- Oh, Kenny boy.
Hey, the British are coming! A raid!
I'm getting to be an expert at taking toys away from your gunmen,
Madame Barabbas.
What? No gun?
Here, Kenny boy, dry your eyes and blow your nose.
Now, let's talk about money.
You hired me to get the trumpet and I got it.
Now listen, Shane.
I hired you first, so that they wouldn't have it and we would.
- We, Valerie?
- You remember me.
You said there wasn't any trumpet, and that I was silly to talk about it.
Oh, but you knew I was lying, Shane.
You knew all the time that I was lying.
You're a lovely liar. So, you're in on this?
Give me the trumpet and I'll give you half the fortune I can sell it for.
The various killings were all the young lady's fault.
- What nonsense.
- Nonsense? Listen, Mr. Shane.
I sent Miss Purvis and Travers to Salonika to get the trumpet from the Greek, and it was there he started the double-crossing.
Nothing of the sort.
Miss Purvis started the double-cross in Hong Kong when she made the deal with Espinoza.
But you're wrong.
I didn't double-cross you, my dear.
I simply didn't trust you.
You didn't exactly trust Espinoza in Hong Kong, neither, when you had him bring the trumpet in on the slow boat, and you beat him here on the fast one.
- So, you've got it all figured out, have you?
- Certainly.
You crossed Travers in Hong Kong, you double-crossed Espinoza, and then you triple-crossed poor Farrow.
Poor Farrow.
I only intended using him to get the trumpet off the boat.
I warned him against you, and he was getting wise to you, Purvis.
But he remained faithful to the end.
The end was when
Mr. Travers shot Farrow, so the girl wouldn't have his protection anymore.
And then shot Espinoza out on the end of the pier.
You're a bit inaccurate there, Mr. Shane.
They were killed, I grant you, but not by me.
No? Who else? it wasn't Miss Purvis, because the two gents were more valuable to her alive.
And it wasn't Barabbas, because she knows enough to have her killing done for her.
And it certainly wasn't Kenneth.
Not little chubby over there.
I'm telling you, mister.
You've been saying that to me for two weeks. You can't tell me anything.
I'm telling you that ninny Travers never killed anybody.
I do the killing around here.
I plugged Farrow and the Spaniard.
- And you're next.
- Now, you're talking.
Now, we've got our peace offering to the police with his confession.
A nice, hashed-up story nobody will want to investigate too thoroughly, for fear of getting all mixed up themselves.
That's all I ask.
You're not going to turn Kenneth over to the police.
Certainly. He's been a very naughty boy.
I won't allow it.
He's been more than a son to me.
You can get another son.
There's only one trumpet.
A victim to feed the police is a part of my price.
The other part we'll discuss right now.
Trumpet, trumpet! I've got the trumpet!
How much am I offered for the trumpet?
Shane, you remember my promise?
I've had a lot of promises.
This is a cash transaction.
You're on, Mr. Shane.
I'm prepared to pay cash.
Cash, Madame?
Cash, cash, where do I hear the cash?
I offered you half that the trumpet will bring.
I'll still settle for cash. Where is it?
You don't expect me to pay till I'm sure that the trumpet is in that parcel.
All right, unwrap it. I guess that's fair enough as long as I've got a gun on you.
Remember what you're getting, Madame.
The one and only horn of Roland, stuffed with gems by the Saracens.
Hurray!
- Roland's horn.
- Are you sure?
Of course, just as we got it from the Greek.
It's mine.
It's yours as soon as you give me the cash.
- Here's the cash, Mr. Shane.
- And the horn is yours.
Come on. Let's open it and see the iewels.
- Pretty expensive sand.
- We've been robbed.
Tyrilias Constantinidis!
Tyrilias Constantinidis.
How do you spell it?
Hello, Sergeant.
Let me introduce Madame Barabbas.
You can get better acquainted with her in the "Criminals Wanted" files at the office.
Pleased to meet you, Madame.
I'm telling you, mister!
Lie down on the floor and keep out of sight.
- Are you hurt, darling?
- Come on, you, get up.
What are you doing to my Kenny boy?
Your Kenny boy only killed Farrow, and tonight he killed Espinoza out there on the pier.
- All right, take him away. Her, too.
- Here's his gun.
- He's in it, too.
- All right you, come on.
I say, what's up?
Take him along, he's not as pure as he looks.
I say, Mr. Shane, that's not cricket.
- All right, take him along.
- Come on.
Well, Pollock, I've made a hero out of you.
Some people may even think you're a detective.
Say, wait a minute.
What are you trying to do?
Stall out of that Ames murder?
Now, you oughtn't to say that to me after what I've done for you.
Now, listen. There's $10,000 reward up now for Ames' killer, and I need it.
But you're going to need brains to get it.
That's going to make it hard for you and easy for me.
Easy.
- Say, wait a minute.
- Lieutenant.
- Did you get them all?
- Yeah.
- Did you get that girl, too?
- What girl?
Well, there was a girl here when the shooting started.
Purvis. Come on.
Hello? Shane?
Good morning. How you doing?
Two tickets on the 3:45 train going north?
Okay. I'll meet you at the station.
- Oh, goodbye, Shane!
- Hello, kitten.
Say, when I get a little time, maybe you and I can have some fun.
Hey, where's the telegraph office?
Board!
Here, send this wire for me.
And here's the money.
Hey, sir.
- What track is the 3:45 on?
- There she goes, boss.
Hello, boys. Looking for me?
Hey, boy, where's the telegraph office?
Straight ahead, boss.
And will you please send this for me?
- Well, where's the money?
- Send it collect.
Look, why did you sell them the trumpet for less than they offered you?
In spite of my better offer, in spite of me. Why?
Honey, days ago, I got this letter from a professor of history, telling me that there might be such a trumpet, but that there couldn't possibly be any jewels in it.
- I didn't want to gyp you, honey.
- You're an angel.
I told you when a couple of murders were cleared up, you and I could have some fun.
We will, won't we?
It's nice that it's all over, finally.
I got so tired of the whole mess.
Being afraid, hiding, telling lies.
Remember the first lie you told me, darling?
About wanting to find a sweetheart?
It worked.
It found me a sweetheart, all right.
It'll be for always now, won't it, Shane?
You know, if it was only the Ames killing, I should think it'd have been simpler to stay there and prove that
Farrow shot him.
If I could stay and prove that,
I wouldn't be running away, baby.
Then the police were right.
You really did it.
I never thought you'd say that to me, darling.
You know I didn't kill Ames.
Even if you did, it wouldn't make any difference to me.
I just thought that you were the only other one who could've done it.
- The only other one except you, precious.
- Shane.
Honey, it blows.
You wouldn't accuse me of a thing like that, even in kidding.
You know I didn't do it.
Down in your heart, you know it.
My love, that graveyard's famous as a nice, safe place for lovemaking.
Ames knew that, and he'd have gone there to be alone with you, darling.
And when you two went sneaking in there, you'd have pretended you were frightened.
And you'd have a good, tight hold on his right hand, so he couldn't reach for his gun.
Then, suddenly, you'd pretend you heard something.
And you'd grab him quick, and cling, whimpering to him, pretending you were afraid of ghosts.
And the poor chump would put his arms around you and he'd hold you close, and he'd tell you in that brave company voice of his,
"There's nothing to be afraid of."
And you, you'd stick a gun you got from Farrow in Ames' side and you'd let him have it.
Then Ames fell dead across somebody else's grave, and you threw Farrow's gun down beside the body, figuring it was a cinch for the police to grab Farrow for murder and for you to grab the trumpet for yourself.
Oh, then you knew all the time that I'd killed him.
And yet, you loved me enough not to give me up.
To take a chance of running away with me.
Oh, I was wrong to think that you're cruel and brutal, darling.
You... Oh, you're marvelous.
Precious, I told you when we got a couple of murders cleared up, you and I could have a lot of fun.
The late evening paper!
Evening paper!
Get the evening paper!
- Oh, we'll have one.
- Yes, go ahead.
I'd love to know what happened to Madame Barabbas and her gang.
Here you are.
Late evening paper, magazines.
Oh, hello.
You remember me.
Yeah, we got a telegram to pick you up on the Ames murder case in San Morego.
I had my secretary send that.
- You've got him?
- I've got her.
I just couldn't get her to confess until she thought we were safe and on our way.
Come on.
- She's gone.
- Huh?
How would you...
How would you like to make $10,000?
No, ma'am,
I'm a respectable, law-abiding woman.
Be quiet, and listen to me.
Well, Shane, I guess you're under arrest.
Oh, keep your shirt on, she's here somewhere.
Hey, man!
Let me have them bracelets, and give me my $10,000.
You'll miss that reward, won't you, Shane?
Now, I'll miss the $10,000, all right, but I'll miss you, too, honey.
- I thought you cared about me.
- I do, Valerie.
But I won't play the sap for you.
You gave the works to the Englishman, the Spaniard, Farrow and Ames.
The last three fell for you and they're dead.
I'm crazy about you, sweetheart, but I just won't be the fourth guy to die for you.
No.
But for me, you'll go through something that'll be worse than death.
Because you'll always remember me, the one woman you couldn't take for both love and money.
The one woman who handed you double-cross for double-cross right up to the end.
'Cause now you found a woman can be as smart as you are.
Someday you'll find one who'll be smarter.
She'll marry you!
- Hello!
- Hello, kitten.
How you doing, Shane?
- Well, I cleared up a couple of murders.
- Now we can have a lot of fun.
Bye-bye, honey. I'll see you later.
Effie.
Yes, Sam.
Honey, have I any more important engagements this afternoon?
Not that I know of.
Yes, sir.
There's a girl outside to see you, Sam.
Her name's Wonderly.
- A customer?
- I guess so.
You'll see her anyway. She's a knockout.
Okay, honey, send her in.
Will you come in, Miss Wonderly?
How do you do? Won't you sit down?
Thank you.
Mr. Spade, could you...
I thought...
I mean, I...
Perhaps it would be easier if you started from the beginning.
That was in New York.
She met him there.
- She?
- My sister.
Oh, I see. Then it's your sister you're concerned about.
Terribly. And I must get her back home before Mother and Father return from Europe.
- When will that be?
- The first of the month.
That's two weeks.
Oh, that's plenty of time.
Spade and Archer.
Hello, Effie, this is Iva Archer speaking.
Say, is my husband there?
No, he isn't, Iva.
He isn't back from his trip yet.
Well, then put Sam on the phone.
He is in conference now.
Well, that's all right.
Tell him it's very important.
All right, hold the wire.
I'll switch your call to his office.
Excuse me.
Mrs. Archer on the phone.
She says it's important.
Will you excuse me just a minute?
- Hello?
- Hello, Sam.
Oh, I'm terribly Ionesome, and I just had to talk to you.
Yeah.
Oh, hello, Mr. Archer.
Have a good trip?
Yeah, yes, I had a good trip.
Found out what I wanted to know.
Effie, will you put these in on my desk, please?
And get out the other papers in the case, too, will you?
Yes, Mr. Archer.
Now you be sensible about it. Please.
Don't do anything rash.
Things will work themselves out.
You sound so cold.
Don't you love me anymore?
Is there somebody there that you can't talk to me like you used to?
Yes. Yes.
Goodbye, honey. Call me soon.
I'll be waiting.
Very strange case.
Woman lost a dog last night and wants us to find it for her.
- Excuse me. I thought you were alone.
- Come on in.
Miss Wonderly, my partner, Miles Archer.
How do you do?
How do you do, Mr. Archer?
Miles, Miss Wonderly's sister ran away from New York with a man named Floyd Thursby.
- Thursby?
- Yes.
They're here in town.
She located Thursby, but he won't tell her where her sister is.
- Is that right?
- Yes.
She wants a man to follow Thursby until we find out just where he's hiding her sister.
Well, how do we pick up this man Thursby?
Miss Wonderly's gonna meet him tonight at her hotel at 8:00.
And I think it would be safe for you if you met him in the lobby.
But you must be careful.
I'm so afraid of what he might do... to her.
You think he's dangerous?
I don't think he'd stop at anything to save himself.
We know how to take care of him, all right.
Now, don't you worry, Miss Wonderly.
Mr. Spade, could either you or Mr. Archer...
Could either of you handle this matter personally?
I'm so afraid about the whole thing, and I'd feel so much safer.
I'd be willing to pay most anything if you would.
Would that be enough?
Oh, yes. I'll look after this myself.
- Thank you so much, Mr. Archer.
- It's all right.
- And thank you, Mr. Spade.
- Not at all.
You've both been very kind.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
Any phone calls for me, Sam?
- Oh, yes, your wife called.
- Yeah?
What did she have to say?
Oh, wanted to know when you were coming home.
And she said she missed you an awful lot.
Yeah?
Hello?
Hello.
Yes, speaking.
What?
Dead?
Yes, I'll be right over.
Yes, I'll hurry.
Dead?
- Hello, Sam.
- Hello, Tom.
I thought you'd want to take a look at the body before we took it away.
Got him right through the pump with this.
And fired so close, the powder burned his overcoat.
Archer didn't have time to draw.
His gun was tucked away in his hip pocket.
- Better take it.
- I don't want it.
I know how you feel.
I guess it's up to you to break the news to the widow, ain't it?
Yeah, I guess so.
Say!
Ain't you gonna take a look at him before you go?
What's the use, Tom? You've seen him.
Nothing I can do to bring him to life.
Come on in, precious.
- Who were you expecting, darling?
- You, sweetheart.
Was Archer working tonight, Sam?
Supposed to be tailing a guy named Thursby.
What for?
Well, for the swell reason that we've got a client that's paying us good old-fashioned American coin to have him tailed.
Did you break the news to Archer's wife, Sam?
- Yeah.
- How did she take it?
I don't know much about these women.
The devil you don't.
I warned you your foot would slip sometime, Spade.
Everybody's foot slips sometime.
Yeah, and this is your time.
- What kind of a gun do you carry?
- None.
You don't happen to have one around here anyplace?
No.
- Are you sure of that?
- Well, have a look around.
If you find one,
I'll make you a present of it.
I told you I didn't have any.
You've told me a lot of things tonight that didn't mean anything.
I tell just what I wanna tell.
You'll tell me just what I wanna know, or you'll tell it in court.
This is murder, and don't you forget it.
Listen, Dundy, it's a long time since I burst into tears because a policeman didn't like me.
Yeah?
Well, you listen to me, Spade.
At 1:00 tonight, Archer was murdered.
Another man named Floyd Thursby was shot down in front of his hotel
35 minutes after you left Archer in the alley.
Take your dirty paws off me!
What have I got to do about all this?
Tom says you were in such a hurry you didn't even stop to look at your dead partner.
I couldn't get sentimental over Archer, dead or alive.
And you didn't go to Archer's house to tell his wife.
You sent the girl from your office.
Well, now that you got it all figured out, maybe you can tell me how I killed Thursby. I've forgotten.
As he started to go into his hotel, he was shot three times in the back with a.45 from across the street.
Nobody saw it, but that's the way it figures.
You may as well know it, if you don't.
Thursby died before he could tell anybody who shot him.
I never saw Thursby dead or alive.
Now get out of here and let me get some sleep, will you?
You can't give us the runaround this way.
- The D.A. Is gonna hear about this.
- Yeah?
Well, what I said to you goes for the D.A., double in spades.
What do you think of that, Mr. Dundy?
- Who is it?
- Mr. Spade.
- Good morning, Mr. Spade.
- Hello. How are you?
I didn't expect to see you.
I thought Mr. Archer was to call.
Mr. Archer couldn't come.
- Won't you sit down?
- Thanks.
Too bad we couldn't find that little sister of yours.
Mr. Spade,
I have a terrible confession to make.
That story I told you yesterday wasn't true.
We didn't believe you.
But we believed your $200.
You know, darling, for that amount of money, I'd let you tell me a lie every day.
Well, when I told you that I expected Mr. Archer,
I lied again. I know what's happened.
But you'll go on with the case just the same, won't you?
That all depends.
There have been two murders committed.
That stirs up the police and makes things more expensive and harder to handle.
You don't think I had anything to do with those murders?
- I forgot to ask you that. Did you?
- Oh, no! Of course not.
Good!
Say, listen.
There are a flock of policemen, assistant district attorneys and reporters outside, running around with their noses to the ground.
What are we gonna tell them?
- Can't you keep me out of it?
- Maybe.
But I've gotta know what it's all about.
But I can't explain. Not just now, I can't.
I'm sorry.
Please help me. You must.
I haven't anyone else, and I need help so badly.
I'll explain later, when I can.
But I can't, not just now.
I'm afraid.
You see, I trusted Thursby, and he betrayed that trust.
But I'm depending on you to save me.
Why, if I hadn't believed that with all my heart,
I would have run away yesterday instead of coming to you.
I know I haven't any right to ask you to help me blindly.
But I do ask it.
Oh, be generous, Mr. Spade.
You won't need much of anybody's help.
You're pretty good.
As a matter of fact, you're very good.
It's chiefly your eyes, I think, and the throb that you get in your voice when you say,
"Oh, be generous, Mr. Spade."
I really needed your help, needed it desperately.
- Goodbye.
- Now, now, don't get your feathers up.
Tell me all about Thursby, and tell me the truth.
I met him in the Orient.
We came here together from Hong Kong about a week ago.
Why did you want him shadowed?
By the time we landed,
I was afraid I couldn't trust him.
- Did he kill Archer?
- Of course.
With the gun he always carried in his overcoat pocket.
- You've seen it then, huh?
- Often.
He never wore an overcoat without it.
- Why all the guns?
- He was afraid of being caught unaware.
He always covered the floor around his bed with crumpled newspapers so no one could approach without making a noise.
You picked a nice playmate.
- The only kind that could help me.
- Help you do what?
- Say, how bad a hole are you actually in?
- As bad as could possibly be.
Physical danger?
I'm not heroic. I don't think there's anything worse than death.
Then it's that, eh?
As surely as we're sitting here, unless you help me.
How am I gonna help you?
You haven't told me anything.
- Who killed Thursby?
- I don't know.
- Your enemies or his?
- I don't know.
- His, I hope, but I'm afraid.
- You're impossible.
- You won't go to the police, will you?
- Go to them?
Why, all I have to do is stand still and they'll be swarming all over me like a bunch of bees.
I'm gonna tell them all I know, and you take your own chances.
Say, have you got any money?
I've only got about $500 left.
Let me have it.
- What for?
- Now, don't ask any questions.
Hey, there's only $400 here.
Well, I have to have something to live on.
Haven't you got anything you can raise some money with?
A few pieces of jewelry.
Afraid you'll have to hock 'em, honey.
- I'll call you when I get some news for you.
- Thanks.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
- Hello, sweetheart.
- Hello, Sam.
Oh, look, Effie, have them take Spade and Archer off the door and put Samuel Spade on it instead, will you, honey?
All right.
- Sam.
- Yeah.
It's a gorgeous new customer.
- Gorgeous?
- A knockout!
Send her right in, honey.
Will you step in, please?
- Good afternoon.
- Good afternoon.
- Sit down, Doctor.
- Thank you.
Well, sir, what can I do for you?
Allow me first to offer condolences for your partner's unfortunate death.
Oh, yes. Thanks.
Was there, as the newspapers indicated, any connection between his death and the death of the man Thursby?
Oh, I don't know. Why should there be?
I'm not merely curious, Mr. Spade, but it occurred to me that the two, shall we say accidents, might have something to do with a certain ornament that I am trying to recover, not for myself but for the rightful owner.
- What kind of an ornament?
- A statuette.
The black figure of a bird.
I am prepared to pay, on behalf of the owner, the sum of $5,000 for its recovery.
And I can promise you that no questions will be asked.
Come in.
- Anything else?
- Not a thing, honey. Good night.
- And lock the door as you go out.
- Good night.
$5,000 is a lot of money.
You will please clasp your hands together at the back of your neck.
What are you doing, kidding me?
You will please clasp your hands together at the back of your neck.
Okay, Doctor.
I'm going to search your office, Mr. Spade.
And if you attempt to prevent me,
I shall certainly shoot you.
Stand up, please.
I must see that you're not armed.
Why did you strike me after I was disarmed?
I'm sorry.
But you could imagine my embarrassment, Doctor, when I found your $5,000 offer to be nothing but a lot of baloney.
You're mistaken. It was a genuine offer.
I am prepared to pay you $5,000 for the statuette's return.
- Do you have it?
- No.
If it's not in this office, why should you risk your life to prevent my searching for it?
What do you expect me to do?
Sit around here and let people come in and stick me up?
I see you've got my apartment address.
Have you been there, too?
Yes.
While I am ready to pay $5,000 for the statuette,
I naturally wanted to save the owner that expense.
Who is the owner?
- I cannot answer that question.
- What does this black bird look like?
It's a figure, about 12 inches high, in black enamel.
All right, it's a deal.
But remember, you're not hiring me to go out and murder or steal.
You simply want me to get the black bird for you in a lawful and honest way. Is that right?
If possible.
At least with discretion.
Okay.
I'm at the Hotel Belvedere if you should wish to communicate with me.
Fine.
- Good afternoon.
- Good afternoon, Doctor.
- May I have my gun, please?
- Sure.
Thank you.
You will please clasp your hands together at the back of your neck.
I'm going to search your office, Mr. Spade.
Go ahead and search, Doc.
You're paying for it.
Hello.
Sorry I'm late.
Been waiting long?
I came over the moment
I got your message.
I saw your friend Cairo today.
Do you know Cairo?
Yes.
He offered me $5,000 for the black bird.
Surely you're not considering it?
$5,000 is a lot of money.
But, Mr. Spade, you promised to help me.
I trusted you.
Now, don't let's try to figure out how much you've trusted me.
I promised to help you, sure, but you didn't say anything about any black birds.
You won't...
Why, you can't treat me like this.
$5,000 is a lot of money.
Yeah.
It's more than I can afford to pay you for your loyalty.
That's good, coming from you.
Haven't you tried to buy my loyalty with money and nothing else?
Well, if I'm peddling it,
I'm selling to the highest bidder.
I love your apartment, Sam.
Don't you ever get Ionesome?
Sometimes.
- Hello, Tom.
- Hello.
Hello.
Saw your light.
Thought we'd come up and talk to you.
Go ahead and talk.
Love of Mike, you're not gonna make us stand out here, are you?
Afraid you'll have to, Tom.
I can't let you in.
So you won't play along with us.
Still going it alone.
Say, what's on your mind beside your hat?
Just this, there's a lot of talk going around that you and Archer's wife were pretty thick.
Any truth in it?
No.
There's even talk that's why he was put on the spot.
Why don't you stop trying to be a hog, Dundy?
You shouldn't try to pin more than one murder on me.
- I haven't pinned anything on you.
- I know you haven't.
All you've done is sneak around here after hours
- and ask me a lot of silly questions.
- And get a lot of lying answers.
Well, maybe you're right, bucking us.
Think it over.
Glad to see you anytime, Lieutenant.
Drop around when I'm not so busy.
I'll let you in.
Any more of your tricks, and I'll finish you.
What's all this?
Maybe you can tell me.
She hit me over the head.
She would have killed me.
What for? What did you do?
Nothing! Nothing! On my word of honor.
Well?
Miss Wonderly, I'd like you to meet
Lieutenant Dundy and Detective Sergeant Polhaus.
Miss Wonderly is an operator in my employ.
And an old college chum of mine,
Dr. Cairo from back East.
The two of them indulging in a friendly little argument, huh?
- I can easily explain that, Lieutenant.
- I'll bet you can.
Miss Wonderly never saw Dr. Cairo before.
And when he came into my apartment by the back way,
- well, naturally, she was frightened.
- Oh, I was.
I was terribly afraid.
And I'm so glad you aren't a burglar,
Dr. Cairo.
- You will forgive me, won't you?
- Why, most certainly, mademoiselle.
Why should your dear old college chum go and come through the back door?
I'm sure, I don't know.
Joel, why did you?
Why, as a matter of fact,
I have a large sum of money on me, and, naturally,
I was alarmed at being trailed.
I'm not usually timid, but in a strange city one never knows.
If I may go with you when you leave,
I'll feel much safer.
Rather a brief visit, your old school friend is making.
You won't mind, Sam, will you, if I go along with these gentlemen?
Not at all, Joel.
- Come and see me again sometime soon.
- Why, I certainly will.
I'm sorry this little thing happened.
Oh, that's all right, that's all right.
And Miss Wonderly, is she also afraid to go home in the dark?
Miss Wonderly is taking some notes that I haven't finished as yet.
I see.
In that case, we'll leave you to your conference.
- Good night.
- Good night, Lieutenant.
If those detectives are waiting outside for me, they're going to have a long wait.
You can take my bedroom.
I'll sleep out here.
I hope I won't be putting you out.
Are you comfortable, honey?
Come on, dear, tell me all about that black bird.
Oh, I'm so tired, Sam.
Tired of everything, of myself, of lying, of thinking up lies until I don't know a lie from the truth.
I wish I...
Sam.
Don't shoot, honey.
It's only Sam the grocery man.
- Where have you been?
- I went down to get the groceries.
I'm sorry I frightened you, babe.
I'll get breakfast ready, if you run my bath for me.
That's fair enough, sugar.
- Hello, Sam.
- Hello, Iva.
How are you, honey? I'm glad to see you.
I came to talk to you, Sam.
- Can't I go in?
- I'm very busy right now.
Don't be silly. I came to talk to you, and I'm not going to stay out here.
Come here.
I saw her!
Who's that dame wearing my kimono?
Now behave yourself, honey.
I suppose I haven't any right where you're concerned.
Well, I thought I had.
I thought your pretending to love me gave me some.
Well, let's not talk about that now.
What do you want?
Just to talk to you, Sam.
I must. I've got to.
I haven't got the time.
All right. If you won't listen to me,
I know someone who will.
Lieutenant Dundy might be interested in what I've got to say.
I'll be seeing you.
All quiet?
Everything's under control, honey.
You have a lot of trouble with your women, don't you, Sam?
Here's to plain speaking and clear understanding.
Okay.
- A cigar, sir?
- Thanks.
- You're a close-mouthed man, sir.
- No.
- I like to talk.
- We'll talk if you like.
And I'll tell you right now that I'm a man who likes to talk to a man who likes to talk.
Fine.
- Let's talk about the black bird.
- Splendid. Splendid.
No beating about the bush, straight to the point.
- Let's get to the point.
- Yes, by all means.
You are here, Mr. Spade, as Miss Wonderly's representative?
No.
I'm here looking out for myself.
That's wonderful, sir. That's wonderful.
I do like a man who says right off he's looking out for himself.
Don't we all?
Let's talk about the black bird, huh?
Of course.
Mr. Spade, have you any idea how much that little black bird is worth?
I know it's valuable,
- but I don't know what it is.
- You don't know what it is?
What do you know, sir, of the ancient
Order of St. John of Jerusalem,
- afterwards called the Knights of Rhodes?
- Nothing much.
- They were crusaders or something.
- Right.
And when the Emperor Charles gave the island of Malta to these crusading knights, he made the condition that each year they were to pay him the tribute of one falcon, in acknowledgment that Malta was still under Spain.
- You understand?
- Yeah. Sure.
Have you any idea, sir, of the immense, the immeasurable wealth of the Order of St. John?
As far as I can remember, they were pretty well-fixed.
"They were pretty well-fixed."
For years, they had taken the cream of the East as spoils of victory.
We all know that to them the Holy Wars were merely a matter of loot.
Holy Wars?
I'll bet that was a great racket.
The knights wanted to express their gratitude to the Emperor.
So the bird they sent him for the first year's tribute wasn't an insignificant live bird, but a glorious, golden falcon encrusted with the finest jewels in their coffers.
The finest, largest jewels out of Asia.
- Those are historical facts, sir.
- All right, all right.
"All right," you say.
But the falcon never reached the Emperor.
Pirates captured the boat on which it was shipped to Spain and took the bird.
I've traced the history of that bird all over Europe, sir.
In 1840 it turned up in Paris.
By that time, to hide its real identity, it was enameled over to look like nothing more than a fairly interesting statuette.
- And it's still the same way?
- Under that disguise, it was kicked around the gutters of Paris for 70 years.
- And then what happened?
- In 1911, a Greek found it and discovered its real value.
His home was raided, and he was murdered.
No one else knew what the bird was, and so it was lost again.
- And it's still lost.
- That was 20 years ago, sir.
It took me that time to locate it, but I did it.
I traced it to the home of a Russian in Constantinople.
Kemidov.
He wouldn't sell it.
So I sent some agents to get it for me.
They got it, and I haven't got it.
So it doesn't belong to any of you.
- It belongs to General Kemidov.
- Belongs?
You might as well say it belongs to the King of Spain.
But I don't see how you can say it belongs to anyone, except by right of possession.
- Then it belongs to Miss Wonderly now.
- No, sir,
- except as my agent.
- Oh, I see.
- You're sure she has it?
- I'm not sure of anything.
Yeah, but you know where to get it.
At the right time and for the right price.
Well, now, before we begin talking price, how soon can you deliver the falcon?
- A couple of days.
- That's satisfactory.
Now, I have two proposals to make, sir.
I will pay you $25,000 when you deliver the falcon to me, and another $25,000 when I get to New York.
- That's one.
- And the other?
I will give you 25°/0, one-quarter of what I realize on the falcon.
Now, take your choice.
Either an immediate $50,000, or a much greater sum within, say, a couple of months.
- How much greater?
- Who can tell?
If I were to tell you the probable minimum, you'd call me a liar.
No.
Not even if I thought so.
Well, what do you say, sir, to a half a million as your share?
A half a million?
And you really believe this bird is worth $2 million?
Easily.
All right, it's a deal.
Now, Mr. Gutman, what about a deposit to cinch this deal?
Oh, certainly. Certainly, sir.
Why, what was I thinking?
How about $1,000?
Okay.
Now I have your word that you won't back out.
My word!
You've got my $1,000 dollars, besides.
The doctor is here.
The doctor?
Oh, yes. Oh, dear me.
Excuse me, sir,
I have a medical appointment.
- Don't go away.
- I'll be right here.
I'll be right back.
Joel, my boy.
Does this mean that you've come back to the fold?
Get rid of him.
Why?
I just offered him $25,000 for the falcon.
And I offered him $5,000.
We were both of us fools.
- He hasn't got it.
- He hasn't got it?
Why, I just gave him a thousand bucks to bind the deal.
He says he can get it within two days.
- We can get it without him today.
- How?
- You remember Jacobi? Captain Jacobi?
- Jacobi?
I mentioned him in my report from Hong Kong.
I wrote you I'd seen the Wonderly girl there with him.
Jacobi. Yeah, I remember.
- His boat was La Paloma.
- Exactly.
And look.
Well, what's all this got to do with it?
Oh, you don't connect it with the falcon in any way, huh?
- Miss Wonderly has the falcon.
- No, she hasn't.
I've searched her apartment.
The falcon is not there.
Because she gave it to Jacobi in Hong Kong.
Gave it to him?
To bring back to America, while she and Thursby took another boat.
What time does the Paloma dock?
I phoned the harbor.
She's expected in before midnight.
- We better hurry.
- Well, he still has got my money.
Wilmer can take care of him.
No.
No.
I know a better way.
My technique is not so abrupt as Wilmer's.
My apologies for the interruption,
Mr. Spade.
Had we finished our little deal, or hadn't we?
- We certainly had.
- I am delighted to hear you say that, sir.
We shall drink to an affiliation which will prove, I am sure, a pleasure and a benefit to us both.
Okay.
Well, here's to clear understanding.
Yes, sir.
All successful business deals are floated on the wave of good fellowship.
- Do you agree with me, Mr. Spade?
- Perfectly.
Yeah.
I thought you would, Mr. Spade.
Hey, what are you doing here this hour of the night?
Well, you told me to stick around till you came back.
- Sam!
- Wait a minute.
- He's dead, honey.
- Oh, but, Sam,
- don't you think we ought to get a doctor?
- Well, a doctor won't do any good.
Quick, lock that door.
Sam, who is he?
"John Jacobi.
"Captain of the La Paloma.
Arrived San Francisco from Hong Kong."
Let's have a look at the bag.
Ruth Wonderly.
Unlatch that, honey.
Sam, what is that?
Honey, it's the black bird they're all after.
I don't know why it's so valuable, but it's worth a fortune.
Sam, whoever shot that captain will do the same to you.
I'm afraid. Get rid of it.
Oh, stop worrying, honey.
I'll take care of it.
- What are you gonna do with it?
- Now, don't ask questions.
- Check this.
- Yes, sir.
- Hello, Tom.
- Writing love letters, Sam?
- Yeah.
- Don't go too far with that.
It's one of the best ways of getting in trouble.
Are you telling me?
I'm looking for you all night to tell you something.
From Dundy?
No, the District Attorney this time.
He wants to see you.
What's he want to see me for?
It's Iva Archer, Sam.
She's been dishing plenty of dirt.
Spade, who killed Miles Archer?
I don't know.
You certainly could make an excellent guess.
My guesses might be excellent, but I'm not silly enough to make them in front of a District Attorney.
I don't think I'm convinced yet that the police have the right theory.
Well, I'm glad of that.
They've narrowed the solution down to just two things.
Number one,
Archer was killed by a woman who wanted him out of the way.
Number two, the wife's paramour committed the crime with the object of removing Archer as an obstacle to their illicit relations.
And number three,
Archer died of old age.
You're not serious.
Spade, you're concealing information that will enable us to solve this.
And by withholding that information, you make yourself an accomplice to a murder.
I thought this was gonna be an informal talk.
I am a sworn officer of the law
24 hours a day, and neither formality or informality justifies you in withholding from me evidence of a crime.
Unless, of course, you're afraid of incriminating yourself.
I've got nothing to tell you or the police.
Now, if you have anything more to say to me, why, have me pinched, and I'll come down here with my lawyer.
I've been thinking of doing that.
Well, when you make up your mind, let me know.
And when I do, Spade, you'll know that we have information about you and Miles Archer's wife that will require a lot of explanation.
Well, the only chance
I see of saving myself would be to bring in the murderers all tied up in a nice little bouquet.
I'll give you just 24 hours to do that.
Thanks. I'll make a note of it on my cuff.
And remember this, Spade, if you don't come through by this time tomorrow,
I'll order you arrested for the murder of Miles Archer.
You can always get me at my office or my home, Mr. Bryant.
I aim to give service at all times, night and day.
Goodbye, sweetheart.
Sam!
Sam, I didn't think you'd ever get here.
I've been waiting hours for you.
Where have you been?
I've been looking all over for you.
I think there's someone following me.
Take me upstairs, quick.
Okay.
Sam.
Oh, so we have company, huh?
Well, sir, we're all here.
Shall we sit down and be comfortable while we discuss the matter?
What matter?
We know, of course, that you have the falcon.
Oh, have I?
Well, when can you make the first payment?
You know we were talking of more money than this.
We were, sir, but we were just talking.
This is actual coin.
Permit me to remind you, Mr. Spade, you may have the falcon, but we most certainly have you.
I'm not gonna let that worry me.
Now listen to me carefully, every one of you.
There's an angle to this deal you've all overlooked.
- And what is that, sir?
- We've got to have a fall guy.
- A fall guy?
- Certainly.
We've got to feed the police a victim.
Somebody they can stick for those three murders.
You can't expect us to believe that you're afraid of the police and not able to handle them.
I'm not afraid of the police, and I can handle them.
But you've gotta toss them somebody to hang the works on.
You can't be serious, sir.
A fall guy, as you call it, would only lead them to the falcon.
No, we leave well enough alone.
Well, get this through your brain, Gutman.
The police are not asleep, they're laying low and waiting.
And I'm in this mess up to my neck, and they know it.
You're not a man that worries about a little trouble, sir.
You'll manage that.
While you skip to New York or China or someplace, huh?
Well, I'm in business here, remember that.
This is my town and my racket, and I know what's best for us.
Gutman, we're sunk, unless we hand over a fall guy.
Well, none of us exactly qualifies for the part, sir.
My dear sir, it's too ridiculous.
Why, I feel toward Wilmer exactly as if he were my own son.
Well, you can easily pick another son, but there's only one black bird.
- Remember that.
- Lf your scheme were practical, which it isn't, what would prevent Wilmer from telling the police about the falcon and all of us?
Oh, we can have him shot for resisting arrest.
My fondness for Wilmer renders it impossible.
Well, I have another suggestion to make.
Why don't you give them Cairo?
Why not you or Miss Wonderly?
I don't care. Anybody.
All I insist on is a fall guy.
You seem to forget that you are not in a position to insist on anything.
I am in a swell position, and don't you forget it.
Let's settle this.
You've received your money, why can't we have the falcon now?
I said I want 20,000 bucks, and besides,
I couldn't get the bird before daylight.
Daylight?
Well, in that case, perhaps it will be best for us all if we don't get out of each other's sight until our business has been transacted.
Wilmer, lock that door.
See that nobody leaves or enters.
You have the envelope?
I have it.
Honey, it's a long wait before daylight.
You better go and fix some eggs, some sandwiches and some coffee.
We must entertain our guests.
Why, of course.
You will all excuse me, won't you?
Now just a moment, my dear.
Better leave the envelope.
You don't want to get any grease spots on it.
Oh, how stupid of me.
There are only nine bills here now, but when I gave them to you, there were 10.
Wait a minute.
Say, you had the money last, now one of the bills is missing.
- Where is it?
- I didn't take it, Sam.
- Maybe you didn't, but I have to find out.
- You won't take my word for it?
No, I won't take your word for it.
Take off your clothes.
I will not.
- Oh, yes, you will.
- Well, I certainly won't.
All right.
I'll have them take them off for you.
Sam.
Very well.
- You palmed it, Gutman.
- Ridiculous.
I said you palmed it.
Now, if you don't admit it,
I'm gonna frisk you.
Yes, sir. Yes, I did.
I was curious to know what you would do.
That's a trick I'd expect from somebody the skunk's age.
So you're trying to frame
Miss Wonderly, huh?
Frame her?
You were going to let her be the fall guy.
Well, I'm gonna decide right now who it's going to be.
It's gonna be Wilmer.
What do you think of the idea, Wilmer?
Funny, hey?
- I'll give him something to laugh at.
- Now, now, Wilmer.
You shouldn't attach so much importance to these things.
The gentleman is only joking.
Well, make him lay off me, or I'll fog him.
- And nothing'll stop me.
- Now, now, Wilmer.
Now, now, sit down. Come on, sit down.
I'll lay you two to one, they're selling you out, kid.
Spade...
Well, here's our fall guy.
- But... But...
- There's no but about it.
You say yes right now, or I'll turn the black bird and the whole gang of you in.
Well, you can have him, sir.
What about you, Cairo?
Are you with us or against us?
- I'm with you.
- That's swell.
Now we're getting someplace.
Berkeley 007.
Poor Wilmer.
- Hello?
- Hello, honey.
I'm sorry to get you out of bed.
Oh, that's all right. What is it?
Listen, dear, you know our general delivery box at the post office?
There's an envelope in my handwriting.
There's a baggage checker for that suitcase we got last night.
I want you to bring it over to my apartment early this morning.
- All right.
- Atta girl.
Goodbye, honey.
- I'll take the envelope now.
- With the greatest of pleasure, sir.
- All right, Gutman. Sit down.
- Thank you.
Now, let's get the details fixed.
Just why did Wilmer kill Thursby, and how did he kill Captain Jacobi?
Thursby was a notorious killer, sir, and Miss Wonderly's protector.
We tried to persuade him to join us, but we couldn't.
So Wilmer followed him to his hotel and did what he did.
If Wilmer killed both of them with the same gun then the bullets will match.
Captain Jacobi's death was entirely Miss Wonderly's fault.
Just how do you mean that?
He would never have been killed if she hadn't entrusted the falcon to him in Hong Kong.
Oh, I see.
Then he was in on the deal with all of you?
No, sir. He knew nothing about it.
But after he came under the influence of Miss Wonderly's charm, he agreed to bring the falcon to America
- while she came on a fast boat.
- With Thursby?
The falcon went from Thursby to Jacobi, and from Jacobi, at her instructions, to you.
Then I was next in line after Captain Jacobi.
Miss Wonderly's admirers have been many, sir, and she has used them all to her great advantage.
Say, what's the matter with you?
Just a fly.
- Hello, Sam.
- Hello, honey.
- Here it is.
- Thanks a lot.
- Anything else?
- No, I'll see you later at the office.
- All right, goodbye.
- Goodbye.
Well, here's your black bird.
Clear the table.
It's the falcon, all right.
But we make sure. Get a knife.
This is a fake. This is not the real falcon.
Well, that's the only one I know about.
You've had your little joke, why don't you tell them where the real one is?
Oh, no, Sam.
I swear this is the one I got from Kemidov.
That's it!
It was the Russian. Kemidov.
You have bungled the whole thing, you fathead!
You let him know it was valuable, and he made a duplicate.
And what fools he's made of us.
Chasing each other around the world for a lump of lead.
Yes.
Yes, it's the Russian.
There's no doubt of that.
Well,
I have to admit the fault is mine.
Well, shall we stand here and call each other names, or shall we go back to Constantinople and Kemidov?
- You're going to try for it again?
- Certainly. Why not?
I am with you.
Wilmer, you'll go, of course.
- Your little boyfriend checked out.
- Oh.
Oh, well. That's too bad.
Yeah.
Yeah, his services would have been invaluable.
And I loved him like a son.
I'll trouble you for that envelope, sir.
Don't be silly, Gutman.
It's your hard luck, not mine.
Oh.
My $10,000, please.
Good day, sir.
I deeply regret that you are left without a fall guy.
I'll do all right.
Union 2000.
Right.
- Hello?
- Hello, Tom.
- Sam Spade.
- Hello, Sam.
Listen, move up fast on three crooks leaving town.
Gutman, Palace Hotel, Room 900.
And Cairo. Yes, you met the guy over here.
And a kid named Wilmer Cook.
That's right.
Cook shot Thursby and Jacobi.
I've got the gun the kid used.
I've got it right here in my place.
- Yeah. And you better step on it.
- Thanks for the tip.
Listen, honey, let me get this straight with you.
What, darling?
You and Cairo double-crossed Gutman, and then you ditched Cairo in favor of Thursby. Is that right?
Something like that, yes.
Just why did you give the black bird to Jacobi?
I was afraid that Thursby couldn't be trusted.
- That Gutman might buy him over.
- That's a lie.
You had him hooked, and you knew it.
What was your scheme for disposing of Thursby?
I thought if he saw that Archer was following him, it might frighten him into leaving town.
I didn't think he'd really shoot Archer.
Well, if you thought that you were right,
Thursby never killed Archer.
Oh, I know Archer was dumb, but not dumb enough to let Thursby catch him up a blind alley with his gun stuck away in his hip pocket and his overcoat buttoned.
But he'd have gone up that alley with you, honey.
Sam, don't talk to me like that.
And if you had asked him to go up that alley with you, and he knew no one else were there, he would've gone.
And then you could have stood with your body close up against his, and he would have grinned from ear to ear, and you could've shot a hole right through him.
How did you know he grinned?
I know Archer, and I want to know why you killed him.
Well, you did kill him, didn't you?
I didn't mean to at first.
I meant what I said when I told you that I just wanted Thursby frightened.
- But when I found out I couldn't, I...
- Oh, stop lying.
I'll tell you why you shot him.
You figured that Thursby would be nailed for the killing, and then you could get the black bird for yourself.
But when you found out Thursby was shot, you needed a protector, and so you came back to me, right?
I would have come back to you sooner or later.
You know, from the first time I saw you,
I knew that sometime I'd come back to you.
You angel.
Well, with a lucky break you ought to be out of San Quentin in 20 years, and then you can come back to me.
I hope they don't hang you, honey.
You know, it'd be a shame to stretch that pretty little neck of yours.
Sam, don't say such things.
Not even in fun.
You can't!
Not after what we've been to each other.
Don't be silly, sister.
You're gonna take the fall.
You mean you're really gonna send me over?
I don't mean anything else but.
Then you've been pretending.
You don't care.
- You don't love me.
- Oh, I think I do.
But what of it?
I'm not Thursby or Jacobi, and I won't play the sap for you.
You know down in your heart that in spite of everything I've done
- I love you.
- Maybe.
You haven't been on the level with me for a half-hour at a stretch.
Why, you double-crossed every man
- that was fool enough to fall for you.
- Not you, Sam.
I couldn't.
I'm mad about you.
Oh, it...
It's easy enough to be nuts about you, too.
What of it?
That'll all pass.
Oh, I'll have some rotten nights.
They won't mean anything.
I'll get over you in time.
Oh, hello, boys.
- Come on in.
- Hello.
Hello, Spade.
There you are, Tom.
Exhibit A.
These are the guns the kid used to kill Thursby and Jacobi.
Yeah, well, he used another one since.
The hotel says Gutman is dead.
Shot to death by Wilmer Cook.
- The kid got him, eh?
- Yeah, him and Cairo.
We grabbed the kid just as he was leaving the hotel.
- Well, I guess that settles everything.
- Not quite.
There's another murder to clear up before noon.
- What's on your mind?
- Archer.
- Got it all figured out how I did it?
- I've done a lot of figuring.
All right.
Gentlemen, you know Miss Wonderly.
- Yeah.
- Yeah, how do?
She killed Archer with Thursby's gun.
She's an accomplice of Cairo and the kid.
Have you got enough on her to make a pinch?
Don't worry, Dundy.
I've got enough evidence to cinch everything that I say.
- Yeah?
- Yeah.
All right.
Come on, sister, let's be going.
What a pity the detective agencies haven't more men with your strength of character,
Mr. Spade.
Don't worry about me, Miss Wonderly.
There's nothing funny about this.
- When will we see you?
- I'll be down later.
- She's in number 10, sir.
- Thanks.
Say, kid. Got a cigarette?
Thanks.
- Hello.
- Hello.
Hi, boy.
Cigarette, honey?
How's the food? Rotten?
You just couldn't keep away from me, could you?
Well, not when I've got good news for you.
Good news?
They just made me Chief Investigator for the District Attorney's office.
Well, they couldn't find a better man for the job.
Thanks, baby.
I thought you'd like to know.
You helped me get it.
I assure you it was a labor of love.
Love?
Just that, Sam.
Well, if there's any little thing you need, why, let me know.
Goodbye.
- Sarah.
- Yes, Sam.
I want you to be very nice to that girl in number 10.
Give her anything she wants.
Good food.
Cigarettes and candy.
- You know what I mean.
- Very well, Sam. Just as you say.
But who will I charge it to?
Send the bill to the District Attorney's office.
I'll okay it.
But would that be all right?
Yes, sir.
English
DA Farley dropped a bomb in the Harrison case...
...in the person of a surprise witness.
Mr. Prentice pulls a tricky defense, it's too bad for Harrison.
A surprise in the morning.
I'm telling you.
Case will go to a jury before tomorrow afternoon.
How about a statement for the press,
Mr. Prentice?
I'd like to oblige you but I have nothing to state.
Why don't you see the district attorney?
He's probably full of statements.
Oh, uh...
- What luck?
- Everything is fine.
I found a doctor in Brooklyn,
Gillette, got the x-ray plates.
- When can I see him?
- Any time after 6.
- Have him at my house at 8:30.
- Right.
- Have Dr. Lyons and the nurse there.
EDDIE: Right.
- Good night, Mr. Prentice.
- Good night, Lloyd. Good night.
I don't think you need wait,
Mrs. Harrison.
- I'm a little worried now, Mr. Prentice.
- Why? I'm not.
You're not on trial for manslaughter.
- Will you do me a favor?
- Certainly.
Go see a show tonight, forget all about this.
You have nothing to worry about.
Well, I'm in your hands.
- Sorry?
- You know I'm not.
[BOTH CHUCKLE]
- Good night. And don't worry.
- Good night.
Both doctors and the nurse will be at my house at half past 8.
- Aren't you forgetting about tonight?
- Tonight?
Mrs. Prentice is entertaining your house guest.
- House guest?
- Ms. Drexel.
Oh, of course.
Well, I don't see how I can make it.
But I'd like to drop in for a cocktail.
Have Delaney change appointment from my house to my office.
- Yes, sir.
- Thank you.
[IN FRENCH ACCENT]
Oh, bonsoir, Albert.
[IN NORMAL VOICE]
Hello, Evelyn.
- Hello, darling.
- Being the little woman about the house?
Yes, like to help?
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
Your dress is charming.
Oh. Look at all the forks.
One, two, three.
Hurray, we're gonna have an entrée.
I put your friend Chester Wylie next to you.
Besides being a very bad drinker, what is he?
Well, he thinks he's an artist.
I met him in Paris, has a studio in
Greenwich Village, shack in Connecticut.
The modern school, you know?
Draws lines that look like a skyscraper...
...then tells you it's a sleeping dog.
Adores canned peas.
[CHUCKLES]
And in spite of that, I sort of like him.
- Here, let me do that.
- Are you good?
Darling, I'm perfect.
The last time I mixed a cocktail, four people eloped...
...and a man made love to his wife.
Oh, then, please do it.
- Gin and French vermouth.
- Anything else?
Sure, cognac, absinthe and a dash of bitters.
Oh, Amy, you'll kill my guests.
Now, these are respectable people.
Marriage has changed you a lot, Evelyn.
You used to have plenty of zip and bounce.
And now you're so old, so good and bounce-less.
- Does your husband beat you?
- No, I wish he did.
- He'd have to come home to do it.
- Not necessarily.
I know a gentleman who beat his wife in a night club...
...and she loved it too.
Where's the ice?
- Here.
- Oh.
No, I'm lucky if I have dinner with John once a week.
- Don't tell me that you and he...
- Oh, no.
No, I love him more than ever and he loves me.
But I'm sick and tired of the word "law."
[INTERCOM BUZZES]
And everything that goes with it.
Yes? I'll be right up.
Dorothy wants me to say good night to her.
If the guests come, will you take care of them?
After my cocktails, they won't know whether you're here or not.
Take it easy. Ho hum.
Good night, dear.
Can't I stay up and see the company?
Oh, no, darling. It's a grown-up party.
Kiss Mommy good night.
And one for Daddy?
Oh, dear.
I'm always kissing you for Daddy.
I wish he'd come home...
[SLEEPILY]
...and get his own kisses from me.
[INDISTINCT CHATTER]
[SLURRING]
Albert, I am extremely depressed.
Give me a cocktail.
Chester, that's your sixth and I've only had two.
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
Albert, I'm still depressed.
I don't understand it at all.
After all, a dinner party's a dinner party.
I can understand John's being late.
- He's got a tough case.
- You think she'll be convicted?
With her figure and 12 men on the jury?
Not a chance.
[ALL LAUGH]
[ALL LAUGH]
- There you are.
- What's so amusing?
- I was asking Ms. Drexel about...
- You better let me tell.
He asked me if I noticed the change in the attitude of French people lately.
I merely said that I hadn't.
They're still perpendicular when they're standing...
...and horizontal when they're lying down.
[ALL LAUGH]
John Prentice.
Amy. Well... Ha-ha.
- You haven't changed.
- You have, you're better-looking.
John, go and get dressed.
You and Amy can talk through dinner.
I'm terribly sorry but I can't stay for dinner.
I dashed in to offer my apologies,
I've got to dash out again.
- How's the baby?
- She's all right, asleep. You can't stay?
You mean you'll walk out on your guest of honor?
Amy, I'm awfully sorry. But, actually, there's a woman's liberty at stake.
- I can't tell you how badly...
- Try one of my cocktails.
- Maybe you'll feel better.
- That's a good idea. I'll have just one.
JOHN: How are you?
MAN: Hello.
If a man left me alone that much,
I'd get married tomorrow.
- Is there a chance of winning?
- Very good chance.
I don't know. I'd be a little worried.
Nancy Harrison has had a lot of escapades.
Well, people talk a lot, you know.
And rich young widows are an easy target, eh?
- Right.
- Is she as pretty as they say she is?
She's a very attractive woman.
Of course, she's having rather a bad time now.
But I think we'll win. I've got to dash.
- I'll say good night.
- Good night, sorry you've gotta go.
- Bye-bye.
- Good night, Amy.
- I'll take you to the door.
- Yes.
- You won't be very late, will you?
- I don't know, dear. Why?
I thought we might run down to the village with Amy and Mr. Wylie...
...after the others have gone.
Oh, dear.
I don't think I'll be able to make it.
Couldn't you run along without me?
I could.
Darling, don't you think
I'd be doing my job rather badly...
...if I didn't do everything in my power to try to have this woman acquitted?
Of course.
If people could only keep out of trouble.
[SIGHS]
Well, we can't remake the world.
But, John, do you realize that all we have for breakfast, lunch and dinner...
...are thieves, embezzlers, murderers?
Thieves, embezzlers, murderers.
Good night.
MAN: Now, this one was taken after the second operation.
That was only four months ago?
Yes, sir. He was still coming to us for treatment.
- You performed both operations?
- Yes.
- You, doctor?
- I assist him.
- You were the nurse, Miss Lloyd?
LLO YD: Yes, at both operations.
Mm-hm.
Oh.
Will you excuse me just a moment, please?
NANC Y:
Please don't scold me.
JOHN: But I shall. Thought I told you to go amuse yourself tonight.
Oh, I know but I couldn't.
I honestly couldn't. I... Tsk.
All I could think of was tomorrow.
And the difference it might make in my entire life.
Before I realized what I was doing,
I found myself coming here.
Please let me stay.
All right.
This is Dr. Gillette,
Dr. Lyons and Miss Lloyd. Mrs. Harrison.
How do you do?
- Sit down, please.
- Thank you.
If you gentlemen will be in court by 10 in the morning...
...l'll try to finish with you just as soon as possible.
I appreciate you coming to my office at this hour.
- I know how busy you are.
- It's all right.
All I can say by way of apology is that you're aiding the cause of justice.
LLO YD: Good night.
- Good night, doctor.
- I'd like to be on that jury.
- I wish you were.
- Best of luck to you.
- Thank you.
- Morning at 10, then.
- Right.
By this time tomorrow, you'll be a free woman.
- What do you mean?
- The man whose car you struck...
...was suffering from tuberculosis of the spine.
- What?
- Before your accident...
...he had been operated on twice.
And after the second operation, his life really hung by a thread.
Both these doctors will testify to that.
Also that even the slightest shock...
...might have produced the most disastrous results.
Dr. Gillette will testify that he strongly advised the man...
...against driving a car in the first place.
Why, it's entirely possible that the man might have been dead from shock...
...or undue strain even before your car struck him.
Of course, I can't prove that...
...but I can throw doubt in the mind of the jury.
And a jury in doubt is a jury in the bag.
[BAND PLAYING DANCE MUSIC]
[TAP DANCING SOUNDS]
Clever dancers, aren't they,
Mr. Kennard?
Yes. Say, Barney, who's that woman in black over there...
...sitting with the man and the other woman?
I don't know. I don't think she's ever been here before.
Right.
Pardon me, I think I'll call John.
If he's home now, I'll ask him to join us.
[SLURRING]
Well, allow me to do it for you.
- You'd never make it.
- Excuse me.
Hello? This is Mrs. Prentice.
Has Mr. Prentice come in yet?
Oh, I see.
No, no message. We'll be home shortly.
Goodbye.
[APPLAUSE]
Why, Mrs. Prentice, how are you?
- Don't you remember me?
- I'm afraid not.
My name's Kennard. Lawrence Kennard.
- Yes?
- We've met.
- We have?
- Yes.
But I can't seem to remember where.
Was it at Carol Gibson's?
- Carol Gibson?
- The author.
Oh, yes. I don't know Mr. Gibson.
Could it be at Mrs. Alan Blakely's, at one of her teas?
I don't know Mrs. Blakely.
I've heard of her.
This is terribly embarrassing.
I know.
- What?
- You.
I mean, the smile.
Oh, do forgive me, but it's really startling.
I knew I met you before.
That mysterious smile.
I'm sorry.
I'm afraid I'm being awfully rude.
Would you pardon me?
I'll go back to my table.
I'm sorry if I've annoyed you.
- Good night, Mrs. Prentice.
- Good night.
Who was the broad-shouldered thrill you were just talking to?
Oh, did you see me?
- Nothing ever escapes a Drexel.
- Who was he?
I don't know. He introduced himself to me and said we had met before.
He couldn't remember where and neither could I.
Mmm. He was a handsome brute.
He was good-looking, wasn't he?
- I think that's all.
- Thank you, Mr. Prentice.
- So long, Mr. Prentice, and thanks.
- Quite welcome. Bye.
Anything to the rumor that you're going to defend Senator Drake?
[INTERCOM BUZZES]
Excuse me. Yes?
WOMAN [O VER INTERCOM]:
Mrs. Prentice is on the phone.
Oh, that's another case.
I'm rather not discuss that now.
- Thank you, Mr. Prentice.
- Goodbye.
Yes, darling?
Oh, well, now, thank you.
Yes, it was easier than I anticipated.
The jury was out only two hours.
[LAUGHS]
Oh.
Well, go away where?
Darling, I'd love to take a rest.
But I just discovered I've got to go to Boston tonight to see Senator Drake.
Well, I'm sorry too, dear. But...
Well, it'll only be four or five days, a week at the most.
That's right, honey.
Just one bag as usual.
Yes, I know.
Shirts, ties, socks, pajamas.
[INDISTINCT CHATTER]
Drawing Room A, Car 45.
- You haven't much time.
- Thank you.
- Where's he going with those bags?
- He's taking them to the train.
- What train?
- The train Daddy's taking to Boston.
Aren't we going on the train too?
- No, darling.
- Honey, dear.
Daddy'd love to take you and Mommy to Boston.
But he'll be so busy there, he'd never have a chance to see you.
Gonna be a good little girl while I'm gone?
I'm always a good little girl. Heh, heh.
- Well, I should say you are.
MAN: All aboard!
- There it is. Goodbye, sweetheart.
- Bye.
[CHUCKLES]
Goodbye, dear.
I'll be at the Company Plaza,
I'll phone you every night.
- Goodbye. Goodbye, honey. Bye-bye.
- Goodbye, Daddy.
[INDISTINCT CHATTER]
- Oh, diner's in the rear?
- Yes, sir.
- Is it open?
- Yes, sir.
WOMAN:
It's a brown bag, porter.
A little brown bag with my initials on it right by the handle.
- Now, please try and find it for me.
MAN: Yes, ma'am.
[TRAIN HORN SOUNDS]
Where are you going?
Boston.
Please don't be angry with me, John.
Today, you saved me from prison.
And I'm so grateful.
But you can't tell a man how grateful you are...
...if that man is taking a train, can you?
Unless you the take the train too.
- Good morning, Evelyn.
- Good morning, dear.
- Bonjour and how are you, darling?
- I'm fine.
There's some letters on the desk for you.
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
Don't tell me you go in for early morning reading.
- What's the book?
- It's called Sonnets to the Sun.
- What to the which?
- Sonnets to the Sun.
EVELYN:
Pretty, isn't it? It's a book of poems.
Poems? In the morning?
Darling, it's your liver.
So that's what Boston does to your husband.
My first husband went there once, but all I got was a pot of beans.
John didn't send this.
Here's a letter that came with it.
"Dear Mrs. Prentice, I have a feeling the night before last in Barney's...
...you thought of me as one resorting to a vulgar technique...
...to make your acquaintance."
The good-looking thrill with broad shoulders. Go on.
"Couldn't we have tea this afternoon at 4?
Maybe the tea leaves will recall our past fortunes.
Especially mine."
Nice work, fella, nice work.
"I'm taking the liberty of sending you, along with this letter...
...a book of my poems.
May I call later in the day for your answer to my tea invitation?
Please accept.
Sincerely yours, Lawrence Kennard."
A poet. It's an awful waste of broad shoulders.
Ever hear of him?
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
- Neither have I. Coffee?
- Uh-uh.
That needn't interfere with the tea leaves.
Don't be absurd.
Well, I can't see any harm in having tea with a nice clean poet.
And he certainly seemed clean.
Maybe you have met him sometime, somewhere, somehow.
What if I have?
That doesn't give him a right...
...to send me gifts and invite me to tea.
- Gifts? Oh, the book.
Probably that's the only way he can get them into circulation.
Here, you take it. I don't want it.
Evelyn, don't tell me you're not tingling with excitement over the whole thing.
A tall, good-looking fellow just dying to meet you?
Probably write a poem to your eyebrows or something?
You wouldn't be human if you didn't tingle a little.
You're absurd for words.
Where will we lunch?
What do you say to the Waldorf?
Head waiter's so handsome.
- Waldorf wins.
- Then we can shop around...
...until it's time for your tea date.
I haven't a tea date.
[PHONE RINGS]
I'll answer.
Hello?
- Who? Put him on.
- Who is it?
- It's the thrill.
- I'm not in.
[IN FRENCH ACCENT]
Hello?
No, this is not Mrs. Prentice.
Mrs. Prentice is out.
But she leaves word she is pleased to accept your invitation for tea at 4.
- Amy.
- The gold room at the plaza?
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
I'll tell her.
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
Amy, why, of all the...
[IN NORMAL VOICE]
For you and the flag, a poet.
Oh, I hope you don't get stuck with the check.
What are you gonna call your play when it's finished?
It's not really my play.
You see, I'm writing it with another chap.
It's his idea and he's already written most of it.
I've never met a man who's so reluctant to talk about himself.
Your gardenia, sir.
Won't you have something with your tea?
Cinnamon toast or crumpets?
- Our crumpets are delicious.
- Some strawberry jam?
Oh, I really shouldn't. No, thank you.
- Just tea.
- Very good, sir.
- And a lovely gardenia. Thank you.
- There's a story that goes with that.
- Like to hear it?
- Story? Yes, please.
Once upon a time, there was a young man who was terribly broke...
...and terribly in love, and it was Christmas.
Now, you're laughing at me. This is true.
He went into a flower shop and asked the man if he might do...
...some work around the place.
And I suppose because it was
Christmas and it was snowing...
...and the shop was littered with papers and stems and broken flowers...
...the man said, "Go ahead, sweep it up."
He worked all morning.
When he had finished, the owner asked him how much he wanted.
He said, "I don't want any money.
But I would like one of those gardenias."
And he gave it to the young lady?
Yes, I gave it to the young lady.
And did she like it?
I don't know how much she liked it.
You see, somebody else had sent her a box of orchids.
Oh.
This is the first time since that day...
...l've ever given a gardenia to a beautiful lady.
But now, you're rich and successful, you can buy all the gardenias you want.
Perhaps.
But I'm awfully glad you didn't order those crumpets.
- Hello, everybody.
MAN: Oh, there you are.
Sorry to be late.
I had to see a big producer.
- Larry, why didn't you phone?
- Couldn't, I was waiting in his office.
Never mind the excuses.
Where's the whisky?
I ordered some stuff.
It'll be here in a minute.
I'll help you, Greg. How are you, Abby?
Swell.
What's the matter, Judy?
I can always tell when he's lying.
- Who's the producer you had to see?
- I didn't see any producer.
I happened to be out with the wife of a prominent man in New York.
- I'm meeting her again tomorrow.
- Who is she?
Heh. I'll never tell that to anybody.
- Good-looking?
- Beautiful.
I told her my gardenia number, she went for it hook, line and sinker.
I know all about that gardenia number.
I went for it once myself.
- You double...
- Don't call me names.
Now, let me out of here.
I haven't done a thing.
- Now, listen...
- Will you calm down for a minute?
- I wasn't with any woman.
- I heard what you said to Greg.
I know what you heard.
I was stringing him along.
But I want a cut in on that play of his.
Great idea. A sure money-getter.
What's that got to do with being out with a woman?
I told him I was with the wife of a very prominent man.
I want him to think
I can get backing for the play.
Why not say it was a prominent man?
Why say it was his wife?
I don't know. I guess I wanted to show off.
- You believe me, don't you?
- No, I don't.
[KNOCK ON DOOR]
That must be the boy from the liquor store.
Just a minute.
Have you got $6?
That's why I had them sent up.
- I didn't have any cash.
- You'll find some money in my bag.
Oh. Oh, you're a darling.
Now, go and tell them the cocktails will be ready in a jiffy.
There. Everything's all right now, isn't it?
I guess so.
You couldn't stay sore at Larry, could you?
- If I thought you were playing around, I...
- What would you do?
I couldn't stand it.
I'd never let you do it, Larry.
I think I...
[SOBBING]
Oh, Larry, darling.
And Mildred and Peggy and Bindy and Petercon and Fluffy and Roly-Poly.
And all so well-behaved.
That's because they're having a special treat.
- Ice cream?
- No.
Something better than that.
They're gonna sit up and see Daddy.
He's coming home today and I have on my best dress too, see?
Well, so you have.
- You miss your daddy?
- Uh-huh.
And so do Mildred and Peggy and Bindy and Petercon and Fluffy and Roly-Poly.
- But I explained to them.
- About what?
That daddies are always busy.
[LAUGHS]
Well, you've learned a lot for a small person.
- Where's your mommy?
- She's dressing.
Look, here. I think all these children better have a nap before train time.
I know. A big family is such a worry.
Don't I know, with my cat and two dogs.
[GIGGLES]
AMY:
Ah.
[SPEAKS IN FRENCH]
- In other words, what are you doing?
- Packing.
I'm old and feeble but my eyesight's still middling.
What I mean is, what's the packing about?
Look at that.
AMY: Sounds like a traveling salesman than a lawyer.
Can't he find people in trouble here without going on the road?
"Will explain later.
Heaps of love to you and Dorothy."
- Look at those flowers.
- Roses for forgiveness.
Roses, yes, but Larry sent them.
- Larry?
- Mr. Kennard.
So it's reached the Larry stage.
Say, how often have you seen this bird?
Face cream, powder, mascara...
Eye shadow, lip rouge, nail polish, bath salt, perfume.
But that still doesn't answer my question.
How often have you seen this bird?
Mr. Kennard? Oh, a couple of times for tea.
A few lunches and a walk in the park, you know.
I don't get the combination.
Telegram from husband, plus flowers from friend equals a packed suitcase.
- It doesn't make sense.
- More than you think.
- I'm running away.
- With Larry?
- From Larry.
- As bad as that?
Oh, it's really not as bad as that.
- After all, Amy, I am a married woman.
- Might I ask where you're going?
With you. To Chester Wylie's barn dance.
He'll be tickled stiff, if he isn't stiff already.
He was so disappointed when I told him you hated barn dances.
Well, I loathe them.
Gingham dresses, hayseed in your hair, cows in the barn, turkey in the straw...
...but we're going.
[DANCE MUSIC PLAYING]
[MAN SPEAKS INDISTINCTLY]
[RHYTHMIC CLAPPING]
MAN:
Trade!
Promenade!
You know where and I don't care.
[CHEERS AND APPLAUSE]
Oh, Evelyn, aren't you ever coming in?
- No.
- Why not?
I told you I hated barn dances.
Oh, it's so lovely here.
Moonlight on the water, quiet, peaceful.
No telephone calls, no interruptions.
No interruptions?
Here's a telegram for you.
Oh, it is a beautiful night.
I wish Chester was sober.
I hope it isn't bad news.
John?
No.
Oh, it's from the pet canary and it's all in French.
He's not giving the old girls in the telegraph office any breaks, is he?
[READS IN FRENCH]
"What has happened?
What have I done to make you angry?
Have I done anything to offend you?
If I have, I ask forgiveness and offer abject apologies.
Please, please write to me. Larry."
I think not. No, thank you.
Pardon? Oh.
To be honest with you,
I haven't read them.
Poetry isn't my language.
Well, maybe it isn't my language.
Why don't you come down, have tea this afternoon?
- I'll tell you what they meant to me.
- No, thank you.
Oh, because it's daylight and my head is clear.
Well, Larry, I have a hard-working husband...
...and it just happens that I like him.
Oh. No, I'm not angry.
Thank you.
- Thank you very much. Goodbye.
- Who was that? The songbird?
Yes. He knows now why he recognized me that night in the cafe.
I'm the dream girl he wrote verses to.
He should've brought that one up sooner.
- He invited me to his apartment for tea.
- I knew that'd be next.
- And you're getting a kick out of it.
- Right, because I'm not going.
You're not?
- You don't make sense.
- Oh, yes, I do.
- Chester been to Tiffany's?
- No, it's for you.
Thanks. No, Amy,
I've been for a walk.
I've been telling myself how happy I should be.
And honest, it did work.
I'm married to the only man in the world.
Next time you hear me grouching, would you remind me of that?
He must've come home last night.
No, today. Changed clothes, back to office, didn't even see him.
You might as well be married to a night watchman.
[CHUCKLES]
Oh, I know.
"Sorry, darling. Can't make it for dinner.
Crazy business, have to catch a train."
All excuses, but this is his home.
He loves me and I adore him.
Have you been reading
Romeo and Juliet?
No.
No, the poet's invitation to tea had a reverse action.
I see.
Do you mind if I just sit here and try to capture your mood?
- I suppose that's the way it would be.
- What?
You'd have a good laugh on him, wouldn't you?
- On who?
- My husband.
What are you still talking about him for?
I'm still thinking about him.
No, Larry, I'm sorry.
- It's no go.
- What are you driving at?
You can't make a fool of your husband?
What's he made of you?
- That's different.
- You bet it is.
I want to thank you, Larry.
If you hadn't spoken as you did...
Well, you've done me a great kindness.
- Talk sense.
- I am.
I owe you an apology. I'm sorry.
You aren't gonna walk out on me like this.
- I'm afraid I am.
- You'll come back.
No, Larry.
No, I lost my head for a while today.
I was pretty badly hurt.
But I'm not making excuses for myself.
Besides, there isn't just my husband.
Aren't you remembering all this a bit late?
You're right again, Larry.
I'm very ashamed and very humbled.
It's goodbye.
No, it isn't.
You aren't gonna lose me so easily.
I think it's too bad you're being more unpleasant than is necessary.
- I thought we might say goodbye...
- You're not saying goodbye.
I don't know what you're saying.
But I'm saying it right now.
[DOOR CLOSES]
[PLAYING THE PIANO]
[PIANO PLAYING]
Oh, hello, Mommy.
[GIGGLING]
Oh, Mommy. Don't squeeze me so tight.
Mommy, I've got to do my practicing.
[EXHALES]
Never mind your practicing.
Never mind anything.
My darling.
And I'm very sorry but the case doesn't interest me.
[DOOR OPENS]
Very truly yours.
Well...
I have to see you for a few minutes.
No fooling.
You hear what she says, Miss Meade.
No fooling.
Now, what mischief have you been up to?
[DOOR OPENS THEN CLOSES]
Where did you get it?
From... From Evelyn.
I'm supposed to take this to Nancy Harrison...
...with Evelyn's compliments but here I am.
What does it mean?
Read the card.
It came from the Pullman Company.
Found in your drawing room.
"To Nancy from John."
I'm still in the dark.
Listen, I'm giving you the chance to fix up some lies for Evelyn.
You don't have to bother about me.
I'm not lying to you, Amy.
Well, she was on the train, wasn't she?
Yes, she was.
But she was in a compartment of her own.
I told her that I wasn't going to see her anymore.
She became hysterical, threatening.
Amy, this watch wasn't left in my drawing room.
It was placed there deliberately.
- And I think I know why.
- Hm-mm-mm.
A nice girl putting a bomb under a happy home, eh?
I'd give my right arm if this hadn't happened.
Well, you feel as wretched as she does.
A lot worse.
She's not to blame, I am.
How do you get into such a mess with a creature like that?
Vanity.
Someone to tell you how big and wonderful you are.
Have I any chance with Evelyn?
I don't know, John.
I don't know what she'll do.
[PUSHES BUTTON]
Cancel all the rest of my appointments for this afternoon.
And get word to Senator Drake not to come.
WOMAN [O VER INTERCOM]:
Yes, Mr. Prentice.
I'm taking this, Amy.
I'm gonna finish this business.
Don't give me away.
Don't worry, I won't.
EVELYN:
Uh-oh. What's happened to that leg?
It's tired, Mommy.
EVELYN:
Oh, poor old lady.
If you were only a young thing like your mother. Come on, up with it.
Well, have I the two busy little women here this morning.
[GIGGLES]
- Hello, Daddy.
- Good morning, darling.
- Is there room here for me?
BOTH: Sure.
Here I come. Now, where are we?
EVELYN: Here we go.
JOHN: Ready.
One, two, three...
Look at that old bent knee.
Come on, now, straighten it up.
Where's the other leg?
You're not a one-legged girl, are you?
- I got in just the end of that one.
- Now, we'll do the toe-touching.
- The toe-touching.
- Ready.
One, two, three...
You were asleep when I got in last night, darling.
Yes, I went to bed early.
A hard day?
Darling, touch your toes. Yes, rather.
- What did you do? Anything special?
- Nothing in particular.
- You must keep your knees straight.
- It hurts.
- I know it. It's meant to.
- It certainly does hurt right under there.
- Yes, Daddy.
- It's good for you.
What? The hurt?
Uh... No, the exercise.
Well, the hurt too.
Of course, it depends on what you've been doing.
Well, this is certainly good for the tummy.
I don't see why I have to do this exercise.
My tummy's much flatter than Daddy's.
Well, am I insulted.
Evelyn, are you bringing up this child to have no respect for its father?
Why, my tummy is as flat as a pancake.
Not a very thin pancake.
All right, darling, we'll do the arms now. Ready?
- One, two...
- One, two, three four.
One, two, three, four.
- Evelyn.
- Yes, dear?
How'd you like to take your exercise in Europe for the next six months?
- You mean all of us?
- Me too?
Well, I should say so.
- Would you like that?
- Are you sure you want to?
I was no more sure of anything in my life.
We haven't done the bicycle one yet.
That's right, we haven't done the bicycle one yet.
And we wanna do the bicycle one...
...because they have lots of bicycles in Europe.
[GIGGLES]
What do you say, dear?
I'd love to.
Great.
All right, let's get aboard. Everybody. Heh.
Ready? On your wheels.
JOHN:
Let's go.
New York, London, Paris, Vienna.
New York, London, Paris, Vienna.
New York, London, Paris, Vienna.
[EVELYN CHUCKLES]
New York, London, Paris...
[DIALING]
Hello? I'd like to speak to Mrs. Prentice, please.
This is Mr. Prentice's office calling.
Hello, Evelyn? This is Larry.
Yes, I know I did.
I had to say that to get you to the telephone.
Yes, I got your letter.
But that's not why I'm calling you about.
I see you're going to Europe.
Before you take any boat for anywhere...
...you'd better come and see me.
Now, when you get here,
I'll tell you just what I mean.
That's sensible.
Goodbye.
It's a very commonplace situation, really.
Husband and wife aren't getting along.
Husband's cold, wife has peaked.
Looks for romance, finds romance.
Gets cold feet and writes letters.
Husband and wife decide to patch up differences and go abroad.
Wife drops romance overboard.
There was nothing wrong in those, they were innocent.
- Why are you here?
- Nothing is safe with a man like you.
That's the most sensible observation you've made.
If I don't give you $ 15,000, you'll show those letters to my husband?
- Right.
- Very well. Do as you like.
Wait a minute, wait just a minute.
Let me read you one.
The one you wrote after you scurried out of my apartment.
Maybe it will changed your mind.
Here we are.
One, two, three. Heh.
Worth 5000 bucks apiece.
If you pardon my mentioning money.
"Dear Larry, please don't try to reach me again.
The greatest kindness you can do me...
...is to help me forget that yesterday ever happened."
You know what I meant.
Sure I know what you meant.
But who'll believe what you meant?
"And I can't tell you how deeply I regret having gone to your apartment."
How is that, huh?
Larry, give me those letters.
Give me those letters.
Sure.
I meant to give them to you all along.
Thought I might teach you a lesson.
Might make you more discreet next time.
What is it they say?
Only women and fools write letters.
[GUNSHOT]
JOHN:
Evelyn?
Yes, dear?
Oh, there you are.
Can you stand an awful shock?
Turn up the lights, sweetheart.
Your passport photo.
Oh.
[SNIFFS]
And this is your husband.
[JOHN LAUGHS]
Will you tell me why it is...
...that people always look like convicts on those passport photos?
[CHUCKLES]
What's the matter, dear?
Aren't you feeling well?
I have a headache.
Oh, I'm so sorry.
But how did you get that cut on your lip?
Oh, uh...
The car door swung back.
It struck me.
I don't like that.
AMY:
Evelyn, did you hear the...?
- Oh, hello, John.
- Hi, Amy.
Darling, I'll get you a nice cocktail.
It'll be good for you.
- Shall I bring you one?
- One? Bring up the jug.
[JOHN CHUCKLES]
Did you hear about Lawrence Kennard?
- No, what?
- He's been murdered.
- Some girl shot him this afternoon.
- Really?
Caught her standing over his body with a gun.
Imagine how I felt when I picked up the paper, saw that? She's good-looking too.
- What's her name?
- Williams or something like that.
- Did you ever hear him mention her?
- No.
- Oh. That isn't her name.
- What is it, then?
Judith Wilson.
Charles, I wish you'd be a little more careful...
...when you're driving Mrs. Prentice.
How'd she happen to have her lip cut today?
I don't know, sir.
I didn't drive Mrs. Prentice today, sir.
You mean she drove herself?
I don't think so, sir, car was in the garage all day.
Oh, I see.
Oh, I'll take this up, Albert.
Now, would you mix a big shakerful?
- That's all.
- Yes, sir.
I know, dear. I was shocked too.
But there's no reason for you to be so upset, is there?
No.
No, you're quite right. Of course not.
I told him to change that frame.
It's not very becoming, do you think?
[PIANO PLAYING]
Why isn't Dorothy in bed?
What's she doing up so late?
What time is it?
Evelyn, what is the matter with you?
That girl didn't shoot him. I did.
I went to his apartment.
- He struck me, I shot him.
- What? How do you know?
I killed him.
Evelyn.
Enter the doctor.
Now, here's your medicine, dear.
This will fix you up.
Your jug will be up in a minute.
Well, see, I was just about to leap down Charles' throat...
...about that cut on your lip there.
He tells me he didn't drive you today.
No, he didn't.
- Well, and you didn't drive yourself.
- We were in a taxi.
- Oh, you were with Evelyn?
- Oh, yes, John.
Oh, was it the driver's fault?
No, he couldn't help it.
It was just an accident.
That's too bad, darling.
- Will you be down for dinner?
- Yes, dear.
[DOROTHY SINGING "BRAHM'S LULLABY"]
What's this? A concert at this hour?
I'll have to look into that.
I'm going to tell him.
- I can't let that girl...
- What?
I'm going to give myself up.
[BOTH SINGING]
[SINGS THE LAST NOTE AT A LOW KEY]
[LAUGHS]
What are you going to do?
I don't know.
MAN:
Special extra! Girl kills sweetheart!
All about the Judith Wilson murder case. Extra!
Now, look at this plan here.
What's to prevent someone going out of those doors...
...while someone comes in one of the others? Tell me.
But how about the motive?
Tell me that.
When a dame wants to plug a guy, she don't need a motive.
- What has that to do with cocktails?
- Beg pardon, sir. Right away.
This Judith Wilson case, sir, has everyone talking.
- You think she's guilty?
- Well, I'm not so sure, sir.
- Why?
- Oh, she hasn't the look, sir.
She don't sit for the flashlights.
Let's them shoot her any old way, with her hair mussed and nose shiny.
And if she were guilty?
Don't you think she would try to gain the favor of the public...
...by looking pretty and soft and innocent-like?
That's a shrewd observation, Albert.
Well, that comes of serving in your home, sir.
I wish you had the case, sir.
Albert, less flattery and more cocktails.
Yes, sir.
- I'm afraid that we'll have to be patient.
- What happened?
They're trying the Wilson girl in the pantry.
Say, that case has certainly caught on, hasn't it?
Do you think she has a chance, dear?
Well, I don't know.
She's in rather a bad spot.
Farley's up for re-election, he's bearing down on everything these days.
You can be certain he will use his whole bag of tricks to convict her.
He'll get a lot of extra votes and she'll probably get 20 years to life.
Oh, at last.
- Here you are, dear.
- Thank you.
Here you are, John.
And here we are, darling.
- Daddy?
- Mm.
- Yes, darling?
- I'm in trouble, terrible trouble.
Well, now, what is the terrible trouble, old lady?
[SNIFFLING]
You know that vase...
...that little flowered one
Mommy likes so well?
Yes?
I broke it.
Oh, you did? Well, now.
[CRYING]
I don't think that's such terrible trouble, do you, Mommy?
Now, you just watch Mr. Fix-lt.
You come over here...
...and I'll show you just what we do with vases that get broken.
We take some glue, some good old glue...
...and we smear it all over the edge like that.
Then we put the two pieces together like that.
And presto, just as good as new.
Why, it's no trouble at all, is it, Mommy?
- No, darling.
- No.
[CHUCKLES]
Daddy and I were just talking about a girl who is in a real trouble.
Yes.
[CRYING]
Why doesn't her daddy help her?
I don't think she has any daddy, dear.
Couldn't our daddy help her?
Yes, dear, our daddy could.
Why don't you, Daddy?
Well, we're going to get on a great big boat...
...and we're going all the way across the ocean.
Do we have to go?
Well, don't you wanna go?
I don't know.
My teacher says she's sorry
I'm going away...
...because I'm doing so well in my school.
John, we really shouldn't take Dorothy out of school.
And we wouldn't wanna go without her, would we?
I should say we wouldn't.
Dear, would you think me insane if I ask you to call off this trip?
Well, this is rather sudden, isn't it?
No.
No, I've been thinking about it for some time.
John, who will defend her?
I don't know, the court will probably appoint...
...some overworked public defender who'll be just a football for Farley.
- It's terrible.
- Mm. Not so good.
I wish you'd help her.
You do?
Say, you are interested in this case, aren't you?
Well, seems to me she certainly deserves a first-rate attorney.
Thank you.
That's a very pretty compliment.
Even if we did stay home...
...l'd probably be head over heels with work at the office.
Well, could you at least go down and talk with her?
Yes, I could do that if you want me to.
I wish you would.
All right, dear.
I'll go down and talk with her tomorrow.
You're very sweet, John.
Well, there's nothing in the world we wouldn't do for our Mommy, is there?
[CHUCKLES]
- Good morning.
- Good morning.
Good morning, Ms. Wilson.
This is Mr. John Prentice.
Heard of him?
Yes, I think so.
Mr. Prentice has interested himself in your case.
- I thought you were my lawyer.
- No.
I'm only the public defender appointed by the court.
I will be in my office if you want to get in touch.
Right.
Now, suppose we go over this from the beginning, Ms. Wilson.
But I haven't any money.
Don't worry about that. Sit down.
[VOICE BREAKING]
And that's all I remember, Mr. Prentice.
The next thing I knew, I was in a room with big lights shining down in my eyes.
And a lot of men shouting at me, telling me I'd killed Larry...
...and asking me to confess.
But I didn't kill him, Mr. Prentice.
Did you ever threaten to?
- Yes, I did.
- Why?
I was jealous.
But I didn't do it, Mr. Prentice.
Who was this other woman?
I never knew her name.
I only heard Larry say that she was the wife of a prominent man.
But you never heard her name?
No, sir.
Well, that's all for now.
You'll hear from me later in the day.
And don't worry.
Thank you.
[DOOR OPENS]
Thank you.
Eddie, I want you to have Clark and
Thompson at my house tonight at 8:00.
Right.
Get a court order, look over that flat.
Number is 78 Greenwich Avenue.
Meet me there at 4:00.
Right. You're gonna take the case?
Yes. Got a match?
- Good evening, chief.
- How are you?
- Good evening.
- Evening, Mrs. Prentice.
Delaney will be along shortly. Sit down.
You're in the headlines of the evening papers.
Yes, I saw one of them.
- I bet Farley's seen all of them.
- Are we going to lick him?
I shouldn't be surprised if we did.
But we got a pretty tough case in front of us.
There's another woman involved.
A woman who may possibly have been clever enough...
...to kill Kennard in his own apartment with his own gun without leaving a clue.
We've got to find that woman.
Smoke, Mack?
PAT: Was this Wilson girl able to give you any help?
Not much. All she knew was the woman was the wife of some prominent man.
- Sounds like a blackmail set-up.
- That's my conclusion.
I've already got a pretty good line on Kennard. He's quite a ladies' man.
He had no qualms about allowing the ladies...
...to help him out every now and then, financially.
Man like that, when he got a married woman in the right spot...
...especially the wife of a prominent man...
...he'd probably make it very difficult for her.
MACK: How about the apartment?
Anything there?
PAT: Bloodstains?
- Yes.
Of course, there was the pool of blood on the carpet...
...of the living room where Kennard fell.
But in the hall, just outside the living room door...
...there was a trail of blood spots that lead all the way down the stairs.
That blood was not from Kennard.
Someone came out of that apartment who had been hurt?
Right, and as there was no evidence of any weapon having been used...
...it was probably caused by a blow from a fist.
PAT: Nosebleed.
MACK: Or a cut in the mouth.
JOHN: Yes, and the Wilson girl's face was absolutely unmarked.
How about having a look at the man's hands for teeth marks?
Planned that. He was buried yesterday.
We'll get an order, have the body exhumed.
MACK:
Suppose the DA tries to hold us up?
We'll look at the body without an order.
ALBERT:
Mr. Delaney, sir.
Good evening. How do you do,
Mrs. Prentice, Mack, Pat?
What luck, Eddie?
We're batting 100 percent.
I got the janitor...
...from 81 Greenwich Avenue,
81 is after 78.
She was in front of the house that day and saw the grocery boy go to 78.
Minutes before the boy went in, she saw a woman come out...
...holding a handkerchief to her face.
She claims she can identify that woman.
Good work, Eddie.
It looks like we're in luck.
I think I'll go upstairs, dear.
No, darling, I'd like you to hear this woman's story.
Bring her in, Eddie.
EDDIE:
Come right in, Mrs. Blake.
Mrs. Blake, Mr. Prentice.
- How are you?
- How do you do?
- Mr. Thompson, Mr. Clark.
- How do you do?
These gentlemen are our special investigators.
- Hmm.
- And this is Mrs. Prentice.
How do you do, ma'am?
How do you do?
This is a nice place you've got here.
Well, thank you.
Won't you sit down?
Thank you.
[EXHALES]
I'm on my feet all day, and sometimes half the night...
...if Jerry comes home with a load on.
- Jerry's my husband.
- Never mind about Jerry and his load.
You know you can identify the woman you saw come out of the house?
What sort of looking person was this woman?
Oh. That's pretty hard to say with the handkerchief and everything.
- But, oh, I'd know her again, all right.
- Was she tall or short?
Well, let me see, she was about...
Well, she wasn't short and she wasn't tall.
BLAKE:
Sort of medium-like, I'd say.
Could you be a bit more definite?
It's important.
Well, it seems to me she was more on the tall side.
But maybe it was the hat that made her look that way.
Would you say she was 5-feet-5?
I don't know, sir.
I have no head for figures.
[CHUCKLES]
JOHN: Darling, would you mind standing for a moment?
Now, would you say she was as tall as my wife?
She was just about her size, maybe a little shorter.
Good. Thank you, dear.
Was she dark or blond?
Well, that's pretty hard to say at that distance.
But I should say she was on the dark side, like your wife here.
- How was she dressed?
- Oh, swell.
In the height of fashion, as my dead mother used to say.
Was she wearing dark or light clothes?
She had a dark, short coat, brown, with fur.
- Fur collar?
- Oh, no, not on the collar.
Only on the sleeves.
There are hundreds of those.
Mrs. Prentice has one.
Had one, I gave it to the mission two weeks ago.
The fur was completely gone, you know.
Ho-ho. I understand.
Them fur sleeves are great places for the moths, ain't they?
Did you notice her hat?
Yes, it's one of them little dinky ones that sits on the top of the head, brown.
Hmm. How does it happen that you didn't speak about this woman before?
She went out of me mind when I heard the Wilson girl had been arrested.
I never thought of it again till this fella come down...
...and started asking me if I'd ever seen any woman going in...
...or coming out of number 78.
I see.
I appreciate it if you don't mention having been here to see me tonight.
- Oh, I won't tell a soul.
- Good.
How much will I get?
Now, I haven't promised you anything.
Of course, you will be paid for your time.
I understand. Anytime you want me,
I'm always on the job.
Thank you. Come to my office tomorrow morning.
- I'll be there.
- Delaney will call for you around 10.
First thing I know,
I'll be getting talked about...
...having strange men call on me while Jerry's at work.
And a homely-looking mug like him too.
[CHUCKLES]
Darling, would you show Mrs. Blake to the door?
- It's been nice meeting you, Mrs. Blake.
- Same here, Mrs. Prentice.
Now, can I tell you something that's gonna hand you a great big laugh?
Yes, what is it?
When I walked over to you in that room before...
...I could have sworn you were the woman I seen coming out of 78.
Oh, but only for a second or two.
But she was on your style, all right.
But I can see now she wasn't nearly as beautiful as you are, Mrs. Prentice.
- Thank you.
- Which only goes to show...
...how easy it is to be mistaken, don't it? Heh.
Well, it's gonna be awful hard going back...
...to my own little place after seeing all this. Heh.
- Good night, Mrs. Blake.
- Good night.
If you ever are down around 81, drop in and see me.
- And have a little nip, if you like, huh?
- Good night.
Eddie, let me have the key, will you?
Have you ever seen that before, Judith?
- No, sir.
- You're quite certain?
Yes, sir.
There were four keys in Kennard's pockets when his body was examined.
We've accounted for the others, but there's no lock that that would fit.
It might be for a strongbox.
Did you seen one in the joint?
- No.
- Where did he keep his private papers?
In the top drawer of his desk.
I found a diary there once.
- A diary?
- Yes, sir.
- When was this?
- About eight months ago.
- Did you read any of it?
- No, I didn't have a chance.
I was opening it when Larry came and he snatched it out of my hand.
We had a dreadful quarrel about it.
- Had you ever seen it before?
- No, sir.
- Ever see it again?
- No, sir.
Larry said he destroyed it.
Tsk. I wish you'd told me this before.
Well, I'm sorry, Mr. Prentice.
- I hadn't thought about it.
- Hmm.
Say, Eddie, suppose you hop over to Robinson's...
...and make enlargements of those photographs...
...of Kennard's room, will you?
- Right. Let me out of here, will you?
Tell him I want big ones to bring out all the details of the furniture.
Right.
JOHN: Chances are he made entries in it every day...
...he'd certainly wanna have it someplace where you had easy access to it.
Well, I think that eliminates that.
We come to this bronze group...
...and I want you boys to take a special peek at that.
I kept that for the last because
I've got a funny hunch about that base.
- Who got that piece?
- His cousin in Newark.
The same one who got the bedroom furniture.
I don't care how you do it, Ed, but you get your hands on it.
Right. We got one, but every time
I go on a binge, my wife tosses it.
- Funny how they go for foreign objects.
- You know what you're looking for.
Look, examine it carefully for a small lock.
Probably concealed.
And sound that base.
If it sounds hollow or if you find the lock, you get it to me fast.
- Right.
- All right, hop to it.
Remember, the case goes to the jury in 48 hours.
[GIGGLES]
Good morning, Evelyn.
Good morning, Amy.
I'm going to court, Amy.
Am I gonna have to rope and tie you?
Read this.
But you know how often the papers have guessed wrong on John's cases.
I can't take any chances with this.
So help me, Evelyn. In your case, I...
I'd think of Dorothy.
I know.
I'm going crazy thinking about that...
...but I should have thought of Dorothy sooner.
- But, Evelyn, you...
- Amy, please, don't go on about it.
I've gone over it and around it...
...and there's only one thing that's clear.
That girl.
Will you go with me?
Okay.
MAN:
Something I can do for you, please?
Yeah, was looking at this bronze animal with the wooden base.
[KNOCKS ON WOOD]
I see you got good taste. This comes out from a very fashionable 5th Avenue home.
- Is that so?
- Genuine bronze and teak wood.
- You sure it's teak wood?
- Absolutely guaranteed.
- It's not very heavy.
- You know, teak wood isn't so heavy.
I wouldn't tell you it was genuine if I...
What's the matter? Something wrong?
No, I just thought it was broken but it's okay.
Broken? I don't sell broken things in my store.
But please, why are you so particular about the base?
Look at that piece.
- How much do you want for it?
- Genuine bronze.
How much do you want for it?
I give you my word of honor it cost me...
I'll take it.
And so, gentlemen of the jury...
...faced with such overwhelming evidence against him...
...the esteemed counsel for the defense...
...baffled and in despair, discarded the whys and wherefores...
...of legal jurisprudence and turned inventor.
He invented a character, which he calls the other woman.
As far as the state is concerned...
...Mr. Prentice has sole copyright to that invention.
There is no other woman, gentlemen.
There never has been another woman.
Judith Wilson killed Lawrence Kennard.
Judith Wilson and Kennard have frequently quarreled.
On several occasions, as witnesses have testified...
...in a jealous rage, she had threatened his life.
When discovered in Kennard's flat, evening of October 9th...
...the defendant was standing over the body of the murdered man...
...the man whose life she had threatened.
The weapon of death in her hand.
Is this not conclusive evidence?
Yet counsel for the defense...
...calmly asks you to ignore these circumstances...
...and swallow a fairy story...
...about some other woman.
There were no fingerprints on the door through which this other woman...
...had to make an exit from Kennard's flat.
But there were fingerprints on the gun.
They were those of Judith Wilson.
She killed Lawrence Kennard.
Evelyn, you're trembling.
I repeat, Judith Wilson killed Lawrence Kennard.
Why does he keep saying that...
...over and over?
AMY: Shh.
FARLEY:
There are certain laws, gentlemen...
...that have been laid down since the beginning of civilization.
On these laws, society depends for its very existence.
A child in his teens is taught the meaning of "Thou shalt not kill."
But the law of the state, our law, goes further.
It says, "If you take a life, the state shall in turn take yours."
The state demands the life of Judith Wilson.
FARLEY: She killed...
- No!
[CROWD MURMURING]
Don't.
You mustn't say that again.
She didn't kill him.
Please don't say that again.
What is the meaning of this interruption?
Who are you?
Mrs. John Prentice.
Your Honor, I object to this interruption.
Mrs. Prentice, will you tell this court...
...upon what facts you base your statement?
Your Honor, I object.
This procedure is entirely out of order.
Your objection is overruled, Mr. Prentice.
- Answer the question, please.
- I object, Your Honor.
JOHN:
Mrs. Prentice is not on trial.
Please, Mr. Prentice.
I repeat. Will you tell this court upon what facts you base your statement?
JOHN: If the court please...
- I killed him.
[EXCITED CHATTER]
[GAVEL BANGS]
Silence.
Do you wish to testify in this case?
- Yes.
- Your Honor, I agree with Mr. Prentice.
This procedure is entirely out of order.
Judith Wilson is on trial here.
And I object to this hysterical outburst before the jury.
Your Honor, I'd like a recess before we proceed any further.
Your request for a recess is denied.
Mrs. Prentice's declaration is a confession of murder.
But, Your Honor...
...it's the duty of this court to advise Mrs. Prentice...
...of her constitutional rights.
That is correct, Mr. Prentice.
JOHN: So before Mrs. Prentice testifies, she's entitled to advice of counsel.
I don't want counsel.
I just want to tell everything.
I can't keep silent any longer.
I know I'm going to hurt you...
...and Dorothy.
Swear in the witness.
Swear that the testimony you are about to give in the court...
...shall be the truth, whole truth, nothing but the truth, so help you God?
- I do.
- Be seated, please.
Mrs. Prentice, you...?
You knew Lawrence Kennard?
Yes.
JUDGE:
When did you last see him?
In his apartment.
- When?
- October 9th.
Will you please tell this court, in your own words...
...what you know about this case?
I had written some letters.
There was nothing wrong...
...but they might have been misinterpreted.
He wouldn't return them to me.
He wanted money.
He threatened to show them to my husband.
Go on.
There was a gun lying in an open drawer.
I picked it up.
I didn't intend to use it.
I only meant to frighten him into giving me back the letters.
He'd been drinking.
He struck me.
I fell back...
...my elbow hit the wall and the gun went off accidentally.
Accidentally?
Yes.
JUDGE:
Then, what happened?
He fell.
I heard someone in the kitchen.
I was frightened.
I threw the gun on the chair...
...and ran out into the hall.
Mr. District Attorney, do you wish to ask any questions?
No, Your Honor.
If the court please, I move for the dismissal of the case...
...of The People vs. Judith Wilson.
I object, Your Honor.
I wanna examine the witness.
Motion for dismissal denied.
Proceed, Mr. Prentice.
You've just testified that the shot that killed Kennard...
...was fired accidentally.
Is that right?
Yes.
You're quite sure of that?
Yes.
He struck you...
...and as you fell back, your arm hit the wall and the gun went off.
Is that how it happened?
Yes.
Well, then, there was only one shot fired?
There was only one shot.
Did you notice any blood or wound on Kennard as he was lying there?
No.
Did you examine him to see if he was still breathing?
No.
No, I...
I heard someone in the kitchen.
I was frightened...
...and I ran out into the hall.
Did you pass anyone on the way out?
No.
Neither in the hall nor on the stairs?
Nobody.
You're quite certain of that?
Yes.
And you're sure that there was only one shot fired?
There was only one shot.
That's all.
I'd like to recall Miss Wilson to the stand.
JUDGE:
Very well.
Will you please take the stand,
Miss Wilson?
Miss Wilson, if you will recall...
...evidence has shown that after Kennard was murdered...
...these two bullets were found.
One in his body, the other embedded in a wall of his apartment.
Yes, sir.
So we know that two shots must have been fired.
Yes.
In your previous testimony, you said that you heard both those shots.
- Is that right?
- Yes.
Yet Mrs. Prentice, admitting that she killed Kennard...
...has just testified that only one shot was fired.
Well, perhaps I was mistaken.
But before, you were sure.
I don't remember.
I was so frightened, so confused.
Perhaps I heard only one shot.
Suppose I refresh your memory...
...on a few points of your previous testimony.
You said that as you were about to enter the kitchen...
...you heard two shots fired.
That you rushed into the kitchen...
...flung open the door into the living room and saw Kennard lying there.
Is that right?
That's right.
That you knelt down beside him, saw that he was dead...
...picked up the gun and that at that moment...
...the grocery boy came in and saw you. Is that right?
Yes.
Well, if Mrs. Prentice went out just as you came in...
...and the grocery boy arrived only a moment later...
...I don't quite see how Mrs. Prentice avoided meeting the grocery boy...
...either in the hall or on the stairs.
Yet both Mrs. Prentice and the boy have testified that they passed no one.
Can you explain that?
Well, I...
I may have stopped in the kitchen for a few minutes.
For what?
I don't remember.
Get a drink of water or something.
I see.
In spite of the fact that you had just heard a gun fired...
...you stopped to get a drink of water.
Judith Wilson, you've been on trial in this court for your life.
All these weeks, I've been your friend and your counsel.
I've labored and I've struggled to prepare a defense for you...
...that would send you out of here a free woman.
I believed in your innocence and I believed in you.
But you've betrayed my friendship and you betrayed my trust.
You lied to me and you lied to this court.
Now, I want you to tell the truth.
I want to know what really happened...
...between the time you came up those stairs...
...and the time the grocery boy found you.
Shall I tell?
No.
No, I'll tell.
I'll tell everything.
As I came up the stairs, I heard a shot.
One shot.
I rushed into the kitchen, threw the door open into the other room.
And I saw Larry lying on the floor.
I couldn't move for a moment.
As I stood there staring at him...
...he stirred a little and I saw that he was still alive.
As I started over to him, he straightened up and got to his feet.
He was a little dazed.
He'd hit his head when he fell.
I asked him if he was hurt.
He said, "No, she didn't hurt me."
So then I knew it was a woman, someone he'd been making love to.
I asked him what she'd been doing there.
He became very brutal.
He'd been drinking.
He told me to mind my own business and get out...
...that he was through with me, tired of me.
And I saw this time that he meant it.
I pleaded with him.
I told him how much I loved him...
...what he'd done to my life, but he just laughed at me.
He told me to get out or he'd kick me out.
He took hold of me by the shoulders...
...and started pushing me toward the door.
He hurt me.
And then I...
I just went kind of crazy.
Before I knew what I was doing,
I broke away from him.
I ran over and picked up the gun.
I told him he'd never live to treat another woman...
...the way he treated me and I shot him.
He fell to the floor...
...and I was kneeling beside him with the gun still in my hand.
Then the grocery boy came in with the things.
[JUDITH SOBBING]
This girl's story pleads more eloquently in her defense than anything I can say.
She was clean and decent and honest.
She met Kennard...
...and he destroyed her just as thoroughly...
...as if he had put that bullet into her brain.
What she and other women must have suffered at his hands...
...we can only guess.
But that guess alone is enough to make our spines crawl.
How can we feel anything but pity and warm compassion for that girl?
Kennard was a loathsome parasite.
He'd lived on women.
He was violently threatening this girl when she shot him.
She had every reason to believe that he was about to do her physical injury.
She shot him in self-defense.
Gentlemen...
...it is Kennard and his kind of vermin...
...upon whom you are sitting in judgment.
He died as he deserved to die.
His death was an act of high justice.
And I ask you, gentlemen...
...in the name of that same high justice to find him guilty...
...by declaring Judith Wilson not guilty.
MAN:
Special extra. Read all about it.
[HORN SOUNDS]
Judith Wilson acquitted. Extra!
Extra! Read all about it.
Judith Wilson acquitted. Extra!
Get your paper, read all about it!
How could I, Amy, destroy everything like this?
I don't believe he'll let you go.
I don't believe it.
Oh, he has to.
How could he think of me?
For nothing at all, absolutely nothing,
I've smashed all this to pieces.
Wait, dear, please.
No, he'd have come home.
Court was over hours ago.
Oh, Amy, what's she going to think through all the years?
[SOBBING]
What's the matter, Mommy?
What are you crying for?
Oh, my darling, don't ever forget how much your mommy loves you.
[SOBS]
Hello, Daddy.
Hello, darling.
EVELYN:
I only stayed until she was asleep...
...because I couldn't tell her.
What does Mommy mean, Daddy?
Do you remember you were in awful trouble once and Daddy fixed it?
Oh, do you mean when I broke the vase?
Yes, dear.
Did you break something, Mommy?
No, sweetie.
But tomorrow, we're getting on that big boat...
...and your mommy thinks you don't wanna go.
She doesn't want to leave you.
I do want to go, Mommy.
John, John, please listen.
Evelyn...
...the Judith Wilson case finished at 5:00.
Every phase of it.
Every phase of it.
I'll go with you, Mommy. I'll go.
Now, that's fine.
- Good night, Mommy and Daddy.
- Good night, dear.
Don't cry, Mommy.
I love you better than school or anything. Don't I, Daddy?
Of course you do and so do I.
Go to sleep, dear.
And you ask God to let you grow up to be a brave woman like your mommy.
[ENGLISH SDH]
Captioning made possible by lions gate entertainment
People ought to be ashamed of themselves.
Kicking up all that racket at this time of night.
What is it?
Is it a fire?
Well, why can't th ey knock quietly?
Oh, blast it.
We never... it's about
3 doors down.
That's where diana baring is staying.
I say, there's a policeman coming over i think.
Where?
Well, just coming around the corner.
What?
Well, that's funny
. i could've sworn.
No, you're right.
Look. There he is.
Coming down the side of the road.
I say!
That's druce knocking.
Looks as though he's tight again.
Here. Here.
Where's my shoes?
I better get down.
Aye. I'm on my way.
What, at this time of night?
My wife edna!
...with diana baring.
She's a...
Yeah, wait for me.
I'm coming.
I can't stop now.
I gotta go see what's the matter with druce.
Ohh.
Say, what's the matter, mr. Druce? Anything wrong?
My wife.
Will you please take this man away?
Come along now, druce, there's a good fellow.
No. Stop it.
There.
Open this door, will you?!
Open this door!
Hold on.
One second.
Open the door.
Come on.
Let go. Now, wait a minute now.
I can't wait to see what's going to happen.
Open the door, please!
Open the door for the love of god!
Open the door, for god's sake.
One of you run down to the station and ask the inspector to come along.
Tell him it's serious.
Is this woman a lodger of yours?
No, but miss baring is.
And she had mrs. Druce to supper with her tonight.
As a matter of fact, it was about... well, you see, mr. Constable, both these ladies are... i mean, were... you see, we're all members of the company that's playing at the theatre royale this week.
And as i was leaving the theatre, you see i'm the stage manager, and mr. Druce here, he's the general manager.
Well, you see, when i left the theatre tonight, i was invited to join them.
Wait. Wait a minute, wait a minute.
One at a time, please.
They killed you, edna.
They killed you.
Tell me, darling.
Who, darling?
Did she do it?
You always hated edna.
Thought yourself too good for us... with your high and mighty ladylike ways.
Now, pull yourself together.
Ohh! Leave me alone.
Is there any brandy in the house?
You'll find some brandy in the flask on the table.
I was just giving some to edna when... when... i can't think.
I can't remember.
Well, there's none there. It's empty.
I'll run back and fetch some.
Perhaps you'd like a cup of tea, dear.
It'll warm you up.
T.
I'll go and make i i'll give you a hand, dear.
Shall i light this gas, dear?
Please, dear.
It's still hot.
It only wants a drop more in it.
Light the stove, will you, dear?
I, uh...
Uh!
I suppose mrs. Druce really is dead, you know, uh... you know, diana never did get on well with poor edna druce, and i know for a fact that they hadn't been on speaking terms for the last 7 weeks.
Miss diana said nothing to me about it.
Well, it's a fact. You can take it from me.
I don't believe she could have done it, though there's no denying she is headstrong.
I should say so.
Why, she gave in her notice the other day over edna.
Who, miss diana?
Yes, but, uh... jinx didn't want to lose her, so edna would've been glad enough to see her go.
Then suddenly... suddenly, last night, she changed, asked if they could make it up.
Diana was puzzled but asked her home to supper.
Now, i can't help feeling now that she had some reason for getting diana here alone.
Of course, perhaps it's been... hot stuff like she is, she thought one of her men was getting too keen on diana baring and wanted her out of the way.
What kind of tea did you use, dear?
Oh, my dear, i've tried so many kinds, i don't really remember which this is.
I'll get the door, right?
Would you mind... open the door, yes, if you don't mind.
Here. I say, i've just made tea.
That's all right, ma.
We'll get some down at the station.
Third act beginners, please.
Your call, miss baring.
That's miss baring's understudy.
There you are, see?
Going on now.
You are answering the door?
Answer the door?
Of course.
You know that.
Well, i don't know where we shall go.
Oh, tom. Tom.
Just a minute.
The inspector would like to have a word with you.
This is mr. Tom druid, inspector.
How do you do, sir?
It's about the murder, mr. Drake.
Now, there are one or two points we're clearing up.
I suppose you didn'’
’t happen to see mrs. Druce and miss baring leave the theatre together last night.
Yes, i did.
As a matter of fact, i remarked to fane, our leading man, about it.
He saw them, as well, you know.
Why? Is it very unusual?
Unusual? I should say so.
Unusual?
It's an absolute miracle.
As i was saying to my wife, i said, "annie, we met..." hold on, old boy. My cue.
Say, which of the 2 women is this?
Mrs. Druid?
Oh. Ha ha ha.
Now, i'm afraid you're unlucky this time, inspector.
This is handel fane,
100% he-woman.
Mr. Fane's our leading man.
I assure you, inspector, i'm not the other woman in the case.
I know that, mr. Fane, but i understand you saw the 2 women together last night.
Yes, just before i left the theatre, then i went straight to my rooms.
Alone?
Yes. Well, ion stewart came with me.
He came and he wanted to borrow some cigarettes.
He'd lost his case or something, and then i went straight to bed.
Say, excuse me, i'm on
Reginald, darling, has that cat gone yet?
Ooh, it's you, cousin yettie.
Don't you dare to try to run away from me.
Come here when i speak to you.
No, no, you don't.
That's the bathroom.
Come here, or are you afraid of a poor, weak woman?
He promised to meet, dear.
N?
Say, who's that ma oh, that's our heavy lead.
Ion stewart.
Very sound actor.
Is he married?
How did he get on with the prisoner?
Excuse me, inspector.
Say, how did he get on with the prisoner miss baring?
So-so, you know?
Was he popular with the ladies?
You talking about the jerk?
He's a bit too popular if you ask me.
Please, if you could call her a lady.
Shh. Now, doucie, remember, she's only just dead.
Oh, all right, all right.
I've never heard yet that telling the truth was a disgrace.
Only been one year about edna and stewart anyhow.
And the way i take it, mr. Stewart and mrs. Druce... excuse me. My line.
Oh! Don't bother to show me through.
I know my way.
This is not the first time, reginald.
Everything's going splendid.
Well, perhaps i ought not to say edna and stewart like that.
But, ted, you know what edna was like, anyone she liked had to be wrote in.
I can't wait any longer.
Quick! In here!
Excuse me a minute, inspector.
Shan't be long.
There's a quick change.
How do you do?
No, i'm sorry.
He's not here.
What have they done with her?
Who, miss baring?
Why, she's down at the station, i expect.
Did she say anything, do you know?
Is there anything i can do?
Markham, you don't really think she's done it, do you?
Why have they arrested her?
Saw it with me own eyes.
She was with the poker in her hand just by her side anyway.
Blood. Covered with blood.
Oh. Don't.
Why, what's the matter with you?
Blood always makes me feel sick, even the mention of it.
Well, that's all right.
Here's your helmet.
Ready?
Yeah.
Yeah.
Hurry up, markham.
There you are.
Ok?
Yeah.
Yeah. Why not?
Members of the jury, diana baring is indicted and stands charge with the willful murder of edna druce.
For this indictment, she has pleaded not guilty.
It is your duty to inquire whether she is guilty or not.
I need not remind you that in the eyes of the law, men and women are equal.
The crime of murder in england, at least, is judged dispassionately.
Neither beauty nor youth nor provocation can mitigate... she gave me the strangest look.
Half-surprised... and half-angry.
And she said, how dare you!
And i don't remember anymore.
I just don't remember.
Whatever i did... must have happened when i was not conscious of myself.
That's all i can say.
Our defense is a complete denial of all responsibility.
E you've been able to observ the behavior of the prisoner in the dock... and in the witness box.
My learned friend has referred to her behavior as hardened.
Gentlemen and ladies of the jury, is there anything so hardy as the behavior of sheer innocence?
If you're convince d that the story of the defense represents the facts of the case, it is your duty to discharge the accused.
I shall like to remind you that truth is often stranger than fiction.
If, on the other hand, you are convinced that the evidence is indeed fiction, then i must tell you in the words of the counsel of the prosecution that neither youth nor beauty nor provocation can be held to mitigate the crime of murder.
Go and consider the facts for yourselves.
Well, uh, ladies and gentlemen,
We can't talk standing would you ladies like to sit together?
Anyway...
Why, i say, may we look?
Yes. I don't see why not.
That is, if the ladies haven't any objection.
No. Not at all.
Now, i think the best thing to do... if you agree... is to allow me to go over the broad facts of the case.
Because after all, i think it's pretty clear and i really don't think it'll be necessary for us to examine all the evidence again in detail.
Now, in the first place, the prosecution.
They say that the girl and the dead woman were on bad terms.
They make it up.
Edna druce comes to supper, they both have a drop too much and begin quarreling about some man.
For instance, you heard how the landlady said that she heard raised voices.
And the girl admits as much but won't give the name of the man.
Now that in itself is fishy.
The girl gets hold of the poker, loses her temper, and there's the end of edna druce.
The prosecution argues that it has proofs.
Practically caught red-handed.
Girl's dress all over blood, the poker at her feet, brandy flask empty, and the girl half-silly.
And in addition to that, no other person was known to have entered the house.
R.
I think that's pretty clea i think you ought to mention that the girl comes of a good family.
Yes, but it's those so-called well-bred people who are able to remain so brazen in the face of a thing like this.
Well, look at the way she behaved in the box.
Half a minute, ladies.
Let's get on.
Now, take the defense.
They don't deny she did it but argue that their case is that the thing happened when... she was in a fit or something.
Surely it is clear to you that in the evidence for the defense the doctor put forward a theory that it was due to the independent activity of the suppressed experience.
In other words, disassociation, which in this particular form is called a fugue.
So that a person displaying the strangest behavior for a considerable period of time would be quite unaware of this when he or she regained normality.
Well, i think the best thing for us all to do is to write down our opinions on a piece of paper, and then we can see how we stand.
Whichever in the minority... can then give their individual reasons and the thing can be worked out that way.
That makes 7 guilty... and 3 not guilty.
There are 2 not in.
I take it you haven't come to any decision at all.
I think the whole business is hateful.
There's too much responsibility put on our shoulders.
Either we've got to let her go free... that's not fair to the rest of the world if she's guilty... or we got to hang her and that's barbarous.
But if we recommend her to mercy.
Mercy? Is that what you call it?
20 years cut out of life.
The best years and to spend them in hell.
Have you ever been inside a prison?
It takes a civilized community to think out a punishment like that.
I think you exaggerate.
It's no use confusing the issue like this.
People who do wrong have got to be punished somehow.
You can't run the world on sentiment.
No, but that's what we've tried to do.
Save the unfit.
Get more children and make glorious wars to be rid of.
The whole world's a reeking pit of sentiment.
Your verdict, mr. Shackleton.
Guilty, i suppose.
Who's the other one?
You, mr. Matthews?
Is there anything special troubling you so that you can't make a decision?
Uh... no.
What is it prevents you from making a decision?
Well, nothing really.
Uh, well, uh... have you made up your mind at all what it's going to be?
Uh... no.
You heard the case for the prosecution.
That's pretty clear, isn't it?
Uh, yes.
And you know what the defense is, don't you?
Yes, but i, uh... don't quite understand what the lady meant when, uh... when she said no.
When, uh... when she spoke.
My dear man, mrs. Ward was only trying to tell you that the defense was that murder was committed in a fit of daytime sleep walking.
Yes. But, uh... the murder took place at nighttime.
Can you write?
Huh? Yes.
Well, will you please write down on a piece of paper whether you think the prisoner guilty or not?
Now that leaves only 3 for not guilty.
I'll give you my reaso ns for not guilty.
The evidence for the defense by the doctor is to my mind conclusive.
Anyone who's followed the modern trend of pscyhological investigations must be aware that any person suffering from severe mental strain, such as the prisoner may have been following on so many rehearsals and things, may bring about a sudden condition in which the patient is no longer either conscious of or responsible for their actions.
We've already had evidence that the prisoner's mind is a delicately balanced one and quite liable through some hidden flaw in that mind to become deprived of all consciousness and readily enter into a state wherein the body is still functioning, though no longer under the control of the will.
And it is on these grounds, that i feel that diana baring must have been the victim of circumstance.
I have no doubt that mrs. Ward is right.
That being the case, it is quite liable to recur, possibly with the same results.
Well, that's a point i hadn't considered.
Well, it's really important.
Because with this poor gal, you have to consider not only this one tragedy but others that may follow it.
There may be other crimes lying latent in her.
You mean, there's a sort of dual personality in her.
One of these persons is violent and cruel and the other, just an ordinary woman.
Of course.
If we set this bad personality free, we must be prepared to show her the responsibility.
Yes.
If we let her go and anything should happen... the blood would be on our hands.
Do you wish to alter your verdict, mrs. Ward? , now, mr. Daniels... after all you've heard does your opinion still remain the same?
Well, you know, i find it very difficult to believe that a girl of that sort should do such a thing.
After all, she looks perfectly riveting, you know.
Well, you know what i mean?
A sort of girl one would like for a daughter.
I presume, sir, that an ugly woman would stand very little chance at your hand.
The thing you've got to decide, mr. Daniels, has nothing to do with the qualities of the young lady as they appeal to you.
Yes, of course.
I know that.
But, that's all, well, you know what i mean.
It's... it's pretty awful and all that sort of thing. , besides the thing you're thinking of t?
What's your verdic well... well... oh... guilty, i suppose.
Well, now we're practically complete.
There's just sir john.
Well, don't dismiss me as easily at that, mr. Foreman.
G.
Yes? We mustn't be lon time is money, you know?
Time in this case, may i remind you, is life.
If i'm delaying you all, i apologize.
I admit that i am not... a man of business.
I'm a poor actor.
Oh, come now, dear sir john.
I repeat... the poorest of poor players.
And my time on the stage will be shortened had i not for years trained myself to... how shall i put it... to apply the technique of life... to the problems of my art.
But today, ladies and gentlemen, that process is reversed.
I find myself applying the technique of my art to a problem of real life.
And my art is not satisfied.
In the first place, i am fairly convinced that diana baring was telling the truth when she said she remembered nothing.
In fact, i have been impressed by her behavior all through the trial.
But my dear sir!
Oh, i say, sir john.
Oh, please don't think i'm taking the same line as our friend mr. Daniels here.
He made a very gallant attempt, but i assure you my reasoning goes a little deeper.
I am convinced further that she was again telling the truth when she said she had drunk no brandy.
Buy you've forgotten the evidence of the police sargant.
He said she smelled of drink and appeared dazed on arrest.
How do you know that was not the wine she had at dinner?
What about the evidence of markham, the stage manager?
He found the empty brandy flask right on the spot.
Yes, but... what about the evidence of the actor, stewart?
He said the women had been enemies for some time.
Ah, he was the one who said prisoner was rough to mrs. Druce on the stage once.
All pointing to her violent nature, sir john.
Yes, but that was not altogether borne out by fame.
You know, the, um... well, the female impersonator man.
But his evidence was of little use.
He was so obviously in love with the prisoner.
In any case, everything was perfectly clear when the body was discovered.
Why, the woman was actually caught in the room red-handed.
And found with a poker by her side.
And her dress all over blood.
And quarrelling over a man.
That's right.
Any answer to that, sir john?
Think of her personality.
She's not the kind of girl to get drunk.
Brandy in the flask, was there?
She doesn't deny it.
That's right.
Any answer to that, sir john?
Not at the moment.
Then there is the question, was there anyone entered the house that night?
Landlady says not.
Girl says not.
They were alone.
That's right.
Any answer to that, sir john?
Not at the moment.
But have we taken it too much for granted that no one else could've done the murder?
They were alone.
Says they quarelled.
Admits it.
That's right.
Any answer to that, sir john?
She does not admit it.
She says she doesn't remember.
Is that a guilty woman's answer?
Red-handed.
And her dress all over blood.
Make an exhibition of yourself.
Waste of time, waste of money.
Quarelling.
Hands all over blood.
Any answer?
Any answer?
Any answer to that, sir john?
Well, now that we've all agreed on our verdict, i can inform the judge that we're ready.
Stand up.
Ladies and gentlemen of the jury, have you agreed upon your verdict?
And do you find the prisoner guilty or not guilty?
Guilty.
Diana baring, have you anything to say?
My sentence of death should now be passed upon you according to law.
It's absurd, i tell you.
It's absolutely absurd.
? Oh, yes, oh, yes, oh, yes?
Praise silence, all of you, on the pain of imprisonment while sentence of death is passed upon the prisoner at the bar.
So the conference adjourned until tomorrow.
The baring murder trial came to a conclusion today with a verdict of guilty, and sentence of death was passed on diana baring.
And that is all the news.
But here is an s.o.s., which has just been brought into the studio.
We've been asked by th e commissioner of police to broadcast the following... will anyone... brandy cocktail you ordered, sir.
Right.
Ring up mr. Bennett, will you?
And ask him to bring around details details of the particulars for the last 3 nights.
For the last 3 nights.
Also, plan on looking at the flask.
Very good, sir john.
Kindly communicate at once with news cup in jar to telephone victoria 7000 or with any police station.
This is the national program.
Our concert tonight is an orchestral one, given by the radio symphony orchestra.
They start by playing the overture totristan und isolde by wagner.
Funny that s.o.s.
Coming on top of that other.
Save her soul.
Save her.
If i'd stood up longer, i might have worn them down.
Why couldn't they see the girl as i did... the rest of the fellows on the jury.
But anyone standing in the dark on a charge like that... probably looks different from the same person somewhere else.
Ah, amusing the way she stood up to everybody.
There's no doubt that did her a lot of harm.
Yet, it was that manner of hers that... very attractive i thought.
And i wonder what her feelings are now.
Who drank that brandy?!
Why didn't i force that point home to them?
Easy to figure these things out afterwards.
The girl said she didn't drink it.
Yet she admits she might have killed edna druce.
That's queer.
Why admit a big thing like that and yet be sure she didn't do a small thing such as drink a drop of brandy?
All that came to light to me today.
I'm sure i was right when i raised that.
Quite frankly, more certain now.
How do we know that someone else didn't drink the brandy?
Perhaps there was someone else, that's the whole thing.
Whoever drank that brandy!
Mr. Bennett has come up to see you, sir john.
Sir bennett.
Glad you're back, sir john.
Been reading about it all.
Plenty of publicity.
Been awful for you, though.
You having met days before.
Well, she wanted to become a star, a year ago that was.
I suppose you can say in a sense that she has.
A star in a murder... bennett, please.
Look here.
Get hold of my understudy.
Tell him he has to go on again tonight.
Pray god that i give him a better role.
Oh, and, um... get on the telephone straight away to my lawyer, mr. Vice senior.
Oh, i can give it to you.
Temple bar.
Yes.
I want you, as well, to get hold of as many as you can of the members of that company.
You know, the touring company at the time of the murder.
In particular, the, um... funny little man, the stage manager.
I forget his name.
I'll see him at the office in the morning.
Temple bar,
5, double 9, 3.
But i thought the trial was over, sir john.
No, my dear, bennett, the trial is not over, by a hell of a long way.
Well... is it conscience, sir john?
Conscience.
A lying man's conscience.
Oh, they're... they're engaged, sir.
Ok. I'll try later.
Don't wait.
I am.
No, don't wait. Go.
Diana baring... why did i send her away?
Told her it'd be good for her to gain experience in the providence.
Good for her.
And now she's come back.
Uh... i think, uh... boiling it all down, dear, i think perhaps we better, uh... accept sir john's offer after all, don't you?
Oh, yes.
Either that one e. Or one of the other
2. It's all the same to m
That would be sir john himself.
I don't think.
Oh, well.
Seems she won't let us stay on here any longer.
That means lucy will have to go back to her aunt's... oh, i mean, uh... sophie will have to go back to her aunt lucy.
I don't want to go back to aunt lucy.
I want to go on tour with you.
I can't let you go back to sir john's.
Here's a letter.
I really thought you were kidding me, i really did.
What is this?
Ooh. It's from sir john himself.
He'd be happy if we could be in his office at 12:00.
Do you think we could get there in time today?
If we try.
I'll turn the kettle off.
This just needs a little benzine.
Dear, i don't think... petrol will get the shine out of this suit.
I'll say! There' s a job for you!
Look sharper.
I think it must be an ankie.
Yeah. I think so somewhere.
Ted?
Yes, dear?
What have you done with me nail polish?
I haven't seen it.
Here.
Hope this... hope this smell of petrol goes off.
Oh, well, you can blame it onto the car.
I think we shall just about do it.
Actually, my dear, it won't be.
Oh, that's all right, missus.
I promise you your bill shall be paid the first.
I'm not referring to bills.
It's druce i'm after
2-6 to the first 10.
All right. We'll see.
How do you do, mr. Markham?
Nice.
Thanks, sir john.
Ohh. How do you do, sir john?
Won't you sit down?
Thank you.
You know, it seems to me, mr. Markham, that we as artists have a double function.
We use life to create art and we use art to, how shall i put it... to criticize life.
You agree?
Oh, certain, mr. John.
Uhh!
Yes. I knew you would.
Now, mr. Markham, between artists... ahem.
Do we always fulfill our double function?
Are we not so much occupied in using life to create art that we forget our other function?
I foresee your objection.
You're going to say, what opportunities does the round of daily life offer?
I wonder if... if you ever saw a problem play i once did.
Pistols for two.
Oh, yes.
You did.
Yes.
What the critics describe as a high-brow shocker.
Now... when a high-brow shocker occurs in real life, does the public call in the actor?
No.
Uh... mr. Markham, i read your thoughts.
You know, you're saying to yourself, this man is, um, talking to his hat.
Oh, no.
Oh, of course you are.
Otherwise, you wouldn't be the practical man i take you for.
You're also wondering to yourself, why on earth i've brought you here.
Well... that brings me at last... to my object.
Now... yesterday and the day before, i was on the jury at the baring trial.
You impressed me both as an artist and as a man.
Ooh.
By the way you gave your evidence.
Now, i want from you, if i'm not being too indiscrete... oh, no.
The inner history of that case.
Oh, what is it that, uh... see, now, of course, um... bennett talked over with you the question of that engagement?
No, sir.
You see, we'd rather, uh... rather hoped that you'd be free to take on the stage management when i send off this tour at christmas ofthe green eye.
Whew.
I also thought of working out some arrangement of a yearly basis, but we could easily talk that over later with bennett, can't we?
Oh. Thank you very much indeed, sir john.
I, uh... well, i am free at the moment.
And i've had a lot of experience that i'm sure will come in very handy.
Then that's settled, huh?
Uh, yes.
What? What is it, mr. Markham?
Well, it's my wife, sir john.
You see, we've always been joint, as you may say and, uh... well, would it be asking too much, sir john, if a part, i mean, any part that you... ohh. I see.
Mrs. Markham acts.
Acts, sir john?
Heh. Well, uh... perhaps it's not for me to say, but... but my doucie... well, you may say i'm prejudiced, sir john, but i've been stage manager now for 10 years, and it is a fact that a wife, even a good one, is not always the right thing to have in a company, if you understand what i'm getting at, but my doucie, my wife, she's... well, professionally, she's been my right hand.
And there's no one she can't play 24 hours' notice.
All ladies.
From a gladys cooper to a molly lloyd part.
Has she ever... she has her... oh, but... no, no, no.
Go on. Do.
I was going to say she has her off days, of course.
Well, who hasn't?
Yes. I mean, only last summer i had to speak to her seriously about it.
She had a quick change-over from a barmaid to a salvation army lass.
And it told on her, there's no doubt about it, it told on her.
After about a week, i said to her straight out, now look here, my dear, this can't go on.
If you can't pull yourself together, we shall have to go into shakespeare.
Well, she didn't say much.
Not one that was reasonable.
But she thought it over.
And for the rest of that tour i'll give you my word, sir john, she was tallulah.
Pure tallulah.
Where is mrs. Markham now?
She's downstairs waiting in the... oh. One minute then.
Let's send for her to come up.
What, is that you, bennett?
Oh, no, no. I'm sorry. No.
Wait.
Hello, bennett, mrs. Markham is somewhere downstairs.
Would you have her sent up, please?
Yes. Yes, of course.
Up to my room.
Now, mr. Markham... about this trial... i confess to feeling very uneasy about it.
You see, i played a part in the thing, the part of a juryman.
And it was not until the curtain was rung down on the death sentence, that i said to myself... this is not a play, this is life.
Life can be less kind than your dramatists, mr. Markham.
Life permits a beautiful and unfortunate girl to go to the gallows.
Unless... art for once can bring its technique to bear.
Good lord, do you mean to say you think she's... innocent, my dear markham, yes.
It was assumed she was guilty because she couldn'’
’t deny it.
Yes, but i saw the... what did you see?
Diana baring sitting beside the dead body.
She was dazed you say.
What was the cause? Drink?
She hardly ever touched anything.
And who did? Think it over, mr. Markham.
Then there was the pain in her head.
Was she examined by a doctor?
Might he not have found traces of a blow if he'd examined her?
But no, he didn't.
He assumed like everyone else that she was guilty because she didn't deny it.
And there was no private investigation, no inquiry, think it over, mr. Markham.
You know, i feel the most terrible responsibility.
I was one of the 12 people who decided the fate of this poor girl.
I'd found myself caught up with the machine that...
That makes these things... ah, mrs. Markham, so good of you to come with your husband this morning.
Oh, i was quite glad, glad as a breath of fresh air.
Ohh. What a charming place you have up here, sir john.
And piccadilly, with all the shops so near.
You'll, um... you'll stay to lunch, of course.
Ohh!
You know, i must confess, i find it difficult sometimes to wait to a reasonable hour for my luncheon.
Yes, i must say, i feel the same way myself.
It's very rare that i can do without my little tidbits in the morning...
Oh, javier, a cocktail at once, please, and serve lunch. hey.
He's engaged us to see him.
Joint.
No.
Yes. I find mr. Markham is free to join me.
So... please.
So i thought he could, um... oh, we can settle all that later, can't we? Yes, please.
Thank you.
Oh, thank you.
Oh, one more, please.
In the meantime, success to our researches.
Your husband and i have been discussing the baring case.
And we feel that if the murder were approached from another angle, it... oh, sorry.
We shall be able to arrive at a different result.
What?
What? And get diana off you mean?
But she can't get away from that poker.
If you don't share our convictions that miss baring is not guilty...
Well... well, i mean to say diana baring was such a nice girl.
I never thought for one moment she could've done a thing like that.
Didn't i always say, ted, that anybody who knew her never could've thought it for one moment?
Oh, sir john, have you found anything out?
Are you going to take it up yourself?
Oh, we would be so glad to help, wouldn't we, ted?
Shall we now?
I really don't kno w where to begin this thing, do you, markham?
Well, uh... well, yes, sir john.
Oh, i see. Uh... oops.
Yes. I wish i knew where to begin.
Here.
Yes, can i help you there?
Sir john didn't know where to begin, ted.
Huh?
No, no. Let's hear it, mrs. Markham.
See, i'm completely in the dark.
If your husband could show the way, i shall be more than grateful.
Go on.
What is it, markham?
Well, sir john... i should say the best place would be the back of the town where the murder was committed.
Yes. Do you think you could spare me a day or two of your time?
Why, yes, of course we could, sir.
See, if i might suggest that we could go over the ground and you could show me one or two places connected with the murder.
But, you mean, it might have been someone else altogether, what killed edna druce?
Well, i don't know.
It might've been somebody from outside.
How do you make that out?
Well, i don't know.
Miss mitcham didn't do it.
And miss diana didn't.
So it must've been somebody from outside.
If it was, they'd have to get in.
And they'd have to get out again.
Heh. That's clever well, all i can say is... the first thing we got to do is to find out who saw somebody, apart from druce, anywhere near there at half-past one that morning.
Well, ted, for start, there's that chap we thought was the policeman coming around the corner.
Oh, that was nothing.
Just a minute.
I shall like to hear something about this policeman.
Well, you see, sir john, it was like this... only after the murder, when the knocking woke us up, i was over by the window slipping on my negligee, and i popped my head out of the window to see who it was making all that noise.
And i saw the policeman coming around the corner.
So i said to ted, i said, hey, it's the police.
And then i took my eyes off him to tell ted here... and when i looked again, there was no one in sight.
And then ted said, yes, you're right.
Here he comes.
And when i looked again, it was a different policeman altogether.
What had become of the first one?
I have no idea, sir.
He must have turned the corner and come back.
Is that the corner down there?
Yes, that's it, sir.
N? You're sure it wasn't the same ma well, it couldn't have been.
We only took our eyes off of him about 2 seconds.
Oh, blast.
Uh... is there anymore here do you think, sir?
I shouldn't think so.
My god, that's druce.
He must be crazy.
Yeah, we better get down.
You are not going in my house.
Take him away, please.
He's done this before.
Please, promise to stop it.
Yes, that's all right.
Now come along, druce.
My wife's... yes, i know.
But you're muc h better at home.
Come on.
Come on now.
Oh, this is terrible for me this business is.
I shall have to move.
I'm sure i shall.
Yes. Well, uh... mrs. Mitcham, we'd like to show this gentleman around.
That is, if you don't mind.
May i?
Oh. Yes, sir.
Of course.
Yes. Certainly.
Will you come in?
Well, sir john, that's where they found the body.
Right in front of the hearth there.
And, uh... miss baring was sitting just about there.
Oh, by the way, did you ever get your poker back, miss... oh, i can't bear to talk about it, especially with poor miss baring being where she is.
Why, you might as well convict cleopatra.
You think anybody could've got in from the back of the house?
You see just beyond the backyard y, there's an alleywa and just beyond there e.
There's the theatr and look, sir, the dressing rooms are off the back.
Yes, it would take quite an athlete to get in that way.
I don't see how anyone could get in here with this aspedstria filling up the window.
Anyway, without upsetting it, and look at the size of it.
Yes. It's a fine plant.
Unless, of course, it was somebody who knew the room.
But miss baring did not have any visitors, only mrs. Markham every now and again, and mr. Fane and mr. Stewart to tea and mister... what's his name... the little man with the squeaky voice.
Oh, tom druid.
Yes. Yes, that's him.
Squeaky voice, that reminds me.
In your evidence, miss mitcham, you said you had heard angry women's voices.
Yes, sir, i did.
Would you swear to that?
E. Oh, yes, sir. You can' t mistake a woman's voic you know, i had known a contralto... oh, yes, but this was high, quite high. miss mitcham.
Miss mitcham.
Oh, my god, miss mitcham.
Where are you?
The kitchen chimney's on fire, miss mitcham!
That's alice.
One moment, miss mitcham.
Excuse me, sir.
I can't stop just now.
That alice of mine has set the kitchen chimney on fire.
Didn't you hear her calling?
No, no, no.
That was me.
Or did i... you know, markham, i never know.
I'm ashamed to say, i played a trick on you, miss mitcham.
Now, the high voice you heard that night may not have been a woman's.
You've just admitted it.
No. I have not admitted anything.
And i don't hold to playing such tricks.
And i'd like to ask you, sir, what you mean by it.
And you, too, mr. Markham.
Standing there, grinning.
You realize that your evidence as it stands may hang miss baring?
Ohh!
Now, i'm not blaming you.
Not blaming you, miss mitcham.
But you swore that you heard women's voices calling.
And i have to prove to them that it might have been a man's voice, especially a high-pitched man's voice... just like mr. Druid's.
Ohh! I'd do anything for miss baring.
Oh, can't something be done now?
Yes, yes. Now you're going to help us further.
First of all, could you show us some more of the house?
Miss baring's bedroom, for example?
Yes. Certainly, sir.
This way, please.
I don't think you'll find much in here, sir.
There's a few of her things over there on the windowsill.
I didn't like to send them to where she is now.
Oh, i think she'd like them.
Well, let me have them and i'll send them on.
Why, it's one of you, sir.
Uh... lot more places to go to, sir john.
Thank you.
Thank you very much indeed.
Thank you.
Thank you very much.
Yes. Lot more places, sir john.
There's the stage door and then we'll go roun d to stewart's lodgings and then we might go along to the police station, have a chat with the inspector.
He knows me.
And then, um... well, then we can go across the red lion, g have a sandwich while we're talkin to joe the proprieter.
And then... ooh, and then there's stevens, if the policeman's still on his beat.
Yes, i think that' s about all we can do.
Oh, yes, we'll fin d out something if it takes us all night.
I thought perhaps, um... a little dinner... oh. Oh, that's all right, sir john.
Don't you worry about doucie and me.
We've had to go without before, didn't we, dear?
Oh, i should say.
Well, shall we begin, sir john? This way.
Evening, mate.
I've come to see if any of my people left anything behind.
No, nothing, except that there broken basin in number 4 dressing room.
That was some of your chaps after they left.
They never paid for it neither.
Whose room was that?
Uh, fane's and stewart's , i believe, sir.
No, none of our people broke that, mate.
Oh, there is something for you.
This cigarette case left behind in number 4.
You'll know who it belong to.
Oh, righto. When i find out who it is, i'll forward it.
Can we see that dressing room?
Uh, i'd like to see that broken basin.
I'll take you long where does that window look out to?
The private houses round the corner.
I wish i knew who broke that basin.
Lot more places to go to, sir john.
Thank you, mate.
Good day.
Did you find anything?
No, nothing much.
Oh, honestly.
Well, here we are, sir john.
And, uh, i hope you sleep well.
I expect you'll find she's left something cold out for you.
I'll be along first thing in the morning.
I'm awfully sorry but... get to bed myself.
I must say, this street gives me the creeps.
Well, good night, sir john.
Come along, dear.
I say, markham.
Markham... you don't think that i'd better eat at the red lion after all, do you?
Well, that's, uh... just as you like, of course, sir john, but, uh... i thought you wanted to sleep se at the policeman's hou so as to be able to find out something.
I mean, that's why i made the arrangements.
I mean... considering we haven't found out very much today, i think that... it'd be better if you did, sir.
Perhaps you're right.
Good night, mrs. Markham.
Oh, good night, sir john.
Excuse me, sir.
Be quiet.
You, too, children.
Take it.
Ohh.
We mustn't play on the bed.
Sir, shall i pull over the table?
Leave them things be!
Oh, please, don't trouble.
Just put the plate on somewhere.
I'll, uh... i'll see to it.
I'll dress first.
Oh, don't say that, sir.
I know what you gents like.
"A nice cup of tea and a kipper before i get up.
And i'm a new man."
That's what my last lodger used to say.
Stop playing on that bed!
Damn children.
They follow me about.
Ma this and ma that.
On my word, i don't have a moment's peace morning or night.
What do you two be doing?
That's quite all right, really.
He's got my bootsy well, i never did.
Wait till i get you downstairs.
Take this kitten down and don't you bring it up here again.
Now, please, if you could put this plate on the table and bring up some hot water at once, i'll get up.
Just as you like, sir, but...
Now, go downstairs and get the water on. Go on.
Now, why can't you leave him be?
Time and time again, i've told them not to mess with the lodger's luggage.
I'll have your father take you to the police station if you can't stop touching.
They do keep on touching.
Some lodgers don't like it.
Princeton, i had a couple a little while back and one of them give them a good clip for doing that.
You know the baring case?
Well, they was in it.
As a matter of fact, it was my husband what found the body.
He was part of the baring case. ohh.
Well, i never.
Ha ha! She's taken a fancy to you.
There ain't many she takes to.
You're not coming around now, i suppose.
Yes, oh, yes.
You were saying... about hopping on the luggage... oh, yes. Well, arthur was messing about with one of them's luggage when he come across what he thought was his father's helmet and uniform.
Afterwards, i went up.
Mr. Fane, it was.
And i said i don't like the idea of having this in my home.
Just because he had a uniform in the bag he only thought it was his father' s outfit.
I felt a bit of a fool when i finished because he simply turned around and he said i didn't know what i was talking about.
Well, i said if it wasn't you, it must have been the other one who was here... mr. Stewart.
I spoke to mr. Stewart afterwards but in the excitement of the murder i forgot all about it.
Come in, my dear markham.
I thought i'd drop by, miss.
I'll send the water up, sir.
Come along, now, come along.
Don't encourage her too much, sir. That's right.
Run along down.
Here, arthur.
Just come on, come on.
Now go in the street and play.
Don't you get run over. Go on.
That's right, go on.
Doucie and me found out something, sir john.
Won't you sit down?
Thanks.
You know that cigarette case you found in the theatre?
Well, last night i went to smoke in bed just before i went off, you see?
So i took out that case.
Doucie saw it wasn't mine.
Said, i've seen it before somewhere.
I said, whose is it?
She said stewart's.
And then she took it, she noticed what i thought was a beer stain on it... she says, wait a minute.
That's blood on it.
And sure enough. Well, look, see for yourself, sir john. Look.
I believe you're right stewart.
Who wore a policeman's uniform in the past who lived here?
Fane and stewart, sir.
Stewart had a quick change-over with fane in the third act.
But fane had a special uniform made to fit him so we had 2 uniforms in the company, sir john.
You're an important factor in this case, markham.
In fact, most important at the moment.
Well, uh... well, if it helps, sir john.
No, the most important factor seems to be a policeman whom you did not see on the night of the murder.
You remember your wife saw a policeman coming down the street.
You went to the window and you couldn't see one.
Then suddenly there was a policeman.
Now, markham... that policeman was
2 different people.
And for all we know... the first one was not a member of the county constabulary.
You mean, the first one was a fake, sir?
A chap in policeman's clothes?
Our next job is to find out the name of the man miss baring withheld.
Was he a member of the company?
Did he wear a policeman's uniform?
If she still refuses to give the name... perhaps the cigarette case will help her to remember.
You mean, the name of the man they were calling about on the night of the murder?
This end, please.
Won't you sit down?
Oh.
Thank you.
It's very good of you to have come.
But i can't help saying... i'm extremely surprised.
Well, you see, i... naturally, i... i've taken a very grea t interest in your case.
Don't let's talk about it.
How's your play going?
Oh... pretty fair.
Of course you know i was away from it some time because i was on the jury of your trial.
I know.
I wondered... my countryhouse is in that district.
As you know, i can't discuss with you what happened on the jury... but i do want to tell you... is muriel heatherly still playing the lead with you?
Yes.
I do think she's such a good actress.
Don't you?
Miss baring... you remember our meeting?
Oh, yes.
You do remember.
Of course.
Very well.
You see... if i hadn't sent you away on tour to get experience... you wouldn't be in this position now.
That's, in a way, why i feel... sort of... responsibility.
That's why i've come there might be... there must be some grounds for an appeal.
I knew that would happen.
I knew someone would try and get me off and think they were doing me a kindness.
Imprisonment for life.
Why, a week of it's nearly driven me crazy.
If they want to do the other thing... they can.
I thought it and got over it.
Except at night... it'll be no worse than the dentist.
And if i have done this thing, as they say i have, i'm better out of the way.
As for the other thing, if you're a friend to me, you couldn't do it.
Lock yourself up in your own room... for one day.
Only for one day and see.
Tell me what i want to know, i'll have you out of here altogether.
What is that?
I can tell you.
Tell me the name of the man discussed by you and edna druce.
I've said so many times before.
He has no connection with the case.
Besides, i didn't quarrel.
I'll tell you now.
Edna druce tried to say poisonous things about him.
And i just put my fingers in my ears and kept them there.
So that you actually couldn't hear a sound.
You couldn't have hear d of any other person that had come into the room.
No. I suppose i couldn't.
Why wouldn't you listen to her?
Because... i knew what edna was trying to tell me.
What was she trying to tell you?
I can't answer that.
It involved... somebody else.
Plenty of other people have been involved in this case.
Markham, stewart, druce... fane.
Why shouldn't this one man's name be known?
There was something... something he daren't have known.
But which you knew.
Yes.
What was it?
You realize what you're admitting by your silence?
You're shielding this man because you know you'r e in love with him.
Oh, but that's impossible.
Impossible? Why should it be impossible?
I see no reason why it should be impossible.
Why, the man's a half-caste.
What's that?
What did you say?
A half-caste?
Black blood.
Why haven't you said so much?
Tell me the rest.
What was his name?
I won't tell you that.
Ever.
Will this help you to remember the name of the man you were quarelling about?
Stewart's cigarette case?
That's not one of stewart's things.
Things?
You mustn't give the prisoner anything here, sir.
And the time for the interview has nearly ended, sir.
Oh, sir john.
Please.
For these last few moments, let's talk about something else.
Yes.
There was a photograph of me in your room.
How did you know?
I went there to make inquiries.
How did you come to get it?
I've always been keen on the stage ever since i was a little girl.
One has one's heroes.
That's why i came to you for a job.
And i sent you away.
Oh, let's talk some more quickly.
Diana, i... miss mitcham sent me some of my things.
Your photograph with them.
I've got it in my cell now they let us keep some... come. Time's up please.
Good-bye.
I'm going to find fane.
Handel fane.
Handel fane.
Handel fane.
Handel fane?
What's become of handel fane?
Any news of fane yet, markham?
Not yet, sir john.
I'm trying some more of the agents though.
Haven't you found fane yet, ted?
I can't bear the suspense.
We shall be up all night, you know.
Oh, for god's sake.
Hello? Hello?
Hello? Is that lambersee agents?
Yes. You found fane yet?
He's wanted for an important job, you know.
Yes, at once.
What's that?
Gone back to his old job?
What? Trapeeze artist?
Under what name?
Where?
No, can't stop now.
Got him at last.
Yes, that's him all right.
Dressed up as a woman, eh?
Always was good at that.
An extremely clever way of hiding.
Markham?
Yes, sir?
I've an idea.
You know yourhamlet?
Every line of it, sir.
Then let me suggest for your consideration the series of events embodied in act 3, scene 2.
That's the play scene, isn't it, sir?
Yes. The play scene.
Do you remember the title... the mousetrap?
Yes.
Well, when he comes to my theatre to read a part i shall offer him, s.
There'll be 3 of u
2 cats to one mouse.
Yes, but what about the cheese, sir?
The cheese, yes.
The cheese will be a fat part, markham.
A villain's part in the blood and thunder in a play that i'm going t o write especially for him.
A play based on a recent well-known murder case.
I imagine he will play his part, as i hope we shall convince him... to the life.
Come in.
Can you give me a minute?
Certainly.
Oh. Who is that you have with you?
Of course, i remember.
This is the gentleman you suggested.
Yes, sir john.
Mr. Handel fane.
Oh, yes.
Do come in?
How do you do?
How do you do?
Sit down.
Here you are.
Oh, thank you.
Oh.
Thank you.
No, bennett, don't go.
I may need you.
You see, i always conduct these interviews so badly, i'm just as likely as not to leave out the really important points.
Now, i suppose i better begin by an explanation.
I dare say mr. Bennett has told you the author of the play?
No, sir john.
I understand you wish that to be kept a secret for the time being.
Well, i wrote the play.
That was a simple matter, but it's proving astonishingly difficult to find the right person for one particular part.
Might i ask you to stand up for one moment?
Of course.
You know, bennett, he looks it.
He looks it quite perfectly.
Exactly what i've been thinking, sir john.
Would you mind... oh, sit down, do.
Would you mind reading one or 2 lines?
You know, just to give me some idea?
Of course.
Oh, i say, bennett, this is quite illegible.
Tell... what's his name... baldwin to bring me a clean copy of act 3.
Thank you.
Sir john?
Might i ask you... what kind of play is this exactly?
Well, you may question my taste, but as an artist, you'll understand my temptation.
My subject, mr. Fane, is the inner history of the baring case.
Ohh. Thank you.
Really? Your... your indifference astonishes me.
Aren't i right in thinking that you were a member of the druce company at the time?
Yes, that is so.
Then you knew both women concerned.
Yes, i knew them both quite well.
Now, let's begin.
Oh, by the way, mr. Fane, i understand you're appearing at present at the circus.
Would that interfere?
No, it was my old job, it and i've gone back to because times have been a little difficult and... ng however, i understand you wouldn't be starti for 2 or 3 weeks.
No, i don't suppose so, no.
Let me give you... some idea of the scene.
Here is a table in front of a fireplace, more or less a visage.
On the table there's the remains of a meal.
And, of course, the brandy flask.
You know, mr. Fane, of course, you know all the details of the case. i can't help wondering why nothing spectacular developed in connection with the brandy.
Thinking as a dramatist, i can't help feeling that the brandy was not exploited with sufficient imagination.
Then, of course, the law has no sense of drama, has it?
No.
No.
Then again, let me see.
I'm afraid l... i thought it best to begin from a point just before the actual murder.
There's a short scene between the 2 women... which turns into a quarrel.
In the middle of it, you make your entrance, on the words... i got this from the evidence... on the words...
"friends? I can tell you things about your friends that you don't know."
Just carry on from that point, would you?
Now, how on earth did you know the entrance was from the window?
That's highly clever.
And look, mr. Fane, you've forgotten your script.
The script.
Now, where are we?
Ah, yes.
"Friends? I can tell you things..." wouldn't it be better if i were to pick up the poker from the back fireplace before i made the entrance to the room?
Excellent idea.
I'll put that in.
Thank you.
May i have the poker?
No, i'm terribly sorry we only have electric fires here.
Would this pencil do?
Very well.
We must get on without the poker.
You can use your imagination, eh?
Now then... through the window, into the room.
You creep through the double doors.
The 2 women are facing each other.
You come slowly around, taking care not to be heard and gradually you approach the one whose back is to you.
Now, you raise the poker that is in your hand as the other woman says...
"you fool! Don't you know that he's a half..." what a pity, sir john.
The scene isn't finished.
I was getting quite worked up to it.
I thought perhaps... mr. Fane... you might be able to collaborate with us.
I'm so sorry, sir john.
I'm afraid i understand so little about playwriting.
Perhaps later on... when the script is finished... you'll allow me to giv e you another reading.
Find out what time fane comes on tonight.
I shan't be...
How do you do, sir john?
Markham.
Who'd have thought of seeing you here?
Well, you see, i'm, uh... i'm working fo r sir john now.
Yes. Mr. Markham is helping me with my new play.
I suppose you find brandy steadying for the nerves?
Mine's very nerving work, you see, sir john?
You never know what may happen.
Hurry up. You're next.
I presume you've come to talk to me about... that part again, sir john.
R. You know perfectly well what i've come here fo
Hurry up, fane.
There'll be a wait if you're not careful.
If it isn't... how are you, sir john?
Come to see the show?
No, not exactly.
I've really come to see mr. Fane.
Sir john, if you wouldn't mind coming down to see me after my act, i shall only be too pleased to talk over that little matter we were discussing.
For god's sakes, play something!
Uh... fane says he has decided to colloborate in my play after all.
He says...
"the 2 women are standing
"facing each other in dead silence.
"They are so lost in the tension of the moment
"that they do not hear the murderer creep through
"the double doors into the room.
"The murdered woman is at that instant
"going to speak.
"The murderer springs forward.
"He hurls the first woman aside.
"She is stunned by the fall,
"but he doesn't notice it.
"Infuriated,
"he strikes out at the other woman
"with the poker.
"She falls by the fireplace,
"she's dead.
"He nearly faints at the sight of the blood.
"He drinks the brandy,
"then he sees the other woman beginning to stir.
"He must get away...
"through the back window.
"A leap or two.
Finally, a climb into the theatre dressing room."
That accounts for the broken basin.
"But how to get home undetected from the theatre.
"An idea.
The policeman's unifor m he wore on the stage."
There's your policeman , markham.
"He walks home a murderer.
"A murderer on an impulse.
"The silence of the mouth of a woman
"who knew his secret and was going to reveal it
"to the woman he dared to love.
There's a melodrama for you, sir john."
Well, markham... you have it all.
Poor devil.
And diana baring... she knew all the time... he was a half-caste.
Captioning made possible by lions gate entertainment
Well, my friend, this is an unexpected pleasure.
- Come in.
- Thank you.
How do you do?
I wouldn't disturb you, but the friend I spoke to you about... is leaving town tomorrow to supervise some new excavations in Egypt.
He was most anxious to see your collection before going away.
- May I present Mr. Galatalin.
- Why, this is a great pleasure.
I've heard so much about you.
How do you do?
Follow me, gentlemen.
My children would become conceited that so distinguished a critic... has thought them interesting enough to review.
Splendid.
Joan of Arc. Beautiful.
It's a pity to race through such an exhibition.
And here is Voltaire.
One might almost expect him to speak.
I wonder what he'd say after all these years.
You would be astonished.
He is more difficult now, to those in authority, than even the records show.
He is a very stubborn person, I assure you.
- Stubborn?
- Unbelievably.
For days I argued with this fellow... before getting him just as I wanted.
But always, I triumphed.
And few people triumphed over Monsieur Voltaire.
And here, gentlemen....
Here is something that pleases me... although of no historic importance.
It was done because
I love to model children.
Note, gentlemen, the line of the shoulder and--
You have no right to hide such genius in a side-street museum.
You are very gracious.
These things have some merit,
I suspect, but this....
Will you come this way, gentlemen, please?
This, I'm convinced, is fine.
- Marie Antoinette?
- Yes, sir.
Beautiful composition.
Even those delicate veins and the texture of that flesh.
I never saw anything more exquisite.
But, tell me, where did you begin to model in wax?
In my native country, at first, as a hobby.
- He has a great reputation as a sculptor.
- You are very kind, sir.
However, I was commissioned to come to England... and with the completion of my work,
I turned my mind to these... because it seemed to satisfy me more.
I felt I could reproduce the warmth and flesh and blood of life... far more better in wax than in cold stone.
If you will grant me the privilege...
I'd like to submit your work to the Royal Academy when I get back.
Royal--
You will have won the undying gratitude of all of us.
Is that not so, Marie Antoinette?
I regret that I have not the time to give to your exhibition now... but I'll worry you more when I get back.
It will always afford me the greatest pleasure to welcome you.
I must apologize again for coming and disturbing you at this late hour.
It was a great pleasure, I assure you.
- Good night, sir.
- Good night.
- And I'm very grateful to you.
- Not at all.
Thank you for your visit and your encouragement.
- Good night, lvan.
- Good night.
My masterpiece, my Marie Antoinette.
You heard what this man, who is very celebrated, said of you?
Yes, of course. You would say that.
You always told me so, of course.
Hello, there!
Hello.
What are you doing here so late?
I came for some books. I'm trying to straighten out the accounts.
I don't hope to impress you but we haven't a farthing.
That is unfortunate.
You're right, it's unfortunate.
*15,000 it's cost me, and you say it's unfortunate... as though I spilled soup on my vest.
Your money may be very well invested, one never knows.
Something important may come of all this.
Something has got to come of all this.
- The rent on this place isn't paid.
- ls that a fact?
No, I'm lying to amuse myself.
Now, look here. I have an idea that will get us out of all this.
You and I have absolutely no money, but we have got this.
- Fire insurance.
- Yes, insurance. That's our way out.
You know that a fire in this place will give us *10,000?
A fire?
Is this your idea of humor, my friend?
I want the money back that I've thrown into this rubbish heap.
You're asking to burn these people?
- You are asking to destroy all--
- I'm not asking you.
- I'm telling you.
- You think I'll permit this?
You've got to permit it.
Whose fault is it if people don't come here?
Yours. All this artistic nonsense.
The museum at Walston Lane does well enough.
And why? Because they have
Jack the Ripper, Burke and Hare... the Mad Butcher... the Demon Barber of Fleet Street, things that people pay to see!
And they are welcome to them.
To perpetuate such scoundrels is to celebrate their crimes.
What do think I'm in this for?
A match. A cigar stub, even... and you and I have *10,000 to divide between us.
You are insane.
No, I'm not insane. Not at all.
Let me show you how easily it can be done.
Wait, you!
Anything new, Doc?
Nothing we didn't tell you this afternoon.
The coroner confirmed our opinion.
It was suicide.
Gee, that'll make a swell story. Come on.
Hello, is that you, Tim?
I'm sorry, but I've got to have that tonight.
I've got to have it.
No, I tell you, I need it right away.
Who's on the gate down there?
Joe? Then you can get it out, all right.
I'll send a truck right down there.
The harness bull's okay.
I straightened it out this afternoon.
New Year's Eve ain't what it used to be.
This is only the second one tonight.
Times sure are tough.
What happened to this one?
Husband slapped her full of lumps.
Said she talked too much.
What's that?
Embalming fluid. It makes them jump.
Ain't that just like a woman?
Always has to have the last word.
As I live and breath and wear spats, the prince.
You've been doing experiments with Scotch and soda again?
Where did you get that news item?
From a little bird?
Have a pleasant vacation?
Charming. More delightful people crippled.
That's fine.
Consider yourself crippled financially.
See if you can jar your friends loose for enough to eat.
Meaning what?
You're a sure bet to place in the bread line.
There's no room on this rag for the purely ornamental.
You're easy on the eyes and pretty conceited about it.
Is mama's dumpling getting tough?
I'm through clowning, Florence.
You're all washed up. Get out!
What do you mean? It's New Year's!
We still get out a newspaper.
Ever thought of that?
- ls it my fault if nothing happens?
- What do you mean, nothing happens?
Look down there!
Out of that insane mob, you say nothing happens?
There's a story in every person down there.
Do I circulate among them and say
"Would you tell me the story of your life?"
Getting newspaper stories is none of our business.
You're through. Get out.
Go on, get out.
You're fired unless you bring a story for the next edition!
Even if it's only a new recipe for spaghetti!
I thought I told you to keep out of here.
I won't bother you, but I'm all in.
My nerves are all shot.
Your nerves aren't the only things that'll be shot.
You've been smoking again.
Give him a bag.
Thanks.
Come on.
And understand this... you get nothing until you show me something.
The next time you talk out of turn you'll have bad luck.
- Understand?
- Thanks.
Happy New Year!
Hey, Miss Dempsey.
Wonder how they'll settle the heavyweight argument while you're around.
Hello, sweetheart. How's your sex life?
So you're in again.
Hey, Jim, call out the riot squad.
- How's every little old thing?
- Fine.
You're the first reporter here in two hours.
- You people been seeing the old year out?
- I'm people which the old year saw out.
- I'm fired.
- No kidding.
I gotta make news if I have to bite a dog.
Hey, Kelly.
Oh, my gosh, even he walked out on me.
I've got a story for you.
You know the Joan Gale girl?
She committed suicide yesterday.
I read about it last year.
Yeah? Maybe she didn't commit suicide.
- She may have been murdered.
- No kidding? Any suspects?
- You know George Winton?
- Old Howard Winton's cub?
- That's him.
- They don't suspect him?
Don't they?
He's down at the Tombs right now.
- lf you're stringing me, old timer....
- Why should l?
- They were sweeties till last month.
- What does that prove?
Nothing. Only she may have tried to blackmail him.
You know, such things have happened.
Anyway, he was in her apartment a few hours before she was found dead.
- Saved, one job.
- The press room for yours.
- Wait till I give you the rest of the dirt.
- Make it snappy.
They've ordered an autopsy over at Bellevue immediately. Go there.
- Don't give this to anyone else.
- It's yours.
Thanks!
Fresh kid!
- Feeling tough?
- Rotten.
]That's too bad, sister.
I have a case of jitters that will cop the Pulitzer Prize.
If they don't hurry up, they'll have another corpse on their hands.
Bring in number seven. The Gale girl.
She's a very interesting case.
When I was called, the girl had been dead for possibly three or four hours.
My examination clearly showed that she died of laudanum poisoning.
I thought at first it might have been an accident. An overdose.
Her eyes indicated that she used narcotics frequently.
- What was the police theory?
- Suicide.
- Leave any message?
- No.
That's why I thought it was an accident.
- Are you in charge of the case?
- Yes, sir.
Who got the information about Winton?
Everyone knew they were living together.
But he was playing around with some other twist.
Winton was in bad though because he left before she folded up.
If she committed suicide with laudanum she probably took it in its true form... and we'll find it in that or very close to that state.
If someone gave it to her, it would be diluted.
- But how could he give it to her?
- ln a cup of coffee or a glass of whiskey.
- That's possible.
- The Gale body is gone.
- What are you talking about?
- Absurd!
What do you mean? The body is gone?
Just that. It's vanished.
Gone. Disappeared.
You mean to say someone stole the body?
We found the slab empty and the window to the alley was open.
Come on.
Boy, and he asked for a story.
Is his face red!
Bryant, 2626.
- Hello.
- Hello, slug.
Kill that Winton story for this.
Joan Gale's body was....
Not John Brown's.
Joan Gale's body was snatched from the morgue two minutes ago.
I'm here now.
Yeah, there were nine or ten witnesses.
No, they didn't talk. They're pretty stiff.
No, dope, not drunk. Dead.
Get out of the Tombs and get to Winton.
I'll have Harry write the first flash.
A cow does that, and gives milk besides.
Send Harry in.
- How do you do? I'm from the Express.
- Yeah?
I don't want to talk to you.
I know you people. You'll try to crucify me for something I didn't do.
Anything you print about me, you've got to prove.
You know you're innocent till you're proven guilty.
That's fine.
But while I'm proving my innocence... you people will uncover every petty kid trick I ever did.
You'll write editorials about every cocktail I drank.
Anything that any normal person might have done... will have a sinister meaning if I did it.
It'll be a lot easier if you come clean.
Let's get down to cases.
- When did you see this girl last?
- ln the afternoon before--
- Why didn't you tell that to the police?
- They didn't give me a chance.
We had a couple of drinks.
She was all right. She seemed happy.
Do you remember what she said?
What did you talk about?
She laughed and she said we were being very silly... that we didn't care for each other anymore but we needn't hate each other.
- Said she wanted us to be friends.
- Was that all?
No. We planned a trip.
I was sending her to Bermuda.
- You weren't going with her?
- No.
- Why didn't I take her away somewhere?
- Let's get back to the case in hand.
They ordered an autopsy and found her body had been stolen.
No.
What are you trying to do to me?
- You're working with the police--
- I'm trying to help you... if you're on the square and I think you are.
- Why are you telling me a crazy lie, then?
- That happens to be the truth.
- But who'd steal her body?
- That's what they'll ask you.
- Come on, time's up.
- Be right with you.
Keep a stiff upper lip, kid.
I think you'll come out okay.
Go ahead, I'm listening.
The whole thing sounded on the up and up to me.
Poor guy's too scared to lie.
I think he's getting a raw deal.
Ain't that a shame.
Nice little chap, wouldn't harm a fly.
Everyone picking on the poor little fellow.
If he was unknown, they wouldn't have pinched him.
He's George Winton and they're playing it up.
It's a Roman holiday for every editor in New York.
Why the goose pimples?
If he was someone like me, you'd be trying to hang him.
I wouldn't be trying, beloved,
I would hang him.
All that gaga about that body disappearing....
Eight bodies have been stolen in New York in the last 18 months.
Isn't it more reasonable to hook this up from that angle?
And ruin a perfectly good story?
Don't be silly.
I think this kid's entitled to a break.
- He's getting it. He's front page.
- You give me a pain.
I'm glad to hear it.
Since when did you start crusading for justice?
This mug with all the money has had two or three nasty affairs.
He's kept out of print, because his grandfather was smart.
He couldn't have stolen the body from jail.
Don't think he'd be sap enough to do the job himself, do you?
I hope they give him the works.
Even if he didn't kill her, he's responsible for her death... and they can fry him any time without making me sore.
- I won't work on it from that angle.
- You won't?
You were pretty tough about
Judge Ramsey, a while ago.
They didn't prove anything against him.
Except that he disappeared when things got too hot.
Or was killed by someone afraid of him.
- He took a run-out powder.
- That's got nothing to do with this case.
- Can I handle this my way?
- You cannot.
I'm still editor of this newspaper.
You said I was fired. Well, I quit!
- Give the assignment to somebody else.
- Wait a minute.
No, I'm through!
Come here, sob sister.
All right. Go ahead.
Do it your own way.
On the square, if you'd seen that kid down there...
I'm not holding for him, maybe he is a dirty pup, but he's scared... and so kind of dumb and worthless.
If he is, we'll give him away as a bridge prize.
Come on, beat it.
It's 5:. 00. You need some sleep.
- There's another point.
- Sleep on it. We'll get it tomorrow.
Here's your portrait.
- Which one is me? The horse?
- Get out of here.
If my curiosity is not too great... would you mind telling me what animal you are designing?
One of the Athenian girls for the bacchanal.
It would be interesting to know where and when you studied anatomy.
It doesn't seem so bad to me.
What is wrong with it?
Anatomy.
Heaven forgive you.
You must have studied with a sideshow of .
I'm sorry, sir. I'll change it.
The reason I wanted to work with you was to learn about that.
And this fellow.
Look what this cobbler is doing.
What is this?
Are you so beautiful that you make everything in your own likeness?
It's a mercy of Providence that this fellow cannot hear.
Anatomy.
A great sculptor.
And I am barred.
Look.
Look at these claws.
If I had those hands of yours...
I would show you the meaning of what you are trying to do.
All those beautiful things that were destroyed...
I could restore.
It is a cruel irony that you people without souls... should have hands.
But go on, go back to work.
It is useless and hopeless to talk to such people.
Who is it?
Got it? Is it completed?
Yes, sir, it's ready, but it's pretty heavy and I'll need help.
Come in here. Help Professor Darcy.
And hurry.
The figure has yet to be mounted and dressed.
And now, my friend, you are to see something... that one truly can describe as art.
Professor Darcy doesn't try to keep freedom and sketchiness in his work.
He is an artist.
His figures are realistic, lifelike.
He works at home, hours when such people as you are loafing.
- Shall we open it?
- Yes.
Exquisite. Almost as beautiful as the original.
Someday I hope to have you restore
Marie Antoinette.
I'd be glad to, Mr. Igor.
Take her in. Dress her for the opening.
I think I'll have something to tell you soon.
You have done well, and I too have something for you.
Thanks.
Hello?
Hello! I was just thinking about you.
Yeah, I was, too.
No, I haven't forgotten.
I won't have much time, we'll have to eat someplace close.
Let's go to that little Bohemian place.
- All right, I'll meet you in the lobby.
- At 12:00.
Bye.
Who was it? Penny ante?
- Why?
- I just wondered.
Did he invite you to lunch, or did you invite him?
I don't want to offend you but it's none of your business.
- I don't interfere in any of your affairs.
- I don't have any affairs.
- What do you mean?
- I don't think you could have a real affair.
I don't think you could care for anyone.
I've been in love so many times, my heart's calloused.
But I never had one with dough.
This love-in-an-attic isn't my idea of a way to spend a pleasant afternoon.
I don't agree with you.
All right, you raise the kids,
I'll raise the roof.
I'd rather die shaking cocktails and bankers... than expire in a pan of dirty dish water.
Would you?
He can look like a gorilla and have no manners... but he must have dough, plenty of dough.
You think money is the only requisite.
It just happens that the poor people are happier.
Then marry Ralph.
You'll be the happiest couple in the world.
I wish you wouldn't be so sarcastic about him.
He's the sweetest kid I know.
What are you laughing at?
I just imagined you telling a landlady some day... you didn't have the rent, but Ralph was awfully sweet.
I haven't noticed any multi-millionaires running after you.
I met one last night.
All the money this side of Peoria.
- Did you? Where?
- ln the can.
The hoosegow! Mrs. Winton's little boy, of the Park Avenue Wintons.
- Discharge?
- Yeah.
How are you, Mr. Winton?
When I say I'm happier to see you than I ever was to see anyone... it comes from the heart.
- How are you, Mr. Gates?
- Splendid, my boy.
- What have you been up to?
- Not a thing.
- I hope your father accepts that.
- ls Dad here?
No. We talked to him long distance today.
- Was he pretty sore?
- He wasn't exactly overjoyed.
What did he say?
He said to get you out of trouble, then hire someone to punch your head off.
- Have you had lunch?
- No.
Come on, we'll get something to eat.
- Hello, Florence, how are you?
- Fine. Thanks.
I'm awfully sorry,
I've got to disappoint you.
Don't worry. She'll get used to it.
Disappoint me? Why?
I won't be able to go to lunch with you.
What's happened?
The old man is awfully anxious to open on schedule.
All of the advertising announced it for tonight.
What are you doing here?
There are no visitors allowed.
- You'll have to leave.
- I'm from the Express.
I don't care where you're from.
I said, "No visitors allowed."
You might get some good publicity, if you'll--
We're opening tonight.
You shall have the pleasure then.
You don't understand, if you....
Ralph.
Are you going to stay out there all day?
The old man's pretty peppery.
I'll see you tonight.
All right.
I'm awfully sorry.
I was just explaining about....
- What's the matter, sir?
- Nothing at all, my boy.
I should like to meet your friend.
Why, certainly, sir.
Charlotte, Mr. Igor wants to meet you.
Why, certainly.
Mr. Igor, may I present my fiancée,
Miss Duncan.
- Charlotte, Mr. Igor.
- I'm delighted to meet you.
- Professor Darcy.
- How do you do?
If you will forgive this poor, crippled stump, my dear...
I am very happy to know you.
You'd be amused if I were to tell you that I knew you before you were born.
Before this terrible thing happened to me...
I made a very beautiful statue.
And, my child... you are that figure come to life.
How?
I wonder, sometime, would you pose for one of my sculptors... who does really excellent work?
Why, yes, I'd love to.
Thank you.
...see you tonight at the opening.
- Of course, I plan to come.
- You'd be welcome at any time.
I crave nourishment.
Come on, moonstruck. Let's get going.
So long, see you in jail.
- Good-bye, Mr. Igor.
- Good-bye. I'll see you tonight.
I assume I shall have the privilege of having her pose for me.
- That was my plan.
- Thank you.
I'm going to leave you.
I've got to get to the office.
- But what about lunch?
- I'll have it for supper.
Hello, light of my life!
Well, Prussic Acid. What's on your mind?
I want to see the original pictures of Joan Gale.
Dig into the morgue and send up all the art you have on Joan Gale.
Why so mysterious? Spill it.
So you can tell me I'm wrong?
Don't be silly.
- Thanks.
- Okay.
I am right! I know I'm right.
No one would suspect it.
You don't sound right.
If you wisecrack while I'm talking,
I'll crown you.
Go ahead, wise guy. Spill it.
There's a wax museum opening on 14th Street.
Don't that call for an extra.
I asked you to keep it shut.
You can't blame a guy for getting breathless with that scoop.
You poor baboon, you can guess the rest.
Wait a minute.
No kidding. What's your idea?
I got a look at that dump a while ago... and if they don't have a wax figure of Joan Gale, then I'm crazy.
- We'll grant that.
- What?
What of it? Where do we go from there?
Does this mean anything to you?
Joan Gale's body was swiped from the morgue.
Did you ever hear of such a thing as a death mask?
I used to be married to one.
And it came to life and divorced you.
I know that.
My idea is this: Somebody swipes the body, takes the impression... makes a mold, produces a wax figure, peddles it to the old skate there.
Work that up into a comic strip and syndicate it.
- You go to....
- What's that?
Let it go.
Come down to earth.
Would they dare to do that?
Wouldn't they know it would be recognized?
Shake your head, you'll be all right.
All right, mastermind.
Something's cockeyed about that joint,
I'll find out what.
By the way, another pet theory of yours just blew up.
- What?
- That innocent Judge Ramsey... that you were sure got bumped off, has been located in South America.
- No kidding?
- Almost certain.
I'll still bet I'm right, and let you write your own ticket.
- That settles everything.
- Yup, everything settled.
Good.
- I'm glad they didn't hold you.
- There's no case against me.
A clumsy thing, but nothing to worry about.
- lf I can do anything for you....
- I know I can always depend on you.
- What do you think is the best time?
- I'll let you know.
- So long.
- See you later.
- I hope, soon.
- Good-bye.
Hello?
Don't swoon. This is the voice of the New York Express broadcasting.
I'm awful glad you phoned.
Thank you for trying to cheer me up last night.
If you're grateful, you can prove it.
And do yourself a good turn too.
About 8:30 p. m., you be in your car at....
Good evening.
The history of these figures becomes more interesting, perhaps... when I tell you that the originals were destroyed... twelve years ago, in London, in a fire... and were reproduced only after years of arduous toil.
To reproduce the figures destroyed,
I had to train men for years... to do the work that I could no longer do.
The results, you see here tonight.
Ladies and gentlemen, here is one of the classic examples of chivalry.
Sir Walter Raleigh, spreading his cloak in the mud... so that Queen Elizabeth might walk dry-shod.
This group represents
His Royal Highness, Le Duc D'Angouleme...
Ieader of the French nobility... praying before the remains of the victims of the Battle of Quiberon.
And next, we see the ill-starred Maximilian... established as Emperor of Mexico by Napoleon lll.
Upon the conclusion of the American Civil War...
Napoleon withdrew his military support...
Ieaving Maximilian to the mercy of his rebellious subjects.
The figure lying in the bath is Marat... one of the most bloodthirsty leaders of the French Revolution.
He perished at the hands of his mistress Charlotte Corday... who was inspired to the deed by her fanatical devotion to her country.
This my friends, is Napoleon,
Emperor of the French... whose overwhelming ambition swept him to world power.
Here we see him after his banishment to St. Helena by the English.
Now, ladies and gentlemen, on the right here... we have a figure of Peter the Great.
- Hello, Ralph.
- Hello.
- Are we late?
- No.
- Pretty dress, have I seen it before?
- Yes, I think so.
- Thank goodness that's settled.
- Pay no attention to her.
I'm so excited to see all these things.
- Mr. Igor.
- Yes?
You're sure of that? You're quite sure?
- I'd know him anywhere.
- Keep track of him.
This is the most important thing of my life.
That'd be easy.
I wish....
- My little Marie Antoinette.
- Good evening, Mr. Igor.
- It's kind of you to be present.
- All these things are beautiful.
They are.
- Too bad the audience was so poor.
- I wouldn't be too disappointed, Mr. Igor.
The people are tired from the festivities.
My boy, I think you're right.
Everybody is tired out tonight.
And now that I've seen my doors open in a new country...
I begin to realize I'm a little tired myself.
- Call that fellow in, I'll close up for tonight.
- Yes, sir.
I might have felt a little discouraged.
But now, everything seems just as it should be.
You know, to find even one person who appreciates my beautiful children here...
- changes everything for me.
- I'm glad.
You're very beautiful.
Thank you.
You must come sometime in the morning when there is no crowd about... and I can give you more of my time.
Good evening, Mr. Igor.
I've just been admiring your works.
Properly lighted, they're even more impressive.
Yes. At first I despaired of ever achieving the same results I did abroad... and then lighting came to my rescue.
I was particularly interested in that group.
Yes, that one is very fine. Its grim tragedy seems to fascinate everyone.
- Yes, and that other one, that Joan of Arc.
- That was the most recently completed.
- lt arrived this morning.
- You did that yourself?
No. Never since these hands were burned have I created anything.
- I only direct the work of others.
- Who did it?
Professor Darcy.
- He has been my hands for years.
- You are very generous, Mr. Igor.
But I don't deserve any credit.
I only carried out your instructions.
Good night.
It's getting late. I better be going.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Shall we go?
- All right.
Thank you for coming.
Good night, my dear.
- Good night.
- Ready, Florence?
You two go without me. I've got a date.
No fouling in the clinches!
Winton!
Follow that man down the street!
And no questions.
We're on the trail of hot news.
- What's this all about?
- I might as well tell you.
That man is connected with the robbery at the morgue.
I don't want anything to do with this matter.
- Even if it gives you a clean bill of health?
- Not even then.
The police should handle this. If you've suspicions we'll go to the police.
And let every rag in town grab a red-hot story?
- Drive me around the corner and wait.
- I don't want to mix in this.
Then you can go to a warm place, and I don't mean California.
- All right. What do you want me to do?
- I told you what to do.
Drive out of sight of the house.
I want to get a closer look at the place.
That's nonsense.
- I figure you're yellow.
- No, I'm not.
- I feel that someone's been watching me.
- Nobody's watching you.
You're yellow and your nerves are shot.
I'll do nothing to help you until it's delivered.
- Get that through your head.
- All right.
- I'll phone.
- Not on this phone, you fool.
Go outside and call.
All right.
Well, buddy, what's the stall?
- I'm waiting for someone.
- Yeah, for who?
- I don't think it concerns you.
- Cut out the bluffing.
We've been following you, and you've done very suspicious things.
- Now, what are you doing here?
- What have I done?
You had a visitor at your apartment this afternoon.
Not the kind of a person
I'd expect you to entertain.
Winton!
- Hello, Express.
- I found the body!
- What are you talking about?
- The body of Joan Gale!
Trying to outsmart the police?
The body of Joan Gale is packed in the box in the basement!
- Are you giving me this straight?
- Take a look for yourself.
Let's take a look.
You, stop!
You cover the house, I'll get the other bird.
Come on.
Open this door.
Take it easy.
- It's down there in the basement.
- Wait a minute.
You boys go upstairs.
- It's not here, it's in the basement.
- Keep quiet.
Let's have a little light.
- See what's in there.
- Yes, sir.
Can you give me a description of this person you saw?
Not a very good one, I guess.
It wasn't like anything human.
It hobbled and swayed like a monkey.
And the face, from the glimpse I got of it was like an African war mask.
- You mean he was colored?
- I don't know.
But he made Frankenstein look like a lily!
- Nothing in there.
- ls there a rear entrance?
- I couldn't find any.
- Let's take a look.
Look, that's the basement.
- You find anything upstairs?
- Just a lot of paper and junk.
See if you can find a back entrance.
Let's take a look at the basement.
Just a minute, you.
- This is the place.
- Shut up!
Come out of there.
There's no one in here.
There he is now.
Turn on that light.
There it is. You'll find the body of Joan Gale in this box.
- Get that hatchet and open this.
- Yes, sir.
- I don't want to see it.
- Stay where you are.
What I wouldn't give for a slug of gin.
So that's your corpse?
Of all the things!
There's your corpse.
I've done nothing.
You've no right to arrest me!
- What's the charge against me?
- Shut up.
Here it is.
Come here.
Come on, spill it.
Who is it that owns this layout?
- I don't know.
- You don't know anything about it?
No, sir. I just know there was man named Worth.
- Worth?
- Yes, that was his name.
That's my bootlegger's name!
A heavyset fellow, with a broken nose?
Yes, that was the man.
I hope he delivered the stuff
I paid him for this afternoon.
I told you it was a bootlegger you saw at my place.
- Take this fellow in.
- I've done nothing.
- I even refused to deliver stuff for him.
- Come on, let's go.
Are you trying to give us the runaround here?
I want two of you boys to work the outside.
Don't let anybody in or out.
Florence, I don't want to leave her--
What're you doing? Put it back!
No, this is my percentage.
You guys are going to get yours.
I found this dump.
- Yeah.
- Whatever.
- Junkie?
- Yes, peddling.
Hold up your hands.
A classy turnip. Must have dipped it.
They tell me your managing editor is poison.
It takes a sturdy person to look at him.
The season's best catch is waiting.
I guess I'll breeze.
Wait a minute.
You want to talk to that junkie, Captain?
No, it's all right.
Lock him up. He'll talk soon.
- What do you think this is?
- What?
- Looks like a watch.
- Yes, but do you know whose watch?
- We don't know anything about it.
- Judge Ramsey's. That's all.
- Where did you get it?
- Took it off the junkie.
Well, I'll be....
- Bring him in. Here's your chance.
- Oh, boy!
Come in.
That yours?
Wait. Get me to the office and step on it.
- You like taking chances, don't you?
- Why?
- You go in for dangerous things.
- Darned if I don't!
Slow down!
I said the office, not the cemetery!
I never knew there were women like you in the world. You're game and decent.
And so determined to live that I'll take a taxi if you don't watch where you go.
I've only known you 24 hours, but I'm in love with you.
Doesn't usually take that long.
I forgive you.
You were in a tough spot when we met.
- No, I'm crazy about you.
- That's what caused it?
You don't believe me. You think
I'm just talking. Will you marry me?
- How much money have you got?
- Heaven knows. A lot.
That being the case, I'll take it up with the board of directors.
Listen, aviator. Here we are.
Hold everything, I'll be right back.
- Mitt me, kid. I've got a classic.
- You here again...
Iike an evil spirit to mar my happiness.
I've got a story, but I won't tell you what it is.
- Every time I tell you, it goes haywire.
- What do you mean?
You start out after murderers and bring back three-for-a-dime bootleggers.
You start out to solve murders and break up crap games.
You're stupendous. I'm for you.
You're wonderful.
You're always razzing everything I do, but this time I'm in.
Go on, girl. Tell your troubles to a cop.
I don't feel like talking.
Is there any art on Judge Ramsey?
Don't tell me you suspect Judge Ramsey of stealing the body.
I'm gonna make you eat dirt, you soap bubble.
I'm gonna make you beg for somebody to help you let go!
You may be the world to your mother but you're a....
Let's get them some coffee, they've been in there with that junkie all night.
Go on, talk.
You found that watch in a taxicab three months ago. Is that right?
Yes, sir. I got in the cab and it was laying there on the floor.
Where were you going when you got in that cab?
I don't remember. Not very far.
- You remember what day that was?
- No, sir. About three months ago.
- Remember what kind of a cab it was?
- No, sir, just a cab.
- Didn't happen to be going to Worth's?
- No, sir. I'm sure it wasn't there.
You used to go to Worth's place a lot.
What makes you sure it wasn't there?
Well, maybe, it was. I don't remember.
You've got to do something for me.
I can't stand it anymore.
I can't! Please.
He's beginning to break.
He'll talk pretty soon.
I think we got him, Chief.
He's been begging all night.
I never saw a junkie hold out so long.
Ralph?
I beg your pardon. Is Ralph here?
I was looking for Ralph.
No!
Mr. Igor, I'm so glad you're here.
I don't know why but I was a little bit afraid.
Afraid? Poor Hugo is quite harmless.
My little friend, you've honored me by accepting my invitation of last night.
No, I wanted to speak to Ralph.
We had a silly little argument last night, and I said something unkind--
Oh, you children. You happy children.
You've quarreled, and now you'll be friends again.
That's exactly as it should be.
Never let any stupid misunderstanding come between you.
- lt was really all my fault.
- Let him think it was his fault.
You must be stern with him before you forgive him, especially if it was your fault.
Now I understand why he was so gloomy this morning.
- Then he's here?
- Yes, down in the workroom.
- I'll call him for you.
- No, please, don't bother.
- I think it'd be better if I surprise him.
- As you wish, my child.
- Just go straight ahead.
- All right, thanks.
Ralph?
Ralph, are you there?
What's the matter, my child?
Are you frightened?
I thought you said Ralph was here.
I came to tell you that I was mistaken.
I've sent Otto to find him.
I hope this little glimpse behind the scenes will interest you.
This is the birthplace of all my creations.
Let me show you.
I don't want to put you to the trouble, Mr. Igor.
No trouble at all, my child.
This is the strange, vicarious pleasure that remains for me.
To see others enjoy the beauty
I used to create.
- My footing is none too secure.
- Please, let me help you.
Help me, my dear... you'll help me to give back to the world... my masterpiece.
Marie Antoinette.
No!
Hey, you. Wait a minute.
- You can't park here. Get it out of here.
- Okay, brother.
- I have to park the car. I'll be right back.
- Make it snappy, I might need you.
- Hey, Ralph!
- Hello, Florence.
- Gee, am I glad to see you.
- First time you've said that.
- Have you got a key?
- I just came down to open up.
- What are you doing here?
- After news, as usual.
What are the chances for me to slip in and look around?
You better wait until the old man gets here.
I'll tell you a secret. I like the old gent.
I'm doing a special Sunday magazine--
- I don't think I can--
- lt might help him a whole lot.
The old man was depressed at the opening last night. This might cheer him up.
Hurry up.
Thanks.
All right. I'll talk. I'll tell you what I know!
Ramsey was murdered because he looked like Voltaire.
Do you hear?
Because he looked like Voltaire.
You want to know what became of him!
He's a statue. A silly wax statue.
You killed him!
Come on with the rest of it.
No, I did not.
It was lgor at the Wax Museum.
You were in on it. You worked for him.
The only thing I did was keep track of a man named Worth.
- He runs the place where you arrested me.
- You lie!
No. It was lgor at the Wax Museum.
You'll find your judge embalmed in wax!
He's a statue of Voltaire, with the other corpses!
I tell you, the whole place is a morgue.
Do you hear? A morgue.
My child, why are you so pitifully afraid?
Immortality has been the dream, the inspiration of mankind for ages.
I am going to give you immortality.
Please, I haven't done anything to hurt you.
I have no desire to hurt you.
You will always be beautiful.
Think, my child, in a thousand years, you will be as lovely as you are now.
- Come.
- No!
Let me go!
Your face... was of wax.
- You fiend.
- My Marie Antoinette.
- You must not say that to me.
- You fiend!
There was a fiend, of that you can be sure.
There was a fiend.
And this is what he did to me.
You did this.
For 12 years, 12 awful years... this terrible living dead man... with these burned hands and face has searched for the fiend.
Now the account is closed.
He is here!
Charlotte!
Don't be afraid, my dear.
In a few minutes, the container will have filled with wax.
And when it overflows, your beauty will be preserved forever.
Here, go down there quickly.
- I'm getting out of here.
- We'll go down there and help them.
- What can I do?
- I don't know, we must do something!
Come on, boys. This is it.
They're down there. Quick!
Through the center.
Try it again.
Stop where you are!
Take them away!
- You've got the other papers bleeding.
- Now I'm going to scramble this egg.
- Now, Poison lvy, was that a story?
- You had a million dollars worth of luck.
Listen, stupid, could I do anything that would meet with your approval?
You could. Cut out this crazy business and act like a lady. Marry me.
- Marry you?
- That's what I said.
I'm gonna get even with you, you dirty stiff.
I'll do it.
In Renoir's career,
La Nuit du carrefour comes between La Chienne and Boudu sauvé des eaux.
As Renoir explained in 1961, the film came about from his admiration for Simenon:
I admired him then as I admire him now.
To bring to the screen what he did so well in his books
would take a single step.
That step was the filming of La Nuit du carrefour.
I asked my brother Pierre to play Maigret.
And I found this strange
17-year-old kid
with very pale skin, called Winna Winfried.
In this film, I tried to do what Simenon did.
I tried to give the feeling of mud sticking to your feet,
and of fog obscuring your sight.
I tried to achieve what
Simenon's books achieved:
transport the viewer into a certain atmosphere.
Got any petrol?
- Is my tyre ready?
- Over there.
"...de Kervolen, daughter of
Admiral de Kervolen, with Count Jean di Fioretti."
That's great.
I need some petrol.
Morning, sergeant.
Be with you right away.
Is my tyre ready?
Not yet.
We haven't had time.
That's awkward, because I've got a flat.
Jojo will sort that out for you.
"The blessing was given by..."
Hey, sergeant...
Need any oil?
- Ah, here's the butcher.
- Hello, Jojo.
You OK? What's new?
- Nothing.
- Fine.
- Is it good?
- It's the best you can get.
Morning, Mme Oscar.
- Morning, M Oscar.
- Good morning.
Nothing for today?
No, but tomorrow,
I'd like a little something...
- ...on the thigh!
- Ha! On the thigh!
- Nicely prepared, as usual.
- Not too fatty.
Seen any more of those gangsters?
Yes, round here.
They've got some nerve.
You don't know who to trust.
It's not safe anywhere.
Goodbye, Jojo.
- Sir!
- Yes?
Here's my wife.
Ever driven a 6-cylinder?
Don't forget the piece for the cat.
You've seen mine?
Here, I set it aside.
It's the same as the
Count d'Abrinville's.
He's rich, you know.
He paid like me, in instalments.
Don't mind the specks.
It was raining all yesterday.
There. It's weighed.
It's as tender as a kitten.
The best you can get.
It may be a bit dirty but it's a real motor.
Hey, someone's taken my 6-cylinder!
It's that Dane!
Thief! Thief!
Hold this.
Thief!
- What is it?
- Tell me what's going on.
Someone took our car, and left this one in its place.
All those foreigners should be deported.
It's those people opposite, those Danes.
The brother and sister, or so they say.
He'll tell you what rubbish he sells them.
Oh yeah, a load of junk.
Officer, I insist you go round there at once.
- Where do they live?
- Right next door.
Come on. Let's go.
- The girl's a looker.
- Shall we go, Jojo?
We'll see what lies they come up with.
You stay there.
Here it is.
This is where they live?
It's falling apart.
You couldn't pay me to live in that spooky place.
There's my car.
The morning edition.
There you are.
Diamond merchant murdered at Avrainville crossroads.
Suspect arrested.
Where are you going?
- Inspector Maigret.
- OK.
I give you my word, as an officer and a gentleman, that I never saw that Jew.
Oh, you saw him once, at least.
Where?
Well, his corpse, anyway.
In the car.
- Do you need me any more?
- No, thank you.
You lost your eye in the war?
The Danes weren't in the war.
- A fight?
- No. An accident.
My plane crashed.
Yes, I had a plane.
Afternoon edition.
Are you in the habit of going to your garage so early each morning?
I installed a wood-burning stove in my sister's room.
She gets very cold.
So in the mornings,
I fetch wood from the garage.
Why not keep the wood in the house?
It's wood that I cut myself in the park.
It's from rotting trees.
The branches have insects in them.
And my sister is afraid of the little creatures.
Why did you kill Goldberg?
I am not a murderer.
Goldberg was shot with a rifle.
A former officer must be a good shot.
Lucas!
- Well, boss?
- Nothing.
Your turn.
I had nothing to do with your Goldberg.
No more than with any other diamond merchant.
You must have had some dealings with him, since his body was found in your garage.
I've already told you, I don't know how that happened.
And besides, it was
M Michonnet's car.
It was his car, but yours was found in the same M Michonnet's garage.
All that must have made a lot of noise.
How come you didn't hear anything?
There is a lot of traffic on the road at night.
And I sleep very soundly.
Evening News.
- Well?
- Nothing!
Your turn.
By the way...
Did you tell my wife
I won't be home for dinner?
- Yes, I phoned her.
- Thanks a lot.
Thank you.
So, you're saying nothing?
Oh, it's like a tomb in here.
I have nothing to say.
- Granjean...
- What?
I've been here since 8am.
Fine. Get someone to replace you.
About time!
You design fabrics for a shop in Paris.
Why don't you live in Paris?
It'd be handier for your work, rather than living out in that godforsaken suburb.
I draw decorative designs for them.
All I need do is to meet with them once a month.
- Good evening, Granjean.
- Evening. Hurry up.
But that doesn't explain why you went so far.
Write that down.
There's nothing to do.
He won't talk.
Fetch his collar and tie.
You're getting out of here.
Cigarette?
So, still no telegram from Brussels?
- Still nothing.
- This is taking for ever.
He's a tough one, this Dane.
- Are you going out there?
- So it seems.
It sounds like a real dump.
Rather you than me.
I know what it's like.
Evening News
Avrainville murder.
Andersen released.
Inspector Maigret to visit the scene of the crime.
What's the time?
Goodbye, Mme Oscar.
- Some musician!
- Yes.
What are you doing there?
- Who was that?
- An odd character.
The garage-owner. He asked me in because of the rain.
- Who was that?
- The boss.
As you see, there are three houses.
At the back, the Michonnet place. An insurance agent.
That's Oscar's garage.
That's where he lives.
And over there are the
Andersens, the Danes.
All very convenient.
- Does that happen much?
- That's the first.
There's nowhere to sleep here.
You have to go a km up the road.
An inn. There's not much choice here.
I'll take your suitcase.
See you later, boss.
Excuse me.
Come in.
Don't be afraid.
My sister, Else.
Who is he?
Inspector Maigret.
He's investigating the
Goldberg case.
He's a gentleman.
Please sit down,
Inspector.
Has Carl not offered you anything?
What are you thinking of?
Please excuse me.
Go on. Hurry up.
If you knew Carl, you'd know how stupid it was to accuse him.
Do you smoke much?
Two packs a day.
Do you often play records?
Mostly that one.
It's an old Italian tune that my teacher used to play.
Italian, too?
This kind of life is not too hard for your brother?
Carl had a strict upbringing.
He's very brave.
He makes 2000 francs a month with his horrible designs.
Was your family rich?
Carl had the same tutor as the Prince.
Our grandfather was the
First Chamberlain.
It's getting so dark in here.
Carl! Carl!
Light the lamp.
What are you waiting for?
Carl has kept his faith.
But not me.
- The First Chamberlain.
- Yes, under King Christian.
We lost everything after that.
Do you know Copenhagen?
It's lovely, isn't it?
I wish I could offer you better hospitality.
Sorry, boss.
I need to have a word.
Excuse me.
- What were you doing with him?
- He amused me.
- You're behaving badly.
- Very true.
Goldberg's wife has identified her husband's photo.
Will be arriving in Avrainville on the evening of the 17th.
I know you still suspect me.
However, I need permission to go to Paris tomorrow.
It's the end of the month and I need some money.
- Very well.
- Thank you.
- Coming, Lucas?
- Yes, boss.
- Goodnight, miss. Goodnight.
- Goodnight.
I like him.
So are you taking your horn?
It's been repaired, hasn't it?
Yes. Thank you.
I don't think she'll be coming tonight.
No, it's too late.
Excuse me, which way to Avrainville?
Avrainville?
If you'd been paying more attention...
- Madame Goldberg...
- How do you know my name?
I'm Inspector Maigret.
Oh my God!
She's dead.
- Take care of her.
- Yes, yes.
The headlights!
Turn off the headlights!
What is it, Inspector?
Where are you going in such a hurry?
Your husband!
Where's your husband?
You must be tired, Inspector.
Can I offer you something?
- Your husband.
- Can't I get you something?
M Michonnet will be back any moment.
He'll be sorry to miss you.
This affair has been such a strain for him.
- I... I...
- Take it easy.
Give me your gun.
Nice.
You went out for some air?
If the police did their job better, I wouldn't need to keep an eye myself on foreigners who steal Frenchmen's cars.
- You were in their grounds?
- On the wall.
I'd like to point that neither you nor your superiors have done anything to recover my six-cylinder, which is absolutely essential to me.
What did he say to you?
- A rifle bullet, like before.
- Yes.
Let's get going.
Will it be all right if I pay you this evening?
I'll be getting some money in Paris.
- Not too warm, today.
- No.
- A little aperitif, Inspector?
- Yes.
It'll be a pleasure.
This way.
Your bird has flown the coop, eh?
A liqueur?
Would you like a drop, too?
So the Dane...
He's cleared off, eh?
Good hunting?
You go hunting at night?
Come on, Inspector, you're not going to make a fuss over a spot of poaching.
You, too, go hunting at night.
Only you're after different game.
You let him get away, the toff?
He'll be back.
He went to Paris to fetch his money.
- You like music?
- Yes.
And this tune in particular.
I heard it at the circus when I was a kid.
Not bad, eh?
Yes, he's here.
Inspector, there's a call for you.
Yes? Andersen?
Gone?
Hey, give it a rest!
I can't hear a thing.
Yes.
Good.
Do you think he'll come back?
I think it'll be all over tonight.
Listen, about tonight...
I'll tell you now so you don't think I'm like Andersen.
It's our night off.
Everything's planned.
We dine at the Escargot.
We're having lobster.
Then we're going to L'Ambigu, and after that Le Bon Coin.
Here, boss.
- I added some mustard.
- Good idea.
Listen, I'm not as stupid as I look.
Your Andersen...
The border...
Hey, you!
That file is setting my teeth on edge.
Yes?
Go outside for a bit.
Tend to the pumps.
Well, go on.
Go!
You must have a lot of housework to do.
I don't want to keep you from it. Go ahead.
You're too good a husband not to accompany your wife.
I'm going, but I wanted to tell you
I'll be glad to see the back of those Danes.
There are 3 houses here.
The Andersens with their stuck-up airs, those bourgeois Michonnets who moved in...
Where does that leave us?
When there's a crime, who do people suspect?
We had to work hard to build this business.
Of course, we all do stupid things when we're young.
Get out!
It's not easy to get the phone to yourself.
Paris just called.
Andersen didn't show up at his place of work.
They found his car.
Belgium.
- So what do we do?
- No idea.
A van with 30 men.
Police headquarters. 347.
- You think it'll be tonight?
- Maybe.
Tell Granjean to send a van with 30 men.
- Is that you, Granjean?
- Yes, it's Granjean.
What? 30 men?
Understood.
Hey, shut up there.
I can't hear a thing.
Hello, Lucas?
Are you there? Yes.
You want me to tail Oscar? OK.
Yes, I've got his photo.
L'Escargot... L'Ambigu...
Le Bon Coin.
OK, fine. If I lose him, I'll meet you at the crossroads.
OK. No, no.
He's never seen me.
Goodbye.
Is that you?
Is that you?
- Is it you?
- It's me.
Who?
The Inspector.
I want to speak to you.
I'm listening.
You're asking for something difficult, Inspector.
I'm locked in.
- Who locked you in?
- My brother Carl.
I ask him to lock me in when he goes away.
I'm afraid of prowlers.
It's strange to find you smoking up here, when your lit cigarettes are downstairs.
You think so?
Sit down, Inspector.
Over here.
- I'm happy.
- About what?
You can smoke your pipe.
Are all policemen in France like you?
If so, I'd like to be a criminal.
That's not your brother's opinion.
He's crossed the border.
He's left me alone.
Did you ever see Goldberg?
No, I don't think so,
Inspector.
I don't meet anyone.
You know, I'm very lazy.
If my brother didn't provide my meals, I think I'd...
Your brother's flight is going to be seen as a confession.
Carl hasn't fled.
Or if so, he's gone mad.
- Mad? Oh, come on!
- Stop, don't talk of that.
Have you ever seen a madman?
Our aunt, and our grandfather.
But not him!
Calm down.
- Have you eaten today?
- No. Carl left very early.
- Are you hungry?
- I... think so.
- You're very kind, Inspector.
- Come on.
Where are you, Inspector?
I think I hear something.
I don't think it's Carl.
Why do I feel
I can trust you?
Come closer.
I was going to tell you,
Inspector.
Come on. Hurry up.
Take 7 men and station them at the crossroads.
You take 5 men over to that villa.
The rest of you come with me.
I needed the key.
I get scared at night.
But you mustn't think that Carl is bad.
VERONAL TABLETS
I swear to you I didn't know Goldberg.
If Carl did that, he must be mad.
It was like in the morning, when Carl found the car...
Carl wanted to go to the police.
I'm afraid.
Because we're foreigners.
I'm very unhappy,
Inspector.
Who can I trust...
I've been poisoned. Help me.
I don't know what to do.
Help me. The beer!
It's not serious.
You hardly drank any.
Don't let me die...
Try to relax.
What was that?
Hey, boss! Boss!
The fake policeman at the Porte d'Orleans... shot me in the back... and threw me out of the car.
- In here.
- Else!
- Else!
- Carl!
- Carl!
- Shut her in her room.
Still looking for killers at this time of night?
Do you want the spare tyre or not?
Off you go!
Are you coming in?
You want the owner?
What does he need that wheel for?
Why, what's wrong with his wheel?
Hey, now look here!
Is that your stash?
The cocaine?
A taste now and then.
M Oscar - telephone.
Goldberg's diamonds, eh?
Come on.
Not a bad idea.
A garage...
Cars stop here pretending to fill up...
What was in that horn last night?
Figure it out yourself.
Did you know Goldberg?
- What Goldberg?
- Don't play the fool.
This Goldberg...
Look.
ANVERS POLICE TO PARIS -
SENDING LIST OF JEWELS
STOLEN BY GOLDBERG
Goldberg arrives with the jewels.
Someone kills Goldberg, and keeps all the profit for himself.
What was Andersen's role in this?
- Is there a signal?
- Maybe.
Or maybe they can smell trouble. They're good at that.
There's a wounded man here?
Go and park further off.
Are you the wounded man?
Bugger off, you lanky git.
What have we got here?
I've found their accounts.
This is Maigret.
Set up roadblocks.
A grey Torpedo.
Five people.
Be careful. They're armed.
Understood.
- Corporal. "Fall in" the men.
- Yes, sir.
15 silver spoons, 6 items of silverware, 2 pairs of earrings,
A jewelled broach, a packet of bonds...
There's the boss.
Wait here a minute.
They got away from me, boss.
They just went past.
They even left a calling card.
You may catch them.
Have you got a fast car?
A Bugatti. And a great driver.
Get after them.
They're heading for Orleans.
The police stations have been alerted.
They're heading for Orleans.
We have to catch them.
Got your gun?
25 packets of cocaine, 2 pearl necklaces, 11 diamond rings... three silver coffee pots, three assorted rings...
We'll stop them up ahead.
The woman, too.
Come on.
Help, help!
Slut!
- Where's the patient?
- Stay out of my way.
He's upstairs.
Put her in her room, with a man under the window.
And take him downstairs.
Your patient's in there.
Get out. Hurry up.
- What's the rush?
- Come on, come on.
All right, that's enough.
Lock them inside.
- Is the boss here?
- He's at the Andersen place.
At the Andersens.
OK, get moving.
Hurry up.
Inspector...
How many men have been in that bed?
- Inspector...
- Enough of that.
Let's talk seriously now.
First of all, that crook Oscar.
He made you the key, didn't he?
Then Michonnet. But you turned your nose up at him.
Then the "brother", who's no more your brother than I am.
"My brother Carl!"
And that scar, how did you get it?
You're hurting me.
Go and get dressed.
Go on.
- Where are you from?
- Where am I from?
My father was a
Hamburg docker.
That? A bullet.
In Copenhagen.
I was the look-out.
My husband was breaking into a safe.
Someone squealed on us.
That idiot Carl!
He had this idea of saving a fallen woman.
- He's from a good family?
- Yes.
He's Protestant, I see that.
He wanted to save your soul.
And this?
Veronal to put
Carl Andersen to sleep?
Very handy.
While he's sound asleep, you can safely entertain
Michonnet, Oscar, and the rest, each in turn.
Your husband?
Which one is he?
You figure it out.
It won't be hard.
They're all downstairs.
You won't need make-up where we're going.
Not that!
- That's not nice, Inspector.
- Come on.
Are we going to be kept here much longer?
- To start with...
- Take it easy.
He's a right one, he is.
Give me a cigarette,
Inspector.
Love in chains, everybody cried.
I agree.
There'll be tears.
Have you been a fence for long, Oscar?
Two years. That's about what I'll get, right?
One of you will get more than that...
The guillotine.
Who killed Goldberg?
Who was waiting for Andersen at Porte d'Orleans, and forced him in a car to make us think he was on the run?
Who shot him when he came back?
Which of you is the husband of Else?
And the safe-cracker?
Was it you who thought of switching the cars?
The 6-cylinder at Andersen's, and his car at Michonnet's.
Not bad. It throws the suspicion off Michonnet, and onto Andersen.
- What did he do to you?
- To me, nothing. Ask Else.
It mattered that much to you?
Granjean...
Hamburg... The crook.
The husband.
Someone will lose his head for it.
If you come over here, Inspector,
I have something to say.
The little fool.
And he's no better.
- Missed again.
- Nice work.
Shut up!
Bring him in.
Sit down.
- Else!
- Who are you asking for?
Hey, Oscar, the new bracelets suit him.
How about a photo, Oscar?
Shut up. You make me sick, the lot of you.
What a crowd, Inspector!
The patient is asking for Else - or Elsa.
So you're the man in the photo.
Else's husband. Or I should say, her first husband. Speak up.
It's clear that Carl Andersen isn't Else's brother.
He's her second husband.
It was Else who gave Goldberg the address of the fence here.
Yes. But it was you who killed Goldberg, to share the diamonds with
Oscar, Michonnet and the rest.
And you killed Mme Golberg to stop her talking to the police.
- Is that all?
- Admit you had accomplices.
First, Oscar, who hid drugs and jewels inside spare tyres.
Then Michonnet, who fenced the merchandise, and his wife, who would keep watch for the gang.
Poor Michonnet.
He got scared.
He poisoned the beer, and when that didn't work, he tried to strangle her, so she wouldn't talk.
And an innocent man, upstairs, pays the price.
For what? For trying to make an honest woman of her.
Come on.
Else...
- Else!
- Else. It hurts...
Come here.
Two years will pass quickly.
After that, you'll be free.
Truly free.
Else...
English subtitles by
Kinsayder at KG.
Thanks to: Laulo43, Efflamm,
Knappen, Scharphedin & Knutten.
Come on boys, let me through here. You please, I'm a doctor.
Give me a break here, let me through, I'm a doctor.
- Ok Doctor, I think we'll need one.
- You know how women are when they lose.
While the votes are being collected and counted...
I have a few words I'd like to say as president of the Civic Betterment Board.
Don't bar the view mister.
I, I want to introduce to you a very welcome visitor to our city Mr. Frank Patton.
The man who as representative of the Leg
Easy Hosiery Co. Made this contest possible.
Speaking then for the Civic Betterment Board for the girls and I'm sure for all of you...
I want to extend to Mr. Patton our heartfelt gratitude for the noble work he has done.
Thanks Bradbury.
Ah, we have here the tabulation of the ballots of these astute judges.
By unanimous vote, the honor of having the most beautiful legs in Cloverdale... and the 1,000 dollars prize goes to...
Miss Number 3, the girl with the lucky legs.
Thank you.
- Congratulations Miss Clune.
- Thank you.
- Congratulations.
- Thank you so much.
And now would the lucky little lady kindly sign the victory certificate?
With pleasure and pardon me for asking but when do I get the 1,000 dollars?
At my hotel in the morning.
Well you see, I didn't want to bring that much cash with me here tonight...
After all a 1,000 dollars is a lot of money and well, it's a bit risky.
Well, in that case you can expect me early, very early.
Thank you.
Mr. Bradbury, isn't it wonderful?
Are you proud of your employee?
Couldn't have turned out better if I'd used my influence to fix it.
And if I thought it was necessary I've been tempted to fix it for you Margie.
Oh, you're a swell boy.
Swell enough that you might consent sometime to be my boss?
You know you can take over anytime.
- I, I know it, it's sweet but...
- But?
He's over there.
- Studying anatomy Doctor?
- Yes, but entirely without pleasure Eva.
Margie will make you like it.
- We won darling, we won.
- We won?
Yeah, maybe her we means Bradbury and her.
Well, there's one thing my we will never include, that's you.
Margie, I've just resorted to gatecrashing hoping to get here in time to finally... convince you not to stand up there half dressed to be judged like a prize heifer.
Yeah, she does look like a heifer, doesn't she?
Thank you, that's very sweet, goodbye.
Darling, we needed that money.
Now with the 1,000 dollars you won't have to put things off any longer.
You think you made possible our marriage by winning a leg show? You made it impossible.
- Bob.
- That's final.
Bob?
Everything set?
Ok, down the railroad station and step on it.
Somebody is going to catch up to you and your racket sometime and this is the time.
Who are you?
You know who I am, I'm Thelma Bell, the girl who won the leg contest in Waynesville.
The girl you gypped out of the prize money.
The girl who's finally going to collect right now.
You won't get away with the cash this time, not from me.
Come on, get away from that...
- Help, police.
- Shut up.
Alright, get in the cab.
I have an appointment with Mason by letter for 10 o'clock.
If Mr. Mason said he'd meet you at 10 o'clock in the morning, he was boasting a little.
He made me pay him a 1,000 dollars before he make any appointment, it's 11 o'clock now.
I've been here since 9 o'clock this morning and Mr. Mason hasn't come in or even phoned.
Are you sure?
Every minute is important, he ought to get started on this case immediately.
Well, maybe you'd rather wait in his private office.
Oh, very well.
Yes, I'm sure you'll be more comfortable in here.
I'm sure I will, thank you, god...
Oh, being all alone in the big city frighten you?
I don't happen to be all alone.
There's a body in there on the floor.
I'll have to speak to that janitor about cleaning up, he's been very careless lately.
Say, is this the office of the eminent attorney Perry Mason or an insane asylum?
Sometimes I wonder.
Come on in Mr. Bradbury, don't be afraid.
Oh, here.
- That's him.
- That's Perry Mason?
My boss, your lawyer.
- Oh hello Della.
- Hello.
How did you get in this ambulance?
You tell the driver to slow down on the curves and stop that clanging noise.
Remember anything about a 10 o'clock appointment... with a Mr. Bradbury from Cloverdale?
Certainly I remember.
When the give Mr. Bradbury, he's an hour late already.
He's in.
- I'm out.
- Too late.
Mr. Bradbury Mr. Mason will see you presently.
Good morning Mr. Bradbury.
I fell asleep over one of my law books.
Worked rather late last night brushing up on a previous... decision that may have some bearing on your case.
Very gratifying to find you prepare yourself so conscientiously for our interview.
Pardon me, squaw man while I relieve you of your tepee.
Is that the telephone Della, or is it my head still clanging?
No, it's not your head, it's your private phone.
Hello? Oh yes hello Doctor. Yes, he's here.
The doctor says he has an appointment with you to... go over the results of your physical examination.
I don't need to go to a doctor's office this morning to find out what condition I'm in.
- Feeling splendid, you know Mr. Bradbury.
- The doctor says he'll be right over.
He says it's important that he see you before he goes on his vacation.
- Probably just wants to tell me goodbye.
- Yes, that's probably what it is.
That sounds rather ominous, don't you think Dr. Bradbottom?
Bradbury is the name and not doctor.
Just take me the files on Mr.
Bradbury's case, will you please Miss Street?
Oh, of course, I got it out last night myself to study up.
Yes, I think I'm familiar with all the details.
Will you excuse me Mr. Bradbury?
I, I'll get a glass of water.
We should all take two gallons of that a day.
- Two gallons of what?
- Water sir, pure spring water.
I'm not surprised Bradbury that... even a successful, astute businessman like yourself... should fall for this racket of Patton's.
Well, we find that a lot of other astute, successful businessmen... in other towns fell for it just as hard.
It's a pretty good looking racket and in fact Patton makes it look perfect.
Oh, do find a place to lie down Mr. Bradbury.
- Lie down?
- Well, sit down.
Anyway, make yourself comfortable.
Patton flashes, but only flashes credentials from one of the best hosiery firms.
- Gets nearly 10,000 for expenses.
- Eight thousand.
Most of which, since I own the big department store, came out of my pocket, move over.
Ah, yes, of course.
He uses the publicity angle to get everything he wants without expense to him.
Gets you to insure the legs for a million or so.
Gets the commission of the policy himself and... runs off with it all.
Yes, but that wasn't all in my letter.
Well, you seem to have guessed a lot of things we had to pay double to find out.
Oh, I'm pretty good at figuring out the possibilities of any racket.
Other people's rackets, of course.
And now all I've got to do is, figure out how to find Patton...
- and how to prosecute him when he's ours.
- No, that isn't all.
Good, I was afraid it is going to be so simple... that I wouldn't be able to swing much more of a fee out of it.
Look at that Mr. Mason.
With pleasure sir.
In fact, for looking at that, there won't be any fee.
I'm more interested in finding that girl than in finding Patton and my money.
- I don't blame you, so am I.
- That's the girl that won our contest.
You boys up in Cloverdale are pretty fair country judges.
- Oh, I beg your pardon Mr. Braddington.
- Bradbury.
She was robbed, tricked by
Patton out of a 1,000 dollars prize.
Well, anyway, nature did alright by her.
As you know, we got an address on Patton through the bank... here in the city where he deposited our Cloverdale checks.
Just a phony mailing address, I hope you know.
But was enough for the girl, she felt she'd been cheapened and made ridiculous.
She left that night for the city.
- Poor Margie.
- Poor Margie?
Well, I feel rather responsible as sponsor of the contest...
- and as her employer and as a...
- And as a?
And as a man in love with the girl.
I was indeed quite anxious to marry her.
Well, when I find her
I'll put in a good word for you.
Exhibit A, torso and legs, very good.
Have you anything else in the files from the neck up?
Oh, I meant to show you this other picture.
That's the anonymous one she had to submit first in the contest.
No personal favoritism, you know?
We wanted the contest to be strictly on the level.
Well, this is something to look for alright.
- Don't worry, we'll find her.
- I must say Mr. Mason, I am worried.
My introduction to your working system was hardly conducive to encouragement... on a matter on which I feel so deeply.
Oh, I'm sorry if you found yourself in a position at all awkward.
I assure you that anybody in town will recommend... very highly the results I get with my system.
Your system is rotten Perry, on the verge of complete collapse.
For a doctor might be permitted to make such a statement.
You'll be permitted to make such a statement over my dead body.
That's just the situation I wish to avoid by bursting in here.
The perfect time for an analysis of my condition... when I'm interviewing a new client Mr. Braddock.
Bradbury.
Mr. Bradbury, this is my physician, the mortician's friend.
- Pleased to meet you, I'm sure.
- Braddock.
- Bradbury.
- Oh, what's the name?
You're a liver case.
- Bradkins.
- Perry, you've got yourself... in an almost hopeless condition.
May I come in and say, I told you so?
The data on your I-ray shows the lining of your stomach is all torn to little pieces.
It won't matter it does show.
- I'll be leaving if you'll pardon me.
- I certainly won't.
You think I want to be left alone with this raving maniac Mr. Bradley?
Have to make a few final tests just to cinch your condition.
- The perfect morning to cinch my condition.
- Come over to the windows.
- Say Ah.
- Ah.
- Let me see the Ah.
- Ah.
Hold out your wrists, I'll take your pulse.
Shut up, shut up, shut up. You'll probably melt the thermometer with that fever.
Shut up, I want to get your real temperature.
Why, your, your hands are cold as ice.
Well, there's something radically wrong with your circulation.
Pulse fast, probably from high blood pressure, blood pressure is always high.
Perry Mason, I now pronounce you dead.
The mercury is frozen clear to the bottom.
Do you think I'm a case for Ripley's?
Young lady, will you please take a few instructions while I dictate them?
I'll be glad to. Come along
Mr. Bradbury, you will enjoy this.
Can you take shorthand Miss Street?
Well then you can do everything, can't you?
I understand Perry, you consider yourself something of a cook.
Well, from now on you'll have to give up your fancy cooking.
That means I can devote my unhindered efforts to see you sir.
In fact, you'll practically have to give up eating.
Well, it isn't as bad as I thought, I'm on a liquid diet.
- Strictly liquids.
- Will you join me Doctor?
No beer, no wine, no liquors. Now I'm going to break your heart, no whiskey.
Are there any other liquids?
- Milk.
- Milk?
You mean, that unpalatable byproduct of a cow?
Exactly, no excitement whatever in those stimulants.
Did you get that Miss Street?
No stimulants, no excitement.
- I'll have to get rid of you.
- Thank you, you flatterer.
I was going on a vacation... but I better stay on the job and take care of you while you take one.
The rest is absolutely imperative.
I'm so sorry Doctor, I'm afraid I neglected to introduce my new client Mister...
If you'll allow me to prescribe for you
I suggest you get a different lawyer.
Well, thank you Doctor any bill you send me for that advice I'll be glad to pay.
I'll keep in touch with you, so you can get me when the emergency finally arises.
Goodbye Dr. Croaker, call around again anytime... but don't expect me to defend you if they take away your doctor's license.
- Braddock, get some liver pills.
- Right.
Alright Mr. Bradbury, now there's only one thing I need to get things in action.
A thousand dollars.
Another thousand?
Well, you worse than Patton.
Right, that's why I'm the only man to beat Patton.
Come in dearest.
Oh, I beg your pardon,
I was expecting my husband.
How do you do?
Well, when he does come
I suppose you'll want this.
Thanks.
I got a job for Spudsy.
After the way Spudsy has found me even in the most secluded places.
Every time he wanted a loan, I..
I figured that Spudsy was the best man to find anybody anyplace.
You said it Mr. Mason, many is the time I've wanted to ditch him.
Hello dearest. Oh Hello boss.
Come on in Spudsy, don't be afraid, she's been missing badly today.
I'll keep peace in the family by sending you right out on a hunt for somebody.
Oh, that's swell boss, you haven't given me that kind of work in a long time.
It's been a long time since anybody gave you any kind of work.
Oh, now dearest.
Sit down Spudsy,
I've got the dope right here.
You're wrong Mr. Mason,
I've got the dope right here.
- Looking for somebody pal?
- Boss? Say, I'm doing alright.
That isn't our girl, our girl got legs, prize winning ones.
Oh, what I'm trying to tell you is I just caught your guy for a five spot, not bad, eh?
Not good, when I'm paying you to find Patton.
That's the guy I'm talking about, I not only find him... but I borrowed this five bucks from him.
You might've known you could depend on me.
Did you bother to discover where he's staying... and if he continues to stay there now you've pegged him?
You think I don't mark up the hangout of a sucker like that so I always have it on me?
There's the address right there.
Number 19852, neck 16 and a half, sleeve 35, pre-shrunk, very pretty.
Well, it must be on the other tail on account of I have to write left-handed.
- Sure this Patton is the right guy?
- Sure, is the right guy.
I borrowed a fund from him, didn't I? He can't be wrong.
- Where is the drugstore?
- You want an aspirin?
No, a telephone.
- There's a drugstore.
- Come on.
Hello yourself.
Why Della, what are you still at the office for? Locked in?
Why must you always click the phone in my ear Miss Street?
I've located Patton and I'm on my way to visit him.
Well, I'll wait around to hear the good news.
Oh, but if I don't bob up within an hour you better have Patton's address, just a minute.
Spudsy, your shirttail please.
No, I'm not studying haberdashery.
Empire Apartments, suite...
No, I'm not getting affectionate, suite 502 sweet.
- Thank you Spudsy.
- Oh, no, no.
- I have to go now.
- Oh, Why? Where?
Does it make any difference?
You didn't seem to care what
I did after I went in the contest.
Oh, I think the fact that I really care is... pretty well proven by my coming up here to the city.
And you want me to care or you wouldn't have written me where I could find you.
I'm sorry, but you just got here at a very unfortunate time Bob.
Well, if unfortunate why can't I help you or at least be given a chance to try?
I wish you wouldn't ask me anymore questions,
I have an appointment and I'm late right now.
Oh, who with? Patton?
Bradbury? You got to tell me.
- Please, Bob.
Sounds like my horn, it is.
I'll be back in a minute darling.
Here, I'll pay the check.
How much do I owe you?
Sixty cents.
Look, I want to sneak out the back way, how do I go?
- Right out there.
- Don't tell him which way I went.
Don't worry baby, I never tell.
But I tell you officer, this is my car, I'm Dr. Doray.
Ok, it's your car, it's your ticket.
Suppose there was a fire, how do you expect they connect up that fireplug?
Well, I'd explain to you how but I'm in a hurry.
Well, the jail is calm down many a guy that's been in a hurry.
- Thank you.
- Oh, you're not going to move the car?
Oh, why should I? I'm going to pay 5 dollars for parking it here.
Oh, a wise guy. Well, I'll fix that.
Say, where's that young lady
I was sitting up there with?
Oh, she went out back way.
Empire Apartments.
Where have I seen that face before?
- Anything I can do for you sir?
- Eh? No, no, I'm just browsing.
Just, shopping around for a bargain.
What floor? Six.
- How many fingers have you got?
- Five.
That's right.
Hello, anybody here?
Hello hello hello.
Hello hello hello, is Mr. Mason there?
Hello Della, will you please stop screaming?
Have you forgotten the doctor ordered no excitement for us?
Your Mr. Bradbottom is the one excited.
He just phoned from his hotel to have you call him immediately.
Having a nice talk with Mr. Patton?
No, the only thing I'm going to tell you now... is to follow the instructions the doctor gave me implicitly.
Why?
Because recently, the death rate in this city is been increasing.
Goodbye Della.
Was in the apartment right across from me, 502.
And then I heard something fall.
Like when you tip over a lamp or when a body hits the floor.
- You looking for somebody mister?
- Oh hello officer. Yes Frank Patton.
I understood this is where he was supposed to be living, seen him?
Anything very important?
Perry Mason. Well, must've been important or you wouldn't be messing around with it.
What's up officer, I've been trying to get in for several minutes.
This lady said she heard something suspicious.
Well, that's more than I heard, I couldn't even raise an echo.
- Well, let's go in and have a look.
- I'm afraid you'll find the door locked.
- Oh, you tried it, eh?
- Yes, I tried it.
When did you hear your suspicious sounds?
It all ended with a bang about ten minutes ago when I went to call the officer.
I see.
Oh, but before that there was a woman in there laughing and crying hysterical like.
They're always screaming something about Lucky Legs.
Well goodbye, let me know if you find anything officer or if you arrest Patton.
I'll be dying to know.
Who is it?
The milkman.
These aren't the legs that won at Cloverdale.
You can't fool me.
These legs were good enough to win in Waynesville.
Say, whoever you are, you better beat it before I call a cop.
You won't have to call them.
They'll be here soon enough.
- Where is Margie?
- Margie? She's, she's taking a bath.
You will have to prove that to me.
- But you can't go in there.
- Can go in now, who are you?
Well Margie...
I just wanted the whole truth about you and nothing but the truth, I'm your attorney.
- My attorney?
- The best, Perry Mason.
I just want to ask you a few questions, you mind stepping out into the kitchen with me?
- Well, can't we talk in here?
- No, because I haven't had my dinner.
You see, the doctor is got me on a diet so
I have to get my regular food between meals.
- Make yourself at home.
- I don't think you'll have to tell him that.
Is there enough in there for you?
You won't mind answering a few questions Miss Clune?
See, the first thing I want grade
A milk, I don't really want that.
Everything you need isn't there just ask, we'll be glad to run out and get it for you.
Fine, splendid hospitality... here at the new headquarters of the Lucky Leg
Girls Society for the abolition of Patton.
You Margie, went to the Patton address... the banks gave Mr. Bradbury and Mr. Bradbury gave to you.
Patton wasn't fool enough to live at that address but Thelma was.
Living there, I mean.
Patton figured if Margie could trace him there anybody could.
So he gave up the apartment and moved you two over here... figuring he might as well stall you up together.
- Now don't tell me I'm wrong.
- I wouldn't dare.
And Bradbury hired you to find me?
I'm to build up a case against
Patton that will put him behind bars.
Do you? You think you can?
I have an idea Margie that Patton is going to be put away for all time.
Sardines and chocolate cake.
The doctor didn't say anything about them so they ought not to hurt me.
Too bad that refrigerator hasn't got wheels so you could take it with you when you go.
I never liked ice boxes for companions, there's no friendly warmth to them.
I, I've just been up to see Patton.
Let's all go in the other room where we can be more comfortable.
Well girls, where would you say was the coziest place to sit?
When you found everything else you ought to be able to find that.
Alright, follow the leader.
Sit down girls.
Only I hope the next time you'll have the Mediterranean sardines.
Did you, did you get anything out of Patton?
Not, only a knife.
- You mean Patton is dead?
- Marvelous how you guess these things.
We haven't got anything to do with it, why you come here?
Because you went there by appointment.
Oh, I couldn't get in,
I knocked and-and knocked... and nobody answered, so I left.
Yes, I saw you leaving but before you left there a woman in the next apartment... had sent for an officer because she'd been annoyed by a woman in...
Patton's place having the bouncing hysterics.
I'm telling you the truth.
I couldn't even get in, it wasn't me.
- Some girl was screaming about Lucky Legs.
- Well, it could have been a lot of girls.
He pulled his double crossing contest all over.
Oh sure, in Waynesville I got the most votes and the most gypping.
Yes, it might've been you.
Were you up at Patton's tonight?
No, no and I can prove where I was.
With a boyfriend, you can phone him.
- That's a good idea.
- Prospect 83945.
Prospect 83945.
Hello?
Ok, it's a man.
Yes?
Oh yes, I, I know the person.
Good, we found your phone number on her body.
Right now poor Thelma Bell is here in the emergency hospital.
She was injured in an auto accident about an hour ago.
Hey, what kind of a stall is this?
- I was with Thelma Bell an hour ago and I...
- Oh George Sanborne, you dirty chiseler.
Hello? Hello?
Well, anyway... he knows now that there's really been an accident.
I suppose you think he's going to rush over to the emergency hospital.
Yeah, wouldn't surprise me.
His conversation ended with a loud crash and a woman's ferocious scream.
- A woman's scream? That double-crosser.
- Oh, I doubt that he is.
Anyway, he clears you temporarily, bur Margie...
Margie was at Patton's apartment.
And when I came in, she was taking a bath.
Well, what's wrong with that?
Don't lawyers take baths?
Very few, I like them, but the police wouldn't.
They'd say that Margie was washing off bloodstains.
A very good cake.
- What's your middle name Margie?
- Florence.
Alright.
The police won't be long spotting this place.
Go to the Rex Hotel and register as Florence Clune of this city.
You, aren't in love with that Bradbottom Bradbury, are you?
Good.
My phone number is on the card
I gave you, keep in touch with me.
Here's your change madam.
- What will you have?
- Milk.
- Milk? That's a hot one.
- I'll have it cold.
Milk? What am I? Bartender or dairy maker?
- Mason?
- Yes?
- Mr. Bradbury is having his bath.
- It's about time.
Quite an epidemic of bathing in this town.
- Oh, is there sir?
- Yes, sit down, I'll tell you about it.
Oh, no sir,
Mr. Bradbury will be down soon sir.
He wants you to have a midnight snack with him.
But I am on a diet.
When the doctor put me on that diet why didn't he prohibit you?
- High ball, cocktail?
- Whatever you're having boss is ok with me.
Ah? Make it two bartender.
Boy, do I need a slug of that liquid dynamite to pick me up.
Hey, what is this?
Will you gentlemen have plain or charged water for chasers?
Thank you.
Well, I saw Patton tonight.
Nice guy Patton, awful big hearted with his money.
Well Mason?
You can read all about it in the morning papers.
- He's dead.
- What?
Stabbed through the heart with a surgical knife.
Surgical knife?
- Oh, this is awful.
- Really? Looks marvelous.
Circumstances rather heavily involve your friend Margie.
Seems very tasty to me.
No matter how deep Margie is in this, you got to protect her.
I understand exactly how you feel.
I've already taken steps to take care of her.
I don't care what she's done, you save her.
You can have anything you say everything I've got.
Don't worry about that.
Suppose we start like this...
- Little Margie went to town.
- Yes?
For the purpose of finding Patton.
- Well?
- Now then...
That makes us reasonably sure that the girl was at Patton's apartment... either before or after the killing.
And so from what I've told you it ought to look pretty bad for Margie.
Even you can see that.
I mean you being a little prejudiced.
I think I can say without prejudice that Margie isn't the kind who would.
Well, she might've gone to him in an effort to make him pay her... some of the money that was rightfully hers, but she wouldn't..
Oh, thanks mister, I've been so busy on this case I ain't had time to buy none.
You say Mr. Mason the murder was committed with a surgical knife?
- Inserted very expertly.
- A doctor.
Doray.
Make it do re mi and I'll solve the whole case by meself.
That's very unfunny.
Dr. Doray Mr. Mason, is a young man who's very much in love with our Margie.
My associates in Cloverdale tell me he's come up to this city after our Margie.
There seem to be a lot of people other than the police after our Margie, as you call her.
Doray is very anxious to marry Margie... but I don't think she likes his possessiveness or his impulsiveness.
Do you think he is possessive enough and impulsive enough to undertake...
- such a violent vengeance for her?
- He's a very violent chap.
And if he followed Margie to Patton's apartment and heard the screaming...
Well, there's no one I'd rather pin this killing on than a doctor.
Come on Spudsy, I've got to get some rest.
You know, this strict diet is very weakening.
- Goodnight Mr. Bradbury.
- Good night.
Good night.
Waiter...
- Yes sir, Check sir?
- Menu please, I'd like to order my supper.
Very good sir.
We get a hot lead on the Clune girl from
Cloverdale, we get to her apartment and...
Perry Mason has spirited her away.
He spirits away plenty of girls who could win beauty contests.
Then a car belonging to Dr. Doris or Dorey or something from Cloverdale... is towed into the station for parking in front of a fireplug.
And while your busy boys were towing in a parking pickup...
- somebody murders somebody.
- With a surgical knife.
Well, there's a whole bag of surgical tools in this...
Dr. Dorey's car, this Cloverdale croaker.
Bissy, I wish you'd be less apoplectic and more specific.
Alright, I'll be specific.
I want a warrant for Perry Mason's arrest.
That's specific but, but silly.
Mason is not crooked, he's just smart.
Smarter than you, and too often smarter than me.
But I'm not so sure he wasn't even in the death room.
One of my cops saw him at the door just before he discovered the body.
Bissy, why do your men always arrive at the scene of the crime just after Mason?
Well, I suppose it's because before they decide to... commit a murder, they hire Perry Mason to defend them.
I've got an option on his services myself.
If any crooked politician ever tries to impeach me...
I'll be defended in court by Perry Mason.
Well, before that, you're going to be prosecuting him.
Because for once we got
Perry Mason in a nice hot spot.
Mr. Mason is right in there but you can't...
I know.
I want to see him, he wants to see me, so that makes it unanimous.
- Yeah, but I don't think...
- I can tell that by looking at you.
Hello boss, what's the matter? Got a headache?
Yes, I have now, through smoking flame you got to go where I am.
Oh, yeah? You'll be glad I found you.
- I've got bad news for you.
- You're bad news any time.
I just left your office and apartment.
There's cops waiting for you everywhere.
- Ain't it kind of hot in here?
- No, I hadn't noticed, take your hat off.
Thanks.
- Get anything from the cops?
- Not a cent.
They're burning up because they can't find you.
Because they can't find anybody connected with the killer.
Boy this is killing me, they're sore because they think you've spirited everybody away.
- You mind if I take my coat off?
- Go right ahead, take your pants off.
Thanks.
Hey.
You guys are going to catch cold sitting around like that.
But this is health institute calling Mr.
Mason, can't you see it's an emergency?
Oh, don't give me that, you're not sorry at all.
Boy it's hot in there,
I don't see how you stand it boss.
Just trying to get the office, line is busy.
Probably Della calling a beauty parlor.
- Might help.
- But can't you give me the message?
Because I am
Mr. Mason's very private secretary.
Well, I have a little tip for Mr. Mason.
Strictly confidential.
The gentleman at the switchboard will save me the trouble of taking that message, won't he?
What did you get?
This was the tip, the Clune dame just left town confidentially.
Say, we better phone that into headquarters, don't you think?
Yeah.
Oh no, you mustn't do that you nice policemen because that message was confidential.
- Get that.
- Yes sir.
Hey, wait a minute, you...
She's disconnected this connection, I can't hear a thing.
Open that door.
Hello Della, any customers drop in?
Well, there are several gentlemen here in blue uniforms.
They look awfully funny.
Yes and there's one man in civilian clothes.
He looks funny too.
I guess they just dropped in on their way home from a masquerade.
Open up the door.
It's Mason, we want words with him.
Some kind lady phoned... to tell us all confidentially that Margie Clune is just left town.
Yes, will be fine for you if they get her for the murder... after everybody knows you've been hiding her.
Yes, very pretty.
Well, don't flirt with those gents just because they've got uniforms.
Wait till you see the striped outfit they're tailoring for me right now.
Don't say goodbye like that.
- Come on, open the door.
- Gentlemen gentlemen please.
If this continues, I shall be forced to send for the police.
- Who was that on the phone?
- Well, the garbage man.
- I told him to send up enough for four.
- What?
Come on, hurry up.
There's probably cops watching the place, I'll go out the back...
- way and meet you around the corner.
- Wait a minute Thelma.
Running out on me darling? When you knew
I'd be back for more of that marvelous cake?
I was just going home, to Waynesville.
And now you suddenly changed your mind and you're just going home to your apartment.
- Say, who is this guy?
- That's a question I don't have to ask you.
You got George Sanborne carved into your forehead.
That's what you get for refusing to believe me when I told you that...
Thelma was in the emergency hospital.
- Perry Mason, eh?
- That's the guy.
I'm glad I didn't break you two up... because I wanted to hear Thelma's alibi so I'm going to duet. Go on, harmonize.
Well, George will tell you, we were out and around together that night, we... stopped in a couple of places and had a few drinks we, George will tell you.
I think you better let George tell it, you're not doing so well.
But before you tell it Georgie, remember a man is been murdered.
Listen, I got nothing do with Patton's murder and I don't want to have any part of it.
- Is that so? Anything he says now is a lie.
- Thelma had a date with Patton.
I told you Mr. Mason, that's a lie to begin with.
Shut up, you went to meet him and then later called me up, in a jam.
Over the telephone, we fixed up the alibi that got me get dump.
Wait till you see the bandages they drape on you when I'm through with you.
- One murder isn't enough for you, eh Thelma?
- I didn't murder Patton.
I didn't even go near his apartment.
Oh, let me help you.
And when that hanky gets too wet I've got a dry one here.
Exactly like the one you're using.
One I found by Patton's corpse.
Well, that clears me and I clear out.
Goodbye Georgie, only next time don't forget to duck.
Now, Thelma, do you want to tell the truth to me or to the police?
I didn't kill him, I didn't kill him, I didn't kill him.
You probably find it easier proving that you should've and that you didn't.
I went up there and told him he'd better... pay me what he owed me or I'll make plenty of trouble.
You made trouble enough not only to annoy
Patton but the lady in the next apartment.
He started slapping me around and I screamed, then he hit me good.
There was a man who came to the door and he shoved him out.
Then he shoved me around some more and we kind of wrestled into the bedroom.
And then there was another knocking on the door and Patton locked me up in the bathroom.
I heard men quarreling, it sounded like the same man back.
- Man, eh?
- Yes.
I don't suppose you had sense enough to stop hollering and try to find out what men.
Oh, I just wanted to get out.
And somebody bumped against the bathroom door.
In any country but this, they've let him in.
I got the bathroom door unlocked with a nail file and I opened it.
Well? Come on, out of the bathroom, I'm waiting.
I opened the door and Patton's body was leaning against it.
He fell in almost on top of me.
- And you carved him as he fell?
- Oh, no. No. I almost fainted.
That must've been when I dropped my handkerchief.
Well, I'll believe that if I believe anything.
- You remember Margie?
- Yes, where is she?
Strange, very strange. A woman called me up and told me that she left town.
Well, she went to the hotel like you told her.
A telegram came here for her and I sent it over to her.
- A telegram? How long ago?
- About an hour ago.
The hotel didn't tell me anything about a telegram.
They said she checked in and checked out.
Well, I found out that... right after she got the telegram she left for the Central Airport.
There's only one plane taken off since then Mr. Mason.
You protect yourself with a passengers list, of course.
- Yes sir.
- I'm interested in the ladies, as usual.
- There were no lady passengers.
- No lady passengers? Are you sure?
There was a young man who seemed to be expecting a lady.
He bought two tickets and watched the front door and he almost missed the plane himself.
- Two tickets for where?
- Summerville, that's the first fuel stop.
- Is there a plane I can charter?
- Sure.
Get it out for me.
Are you the gentleman who ordered that charter job?
That's right, I want to catch that passenger plane that just took off.
- Oh, a comet couldn't do that.
- Well, I want to get to Summerville.
Oh, Summerville?
Well, I think this crate ought to make that.
Well, that's encouraging, let's try it.
- The trip was a little rough.
- Yes, I noticed that.
- Well, undo these for me, will you please?
- Oh, sure.
Thank you.
Who got off the last plane from the south? A matter of life and death.
Only one passenger, he looked sicker than you do.
Sir, I am on a very dissipating diet.
- What's his name? Where he go?
- His name was Roberts.
I dropped him in a bus for the Lakeview Hotel.
You haven't got a lake here, have you?
No, but the hotel has beds for you to lie down on.
That's a very clever remark, take me to a taxi please.
The last plane brought in a man who was pretty airsick.
- I see. Oh, what I can do for you?
- No, no, I mean the plane before the last.
- He's registered under the name of Roberts.
- Well, who are you?
My name is Perry, I'm a lawyer from the city.
Well Mr. Perry, we have a Mr. Roberts up in 301.
That's a bridal suite, you know?
How should I know?
- All alone in the bridal suite, eh?
- All alone.
Well, we mustn't let him get lonesome.
What? No rice? No old shoes?
Where is the curious bride?
If you're looking for the way out, that isn't it.
All alone in the bridal suite.
You must love yourself.
Whoever you are, we don't make an appropriately agreeable young couple.
I am not a habitual frequenter of nuptial chambers but you may have heard of me anyway.
I'm Perry Mason, Dr. Doray.
Now that we know each other, get out or you'll be kicked out.
Just like Patton perhaps. Well, you'll have to use a different knife on me.
Well, I won't need a knife on you.
Bring yourself to life, you're a doctor.
It'll be much cozier here when Margie gets here.
Margie isn't coming here, why you hit me?
Just self-preservation, you missed me.
- Now, where's Margie?
- How should I know?
Well, you should know.
When your head clears, you were at the Rex Hotel with her.
You know, I make more money out of these things.
On various cases than the man who manufacture them.
If you're Mr. Mason, you're the one who sent her there, I only helped her move.
Margie is the girl you intended to marry and she's the girl you thought was at the door... when I tapped with the timid touch of a blushing bride.
I told you Margie wasn't coming here with me.
Then why did you buy two plane tickets?
You know so much Mr. Mason.
I'm not going to lie to you.
- Good, that's darn decent of you.
- In fact I'm not going to tell you anything.
Well, then I'll have to save you the trouble of... making up something by telling you what happened.
You won't want to use that phone, this story will fascinate you.
After the unlucky Lucky Legs Contest you followed Margie to the city.
Nobody can hang me for loving her.
No sir, I like her myself.
I came up here as a lawyer hoping to find her and aid her.
- Why won't you help me help her?
- Well, how can I?
By telling me where she is and why she isn't with you.
- Margie wasn't coming here with me.
- Yes, she was.
And the reason she isn't here is because the police caught her in town.
And she's not going to get here, but the police will any minute.
That's a very good imitation of me imitating a bride.
I'll be the butler.
Well..
Fancy meeting you here.
Margie.
Well, it looks like Margie made a liar out of both of us.
Bob, what's happened?
You two would better worry about what's going to happen.
Since you didn't show up at the airport
I've been crazy wondering what became of you.
My taxi broke down, I missed the plane and took the first train.
Why don't you let me run the show... instead of letting a small town doctor drag you into a spot like this?
If I can't save you with legal science... all the medical science in the world won't save you when they execute you.
The doctor didn't drag me here and I didn't kill anybody.
Well, you practically confessed to killing when you left town.
Well, when I got the telegram telling me to leave, I was afraid to go alone.
So I called Bob and we planned this.
You shouldn't have paid any attention to anybody but me.
- Who sent you a telegram?
- You did.
- I did?
- It has your name signed to it.
Well, if I weren't strictly on an anti alcoholic diet I..
I think that maybe in a wild moment I might've but...
I didn't.
I never liked big black sedans and I never liked big blue uniforms.
Margie, the police have caught up with you already.
- How you like to help Margie for a change?
- Oh, I'll do anything I can.
Well, I don't know whether you can but we'll try.
It'll probably be the hardest thing you ever tried to do in your life.
- Well, what is it?
- Just keep absolutely quiet.
What else?
That will be plenty when they start giving you the works.
And don't think you're not going to get the works.
We'll see you later, come on Margie.
Oh, hang together and you'll hang separately.
Come on Margie, we better get going.
Oh, wait a minute, we can't go down like that, we will meet the cops coming up, here.
- What is it please?
- It's a mistake, excuse it please.
Wife, have you locked our keys in the room again?
- Oh boy.
- Yes sir?
- Boy, have you a pass key?
- Yes sir.
Will you open up please?
My wife is locked the keys in again.
My dear, if your head weren't locked on you you'd probably lock that in too.
- Thank you very much.
- Anything else sir?
No, that will be all thanks.
I just don't want to be disturbed.
What are we going to do now?
- Mr. Mason, I'm scar...
- Silence, don't you know I'm saving you?
Here it is, right here.
No, that ain't the bridal suite, that's 309.
The clerk said it was 301, come on.
Well, if they find you here we're both sunk, they'll drag me in with you.
Then I won't have a chance to save your neck if it deserves saving... by finding out who really killed Patton, you or Doray.
Hey, I don't need you, I'll take this guy back.
- Search this whole house and find that girl.
- Ok Chief.
- Here, put this in your mouth.
- It's a pencil.
Thermometer to you.
- Open up.
- Quiet, this is a matter of life or death.
What's the idea...
What's the idea of creating such a disturbance?
You want to keep me from saving this woman's life?
Mama. I want my mama.
- Pretty sick, eh?
- Oh, terrible, terrible.
I was looking for a young...
Never mind that,
I'm looking for an ambulance.
All the local companies say they're tied up.
You, could you commandeer one for me please?
Me? Sure. I'll phone and get our police ambulance.
Oh, no, no, wait a minute. Don't phone here, you'll disturb her.
You're sure the police ambulance is reliable?
- Oh, don't worry Doctor, she'll be alright.
- Say, you're a prince.
Oh, that's alright Doctor, don't say anything about it. Glad to do you a favor.
Gently. Gently.
- Come on, stand back.
- Careful now, don't jar the patient. Easy.
- Have an accident?
- No, thank you.
- What happened?
- The girl is having a hemorrhage.
Well, don't you have one?
- Hey, Kasey.
- Yes Mr. Robert? They told me you were here.
Just got a wire from the city.
Did you come across a tall, dark guy with a mustache and a blond girl?
Yes, he was a doctor and he was attending a blond girl with a fever.
- How do you know?
- I stood right there and saw them.
You mean to tell me you let Perry Mason and the murderer slip through your fingers?
- Was that him?
- Sure.
And then what are we standing here arguing for? Why don't we go after them?
- Sure, but where are they?
- Well, let me see, they're..
They're in our ambulance heading for the airport.
Gentlemen, I want you to go back to the chief of police of Summerville... and the Chamber of Commerce and tell them that Dr. Prangander and his patient... will never forget their kindness and their hospitality.
Goodbye Doctor, goodbye lieutenant, just shut the door please.
Why didn't somebody stop them?
Well, there they go.
Yes, there they go.
What do you suppose I'll get for this?
You...
Why don't you and your boyfriend go out looking for Mr. Mason?
I'm sure Mr. Johnson... that Mr. Mason will appreciate your cutting the leaves of his law books.
Somebody ought to do it.
And of course, he's always been too busy with his practice.
I suppose if Mr. Mason does walk in here you'll both jump out the window.
Well, I've left it open for you hoping that my prophecy would come true.
Hey, hey.
- Didn't your mother teach you never to grab?
- Hello? Oh hello Mr. Mason.
This is Johnson.
When you going to be able to drop in for a moment?
On your way someplace else?
Listen Johnson, I'm tired of you bloodhounds using my office for a kennel.
Yes, I'll be there in an hour.
You better go out and get yourselves something to eat.
I might be tough to take on an empty stomach.
- Ah, getting a verbal spanking?
- Says he wants to talk to the lovely blond.
I guess he's been away so much he forgets what you're like.
Oh, just a moment gentlemen.
If you are anticipating listening in from my private office...
I'm awfully sorry to have to inform you but I have been a very naughty girl... and loosened all the connections.
Hello? Oh hello, you're the man who used to work here, aren't you?
Yes, they're going.
But I do think you should've given the creatures more than an hour to feed.
It's so far from here to the zoo.
I don't suppose you got a line on that anonymous lady who... called up so full of confidential information about Margie?
Oh, you don't, don't you?
Well, I got her name and address, where the police lost her, I had Spudsy start in.
Wasn't that smart of me?
Yes. Eva Lamont, eh?
Yes, yes, I've got it in my head safe.
Oh, oh, Della, let me tell you, no, no,
I better not tell you on the phone.
Goodbye Della.
Well, well Margie, here we are, alone at last.
And we have so much in common, we both know Eva Lamont.
- You're not trying to help her?
- Certainly not, she's trying to help me.
Who is her?
Oh, she was a model at Bradbury's working with me or rather against me.
Oh, you needn't be so jealous of her.
You've got me here, all alone, defenseless.
She's the one that's jealous of me, she always was.
Yes and she still is and she's still working against you and doing alright at it.
Come on, let's go and see just how well she's doing.
Hello Eva, what do you know?
Well, for instance, what do you know about Patton's murder?
Nothing and if I did I'd only tell it to Perry Mason.
Perry Mason?
- I know that name, lawyer guy, ain't he?
- My lawyer and the best in town too.
Yeah, I know somebody who thinks he's the best in the world.
So if you're bluffing, you better watch out or I'll call him.
Yeah, maybe you'd better.
Get me Plymouth 1-6-6-5.
Just ask Mason if it ain't alright for me to investigate you thoroughly.
Hello? Yeah, hurry.
Hello? Oh hello Mr. Mason.
Yeah. Eva, Eva Lamont. Yeah, been having a terrible time trying to get hold of you.
There's some man here who pretends he's an officer or something.
- Just say I'm a private investigator.
- A private investigator. Yeah.
What do I do? Oh.
Oh, thank you Mr. Mason. Yeah. Goodbye.
He says to see him in his office and for me to have nothing to do with you.
You're sure that was
Perry Mason you was talking to?
I called his office a little while ago and he wasn't there.
When you try to get to Perry Mason it makes a difference who you are.
Well, I guess that's right.
Well, I, I got to see him someway.
I warn you, you're going to have a tough time.
Oh, come on in honey.
It's good to see somebody from the old hometown.
Especially you Margie, because there's somebody that would like to see you.
- Get me police headquarter.
- Not so loud, they're liable to hear you.
No, never mind that police headquarters number, get me Washing 2000 instead.
Come right in and sit down please.
If you're looking for Mr. Mason, I don't know when the gentleman will be back.
The gentleman is here.
Don't lie to me, you're no gentleman, you are Perry Mason.
Oh, I see you haven't been idle while I was out.
Glad that your work doesn't interfere with your art.
But who is this particularly hideous and dissipated devil?
You mean, the one with the big black circles under his eyes?
- Yes.
- That's you.
- Just a little touched in the head.
- Who now?
- Oh, we have company.
- Oh, haven't you two met?
Oh, goodness gracious me.
Come over into the meeting department.
This is my handicap Della Street.
- Della, this is Miss...
- How do you do?
- Oh, yes Miss Margie Clune.
- Oh, it's very nice having known you.
You must be a little touched in the head bringing her up here.
It's too late now for you to square yourself with the police by giving her up.
They want you too, as an accessory to the crime.
Heavens, don't forget what the doctor said, any excitement is bad for you.
Now we'll just keep this office locked and maybe through the door, our contest winner will give us some beauty hints.
Excuse me while I lock you in a little.
The total bill is just
83 dollars and 95 cents.
And if you'll just give me a statement with telephone... calls and everything itemized, I, promise not to complain.
We'll have it for you right away sir.
Well Spudsy, I sincerely appreciate this visit.
I want you to get Eva Lamont to my office as quickly as possible.
With the very minimum of casualties to either team.
Well, if I were you boss, I wouldn't walk around town with the cops looking for you.
Believe it or not, right now
I'm going out to hunt for a cop.
But I'm going to be very particular of what cop I find.
Oh, oh, very pretty.
What the well dressed man will wear.
Don't do that.
- Hello.
- I want to see Mason right away.
- Where is he?
- He's out.
- You sure he isn't in there drunk?
- Oh, I'm sure he isn't in there.
- But I can't guarantee that he's not drunk.
- Who's drunk? Bradbury again?
I'm in full control of all my faculties sir.
Oh, that's too bad.
But you do seem a little upset about something colonel.
- I am. I want to have a showdown.
- It's a fine night for it.
Have we anything else on for this evening?
Well, a little later, some people are dropping in but only for a few minutes.
Alright, start your show sir.
In all decency, you ought to tell what you know about this murder... so that Doray can be brought to justice and I can go home to Cloverdale.
What are cloverdales daddy?
Silence woman, this is serious.
Blood is been spilled Bradbottom...
Bradbury.
Do the police share your enthusiasm for Doray's conviction?
Well, the authority certainly believe that Doray was the killer.
Well, I don't always agree with the authorities.
But who else could've killed Patton with Doray's knife?
Little Margie Doray give her anything he had, even a knife to kill Patton.
Well, of course, we definitely want to get the real murderer.
- Oh definitely, that seems only fair.
- Oh, the Marines have landed.
More guests? Friends of yours Della?
- Never seen them before.
- We can go now Mason.
- Good, goodbye.
- You're coming with us Mason.
- You got your hat?
- Got your warrant?
- You'll need that before I need my hat.
- You get a break this way.
Headquarters just wants a questioning, sort of informal.
I'd like it better formal.
Oh, if it's formal I can wear my new evening gown, can't I daddy?
Yes dear.
If we get a warrant for you, that means a prosecution.
Prosecute me and I'll be defended by the best lawyer in town.
That's me Mr. Bradbury.
Hey... how come everybody ain't in there where it's comfortable?
On account of certain people that have been hanging out there lately, we're fumigating.
There's something awful smelly about this, I think we ought to take a peek.
That's another thing you'll need a warrant for, even to take a sniff.
- Hey, I bet that means something.
- He probably means the Clune girl.
It means you won't find out unless you want a little workout.
Oh dear. Oh. Here.
Oh Bradbury, you do something.
Oh, no. No, no, you mustn't go in there.
- Oh Margie? And now I find you here.
- Clune, I want you.
Hey, you can't do this without a warrant.
Della, she's liable to find that bottle of 80-year-old brandy.
Oh, I dread to think of it.
A little more to the right dearie.
- You let me alone, let me alo...
- I'm not going to leave you alone.
Call Chief Bisonette and ask him to bring the district attorney as our guest of honor.
In a minute we're going to stage the police annual picnic.
You better stop fooling with me.
You're being handcuffed Margie, for throwing my whiskey about.
Listen Mason, just because you're a big-time lawyer you think you can... get away with murder, runaway murderers.
Catching this girl here makes it so.
Now we can arrest you without a warrant.
Mason, you're under arrest. Hey, where is Mason?
Somebody want me?
Somebody important I mean Johnson?
The chief of police is on the phone, is he important?
Oh, just give him the message I gave you.
Just tell him he's invited to the picnic.
Say Mason...
Don't bother me Johnson while I'm investigating this delicate situation.
Ah. Well, at least
Margie didn't kill the brandy.
Mason, we've got you where we want you now.
You think the chief is going to come and visit you... or you're going to come and visit the chief?
May I answer for Mr. Mason Mr. Johnson?
The chief of police wants to know if he and the district attorney can come right over.
Certainly, tell them to come right away.
Tell them I am busy with Sergeant Johnson.
Lieutenant.
You'll be a sergeant when
I get through with you lieutenant.
Mr. Mason says it's alright to bring the district attorney if he's bathed and shaved.
But hurry Chiefy, we're waiting.
No, we're not going to wait... get your book Della, I want to start dictating my confession.
Your confession?
Certainly, I can confess if I want to, where's your book, Della?
Right here, where it fell the other night when you and I were...
Oh, I forgot, this is your confession.
Came a letter from
Cloverdale signed by a Mr. Bradbury.
You go Johnson, maybe you'll get shot.
- Come in Chief.
- Thank you sergeant.
- I told you so.
- Perry, you're never wrong.
Do come in gentleman and sit down and be quiet.
- Now, not so fast Mason.
- I'm sorry Bissy, am I ahead of you?
Mr. Mason is telling the truth chief, I mean he's confessing.
Alright officer, let Mr. Mason continue.
From experience I find it much less embarrassing... to listen to him before we go into court.
We'll start as is the custom by roasting someone who isn't present.
Let's take a very likely prospect.
Patton's first visitor the night death dropped in on him for a long stay.
- Miss Thelma Bell.
- You give me my money or I'll kill you.
And you've got the dough, you...
- give it to me or I'll give you something.
- Shut up.
I like to drink in peace and quiet.
I want my money. I want my money.
Lucky Legs, Lucky Legs.
Ah, why don't you behave?
Yeah, well, my legs weren't lucky for me and they won't be lucky for you. I'm going to...
Patton and Thelma wrestled and waltzed out into the bedroom.
Out in Patton's living room, the door slowly, slowly opened and a man...
- A man came in, that ought to be...
- Hello, Perry.
- How is the diet going?
- Oh fine, I'm learning to curdle.
Well, I'm absolutely off on my vacation in the morning.
Good, I need a rest.
Yes, but I wouldn't enjoy myself I had you to worry about.
Come on, I want to take a final examination of you right now, roll up your sleeve.
Sorry to make a show of you before all these people.
Oh, that's alright, I've been giving them quite a show myself.
Yeah, you hold that, you're doing nothing.
And now if I may be permitted to continue, when his menace came in...
Patton locked Thelma in the bathroom. Sorry, we haven't got a bathroom here Doctor.
Oh, never mind the bathroom.
Come on,
I'm going to take your blood pressure.
Come on, try and act normal for once in your life.
The man who entered Patton's apartment was just as crudely aggressive as the doctor here.
The two men got in quite a fight.
Ladies and gentleman, let us join Thelma in the bathroom.
Let me out.
Naturally, Thelma worked up quite a high blood pressure.
- How's mine Doc?
- Perfect, I'm sorry to say.
Suddenly, it was all calm at Patton's.
- It was all over quick.
- Come on, unbutton your shirt.
- How far you going with this thing Doc?
- Take it easy Miss.
Of course, that was just a simple murder.
You have to expect more troublesome complications with a medical examination.
Thelma had, evidently, been locked in bathrooms before... because it didn't take her long to open the door with a nail file.
But don't find any nail files in my chest, do you Doctor?
Shut up and I'll find out.
Then when Thelma opened the bathroom door...
Help.
As we all know, the handle sticking out of Patton's heart... was attached to Dr. Doray's surgical knife.
What are you preparing to stick in me Doctor?
Here it is.
Come on mister mister Brad Bradshaw.
Out you go, you got three months to live.
Come on Perry, sit down.
- Show me your tongue.
- Ah.
As soon as the doctor gets through probing into me...
I'll probe a little deeper into the surgical killing of another man named Patton.
- Not oh, ah.
- Ah.
Thelma finally got the freight elevator and went out the back way.
I saw Margie coming out the front way.
I recognized the lucky legs.
- Will that be all Doctor?
- It's all I can do here.
You'll have to step into my office to ascertain the final verdict.
- May I bring my guests along?
- Certainly. I've nothing to hide.
Alright, my friends.
The doctor's office is just down the hall.
If you want to know the final verdict on how Patton died and whether I'm dying... come along everybody.
- Well, Dr. Frankenstein.
- No cracks, this is serious.
May I be permitted a few words while you dissect me?
Nothing in the medical science would stop you from yapping. Lights out.
Oh Perry, you got the cutest kidneys.
Well, thank you Della, you say the sweetest things about me.
Come on Mason, let's get the story.
There were just two men interested enough in Margie to kill Patton for her.
Dr. Doray and Colonel Bradbury.
- The man who did it was...
- Lights please.
Put your shirt on Perry.
No matter what the doctor's report is
Mr. Mason on your physical condition...
I don't think there will be any trouble proving that you're mentally quite unsound.
Keep your shirt on Bradbury.
I'll have mine on in a minute.
I suppose you're going to accuse me of this murder.
You win a cigar, but you'll have to wait till we get back to my office.
Martin, aren't you supposed to be on your feet?
Yes sir. I just got here Mr. Mason told me to come up here as soon as I could sneak away.
You'll accept Martin's testimony, won't you, Bissy?
- I guess I'll have to.
- He's the alert officer... who pegged Doray's car brought it in with a case of surgical tools in it.
Tell the boss all about it Martin.
Well, I certainly was surprised when I honked the horn and out comes Dr. Doray.
What's so surprising about that?
Well, he thought the owner of the car was the same man he saw shutting the door of it... when he first pegged the traffic violation from across the street.
Yes sir, naturally, I figured he's the owner but I never see him again up until just now.
But that's him, alright.
Let's go in my office where we can relax. Oh, thank you Bissy.
Why don't you hire a valet Mason?
Well, you're a servant of the public, aren't you Bissy?
- Thank you Officer Martin, you may go now.
- I'll tell him when to go. Go.
- He certainly minds you, doesn't he Bissy?
- You said it.
Come in gentleman, come into the relaxing department.
Look here Perry, you accuse this man of murder.
Isn't it about time you prove something?
- Thank you Mr. Kenchester.
- Manchester is the name.
Bradbury went to Patton's apartment.
I hope you'll pardon my intrusion but I didn't know where Patton live.
And if I'd known I certainly wouldn't have paid you money Mr. Mason to find out.
You knew where he lived because you listened in at my office switchboard... when I telephoned Patton's address.
You remember Della the loud click on the line?
Yes, I remember, you accused me of clicking the telephone.
Bradbury went to Patton's apartment.
He heard Thelma's voice and thought it was Margie screeching.
Then when he found Doray's car parked nearby he knew Margie was around.
So he took the knife out of Doray's car and went back to Patton's with... blood in his baby brown eyes.
Isn't it a bit far fetched that I should stumble across Doray's car so conveniently?
You know, I thought it was a little far fetched myself but Copper Martin saw you.
And if you contradict him you insult Chief Bisonette.
And if you say you didn't go back and stick Doray's knife in Patton you... contradict me and that's worse.
So bad as it is, I'll take a chance, I did not kill Patton.
Well, anyway, after the murder I sent Margie into hiding... at a hotel where I always hide my clients because I happen to be part owner of it.
- Try to find out which one Bissy.
- I will.
I told Margie not to leave the hotel but she got a telegram telling her to get out of town.
Got your name signed to it.
But it was charged to your hotel bill which I generously paid.
Thelma forwarded the telegram to Margie's hiding place.
I knew she left and Doray knew she'd left.
Let me help you light that Bradbury with the packet of matches Doray got when... he took Margie to her new hotel.
Pull hard colonel.
Because you didn't know
Margie had left this address.
Are you forgetting again that I paid you money to find her address for me?
You found it without any help from me.
You found it on a telephone memo in Patton's apartment after you murdered him.
Gentleman, I have only one thing to say and it may disappoint all of you considerably.
Oh dear dear, I couldn't stand a disappointment now.
Will you excuse me gentlemen, if I step out of the room for a moment?
Sorry to be late Mr. Mason but we had to stop while I got bandaged up.
- Are you Mr. Mason?
- Yes and I always have been.
Sorry Spudsy, I didn't know that Eva was so hard to handle.
Oh, Eva was Ok, I brought her in easy.
But when I caught Eva, my wife caught me.
- Sucker, why didn't you duck?
- I did, but I came up too soon.
Come on Eva.
So you see gentlemen, all that's necessary to prove... where I was at the time of the crime is to find the little lady.
And here she is colonel and never say that this office doesn't give service.
It's very kind of you sir.
I knew she was your friend because when I showed her Margie she... pretended to phone the police and phoned you instead.
If Eva known then I was Perry Mason she would've known I was at the keyhole.
Eva, just explain to these gentlemen that we spent the evening together.
- Well, we...
- Yes, do Eva.
But before you explain to the gentlemen let me point out a few of them to you.
On your left is chief of police Bisonette and there is the district attorney.
- Yeah?
- Yeah, and in this city perjury is a felony.
Well, I'm just a little girl from the country.
And the only thing I don't like about this city is the jail.
- Eva, tell the truth.
- Ok, boss.
Mr. Bradbury phoned me to come to the city and when I got here... he told me to say I'd been with him since since o'clock.
- And when did you meet him?
- About 10:30, but only for a few minutes.
I didn't know he committed a murder.
Hey, you...
Well ladies and gentlemen, the winner.
Sergeant, you don't need to be afraid to put the handcuffs on him now.
And when Jack the knifer comes to, just give him my love.
And a very good night to all of you.
Oh, where are you going with that?
I can't go home tonight so I thought I'd sleep in the park.
- Oh.
- Thanks, boss.
- Oh, where you going darling?
- Well... you just wished us all a very good night and I know if I stayed, you'd be miserable.
Yes, I know, but I suspect you Della.
When the police and I were wrestling who were you going to hand that vase to?
- Me or the cops?
- Well, you just solved one mystery.
Ah, that's what I thought.
{3166}{3233}- Mr. Dragore, please.|- Oh, him.
{4143}{4175}No sound, please.
{4186}{4234}After two years, I find you.
{4259}{4302}I want the Eternal Light.
{4320}{4357}You've found me too late.
{4369}{4404}It's no longer mine.
{4550}{4637}I can kill with this from the end of the room.|No lies, please.
{4670}{4715}You cannot kill in England, Mahmoud.
{4728}{4798}They get their murderers here|and hang them.
{4825}{4860}I have not come alone.
{4862}{4905}If I hang, there are others.
{4916}{5007}The Eternal Light goes back|to the tomb from which you stole it.
{5010}{5090}- But I tell you, I have not got it.|- Please, I am not a child.
{5150}{5203}- I sold it.|- To whom did you sell it?
{5240}{5273}To Professor Morlant.
{5321}{5358}That robber of the dead?
{5415}{5440}Has he sold it?
{5442}{5487}- He did not buy it to sell.|- What then?
{5490}{5564}- Like you, Mahmoud, he believes.|- Believes?
{5573}{5673}He believes that the Eternal Light|will open for him the gates of paradise?
{5675}{5750}Even so,|he gave the best part of his fortune for it.
{5762}{5837}And, very soon,|he will know whether or not he was right.
{5842}{5873}What do you mean?
{5890}{5953}Professor Morlant is dying.
{6022}{6080}Then you think it will be buried with him?
{6084}{6115}I'm sure of it.
{6129}{6169}We have only got to wait...
{6174}{6205}until he is dead.
{6462}{6492}Anubis...
{6602}{6637}Opener of the way.
{7462}{7489}What's that?
{7704}{7745}- What is it?|- Good evening.
{7757}{7796}I stay in the neighborhood...
{7798}{7881}and, hearing of your master's illness,|I took the liberty of calling.
{7883}{7914}How is he tonight?
{7917}{7958}He'll never see the morning.
{7963}{8029}- He hasn't asked for anyone of my cloth?|- Nor will he.
{8032}{8109}He's set in his ways,|and they are the ways of the heathen.
{8111}{8153}I know he won't see the rector...
{8156}{8241}but though I'm a stranger,|I don't like to leave a man to die like that.
{8243}{8311}He'll die in his own fashion, as he has lived.
{8314}{8383}- Still, sometimes at the end...|- Not with him.
{8386}{8485}He's stubborn and unbending|and will be so at the throne itself.
{8528}{8571}I suppose I can be of no use then.
{8574}{8612}No manner of use.
{8714}{8740}Good night.
{9033}{9069}He's asking for you.
{9139}{9185}Where can I find Mr. Broughton?
{9537}{9562}Who is it?
{9570}{9601}Come in or go out.
{9838}{9901}You'll have to go up soon|if you want to see him again.
{10005}{10045}Curious house, this.
{10056}{10086}Curious owner.
{10090}{10189}Yes, but I suppose a great Egyptologist|can't be expected to be like other people.
{10197}{10250}He'll be like a great many other people soon.
{10253}{10306}That's not a very sympathetic thing to say.
{10310}{10351}I'm not a sympathetic man.
{10374}{10400}Want a drink?
{10455}{10519}- That's across the hall, isn't it?|- I dare say.
{10530}{10554}Thanks.
{10875}{10941}"September 22nd...
{11349}{11385}"Daily journal."
{11746}{11801}"The Eternal Light...
{11822}{11870}"mine at last."
{12478}{12525}I want to see Laing.
{12575}{12605}I'm here.
{12704}{12742}Is the door shut?
{12751}{12778}It is.
{12812}{12861}- No listeners?|- None.
{12922}{12981}- The curtains?|- They are drawn.
{13050}{13083}Come nearer.
{13436}{13482}This man, Broughton...
{13528}{13556}Watch...
{13574}{13597}Broughton.
{13614}{13657}You were always suspicious.
{13670}{13728}Have you ever trusted a living soul?
{13741}{13776}Only fools.
{13843}{13881}I trust you.
{13903}{13972}Better to trust in the spirit than in the flesh.
{13982}{14032}I put my trust...
{14064}{14116}in my own gods.
{14174}{14199}And now...
{14230}{14261}when I am dead...
{14302}{14334}my funeral...
{14362}{14416}you will bury me at dusk...
{14444}{14500}in the clothes I told you.
{14536}{14601}You will place the figure of Anubis...
{14632}{14695}at the west of the inner chamber.
{14700}{14725}I will.
{14770}{14805}And on the night...
{14828}{14870}of the full moon...
{14938}{14981}at the first hour...
{15031}{15119}I will make my offering of the Eternal Light...
{15146}{15178}to Anubis...
{15216}{15272}opener of the ways.
{15364}{15432}If I have done well in his sight...
{15494}{15589}those fingers will close over the jewel...
{15683}{15790}and he will open to me|the gates of immortality.
{15815}{15905}The hand of a heathen image|will not come to life.
{15947}{15980}The bandage...
{16970}{16993}Look.
{17113}{17196}This is the Eternal Light.
{17270}{17329}It must rest in my hand.
{17375}{17461}A man will not find peace|who robs his heirs.
{17489}{17533}Bandage my hand.
{17565}{17599}The Eternal Light...
{17614}{17655}must lie with me...
{17673}{17702}in the tomb.
{17729}{17770}You're afraid of me?
{17798}{17841}I'm afraid for you.
{17859}{17906}If this should leave me...
{17949}{18023}then you'll have reason to fear...
{18080}{18122}for when the full moon...
{18137}{18197}strikes the door of my tomb...
{18228}{18266}I will come back.
{18302}{18331}You hear?
{18357}{18430}I will come back to kill.
{18497}{18595}Bandage my hand.
{19570}{19597}Doctor!
{20141}{20168}Window...
{20219}{20243}open...
{21031}{21060}It's all over.
{21158}{21213}Make out a certificate: Heart failure.
{21311}{21385}What was the idea|of bandaging his hand like that?
{21410}{21437}I cannot say.
{21452}{21498}He had many a queer fancy.
{21556}{21626}I'll be round in the morning|to sign the certificate.
{21762}{21856}I'll not be leaving my master's side|till his body is laid to rest.
{21886}{21910}No.
{24552}{24587}Where are you going?
{24598}{24672}To feed the lamp that is to burn inside.
{27042}{27066}Wait!
{27094}{27141}You're leaving the key inside.
{27169}{27232}That was another of his queer fancies.
{27713}{27760}When your master died, Laing...
{27770}{27854}I believe him to have been possessed|of a jewel of great value.
{27879}{27917}Do you know anything about it?
{27924}{27949}Nothing.
{27954}{28048}- I advise you to be very careful, Laing.|- I have a careful nature.
{28050}{28126}You may be putting yourself|perilously near dishonesty.
{28147}{28189}I've seen men nearer.
{28390}{28430}You may regret this, Laing.
{29223}{29294}I want you to stay here|and watch that man with the clubfoot.
{29298}{29341}But I'm not a detective.
{29344}{29407}One more word from you, Davis,|and you're out of work.
{29424}{29509}I have reason to believe that he has stolen|a valuable piece of property.
{29514}{29562}He may make an effort to get rid of it.
{29565}{29649}Watch him, and telephone me|at my office if he leaves the house.
{29662}{29693}Very good, sir.
{30603}{30626}"Harlon."
{30772}{30817}"Miss Betty Harlon...
{30831}{30898}"52 Blandford Street."
{32955}{32984}Carrier!
{33176}{33204}From Wrexham.
{33215}{33317}Ten shillings if you'll drive me to Yoxford|station in time to catch the 5:00 train.
{33319}{33399}I'll oblige you, guv'nor.|I was going straight back, as it was.
{34007}{34101}That's a very old carpet. I should be glad|if you will not kick it to pieces.
{34106}{34166}I'm sorry, but when I'm angry, I do kick.
{34187}{34249}- Would you like to explain that?|- Yes, I intend to.
{34290}{34371}By your own statement, Miss Harlon and I|are the sole heirs of Uncle.
{34374}{34428}We were not informed|of his death or his funeral.
{34430}{34497}Your uncle died|and was buried in a certain way...
{34500}{34543}according to his wishes, which...
{34554}{34585}Need I go on?
{34595}{34685}Almost his last words|were a threat to return from the dead.
{34709}{34770}- In my opinion, he was mad.|- Well, that may be so.
{34773}{34820}Miss Harlon and I|should have been consulted.
{34823}{34889}I understood that you and her|were not on speaking terms.
{34891}{34951}So what?|You expect quiet at a funeral, don't you?
{34956}{34997}Yes, I also expected my offer.
{34999}{35073}I'm very sorry,|but this means a good deal to both of us.
{35076}{35154}- I thought he was worth about £4,000 a year.|- He isn't now.
{35161}{35201}What do you mean by that?
{35211}{35258}He spent a good deal, you know.
{35282}{35342}It may surprise you to know|that, some time ago...
{35345}{35403}he drew a check for £75,000.
{35410}{35439}What for?
{35448}{35473}I don't know.
{35486}{35557}You were in charge of all his affairs,|and you don't know?
{35560}{35589}That's what I said.
{35614}{35688}And I advise you to look after|the tone of your voice.
{35690}{35790}I'm not sure I haven't more important things|to look after than the tone of my voice.
{35794}{35824}I don't follow you.
{35836}{35905}I'm going to run down|to Earlsvale House tomorrow morning.
{35919}{35942}Yes, why...
{35959}{36018}I don't think you realize...
{36035}{36082}the conditions that you'll find there.
{36085}{36147}- No, that's why I propose to go.|- You won't like it.
{36164}{36208}You'll be most uncomfortable.
{36211}{36254}You don't advise me to go?
{36262}{36325}I think you'll be making a very big mistake.
{36356}{36385}Then I'll go.
{36422}{36505}By the way, does Miss Harlon know|anything about this will business?
{36507}{36581}No doubt she will have received|a letter from me by now.
{36587}{36632}- Do you know Miss Harlon?|- No.
{36654}{36726}I plan to have the pleasure|of calling upon her this evening.
{36794}{36818}Hello.
{36830}{36873}It's you, Davis. Wait a minute.
{36883}{36951}I have a visitor here,|but I think he's just going.
{36963}{36998}Thank you very much.
{37005}{37079}If you're going to see Miss Harlon tonight,|I shall be there, too.
{37082}{37169}No doubt you will succeed|in making a painful interview intolerable.
{37190}{37221}Good afternoon.
{37234}{37299}Your manner must help|your practice a great deal.
{37462}{37490}Now, Davis.
{37736}{37801}Can you direct me|to Blandford Street, please?
{37804}{37885}Follow the tramlines close on a mile|and then turn right at the church.
{37887}{37928}I'm obliged to you.
{38598}{38628}Hello, Kaney.
{38938}{38983}It's good to get out of that fog.
{38986}{39045}My dear, a most exciting thing|has happened.
{39067}{39107}Don't let it happen again.
{39110}{39190}No, not that. That's a chestnut. It's this.
{39226}{39269}It looks like a solicitor's letter.
{39272}{39315}It's just been delivered by hand.
{39318}{39373}Oh, dear? What haven't we paid?
{39383}{39437}I wonder if I'm gonna get a shock or not.
{39464}{39507}Kaney, that is a silly game.
{39541}{39592}After all we've said about Uncle Henry...
{39594}{39631}what do you think he's done?
{39634}{39687}- Something nice, at last?|- He's dead.
{39709}{39753}My dear, I'm sorry.
{39759}{39808}And his solicitor wants to see me.
{39810}{39849}My dear, I'm glad.
{39863}{39910}He was awfully rich, wasn't he?
{39925}{39967}He may have left you a fortune.
{39970}{40037}If he has, I'll buy you a private cinema.
{40045}{40101}I say, when did this letter come?
{40113}{40153}A few minutes ago. Why?
{40156}{40237}He asks me to telephone him|if I could see him here at 6:00.
{40256}{40337}You don't want to miss the chance|of a fortune for the sake of tuppence.
{40340}{40408}- You'd better run out and do it now.|- You're right.
{42985}{43029}- Miss Harlon?|- Yes.
{43941}{43964}What happened?
{43967}{44025}Somebody attacked me,|and snatched my bag.
{44029}{44106}- Why, good Lord, it's Betty Harlon.|- Ralph Morlant.
{44123}{44182}You would go and get yourself|into some kind of mix-up.
{44185}{44243}- You would arrive when it's all over.|- Thank you.
{44246}{44290}- I'm going home.|- Wait a minute.
{44298}{44350}I was on my way to see you,|strictly on business.
{44353}{44405}You wouldn't be allowed in|for any other reason.
{44408}{44432}That's good.
{45277}{45302}Taxi!
{45342}{45409}Penninghame Garage,|as quickly as possible.
{46188}{46224}So you've brought him.
{46234}{46303}Dear Mr. Broughton,|we're delighted to see you.
{46306}{46384}No, it isn't Mr. Broughton.|It's my cousin, Ralph Morlant.
{46386}{46464}Dear Mr. Morlant, we're delighted to see you.
{46470}{46523}Wrong again. We don't like him very much.
{46529}{46591}Don't we? I didn't realize.
{46603}{46677}- Our two families are not on speaking terms.|- Oh, dear.
{46683}{46773}As far as I can make out, it was started|by my late uncle as a Christmas joke.
{46784}{46838}- Won't you sit down?|- Thank you.
{46860}{46927}But now he's dead. The trouble's all over.
{46941}{46991}I'm not sure it hasn't just begun.
{47002}{47042}Where's Mr. Broughton?
{47047}{47099}He won't come, because I didn't telephone.
{47102}{47149}I nearly got throttled instead.
{47169}{47249}There was a man with a limp.|He pushed a note into my hand.
{47251}{47292}I just put it in my bag...
{47295}{47344}when somebody snatched the whole affair.
{47348}{47379}What was in it?
{47382}{47447}"There's something of value at Earlsvale.
{47461}{47520}"Others are after it, so come."
{47527}{47629}And Broughton was doing everything|he knew to keep me away from there.
{47639}{47691}There's a fox in the cover somewhere.
{47702}{47726}Goodbye.
{47755}{47784}Why "goodbye"?
{47797}{47865}I'm going there right away.|I'll let you know what happens.
{47868}{47950}You're wrong. I'll let myself know.|If you go, I go, too.
{47959}{47996}You can't do that.
{47999}{48083}Alone in a house with a man|you're not even on speaking terms with.
{48086}{48157}Don't be so absurd.|It's not as if I even liked him.
{48168}{48228}If another woman was going, perhaps.
{48230}{48317}- I suppose you want to come, too?|- Obviously, it's my duty.
{48324}{48366}And suppose I object?
{48383}{48445}I'm not so broke I can't hire a car.
{48470}{48539}All right, you win,|but for goodness' sake, hurry.
{48862}{48932}Girls, just get in as best you can.|There you are.
{49064}{49112}- You first!|- No, you. Hurry up.
{49221}{49260}This is an unspeakable car.
{49262}{49319}- There's no room for my legs.|- All right.
{49550}{49629}- It looks as if I'll have to walk.|- You might do worse.
{49635}{49702}There's a grand moon. It's full.
{51836}{51886}I'll see if there's a name on this gate.
{52010}{52056}There's nothing to show this is the place.
{52058}{52135}But there aren't any other places,|and I'm frozen.
{52144}{52196}It's no use going to the wrong place.
{52198}{52270}Wait. Here's someone on a bike.|Hi there, cocky, wait a minute.
{52335}{52387}I'm sorry. I didn't see you were a parson.
{52390}{52421}That's all right.
{52457}{52489}- Any trouble?|- No.
{52500}{52565}We just want to get to Earlsvale House.
{52574}{52607}This is it.
{52618}{52673}As a matter of fact, I'm calling there myself.
{52676}{52748}- Did you know my uncle, Professor Morlant?|- Slightly.
{52757}{52829}Perhaps I ought to introduce myself.|My name's Nigel Hartley.
{52832}{52903}- I'm down at Raveley. The vicar's ill.|- How do you?
{52926}{52963}I'm Ralph Morlant...
{52982}{53018}and this is Miss Harlon.
{53021}{53045}We're the heirs...
{53048}{53115}Couldn't we have the rest|of the introduction indoors?
{53118}{53160}Of course. You must be cold.
{53206}{53269}It's straight down this drive.|You go along, I'll follow.
{53271}{53296}All right.
{53938}{53967}Here we are.
{54127}{54173}The car will be all right here.
{54201}{54237}I'll show you the way.
{55450}{55489}What a horrible house.
{55515}{55569}I wish I was back home in bed.
{55626}{55666}I can hear someone coming.
{55954}{56005}Don't stand about. Come inside.
{56808}{56848}We'll go into the library.
{57613}{57706}I may be old-fashioned, but I feel awkward|when I'm not introduced to people.
{57713}{57780}I'm sorry. I forgot you didn't know|your clients by sight.
{57822}{57874}- This is Miss Harlon.|- How do you do?
{57886}{57947}I was expecting|a telephone message from you.
{57954}{58000}I was on my way to call you up...
{58004}{58063}when the most extraordinary|thing happened.
{58126}{58155}This is Miss Kaney.
{58214}{58242}How do you do?
{58377}{58422}You're a surprise, Broughton.
{58442}{58510}I have a great deal of business|to clear up down here.
{58513}{58596}This house has needed a woman|for about 25 years.
{58647}{58689}Now I've blinded myself.
{58714}{58778}You haven't wasted much time|in getting here.
{58781}{58835}No, just a little too much, perhaps.
{58842}{58922}Whatever do you mean?|Really, you're the rudest man alive.
{58939}{58985}Oh, pretty pussy!
{59013}{59058}How horrible! It's stuffed.
{59074}{59129}I dare say, you know|your own business best...
{59131}{59183}but why you should want|to bring a parson in...
{59186}{59263}- A pure accident. We met at the gates...|- So you brought him in.
{59266}{59353}- I can stand a certain amount, but no more.|- Don't let's make a battle of it.
{59606}{59651}- You stay here in the car.|- No.
{59662}{59731}I shall be among the trees, watching.
{60041}{60101}You may say I have no right|to express this opinion...
{60104}{60178}but to my mind,|it's a scandalous and disgraceful burial...
{60181}{60235}which may have disastrous consequences.
{60238}{60306}It'd be very disastrous|if he came back, wouldn't it?
{60309}{60377}- I quite see Mr. Hartley's point.|- You make friends quickly.
{60379}{60457}- And enemies quicker.|- Need we have these childish squabbles?
{60475}{60533}We all know that dead men don't come back.
{60637}{60687}I wish I was back home in bed.
{60700}{60764}- Hadn't somebody better answer that?|- Certainly.
{60774}{60818}- It's your house.|- Very well.
{61010}{61045}I'm sorry to disturb you.
{61048}{61112}But I was an intimate friend|of Professor Morlant.
{61155}{61222}You'd better come in.|We seem to be giving a party.
{61264}{61293}Thank you.
{61585}{61639}My name is Aga Ben Dragore.
{61648}{61679}An Egyptian?
{61690}{61719}An Arab.
{61722}{61774}I don't remember having heard your name.
{61778}{61831}I did not flatter myself that you would...
{61834}{61916}but I knew Professor Morlant|some years ago in Egypt.
{62152}{62189}I heard of his death...
{62200}{62249}and of his burial in my own faith.
{62262}{62325}I hoped, as I'm leaving England tomorrow...
{62328}{62388}that I might be allowed to visit his tomb.
{62418}{62473}I must protest against anything of the sort.
{62475}{62549}Why shouldn't the poor man|look at his friend's tomb?
{62558}{62596}I don't mind him going.
{62608}{62689}I can't believe|that you'd willingly encourage paganism.
{62692}{62742}The Egyptians were not pagans, sir.
{62769}{62821}As no doubt you know, Miss...
{62838}{62865}Kaney.
{62891}{62974}I think you're all being very unkind|to Mr. Dragore.
{62984}{63085}I don't think you people realize quite|how far Morlant's queer ideas took him.
{63094}{63152}He believed that after his death,|at a certain hour...
{63154}{63238}the image of Anubis would come to life|in his tomb and receive his soul.
{63246}{63281}It's horrible.
{63298}{63343}Well, I can't see that it matters.
{63346}{63416}After all, if that sort of mumbo jumbo|gave him any comfort...
{63418}{63459}It matters a great deal.
{63462}{63544}If my suggestion is likely to hurt|anyone's feelings...
{63567}{63592}please forget it.
{63595}{63678}I think that's very sweet of you, Mr. Dragore.
{63698}{63758}Your sympathy is more than charming.
{63804}{63893}Well, what about a cup of coffee,|after your cold drive?
{63907}{63971}I dare say, we should find some|in the kitchen.
{63981}{64059}May I offer my services as pantry man?
{64084}{64126}Quite sweet of you.
{64206}{64241}Come, Mr. Dragore.
{64303}{64403}Her sheer speed! She'll not let him out|of her sight for a moment, now.
{64406}{64450}Perhaps that's just as well.
{64482}{64548}Come along, Betty,|how about making a fire in the library?
{64550}{64575}Yes.
{64595}{64653}I'm sorry there should be|this sort of atmosphere.
{64655}{64724}After all, we're only ships|that pass in the night.
{64739}{64793}Do you want a drink, or will you pass now?
{64814}{64853}Well, thank you very much.
{65033}{65062}There you are.
{65350}{65417}If you build it that way,|there won't be any draft.
{65422}{65506}It'll be the only place in this house|where there isn't one, then.
{65518}{65600}Don't you think you carry|those snappy retorts a trifle too far?
{65603}{65700}Since we met, I can't remember you|saying a kind word to anyone.
{65705}{65760}Perhaps you're right. I'm sorry.
{66002}{66034}Six cups.
{66051}{66087}That's just...
{66100}{66139}four too many.
{66212}{66253}Tell me about Egypt.
{66281}{66326}Have you ever seen a sheik?
{66371}{66399}I am one.
{66600}{66629}Thank you.
{66674}{66723}Then how should I address you?
{66751}{66829}I'm cutting sandwiches for a sheik.
{66855}{66895}I don't feel quite well.
{66907}{66939}Don't be alarmed.
{66950}{67013}We're not quite as uncivilized|as people think.
{67022}{67056}Don't say that.
{67096}{67149}Do you ride a white stallion?
{67157}{67183}Sometimes.
{67202}{67254}Down the path of the moon...
{67268}{67362}the noble animal,|plunging and frothing at the nostrils...
{67371}{67450}till it founders at your feet,|faithful unto death.
{67458}{67493}Well, not very often.
{67496}{67548}You see, it's rather too expensive.
{67566}{67645}I know it's not your fault.|We were taught to hate one another, but...
{67648}{67692}You don't think I hate you, do you?
{67694}{67749}I can't somehow feel I'm your dearest friend.
{67774}{67824}You never did have a great deal of sense.
{67826}{67859}That's nice.
{67920}{68009}Ralph, I have a woman's intuition|that you and I are up against things.
{68040}{68128}- I'm pretty sure we are.|- Well then, let's cut the quarrelling.
{68134}{68184}Shoulder to shoulder? All right.
{68210}{68234}Partners.
{68618}{68693}Well, what a wonderful night.|It's a full moon.
{69090}{69149}Scared of a dead man in his tomb?
{69178}{69210}Shame on yourself.
{69281}{69379}Are you a child, that your knees|should rattle at the talk of a madman?
{69467}{69517}Look your enemy in the face.
{69542}{69606}It's the fear of the big door has got you...
{69611}{69684}and will hold you fast till you stare it down.
{69850}{69889}Do dead men walk?
{69922}{70004}I'm not thinking a dead man|will cross my path tonight.
{74214}{74251}I was dreaming.
{74270}{74347}Now I will show you|how we make coffee in the desert...
{74351}{74388}underneath the stars.
{74426}{74481}You don't make it yourself, do you?
{74487}{74531}No, of course not.
{74549}{74592}A Circassian slave...
{74594}{74673}Iovely as sin, cooks it for us, kneeling.
{74687}{74756}- And if it is not to our liking...|- I know!
{74781}{74834}She's stripped to the waist...
{74854}{74938}and lashed for miles across the Sahara.
{74950}{75042}Where she is finally eaten by locusts,|and rightly.
{75078}{75181}Now, take this canister,|and do exactly as I tell you.
{75234}{75269}And if I fail?
{75278}{75341}The Yorkshire moors are just behind us.
{75426}{75462}Six spoonfuls.
{75500}{75525}One!
{75614}{75640}Two!
{75732}{75758}Three!
{75808}{75833}Four!
{75867}{75893}Five!
{76117}{76194}Get off, you! Get your arms away from me!
{76275}{76339}What's the matter with you? Are you mad?
{76502}{76578}What was the matter with him? Was it drink?
{76581}{76625}No. Terror!
{76646}{76681}Stark terror!
{76699}{76741}Then I've caught it.
{76758}{76786}You stay here.
{76803}{76837}I'll look after him.
{76851}{76936}If you must look after somebody,|why look further?
{76990}{77016}Come on, then.
{77161}{77228}Ralph! That limp! I'd swear to it anywhere.
{77607}{77637}That's the man.
{77758}{77840}- Did you give a note to this young...|- Get your things and get out of here!
{77843}{77895}The master, I've seen him!
{78135}{78192}- Who screamed?|- I did.
{78194}{78293}That's the last time I'll ever try|to make coffee in a strange house.
{78295}{78345}That man with the limp, who was he?
{78351}{78413}Laing, your uncle's servant.
{78432}{78473}Well, he seemed mad to me.
{78709}{78737}Yes...
{78751}{78788}and probably dangerous.
{78813}{78873}Go into the library. I'll have a word with him.
{78876}{78951}Yes, come along.|Mr. Broughton understands the man.
{79312}{79376}It would do no harm|to warn my man to stand by.
{79378}{79436}Your man? Is he a sheik, too?
{79439}{79524}No, he's a chauffeur.|He's outside now with my car.
{79640}{79691}You're not leaving us, are you?
{79737}{79781}My dear lady.
{80000}{80066}Not a very courageous person,|our foreign friend.
{80090}{80132}You think he's run away?
{80146}{80174}Absurd!
{80187}{80286}I'd like to see you riding your bicycle,|with a Circassian slave, lovely as sin...
{80289}{80323}across the handlebars.
{80329}{80400}- What on earth are you talking about?|- Listen, good people.
{80402}{80488}Don't you think we're allowing this thing|to get on our nerves?
{80492}{80569}Don't you think if we took a grip|on our self control...
{80572}{80620}Now, listen, good parson...
{80622}{80711}this is our show, and our nerves|are probably as good as the next man's...
{80714}{80769}so keep that sort of talk to your pulpit.
{80772}{80835}I have no wish to interfere|where I'm not wanted.
{80838}{80894}Then don't. This is not a Sunday school.
{81027}{81083}After that, I think I can say good night.
{81098}{81128}As you please.
{81254}{81308}I'm sorry I was offensive. Good night.
{81310}{81389}The tongue is an unruly member, is it not?
{81400}{81424}Yes.
{81650}{81692}I was tempted...
{81758}{81801}but I did not fall.
{82057}{82093}I did not fall.
{82114}{82190}The thing's safe, I swear it.
{82302}{82372}When you told me|you'd come back from the grave...
{82376}{82415}how could I believe you?
{82426}{82486}I never knew such things could be.
{83500}{83568}I have not got it!
{83583}{83639}The girl, she has it!
{83651}{83682}I swear it.
{84333}{84423}What on earth's the matter with you?|You look as if you've seen a ghost.
{84426}{84453}I have.
{84493}{84587}I saw Morlant as plainly as I see you.
{84627}{84671}I'm gonna mix myself a drink.
{84875}{84922}Betty, just a minute.
{84994}{85019}Well?
{85033}{85093}I think they're trying to scare us|out of this house.
{86712}{86768}There's no use blinding ourselves|to the facts.
{86770}{86819}There must be something big at stake.
{86822}{86882}Something that depends|on getting rid of us?
{86894}{86935}That's how it looks to me.
{86943}{86986}But what are we going to do?
{88810}{88836}Who's there?
{88988}{89052}- I'm going down to that tomb and find out...|- What does...
{89054}{89113}It's the only way to find out|what's going on here.
{89117}{89185}I don't want to be left here alone.|Can I come, too?
{89209}{89275}There's nothing wrong with your nerve.|Come on.
{89532}{89604}- I'll put on a pullover and thicker shoes.|- All right.
{89617}{89652}- Is this yours?|- Yes.
{89655}{89701}I'll keep an eye on Broughton.
{90045}{90149}You have every chance of seeing things|if you lower Scotch at that pace.
{94175}{94228}Mr. Dragore!
{94329}{94361}There you are.
{94377}{94445}Mr. Dragore, I'll come up to you.
{94543}{94582}Wait, I'll come down.
{94734}{94805}- What do you want?|- There was somebody in the library.
{94807}{94849}- Who?|- I don't know.
{94867}{94906}The door, it shut!
{94934}{94963}Don't scream.
{94982}{95024}That's what I need!
{95026}{95106}The command in your wonderful voice.
{95202}{95229}Come with me.
{95250}{95320}I think you've gone far enough|with your insinuations.
{95322}{95377}Yes, and I may go a great deal farther.
{95433}{95491}- What is it? What's the matter?|- I've seen him.
{95659}{95724}Now perhaps you'll believe what I told you.
{95730}{95768}Get me a glass of water!
{97257}{97323}Thanks. I wasn't hurt, only frightened.
{97359}{97422}Broughton, see if you can find Miss Kaney,|will you?
{97521}{97606}It's wonderful to be with a man|who isn't afraid.
{97609}{97637}I am afraid.
{97640}{97725}You, who have ridden bareback|over the desert...
{97738}{97821}If you don't stop chattering,|I am afraid I shall have a knife in my back.
{97824}{97881}When I'm with you, I have to talk.
{97885}{97940}It comes, like poetry.
{97961}{98003}Are you prepared to obey me?
{98014}{98047}In anything.
{98059}{98096}Then close your eyes...
{98110}{98170}and don't speak for 10 seconds.
{99257}{99325}- We all panic sometimes.|- I felt his hands on me.
{99327}{99397}- That's why I know it was no ghost.|- It was no ghost.
{99433}{99505}Look at the clock. It's nearing the hour.
{99516}{99565}I know where you'll find him now.
{99580}{99669}He's gone back to the tomb,|to his heathen gods.
{99720}{99760}You and I will follow him there.
{99762}{99789}Wait a minute.
{99802}{99880}- What's his doctor's telephone number?|- Yoxford, 72.
{101461}{101520}Look! The door's open, and there's a light.
{101529}{101593}I'll go no nearer.
{101665}{101706}I can see a shadow moving.
{101709}{101772}- I'll go no nearer.|- Well, then, go back.
{101833}{101870}What about it, Betty?
{101879}{101909}Do we go on?
{101930}{101961}Yes, of course.
{102001}{102040}Thought you'd say that.
{104755}{104781}Look!
{105084}{105161}Hartley! So you're not a parson.|Just a dirty crook.
{105283}{105335}You'd better get out of my way.
{105347}{105410}Your hand! So that's how it was done.
{105453}{105516}- I wouldn't come any nearer.|- I don't have to.
{105695}{105719}Look!
{105721}{105784}If you please. Thank you. Come on, now.
{107553}{107577}Door.
{107753}{107824}- It's too late. Are you badly hurt?|- No, it's nothing.
{107848}{107880}Come and sit down.
{107900}{107950}- Where's the key?|- He threw it away.
{108185}{108247}When I phoned the doctor,|I told him to bring the police.
{108249}{108288}They ought to find us somehow.
{108290}{108373}Even if they do come,|how can they break down that door?
{108481}{108515}They'll find a way.
{108623}{108652}I'll make a bandage.
{108877}{108943}The doctor in charge|didn't understand the case.
{108949}{109001}- I'm afraid of catalepsy.|- Meaning?
{109004}{109044}Morlant was buried alive.
{109071}{109150}Mr. Dragore, what were those shots?
{109159}{109217}- Out of my way.|- Where are the others?
{109224}{109254}Leave me alone.
{109791}{109844}I thought you might be leaving in a hurry...
{109846}{109913}with something in your pocket|that doesn't belong to you.
{109917}{109946}Hand it over.
{109981}{110004}You win.
{110251}{110300}That woman! There she is!
{110303}{110360}- Come now.|- Put down that gun, you fool.
{110362}{110402}I tell you, she's got it.
{110492}{110520}Come on, then!
{110745}{110770}Stop!
{110789}{110868}- Now, Miss Kaney, if you please.|- I don't think so.
{110870}{110900}You fool.
{110905}{110989}If either of you two horrible men|so much as move...
{110995}{111023}in it goes.
{111025}{111126}- You don't know the value of that jewel.|- I don't care for the value. It'll go.
{111161}{111212}And if you shoot, I'll go with it.
{111239}{111264}I mean it.
{111278}{111376}Down 30 feet, and about 60 feet of water...
{111426}{111468}and then Australia.
{111533}{111618}I can't see to tie this.|That light seems much lower.
{112048}{112126}Hartley! Quick, come on! Get up!|Get him out of here!
{112269}{112329}- The door!|- Shut!
{112371}{112453}The flames! They mustn't reach the door!
{112811}{112865}It's no good. You can't breathe in there.
{112932}{112961}The cartridge!
{113009}{113034}Here!
{113043}{113068}If only...
{113245}{113294}I've had enough of this, Miss Kaney.
{113300}{113357}Supposing I'm ready to shoot,|and take the risk?
{113359}{113428}You'll be taking a bigger risk than you think.
{113454}{113499}- I'll take that gun.|- Now, look here.
{113501}{113561}That'll do. Now what's the trouble?
{113567}{113625}This, they're after it.
{113633}{113693}All of them. It belongs...
{113759}{113795}I'll carry her to the house.
{114060}{114090}Get back!
{114095}{114128}Back in that corner!
June.
Look who's here, Sis.
Why, Hazel Cousins.
- Hello, June.
How you been, you old so-and-so?
Gosh, it's good to see you.
Tell me, do you see any of the old crowd?
You know, the dear old Kappas?
- No, I don't get around much.
I've been taking a motor trip with a friend.
And when I saw you were here,
I simply had to come in and say hello.
That's swell.
Come on, snap into it, honey.
We're on next. I'll be right back.
What's the matter, June?
I'll have to tell you.
I've got to tell somebody, to get it out of my head.
Hazel.
I shouldn't go on with this act.
I'm afraid.
Afraid? Of what?
Something that's been on my mind for a long time now.
It didn't bother me much at first.
Now, it's driving me ..
No .. no, I can't go on.
What's the matter? What's happened?
Do you remember that round-robin letter we all sent each other?          - Yes.
The letter mentioned ..
How miraculous a Swami in New York was in predicting what would happen to us.
So you sent for your horoscope?
- Did you, too?
Well, he sent us three letters, warning us.
He didn't tell my sister.
Hazel .. he said something terrible was going to happen to one of us.
An accident. And another one of us would go ..
Oh no, I ..
It can't go on. Way up there.
I know I'm afraid.
Yoo-hoo!
Come on, we're on.
Goodbye.
Ladies and gentlemen.
I take great pleasure.
In introducing to you.
The marvel .. of the
Joe E Marvel circus:
The Raskob sisters!
And now .. the Raskob sisters.
Will do their world-famous double twist!
Done without a net.
The most breath-taking.
Death-defying aerial feat.
That this .. or in my opinion, ladies and gentlemen ..
Any generation .. will ever see.
I've worked this horoscope out 5 times.
It predicts great happiness.
But still I'm afraid to send it.
Why, Swami?
Because I was fatally wrong about June Raskob.
Her future was as happy as this one.
A week after I wrote her.
Her sister was dead and she was insane.
You must send it.
- Have I ..?
Have I lost the power to divine the stars?
No, Swami.
But you must send the letter.
For the sake of the 12 women who wrote a round-robin asking for their horoscopes.
They were schoolgirls together.
Their lives formed one chain of destiny.
Twelve women who believe.
Don't destroy their faith in the occult.
Swami.
What is in that brain of yours?
Your eyes.
We've met before. Of that, I'm certain.
Not on this earth.
Were we lovers in another incarnation, Swami?
Tell me.
Couldn't you learn by ..
Casting my horoscope?
I have cast it.
To see if the heavens could explain your ..
Your effect on me.
Yes?
- Please don't make me tell you.
Tell me.
It is death.
I read for you.
Aren't we all to die?
- But you, not pleasantly.
Oh, the thought it too horrible.
Your body.
Mangled like that.
- How?
An accident, the stars say.
A railroad .. perhaps.
How strange.
So, are you to die like that, too?
Don't look at me that way.
Don't look at me like that.
You are very tired, Swami.
Sleep is so sweet.
Hazel!
We're playing Tarzan.
And Ann says I can't climb trees.
But Tarzan did, Mother. So why can't I?
Los Angeles calling
Mrs Helen Frye in New York.
Mrs Helen Frye?
Yes.
Hello .. hello, Helen?
Why, Laura Stanhope.
It's grand to hear you again.
What's up?
Oh.
Oh yes.
His prediction came true.
Oh but dear, that's just a coincidence.
May going like that and then Hazel.
We mustn't believe in it, Helen.
I'm going to put a stop to it. Do you hear?
Listen.
Grace Coombs lives out here.
And Jo Turner is going to stop off on her way back from Hawaii.
Helen, you try to come out.
Oh .. oh, I'd love to Laura but ..
George has been so wretched since ..
Since the baby left us.
I don't think I ..
- But the trip will do you good.
We'll laugh those fool horoscopes right out of our heads.
Alright. Let me know.
Goodbye.
Can I Mother, in my old clothes?
Yes, darling. You can climb the apple tree in your own yard.
Okay.
Oh, hello Grace.
How are you?
Come on, sit down.
Oh, another one of those messages?
- Yes.
Grace .. if you don't stop selling your soul to the devil ..
By believing in those foolish horoscopes.
What about May?
And Hazel is in jail.
It's pitiful, yes.
But the result of natural causes.
And belief in anything else is believing in .. magic.
But Laura.
And you'd help the rest of us Grace, if you'd hush.
And stop writing your letters telling us all to prepare for our ..
The moon does control the tides.
And nothing can live without the sun.
Why shouldn't we be controlled?
Because we are reasoning human beings, silly. And not irresponsible machines.
Listen, Laura.
This letter came from the Swami just an hour ago. I have to tell you.
Listen.
"I'd do anything to halt the disasters that have come to you and your friends."
"As I would do anything to save my own life."
"But I can do neither.
For I am helpless, too."
"I knew too much about the heavens."
"They are killing me."
"My own horoscope shows .."
"That I am to leave this earth."
"Before July the 1st."
Ha-ha-ha.
Well, if I needed anything more than common sense ..
To disprove your arguments, that would be enough.
No-one is going to take his own life ..
Just to prove to 12 women that he's a good stargazer.
You are deranged, Grace.
- This happens.
The Swami himself does die.
How can you disbelieve?
New York.
Before July the 1st.
[ Screams! ]
Well.
That makes it practically unanimous.
I'll have a lemonade and bitters, please.
Excuse me.
Aren't you Helen Dawson?
Before I was married, yes.
Hello .. uh ..?
St Albans School, wasn't it?
Why, I have forgotten your name.
Ursula Georgi.
- Oh yes. Of course.
Well, isn't this fun, meeting like this?
Are you going to coast?
It doesn't seem long since we were at St Albans, does it.
Tell me about the girls.
It's nice to have you ask about the girls.
As I remember, it wasn't very pleasant for you.
Oh.
I didn't mind having to leave.
It was hard on the missionary.
Who sent me there.
He picked me up in India.
To .. to save me.
Oh, all those things mattered so dreadfully, then.
They seem so childish now.
How I used to envy you girls.
Your parties .. your sorority.
You are lucky you don't belong, if you ask me.
Because of those timetables made out by the stars, we were talking about?
You straight-thinking, rational Anglo
Saxons don't believe in such things.
Do you?
Laura doesn't.
Thank goodness.
Mrs Stanhope always was a strong character, wasn't she.
Yes.
That's why she's getting us all together.
So we can laugh it all away.
I haven't laughed for so long.
My little girl has the bluest eyes.
She was just two and a half year's old.
It's what happened to Yogadachi himself that makes it all so convincing.
He predicted even the date he'd go.
You can't laugh that off, can you.
No.
I want you to read his last letter.
Isn't that silly?
A man I've never seen.
And he has the nerve to tell me that I'm going to kill myself.
Why the gun, then?
Aren't you afraid?
- Afraid?
Why, of course not.
This belongs to my husband.
I brought it along with me.
Just to prove to myself that the Swami is bogus.
If I avoided the thing now.
I would know that I was afraid.
Oh, are you going to bed?
- Yes. It's so late.
We'll be in Los Angeles in the morning.
I'll see you at breakfast.
- Fine.
If I was you I'd ..
- This ..?
Oh .. don't worry.
No stars are going to twinkle twinkle me into committing suicide.
Goodnight.
Goodnight.
[ Gunshot! ]
Oh, you let an old lady beat you.
You did not beat me. I let you win because you're a girl.
Jo's going to help Mother now darling. Come on.
She don't want to help you, mother.
- Yes, she does want to help me.
Scoot.
Oh, he's precious.
I do envy you, Laura.
To me .. life is just an ashtray full of cigarette butts.
Why don't you marry again, Jo?
- Oh ..
I would if I was sure of getting a kid like Bobby.
What about the present fiancée?
Oh, he's a lot of fun.
But all he wants is a ..
A well-stocked cellar.
A racehorse. Bridge.
Anything but babies.
Laura.
Laura, why don't you
marry again sometime?
No.
I could never be dependent on anyone again.
I love standing on my own feet.
I wonder if any woman can?
- Why not?
I say.
Do you remember how you were always afraid the boys would go too far?
And I was afraid that they wouldn't?
Here, let me help you.
Here's Helen's.
Where do you want her?
- Oh, let's put Helen there.
Excuse me, Mrs Stanhope.
Mother!
Can I put this up in my room with nails, Mother?
It's for my engine to sleep on.
Hey, Burns, will you do it for me?
- Sure.
That's keen. Come on.
Burns, where is Mrs Frye?
Did you meet her?
I met the train, yes ma'am.
But no-one came.
Isn't it funny Helen didn't wire?
Oh, she probably missed it and is taking a cab.
What do you say, Sergeant?
I agree with you, coroner. For once.
- Much obliged.
What is it? What's happened?
- Suicide.
Sergeant Clive here says the restricted angles of the compartment prove that.
He's the mathematician of the department, so ..
Suicide is bad enough, but I'm relieved it wasn't ..
Murder?
No.
On the other hand.
Something makes one kill oneself.
So suicide is murder.
The trouble is you can't arrest a something, can you.
I beg your pardon.
The porter believes he saw you passing Mrs Frye's drawing room.
At about the time this suicide happened.
That's very possible.
Tell me .. did you hear or see anything unusual?
I can't say that I did.
I feel terribly upset about it.
I met the lady on the train and she seemed very charming.
Thank you, Miss .. or is it Mrs?
"Miss" .. Clemens.
Clemens?
Thank you, Miss Clemens.
Alright, folks. You can go now.
Sorry to have kept you waiting.
Jo, I sent a wire to Helen in New York.
Thought perhaps she'd missed the train.
I haven't got an answer yet.
Strange, isn't it.
Hello, Grace.
- Hello dear. How are you?
Jo Turner is here.
- Oh.
Hello, darling.
- Jo, dear.
Quite in the flesh.
Darling .. I'm sorry to make a liar out of your incredible Swami.
But I haven't killed myself over a man yet.       - Jo.
He should have known that it's the men that kill themselves over me.
Sit down, Grace dear. Sit down.
Oh Jo, please don't be so flippant.
What is written in the stars must come to pass.
Okay with me.
I've had a lot of fun.
You are both fatalists.
- Hmm, sure.
When the Gods are fed up with me .. voila!
Don't pay any attention to her, Grace.
- I beg your pardon, madam.
Oh yes. We'll wait on dinner for the others, Henry. But ..
You might bring some cocktails in here, please.
Yes. But excuse me, a Policeman.
May I come in?
Excuse me but the baggage belonging to a
Mrs Frye was marked for delivery here.
Did anything happen?
I'm terribly sorry.
It appears to be.
Suicide.
It happened on the train.
Do you know of any reason that could account for ..?    - Why ..
Mrs Frye.
A couple of months ago,
Sergeant, lost her only child.
I can understand that, Mrs Stanhope.
We were just going to have a ..
Reunion dinner.
Old classmates.
Mrs Stanhope, If you will be kind enough to drop into Headquarters, tomorrow say.
A routine statement about Mrs Frye ..
- Yes, of course, Sergeant.
Thank you. Goodnight.
- Goodnight.
Well, do you still doubt, Laura?
Are you still laughing, Jo?
Yogadachi has been right again.
Oh, you must accept his truth as I have.
That's the trouble with you,
Grace. Glorifying such rot.
Rot?
I tell you that nothing could save Helen.
Nor May. Nor Hazel .. from fate.
Don't you understand?
It was written for them.
As it is for all of us.
Well, if it's all settled for us, why worry?
Stop talking about it.
Stop thinking about it.
Anyone can think themselves into anything.
You two are stumbling in a dark material world.
I am above it.
As Yogadachi was.
Death means peace.
Freedom.
I shall meet him.
Gladly.
Well .. I shan't.
Depression or not, personally
I'm mad about this world.
Oh .. go on home, Grace.
You give me the creeps.
- No. Not I.
But what is written for you.
Only you are afraid to face it.
- Grace. I think you'd better go.
Just as you say.
Ooh .. she gives me the jitters.
I guess you'd go the same way too, if you'd received one of those horoscopes.
I have.
No?
I've been trying not to think about it, Jo.
He warned me that ..
That something dreadful would happen to Bobby.
On or .. before his birthday.
But my dear, why on earth didn't you go to the Police?
Oh, well.
I was determined not to give in to superstition.
Yes, but surely it has gone beyond a joke now?
You're right.
When I see that detective in the morning, I'll tell him everything.
I think you should.
When is Bobby's birthday?
Sunday.
Three days.
I don't know how I've .. lasted.
Away from you.
You haven't.
You've grown fat.
- Well, it's a soft job.
Did you have any trouble finding the place?
No.
I thought a little house would be better while you're here.   - Yes.
How long must a man be in love with you before you call him by his first name?
Why, you ..
You would think I was working for you.
You are.
Yeah.
Haven't you missed me?
- Of course I have.
When are you going to tell me about things?
When are we going to stop all this?
I didn't figure on going this far.
I didn't even think it would work.
But you see, it does.
- With the others, perhaps.
But .. but the Stanhopes?
Is Mrs Stanhope ..
Laura?
Is she still strong?
Yes, she is.
I hate her.
Her cool, poised character.
Her rigid mind.
You'll never break her.
Yes, I will.
That big elephant was so friendly picked him right up with his trunk.
Here, Robert. It's for you.
Gee, it has my name on it.
- Yes.
I bet it's a present for my birthday.
Hmm .. chocolates, Nanny.
- Not until you've finished your milk.
Bye, darling.
Where did that come from?
- The mail, madam.
Perhaps I shouldn't have given it to him. It must be a present for Sunday.
Now can I, Nan? Can I?
- No. No.
Not so early in the morning, darling.
I'm sorry, Mrs Stanhope. Come along
Bobby, you'll be late for school.
No .. no .. no.
Bobby.
How would you like to miss school today?
Stay home and help Nan with your birthday party?
Can Burns finish building my pirate boat?
You bet he can. Would you like that?
- Thank you, Mummy.
Hey, Burns. I don't have to go to school.
Well, the candy is okay.
But it's been tampered with since it was bought.
If anybody had eaten it, he'd have strangled to death in 30 seconds.
Bobby.
How many of the Swami's predictions have come true, Mrs Stanhope?
Three.
- Four.
You must remember that the
Swami foretold his own death.
Well, there is no sense in them.
The man goes out and mails the candy, then goes and kills himself. No sense.
That's right, Chief.
It looks like the Swami was hired to scare those women into ..
How can you hire a man to kill himself?
Ah, there is no sense in it.
Anyway Sergeant, it's your case.
If I think about it anymore I'll probably wind up in the booby hatch.
That's just what happened to the other people.
Thinking about it too much.
This case is just crazy enough for Sergeant Clive to solve.
Excuse me, lady.
Oh why should the Swami want to kill my little boy?
Perhaps he didn't.
This package was stamped at the Parcel
Post window at 14 minutes past three.
Now, the accident happened at two minutes past twelve.
The Swami was dead for over three hours when the candy was mailed.
Dead?
But someone else is still alive.
Someone who still wants to kill Bobby?
Possibly .. there must be an accomplice.
The person who mailed this box is likely responsible for all that's happened.
I'm going to find that person.
I'll send some men to your house at once.
I suggest that .. you be at your boy's side constantly.
Oh yes.
Yes, I'll be very careful.
Goodbye, Sergeant.
- Oh, pardon me.
Is that sorority pin always worn there?
Yes. That's the ritual.
And only the girls who are members of your particular club wear them?   - Yes.
Where is St Albans seminary?
North of San Francisco. At Medora.
What are you thinking, Sergeant?
I was just thinking of you.
Of your boy, Mrs Stanhope.
Oh, thank you.
- Not at all.
Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
It seems incredible that such things as you describe.
Could possibly be happening to those other children of mine out in the world.
They're not children any more.
The New York Police questioned
Mrs Hazel Cousins in jail.
She told them that she started the round-robin.
But .. you gave her the idea.
Why, how could she say that? When I didn't.
I was merely having luncheon with the dear child.
When I was attending a conference of educators in New York.
Pardon me, Miss Kirsten.
Hazel Cousins insists that you suggested the idea to her.
Oh but Mr Clive .. I ..?
Oh, it's simply impossible.
Why I ..
Wait a moment.
I'm remembering something.
Yes, I did see someone else.
Who?
Yes.
Yes, the mood is coming back to me.
Schoolgirl friendships .. fading.
Soon forgotten.
That's a lovely sentiment.
Would you mind telling me who?
Of course not.
- Who?
Another one of my girls. Ursula Georgi.
That's a very musical name, isn't it.
Would you mind saying it again?
"Ursula .. Georgi".
You enunciate beautifully, Miss Kirsten.
What was she like?
Sweet .. very.
And mystical.
Sounds very interesting.
Now tell me, Miss Kirsten have you a photograph of the class group? Anything?
Oh no. She wasn't here long enough for that.
One day she decided to leave.
- And she left?
You are a very understanding young man.
Why didn't I go to the Police sooner?
I've been crazy, Jo.
Trying to whip instinct with ..
With just reason.
- Oh, you mustn't talk like this.
You mustn't even think like this.
- No, I know I mustn't.
I know I mustn't.
But I am.
That boy of mine is all I've got, Jo.
How can I help it with things I don't understand striking at him?
Like it did the others.
Out of the dark where you can't protect him.
Imagining that ..
That every little breath he takes .. may be his last.
Nothing can happen here.
- No.
My mind tells me it's impossible.
But it is happening.
I'm afraid. Jo, I'm afraid.
Bobby .. Bobby!
Darling.
Promise Mother you'll never leave the house alone again.
Promise?
Why not, Mumsy?
- Oh ..
Mother is just a little worried. That's all.
You don't need to worry, Mumsy.
I'll take care of you.
Relay this to New York right away.
- Alright, Sergeant.
Give this to master
Bobby with all your love.
And don't drop it.
I ..
I can't.
I can't bear the thought of it.
I can't do it.
Of course you will.
Darling.
You and I are going away together, aren't we.
As soon as everything is done.
You'll do it.
Won't you?
What .. what will it do to him?
He won't know anything.
He'll bounce it.
Children always bounce rubber balls, don't they.
And then?
- Why ..?
Shush.
You've done a lot for me, Jo.
We've helped each other, rather.
But with Sergeant Clive around.
You won't need me.
But just the same.
I hate to see you go.
- And I hate going too.
Only I don't dare stay.
Why?
Oh, well I've quarrelled with my fiancée and ..
I believe anything of myself when I'm in love.
Look here, Jo.
You surely don't believe your prediction?
Ha .. I'm human, too.
Do you know .. the only credulous animal on the whole face of the earth.
Is the human.
You'll excuse me, Mrs Stanhope.
- Yes, Burns?
I hope you don't mind.
I .. I took the liberty of ..
Of getting the little fellow a ..
Well, I got him a ball for his birthday.
Very thoughtful of you, Burns.
I'm sure he'll like it.
Is the car ready, Burns?
- Yes, Miss Turner.
Good.
Well, darling.
Goodbye.
- Goodbye, Jo.
What's that?
A present dear, from Burns.
Can I see it?
- No. You know, Bobby.
If you open it now, you won't have anything left for your birthday.
Come on sweetheart, take your nap.
That's it.
Goodnight.
Here's a wire from New York, Sergeant.
Are you almost through?
- Just about, Sergeant.
Say, I know that woman.
- Yeah?
Yeah. She was on the train when
Helen Frye committed suicide.
Let me have it.
Mike.
- Coming.
We want this woman.
Her name is Ursula Georgi.
A half-breed type.
Half Hindu, half Japanese. I don't know.
She's living right here in this town. I want you to find her.
Check every move she makes.
There are one million, 238,048 people in Los Angeles.
And you want only one woman? A cinch.
Get going. Get going.
Ann, did you tell Burns I wanted him?
- He's bringing the car, Mrs Stanhope.
Are these all the presents?
- Yes, Mrs Stanhope.
I won't feel satisfied until I've had every one of them tested.
I suppose it's silly .. but ever since that poisoned candy came ..
Put these in the car please, Burns.
And then take me to Headquarters.
Yes, ma'am.
What's the matter, Burns?
- I beg your pardon, Mrs Stanhope.
I had hoped to have the afternoon off.
You see .. my mother is not well.
Oh, I'm sorry Burns.
Well.
Well, I tell you what you do.
You drop me off at Headquarters.
And you take the car on out to your mother's.
Sergeant Clive will bring me home.
- But ..
[ Engine not starting ]
[ Engine not starting ]
Anything wrong, Burns?
I don't know. Something ..
Is your switch on?
I got a hot line on Ursula Georgi.
She bought herself some dynamite in a hardware store.
Dynamite? How can she get hold of dynamite without a permit?
She talked him right out of it.
He says she gave him the willies.
Mike, we've got to get that woman.
Sergeant .. here's some more dope on that Hindu dame's case.
Read it.
Yogadachi chauffeur Burns, disappeared a month ago.
Burns?
Hello? Get me Mrs Stanhope in Beverly Hills quick.
You have her number on the board.
Hello? Is Mrs Stanhope there?
Mrs Stanhope has just left for your office.
She's taking all the packages that Bobby had for his birthday.
Is Burns there?
- Burns?
He's driving her down.
Do you know if there was a present from Burns among those things?
A what?
A rubber ball?
Come on, Mike.
Los Angeles Police Department calling all cars.
[ Radio: ]
"Watch all roads from Beverly Hills."
"Be on the lookout for a limousine being driven by a chauffeur."
"Contains a woman passenger."
"And they are headed for
Police Headquarters. Be careful."
Not so fast please, Burns.
Burns, don't you hear?
Not so fast, please!
Burns!
Burns!
[ Gunshot! ]
[ Gunshot! ]
Throw out the packages.
Take me home, Sergeant. Take me home.
Mike, take care of Mrs Stanhope's car.
- Okay, Sergeant.
I can't stand any more of this.
Why should she want to kill Bobby?
I don't understand it.
Mrs Stanhope.
I wish you'd get out of town until we catch this Ursula Georgi.
Anything. Anything to get away from all this.
Why don't you take the train for New York tonight?
Yes.
Yes, I will. Tonight.
- Fine.
[ Radio: ]
"Los Angeles Police
Department. Calling all cars."
"Be on the lookout for a man."
"He might be dressed in a light gray chauffeur's uniform."
"Also, a woman. A half-caste Hindu."
"Watch all trains, watch all highways. Watch all boats."
How are we going to beat this dragnet?
If you had only let us go this morning.
They've got everything watched.
As if I ..
I would run into their arms.
They don't think.
- But, what .. what about me?
I'll come back for you. So wait.
I'll check this at the station and you can pick it up when we leave.
Go on a train? Didn't you hear that? All trains are ..
Why can't we hide out here until this thing blows over?
They can't hang anything on us now.
Nothing's will happen to the boy now.
You can't go on a train after what
Yogadachi said would happen to you.
Yogadachi was a fake!
I was his brain as I am yours.
You're running out on me.
They'll get me.
I won't stay here.
- Oh yes you will.
I will .. I'll be alone.
You'll be more alone if you go out.
Because you won't know what to do or where to turn.
And they'll pick you up in minutes.
That's why you'll stay here.
Goodbye, Bobby.
Be sure and take good care of Mother.
Sure. And don't forget you said you'd get me a Policeman's badge.
I won't forget and I'll get you a gold one, too.
Goodbye, Mr Clive.
- Goodbye, Bobby.
Goodbye, Mrs Stanhope.
I hope you have a pleasant rip.
Goodbye.
I wish.
I would feel better if you were going with us.
I wish I were going.
All aboard!
All aboard!
Everything is all ready, Sergeant.
Goodnight.
- Goodnight, Mrs Stanhope.
Good evening .. Laura.
Ursula Georgi.
Does the exclusive Mrs Stanhope further honor me by remembering my name?
Let me go .. let me go!
How is your child, Laura?
They tell me he is handsome.
And bright. And very lovable.
Yes. Burns told me.
Tomorrow is his birthday.
I looked at his star tonight.
And it was glowing red.
Like the ball I sent you.
Why should you want to kill Bobby?
He's your child, isn't he? Yours!
What have I done? What has anyone done to make you so inhuman?
Do I hear the very human white race .. asking that question?
When I was twelve years old.
A white sailor ..
- You're insane. Insane.
Maybe I am.
But do you know what it means to be a half-breed?
A half-caste in a world ruled by whites?
If you're a male, you're a coolie.
If you're a female, you're .. well ..
The white half of me cries for the courtesy and protection ..
That women like you get.
The only way I could free myself was by becoming white.
And it was almost in my hands .. when you ..
You and your Kappa society stopped me.
You're crazy, what did ..?
- My parents spent six years slaving.
To get moñey enough to put me through finishing school.
To make the world accept me as white.
And you .. and the others wouldn't let me cross the çolor line.
But we were young.
Maybe we were cruël.
But you can't use that to justîfy murder.
I can.
You are very tired, Laura.
Mrs Stanhope.
Mrs Stanhope.
T-G oö
[Barker]
Ladies and gentlemen, the biggest aggregation...
ofhuman curiosities ever assembled under one tent.
You'll see Madame Beardo...
and Gangor the snake charmer...
handling the biggest and the most dangerous cobra in captivity.
Su Toy, the little lady who has tied herself into knots in every country in the world.
[Barker #2]
A sensation, folks. A sensation.
Colonel Tim and Lady Tiny, the biggest little people on Earth.
Aw, folks, you can't afford to miss it.
Think of it.
For the small sum of 25 cents, one quarter of a dollar... you're going to see the greatest show on Earth.
Come on. Let's-
Everyone, the line forms on the left.
Come on, folks.
Do I have to beg you to see the greatest show on Earth for a quarter?
Tickets, please. Tickets.
One at a time.
Don't crowd.
There's plenty of room for all.
Hey. Hey!
Tickets?
Five. Six. Seven. Eight.
Nine. 10. 11.
Twelve. 13.
Fourteen, including humble self.
- Passes.
- Thank you so much.
[Squealing Noises]
Ladies and gentlemen, give me your attention, please.
Right here in front of this platform, you will next be entertained right here.
I will now introduce to you... ladies and gentlemen, the biggest little artists... with any circus on the face of the earth.
They have appeared before all of the crowned heads of the world.
Colonel Tim, 42 inches small...
- and Lady Tiny, two inches smaller.
- [Fanfare]
They will now entertain you.
[Rumba]
[Ends]
[Applause]
Hey, Mike, did a Chinese gentleman just come in here?
You mean the guy with his own sideshow?
He's right over there, boss.
[Barker] And now, ladies and gentlemen,
I will introduce Gangor...
the Hindu snake charmer...
who fearlessly handles the most poisonous reptiles!
- Gangor!
- Are you Mr. Chan?
Humbly admit identity.
You Mr. Kinney... who extend most generous invitation to circus?
Yes. I saw by the morning paper you were in town.
I wanted you to be my guest.
Very kind.
Free ticket to circus... like gold ring on merry-go-round.
Make enjoyment double.
Oh, uh, please to meet honorable wife... and, uh, latest blessed event.
Glad to know you, Mrs. Chan.
Happy to announce have taken whole full house for vacation.
That's fine.
Multitudinous family very interested in little people.
Well, I'll introduce you.
Come over here, you two peanuts.
This is Tim and Mrs. Tim, the biggest little runts on Earth.
Size of package does not indicate quality within.
[Together]
Thank you.
We've often seen your pictures in the papers, Mr. Chan.
Yes, and we've read about every case you've worked on.
- Have a cigar.
- Thank you. Do not indulge.
- I'll have one.
- Have peppermint stick?
- Thank you.
- You also?
Thank you.
May I have your autograph, Mr. Chan?
- Please?
- Very great pleasure.
Hold, please.
[Barker] And now, ladies and gentlemen, right this way.
Right this way.
I will introduce to you Su Toy...
that beautiful little flower of the Orient.
She ties herself in a thousand knots.
Watch her, ladies and gentlemen.
- The human puzzle- Su Toy.
- [Gong Bangs]
- Here.
- Hey!
[Oriental]
- Good-bye, Mr. Chan.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
- Come and see us again.
[Voices Overlapping]
Oh, Joe?
Excuse me.
How about you and me gettin' together?
I've gotta see-
Can't make it tonight.
Too many things to look after.
You've been keepin' me waitin' for weeks.
And you'll keep on waitin' till I'm good and ready.
I don't wanna impose on you,
Mr. Chan... but when I sent an invitation to come here tonight... there was a little matter
I wanted to get your advice about.
Excuse, please.
Have promised wife... not to let anything interfere with family vacation.
It'll only take a few minutes.
You'd be doing me a great favor.
Can take matter up now?
Well, uh, I've been gettin' a lot of threatening letters lately.
They're all unsigned, and they arrive very mysteriously.
Now, frankly, I'm a bit worried.
- If you'll notice, they're all, uh-
- [Fanfare]
Oh, well, it's time for the show to start.
I'll tell you what.
If you wouldn't mind slipping out during the performance...
I'll be at the business wagon in the back lot at 9:00.
- Will be there.
- Thanks. You'd better gather your family together.
I'd like to take you someplace where there's a snappy dance orchestra.
Oh, boy, I'll bet you can shake a mean rumba.
I'm shaking you right now.
I told you the show leaves town tonight.
Then how about tomorrow night?
If it's not too far,
I can run over to see you.
Excuse.
Pardon interruption, please.
Oh, Pop, this is Su Toy.
Gee, you ought to see her do her stuff.
So pleased.
Hope romantic offspring... has not tried to twist charming artist around finger.
Oh, no, Mr. Chan.
I had my fingers crossed.
Wise precaution... to accept applesauce with large pinch of salt.
Excuse, please.
Show's starting. Where are brothers and sisters entrusted to your care?
Oh, I've got that all fixed, Pop.
[Whistle Blowing]
[Circus]
[Laughing, Shouting]
[Kinney]
Gaines.
What's the take tonight?
- Not so good.
No. If business doesn't pick up...
I'm afraid I won't be able to pay you those notes by the end of the season.
- That's your worry.
- I know. I'll do the best I can.
- I may have to ask you for an extension.
- Get this straight, Gaines.
With me, a bargain is a bargain.
You can't meet your obligations...
I'm taking over your half of the show.
Good heavens, man, every dollar
I have in the world is tied up in this circus.
- You can't do any-
- Oh, yes, I can. And another thing-
Mr. Kinney, the ape's acting up again.
- Blake says it'll be dangerous to work him tonight.
- Why bother me about it?
- You're head animal man. Use the whip on him.
- Yeah?
I did that once, and you know what it got me.
If you ask me,
Blake's usin' good sense.
Nobody's askin' you.
I'll take care of the ape.
You're makin' a mistake, Joe.
You can't run a circus with a bullwhip.
You look out for your end, Gaines,
I'll take care of mine.
- [Ends]
- [Applause]
- [Roaring]
- [Man] Easy, boy.
Quiet, Caesar.
Steady, boy.
Take it easy.
Here. Quiet!
Why don't you sing him to sleep, Blake? That's what's the matter with him-you pamper him.
Well, he can't be handled tonight,
Mr. Kinney.
If he goes bad in the big tent, someone'll get hurt.
Even the ape knows you're yellow.
You've gotta show him who's boss.
Cut it out! Don't you see you're only making him worse?
You're fired, Blake.
Give me the key to that cage.
That's okay with me.
If I have to crawl... to anyone like you,
I don't want the job.
- I'll take that key.
- Oh, no, you don't!
[Blake]
Why, you-
[Voices Overlapping]
- Get out of here! Get off the lot, all of ya!
- Wait a minute.
Blake isn't going or anybody else.
Get back to your work, men.
You and I'll attend to this later.
Lou, can I see you a minute?
Yes. Come on in.
- What's the matter? Why aren't you working?
- I'm through. I quit.
- What, again?
- Yeah, but this time it sticks, and I'm takin' you with me.
Oh, now, now.
Tell me what it's all about.
Oh, I'm sick of the whole rotten mess.
Let's get away from here and live like regular people.
I'll scrape up enough dough somehow.
You wouldn't leave the circus for all the money in the world.
- You know you wouldn't.
- Wouldn't I?
Where's your sister?
Marie's over at the wardrobe tent getting her costume fixed.
Oh, so that's what it was.
You had another argument with Kinney.
Yeah. He's not gonna boot me around like he does the animals.
- Marie?
- Oh, hello, dear.
- I'm sending your act on early tonight.
- Why? What's happened?
I had a scrap with Hal Blake.
I fired him. The ape act isn't workin'.
Oh, Joe, you're always getting into trouble with someone.
That's the only way to get things in this world-you gotta fight for 'em.
No, it isn't.
You'll only make people hate you... and I want people to like the man I'm going to marry.
Here's your cape.
- Thanks, Nellie.
- [Fanfare]
There's your music cue.
Come on, kid, get goin'.
What's the matter?
Joe only comes around when Marie's here just to burn me up.
- I'm gonna tell him so next time.
- That won't get you anywhere.
If you were any kind of a brother, you wouldn't have let him treat me the way he has.
I'm taking care of that in my own way.
Ladies and gentlemen... it is my great privilege and honor to be able to introduce to you... that peerless little aerial star...
Miss Marie Normand!
- [Fanfare]
- [Applause]
The only artiste in the world with any circus today... doing a forward somersault from a flying trapeze...
and catching by her heels.
She will perform this death-defying feat... without the aid of a net!
- Marie Normand!
- [Waltz]
[Applause]
[Stops]
[Drumroll]
- [Cymbal Crash]
- [Applause]
Oh. Oh, Pop,
I was just looking for you.
Following road map?
I saw you leave and figured something was up. I wanted to be in on it.
Curiosity responsible for cat needing nine lives.
You looking for somebody, Mr. Chan?
Had appointment here with Mr. Kinney, but find door locked.
Well, this is Mr. Gaines,
Mr. Kinney's partner.
How do you do?
Anything I can do for you?
Hey, Pop, look.
There's a light on the inside.
There shouldn't be. I locked the wagon up myself over a half an hour ago.
Perhaps advisable to investigate.
- Have key to wagon?
- Yes, I have.
- It's bolted on the inside.
- Most peculiar.
Door bolted on inside... suggests someone there... but no answer to knock.
There's one way to find out.
Break the door in.
That isn't necessary.
I'll get a locksmith.
One moment. More than one way to remove skin from cat.
Ventilator on roof open.
Ventilator on roof open.
Perhaps little man can enter.
Why, I couldn't get up there.
Giant very good for first step.
Sure.
There you go.
It'll be a long drop to the floor.
May borrow walking stick?
Why, sure.
Jack have no trouble sliding down beanstalk.
- Lift me up. I can't see.
- Why, certainly.
[Gasps]
Something's happened to Mr. Kinney!
[Gaines]
Unbolt the door!
- Touch nothing, please.
- Towers, get the show doctor.
Too late.
Mr. Kinney dead.
- Dead?
- He must've been murdered.
Neck broken.
Strangled by very powerful hands.
Dan! Dan Farrell!
Caesar's loose!
- How'd he get out? Wasn't the cage locked?
- Sure, it was!
- Someone must've opened it.
- Never mind that. Come on, fellas.
Scatter out.
Don't let him get near the big top!
But the door was bolted on the inside.
[Chan] Much evil can enter through very small space.
Police must find answer.
Wait, Mr. Chan.
You're a detective.
Can't this be handled quietly?
Very happy to be of assistance... but police must be notified.
I'll do it, Pop.
There's a telephone across the street.
All of you go about your business as if nothing had happened.
I don't want any excitement while the show is on.
I'll get Dr. Meade.
The police'll probably want him.
Hello.
Chief of the homicide squad?
There's been a murder at the circus.
Of course I know it's murder.
I'm a detective myself.
Okay, Chief.
[Screams]
[Roaring]
[Gasping]
- Gee, I'm sorry!
- Get out of my way! The ape's loose!
Ape's loose?
You're telling me!
Stop it! Let me go!
How dare you!
Let me go!
Let-
- Let me out of here!
- You'll be safe in there.
- Why, you-you-
- Don't worry about me. I'll be all right.
Hey, Pop, the big ape is loose!
Had suspected same.
Observe.
Hairs not from human head.
I got it, Pop! They're monkey hairs.
The ape killed him.
Very good deduction.
But how did he get in?
The wagon was locked on the inside.
Suggest we make inspection outside window. Come.
- Found anything?
- Not a trace.
Jerry, look in those shadows over there by the canvas. Frank, go around the other way.
Look out he don't get behind you.
- Ape tracks.
- Gee, Pop!
That is barrel he used to climb up to window.
And here are some more prints on the barrel.
Look out!
Caesar! Caesar!
Farrell! Don't use the whip!
Here, I'll have him. Caesar! Caesar, steady!
Caesar! Caesar!
Steady, Caesar!
All right.
Take him to his cage.
Good work, Holt.
It took a lot of nerve to do that.
Are you hurt, Pop?
Side of wagon not like feather bed.
Thank you so much for fortunate rescue.
That's all right.
- [Siren Wailing]
- Here come the police, Pop.
Recommend you stay here.
- Study approved method of police.
- But, Pop, l-
One ounce of experience worth ton of detective books.
Go ahead, fellas.
Give the place the once-over.
I can give you the dope,
Lieutenant Macy.
The big ape escaped during the show and murdered him.
The proof is right there on the window sill.
Right here, Mr. Macy.
Looks like your tip's about right, kid.
They're ape hairs.
There's only one thing
I haven't figured out yet- how they got there with that window locked.
That's right.
Here.
Well, that's easy. Look.
The window must've been propped open at the time like that.
Now, you stay right here, and I'll show you how it was done.
You'd better come this way a little.
Now turn your back to me.
That's it.
Now, don't move.
The ape creeps up on the outside... reaches in through the bars... grabs Kinney by the throat...
- shakes him, chokes him...
- [Coughing]
And kills him.
Now, then, in getting away... he knocks the prop down-
And the lock snaps shut.
[Coughing]
Gee, Mr. Macy, you figured that one out fine.
- Thanks.
- [Coughing Continues]
- I hope I didn't hurt you.
- Oh, no.
Say, let me have that magnifying glass again, will you?
Sure.
- There's one more thing I haven't figured out yet.
- Yeah? What's that?
The barrel wasn't here.
It was over there.
- Oh?
- Now, here's what happened.
When the ape stepped down, the barrel tipped over, like that!
Gee, Mr. Macy,
I hope I didn't hurt you.
Oh, no.
You're pretty good at figuring things out yourself, ain't ya?
- Here's your glass. I'm glad I didn't break it.
- Oh, thanks.
Now that I got that figured out...
I wanna know how the ape got out of that cage.
Perhaps can offer slight suggestion.
Oh, this is my father, Charlie Chan.
Lieutenant Macy.
How are you, Mr. Chan?
You sure got a bright kid.
He just gave me a good steer.
Uh, sometimes suspect ambitious offspring of giving bull.
- [Chuckles]
- Did you find anything new, Pop?
Ape released purposely.
Hal Blake, who worked animal... have two keys to cage.
Lost one earlier tonight.
Either Blake open cage...
- or person who find lost key.
- Aha.
- Where is he? Where is he?
- They've taken him away, lady.
Just a minute, please.
Who are you?
I'm Marie Normand, Mr. Kinney's fiancee.
I want to go to him.
You couldn't do anything for him now, miss.
- We didn't wanna tell you until after the show, Marie.
- So sorry.
Offer deepest sympathy.
Someone killed him.
I know it.
They hated him.
They all hated him.
- What do you mean by that?
- Later, please.
Suggest you take young lady away.
Come, Marie.
Well, what she said about them hating Kinney proves your point- that the ape was released purposely.
We'd better round up the whole outfit and give 'em a grilling, Mr. Chan.
Oh, one point more.
Would suggest you look for threatening letters...
Mr. Kinney had in inside pocket of coat...
now mysteriously missing.
Excuse, please.
Must return to family.
- Will say good night.
- Well, thanks for the help.
- Don't mention it.
- Dig up the manager of the show...
- and tell him I wanna talk to everyone connected to the case.
- Yes, sir.
Gee, Pop, I hate to walk out on this case.
I can see some interesting angles.
- Contortion lady?
- Gee! That reminds me!
See you later, Pop.
- Help!
- Gosh, Su Toy. I'm sorry.
Let me out of here, you!
- Listen, please, I just couldn't get back any sooner.
- Don't speak to me!
I just had to put you in there to save you from the ape.
[Both Shouting In Foreign Language]
Hey, Su Toy, let me out, will ya?
Su! Su, come back here!
Oh, Mama, you have railroad tickets?
- Oh, yes.
- I can't find my raincoat.
- Hurry to bed, children.
- Here, Daddy. Here's your shoes.
Oh. Thank you so much.
You know, I think we oughta stick with this case, Pop... and go to the next town with the circus.
Have desire to remain permanently in monkey cage?
Have late visitor.
[Tiny]
Here I am, Mr. Chan.
Oh, come in.
Excuse me for coming here so late, but it's terribly important.
Very happy to welcome distinguished little visitor.
[Voices Overlapping]
Oh, Mr. Chan, are you going away?
Yes. Tomorrow, am taking family to observe wonders of Grand Canyon.
Oh. I'm so sorry.
You are in trouble?
Sit down.
Mr. Macy took my husband and Mr. Gaines... and some of the circus people down to police headquarters.
Distinguished lieutenant of police act with streamline speed.
And he says he's going to tie the show up until the murder of Mr. Kinney is solved.
If he does that, the circus will just go to pieces, and we'll all lose our jobs.
That would be most unfortunate.
It'll cost Mr. Gaines everything he's got.
And, Mr. Chan, he's been an awfully good friend to Tim and me and everyone.
We've been with him for five years... and there never was any trouble until Mr. Kinney joined the show.
How long Mr. Kinney been partner in circus?
Just the last two seasons. Mr. Gaines needed money, so he sold him a half interest.
But Mr. Kinney didn't know how to handle circus people.
He was only used to honky-tonks and tried to run things with his fists.
Man who seek trouble never find it far off.
It's Mr. Gaines who's in trouble now.
Can't you do something, Mr. Chan?
Please?
Unfortunately, have already made plans for vacation with family.
Oh.
I was depending on you to help us.
Aw, Pop, don't let 'em close down the circus.
- And don't let them arrest the little people.
- And the clowns.
- And the elephants.
- You see, Pop?
- I knew we should have stayed on this case.
- Aw, Pop!
- Come on!
- Please.
Jury seem to render verdict without retiring.
Then you'll help us, Mr. Chan?
Final decision in hands of judge.
Judge say yes too.
Suggest we visit police headquarters and see Lieutenant Macy.
Oh, thanks.
- I'm going with you, Pop.
- Contradiction, please.
You stay here, help unpack.
[Laughter]
We had a pretty tough season, so naturally, the show went into the red.
I gave Kinney notes for my share of the losses.
Then if those notes weren't paid by the end of the season...
he would have taken over your share of the show.
- He could have.
- Well, as far as I can see...
every one of you might've had a reason for wanting Kinney out of the way.
Now, some one of you had a hand in turning the ape loose...
and until I get the answer, you're all gonna stay right here.
You can't do that!
We may be tied up here for weeks.
This show's got to keep moving to support itself.
It's the law, brother. All right, Stone.
Take 'em out and have 'em booked.
But you-
Just a small-town cop who wants to show how smart he is.
- Yeah.
- All right, get goin; both of ya. Go on.
May offer suggestion, please?
Go ahead.
Frightened bird very difficult to catch.
What does that mean in English?
Old English adage say give man plenty of rope, will hang self.
Not in this case. I'm gonna give 'em a few hours in the jug... and I'll bet they uncork everything they know.
Perhaps facts also remain corked in jug.
Guilty person more apt to betray self... while engaged in everyday work at circus.
[Chuckles]
I suppose I should join the circus as a mind reader and guess the answer.
- Very wise plan.
- Are you kid-
Say, that gives me an idea.
If I let 'em carry on with the show... then I can study the conditions under which the crime was committed.
Trained mind of policeman work like lightning.
Yeah!
Say, listen, Charlie.
You were in on the start of this.
Why don't you stick with me to the finish?
Thank you so much.
Will return to humble family and make arrangements.
Fine.
[Horn Honking]
Su! Su Toy!
- You again?
- Yeah. I'm going along with you.
- What?
- Sure. Haven't you heard?
I'm gonna help Pop solve the murder.
Well, you can solve anything you want to, but keep away from me.
[Lee] Aw, don't be like that.
We'll have a swell time.
I've brought along my phonograph, and I got a lot of records from Shanghai.
That's fine.
Then you can play yourself to sleep.
Good night.
Lady seemed to have dropped final curtain.
Oh, that-that's just her way of saying good night.
Mmm. Very practical.
There is nothing to detain you further.
- What time did you say this train pulls out?
- Midnight.
We'd better get aboard.
What are you doin' in the manager's compartment?
Waitin' to see Gaines.
Well, wait outside.
We don't want the smell of animals in here.
- What is it, Farrell?
- I thought I'd better ride up forward tonight...
- and keep an eye on the ape.
- That's a good idea. Go ahead.
- Is that Kinney's stateroom?
- Yes. Mine's further down the corridor.
Holt, take the bags to Mr. Kinney's room.
You don't mind sleeping there,
Mr. Chan?
No. Guilty conscience only enemy to peaceful rest.
- How about your son?
- Huh? Oh. Oh, I don't mind.
- You can use this room anytime you like.
- Thank you.
This way, sir.
- You are Hindu from the sideshow?
- Yes, sir.
But in the circus, we all have more than one job. I'm the porter on this car.
Circus performer like detective.
- Must beJohnny of many trades.
- Yeah, you said it.
- Bring other baggage, please?
- Yes, sir.
Did Kinney keep all his papers here?
No. He used the safe in the business wagon too.
Well, how about having a look at it?
Be a lot of trouble. The wagon's already been loaded on the flatcars forward.
Oh, well, we'll look at it in the morning.
[Music Box]
- Oh, pardon me.
- It's all right.
[Whistle Blowing]
- Dan, did you tell them?
- No. They'll find out soon enough.
- Oh, you should've told 'em tonight.
- Let me handle it, will ya?
- Where are you going?
- I'm riding forward on the flatcars.
- I saw to that.
- [Whistle Blowing]
[Middle Eastern]
[Continues]
Ancient adage say music soothes savage breast.
Please to reserve for such occasion.
I was just trying to cheer things up, Pop.
It's kind of creepy here in Kinney's room.
Then recommend you brush teeth, say prayers and go to bed.
I'm not sleepy yet.
You know, I'm going out on the platform and think this case over.
Have new problem in female geometry?
You know what you always say, Pop-
If you want to understand men, study women.
- Did Pop say that?
- Yeah.
Tim?
[Yawns]
- Tim!
- Aw, what do you want?
How do you expect me to get any sleep with you stamping around over my head?
You women can sleep no matter what's going on, but I'm worried.
Well, lie down and count sheep.
I never did like sheep, and you know it.
Well, try elephants.
You don't have to count so many.
Think you're smart, don't ya?
[Coughing]
[Middle Eastern]
Gun in coat pocket.
Aim carefully.
Cannot afford to miss.
Perfect bull's-eye.
Very proud of number one son.
Gee, Pop, I knew we shouldn't have slept in here.
Hey, Charlie, what happened?
Somebody object to Charlie Chan as passenger on train.
- A snake!
- How could that have gotten in here?
Very strange. When retired, ventilator closed.
Well, then someone must've opened it from the roof and slipped the snake in.
- Where are they kept?
- Forward in one of the menagerie cars.
- Holt's the only one that handles 'em.
- Yeah, that's right.
- Well, what's the answer?
- How do I know? I haven't left this car all night.
- How'd the snake get in here?
- How'd the ape get out of the cage?
Question without answer... like faraway water, no good for nearby fire.
Yeah, but I know one answer though.
Somebody's trying to pin this on me just because I handle the snakes.
Well, this time,
I'm going to find out what's what... if I have to keep everyone on this train awake all night.
No cause for hurry now.
Enemy who misses mark, like serpent... must coil to strike again.
- Good night.
- Good night.
[Shouting, Indistinct]
Oh. Hello, Pop.
I was just doing my daily dozen.
Attitude prove
Darwin theory correct.
Suggest you untie human pretzel and get dressed.
Yeah, sure. Hey, Pop, get me out of this, will you?
Very wise to know way out before going in.
Ooh! Oh, thanks, Pop.
Where are you going?
Am having breakfast with little people.
More coffee, Mr. Chan?
Thank you.
Another piece of toast?
No more, thank you.
- Very excellent coffee.
- Thank you.
Tiny's a good cook.
Do they dunk in China, Mr. Chan?
- Please?
- Dunk. Dunk.
Oh. Very ancient Chinese custom.
Tiny, don't be so unrefined.
[Slurping]
I was hoping, Mr. Chan, that you'd have some new clues.
Have, uh, several clues.
One need explanation.
- Perhaps you can be of assistance.
- Sure, I'll be glad to help.
You enter business wagon last night before discovery of body?
You enter business wagon last night before discovery of body?
- Why, I, uh-
- You'd better tell Mr. Chan everything.
- He's a mind reader.
- Very easy to read mind... when clue like, uh, rag on sore thumb.
Marks in dust on light shade prove little man on first visit... slide down lamp cord to reach floor.
It's true.
I did go in.
Mr. Gaines left his keys in there after the matinee... so I climbed down the ventilator and opened the door for him.
Uh, something important
Mr. Gaines want in wagon?
I don't know. He started to open the safe, then Mr. Kinney came in.
They got into an argument about business, so I beat it.
But please don't tell the police.
They suspect Mr. Gaines already.
If they knew that, they'd be sure to arrest him.
Facts, like photographic film... must be exposed before developing.
Thank you for very excellent breakfast.
Don't mention it, Mr. Chan.
Is there anything else we can do for you?
Have desire to again visit ape's cage.
We'll take you there. I always bring the ape a banana in the morning.
He's crazy about them. No matter how mad he is, it always quiets him.
[Chuckles]
Yes.
This is Jumbo.
He's my special pet.
Really?
[Chuckles]
Most fortunate animal.
[Growling]
Look at the size of that fellow, Mr. Chan.
Like Charlie Chan, need to reduce waistline.
[Both Laughing]
[Lions Growling]
How would you like to be inside playing with them?
Much prefer being outside looking in.
[Both Laughing]
- [Growling]
- Quiet down!
Hal, I brought Caesar a banana.
Be careful, Tiny.
He's still pretty mean.
Oh, he wouldn't hurt me.
Will you help me up, Mr. Chan, please?
Here, Caesar.
- Any news of missing key?
- No, sir.
But Mr. Macy put this policeman here to guard the cage.
Hey, Pop! Pop!
I've been looking all over for you.
The business wagon was broken into last night, and Mr. Macy wants you there right away.
More trouble for poor Mr. Gaines.
Trouble rain on man already wet.
Excuse, please.
Excuse.
[Macy]
Looks like an amateur tried to break it open.
A regular yegg would've known he couldn't chisel his way... through a cold steel safe door.
Any fingerprints?
No, not a trace.
- Where was the business wagon last night?
- On the flatcar.
Yeah, and I locked it up before it was put on the car.
Pop!
Look. They filed through the hasp to get into the wagon.
Open the safe, Gaines, and let's take a look.
- What do you make of it, Pop?
- Very clever job.
And, uh, excellent bronze filings.
Nothing's been touched.
He didn't get into the safe.
For a quick guess, I'd say that whoever was responsible for Kinney's death... must've wanted something out of this safe.
Quite possible.
Here, what's this?
"Joseph Kinney. Personal."
Life insurance policy.
Fifty thousand dollars.
- Who is beneficiary?
- It was changed last month to, uh...
Marie Normand.
Trapeze lady.
Mr. Kinney's fiancee.
Yeah. Hey, wait a minute.
- Here's a certificate of marriage.
- What's that?
"Juarez, Mexico. May 30, 1935."
Joseph Kinney and Nellie Farrell.
Say, what is this fiancee business?
Very peculiar.
Man already married announce engagement to trapeze lady.
- [Snaps Fingers]
- I got it.
The Normand girl must've found out he was two-timing her... and decided to collect the insurance.
Too soon to count chickens until eggs are in nest.
- Who is Nellie Farrell?
- The wardrobe woman, Dan Farrell's sister.
She and Kinney used to go together, but he threw her over for Marie Normand.
Did you ever hear Kinney speak of being married to her?
Never. If he did, he kept it to himself.
Well, is that his signature?
- Yes, it is.
- Very strange.
Nellie Farrell did not reveal last night... she was wife of murdered man.
I got it. Maybe this is the lucky break we're looking for.
We'll need it if we're ever gonna crack this case.
One grain of luck is sometimes worth more than whole rice field of wisdom.
Yeah. Say, where can I find this Nellie Farrell?
- She's probably over on the train.
- Come on.
Let's go have a little talk with her.
- Are you Nellie Farrell?
- No.
She was over there reading the morning paper just a few minutes ago.
- Well, where'd she go?
- Who wants to know? Oh.
She said she had some business in town.
- She'd be back before the show started.
- Oh.
Say, Pop,
I just thought of something.
I'll see you later.
So she went to town on business.
I wonder what that's all about.
Perhaps will learn when meet with her.
Very excellent likeness of Mr. Kinney.
But we know what he looked like.
His picture isn't gonna get us anything.
Cannot tell where path lead until reach end of road.
- Let me look at that, will you?
- Say, what's the big idea?
Here it is!
What a break! Come on!
We're on the right track.
There's Nellie's brother.
Where? Let me see.
Well, I should kiss a pig!
Shh, shh, shh.
There, there, dear.
There, there.
There, there.
There's Nellie too.
They're coming this way.
Keep your head down, and we'll trail them.
- What did the lawyer say?
- There isn't a chance of a slipup.
I can claim everything.
[Su Toy]
Good morning, Mr. Chan.
How did you know it was me?
I never forget a face.
Don't give me away.
I'm on a hot trail.
You must be.
Something's burning.
- Hiya, Su. We're detectives.
- We're in disguise.
Well, the first thing you'd better learn is how to keep your disguise up.
[People Laughing]
- Say, Pop-
- You find Nellie Farrell visit lawyer's office?
- Gee! How did you know?
- Very simple.
Saw you get idea from newspaper with clipping cut out.
Uh, very proud you learn tricks of trade so quickly.
And I thought I was putting something over on you!
But she went there, all right.
And when she came out-
She meet brother, Dan Farrell.
I'm telling you?
You're telling me.
Very simple.
Brother also missing from circus lot.
Anyway, I followed them and listened in.
She told them there wasn't a chance of a slipup.
- She could claim everything.
- And then?
And then they walked on, and, well, uh, l-
- You meet contortion lady?
- Oh, how do you do it, Pop?
Evidence like nose on anteater.
Jade pin belong to lady of many angles.
Gee, you can see through anything.
I don't see what you need a microscope for.
Good tools shorten labor.
Have made very interesting discovery. Observe.
- What are those spots?
- Bronze filings... from padlock on door of business wagon.
Discovered in this envelope which contain personal papers of Mr. Kinney.
But that envelope was inside the safe, and the safe wasn't broken open.
Contradiction, please.
Bronze filings prove otherwise.
Same person who file lock also open safe.
Must have known combination.
Then batter safe door to give appearance... of unsuccessful attempt at burglary.
It's over my head.
Particles of bronze filings from padlock... unconsciously deposited in envelope when burglar handled same.
I get it. But what do you suppose they stole from the envelope?
Mystery still to be solved.
Oh, l- l-I was just gonna tell Mr. Chan the matinee is about to start... and I thought maybe he needed something before I left.
Oh, yeah?
Well, get outta here.
And make it snappy.
I just caught Holt listening outside the door.
Inquisitive person, like bear after honey... sometime find hornet's nest.
[Fanfare]
Circus starting.
Perhaps Nellie Farrell now returned.
Yeah, that's why I came to get you.
We'll look her up.
Advise no mention of marriage certificate.
Leave first move to lady.
Oh, sure.
- [Circus]
- [Chattering]
Hey, Jenny, what about my turban?
- It's right there under your nose.
- Where?
- Jenny, where are my slippers?
- I don't know.
- There's no shoes with this outfit.
- Look for 'em yourself.
That's Nellie's job, not mine.
Lou.
Did you think over what we talked about last night?
Yes, Hal, but I couldn't leave Marie, especially now.
There isn't anything you can do for her.
I've got it fixed up for a job in Chicago.
We'll hop the night train-
Jenny, isn't Nellie Farrell back yet?
No, and I think it's a dirty trick piling up all this work on me.
And don't blame me if I'm late for the show.
- Jenny, haven't you found my slippers yet?
- All right.
Do the best you can. We'll have everything straightened out in a little while.
Jenny, get your parade stuff racked over there.
- Make more room for this other wardrobe.
- I only got one pair of hands.
- I'm doing the best I can.
- I know you are.
Well, Nellie... why weren't you on the job?
- I don't have to answer to you anymore.
- What do you mean by that?
I'm just as much boss here now as you are.
I'm Joe Kinney's widow. I've put in my claim for his share of the show.
What are you talking about, Nellie?
We were married five months ago.
- Why didn't you tell me about it?
- Why, you were with-
Excuse. So clumsy.
[Quietly]
Better to slip with foot than with tongue.
I didn't tell you about our being married... because I knew you didn't likeJoe Kinney... and I suppose he was keeping our marriage a secret... because he was making a play for Marie Normand.
That's not true! You're just saying that because you hate my sister.
You keep out of this.
I can see through your game.
BecauseJoe Kinney's dead, you're trying to put something over.
But I know he never married you, or he'd have told me.
Why should he?
You were just another woman to him.
And you thought you were so clever taking him away from me.
Pardon interruption, please.
You have marriage certificate?
No, Joe never let me have it.
When was time of marriage?
It was, uh, May the 30th,
Decoration Day.
We were in El Paso, and the big top blew down, and we couldn't go on that night... soJoe and I went across the border toJuarez, and we were married.
- Now I know you're lying.
- I'm sorry, Miss Normand, but it's the truth.
- We found the marriage certificate.
- It's a fake.
No, it isn't.
Mr. Gaines verified the signature.
- I know whereJoe was that night.
- You haven't time. There's your music.
- He wasn't in Mexico, and I can prove it.
- We'll get your story later.
- Hurry!
- [Fanfare]
Get back to your work, folks.
We've got a show on.
Just a minute.
Why didn't you tell us about this... last night when your husband was killed?
Joe and I hadn't been living together... so I thought I should see a lawyer and find out just where I stood.
- I'll take my marriage certificate.
- One moment, please.
Certificate much safer in hands of law.
Yeah, that's right.
You've got nothing to worry about.
We'll take good care of it.
Come on, Charlie.
[Drumroll]
[Man]
Marie Normand!
- [Cymbal Crash]
- [Applause]
[Drumroll]
[Continues]
[Screams]
[Clamoring]
Marie! Marie!
- Marie!
- Hurry with that stretcher!
Pick her up.
Gently. Gently.
That's it. Easy.
Take ahold of that.
Take ahold of that.
Take her to her dressing room.
All right.
Somebody get a doctor, quick.
Start the band playing, get the clowns out here, and keep things going.
- Right.
- Well, whatever she knew... her mouth's shut now.
Silent witness sometimes speak loudest.
She's still alive but unconscious.
We're taking her to her dressing room.
I don't see how it could've happened.
That rigging is tested before every performance.
Very strange.
Accident most conveniently timed.
- I'll get the doctor's report.
- [Circus]
- Hey, come on, clowns!
- [Clowns Shouting]
Suggest you place very close guard over Miss Normand.
Might meet with another accident.
You're right, Charlie.
I'll see to it.
[Continues]
Observe. Bullet hole in canvas over trapeze.
- Very commendable research.
- Oh, uh-
Have discovered secret of perpetual agitation?
I was only testing the machine, Pop.
Magnifying female charms very ancient optical illusion.
Look, Charlie!
I found this gun under a wagon near the big tent.
Here's the dope. Somebody was afraid
Marie Normand would squawk... about the night of May 30 and tried to finish her off.
- That's exactly what I thought.
- It must've been the Farrell girl... or maybe her brother.
But that doesn't make sense.
This marriage certificate's on the up-and-up.
May examine document, please?
[Lee] They're exactly alike.
That proves it's Kinney's signature.
- Sure.
- Contradiction, please.
Even if name signed one million times... no two signatures ever exactly alike.
Then the Normand girl was right.
It's a fake.
Kinney's name was traced on there from the photo.
- Undoubtedly correct.
- It's a cinch.
Look, Farrell had planned this phony marriage racket.
He turned the ape loose to murder Kinney... and planted the certificate in the safe.
Then when the Normand girl threatened to spoil his game, he tried to knock her off.
- That's enough for me.
- Not always wise... to accept simplest solution.
Mind, like parachute, only function when open.
[Laughs] If I can't make a case out of this,
I'll pin my badge on the ape.
- Mr. Macy, I agree with you.
- Thanks.
- Who is it? What-What happened?
- So sorry.
Unloaded gun always cause most trouble.
- How'd that rifle get here?
- Was reposing against wall.
That's funny. Mr. Gaines never let it out of his stateroom.
Please to return gun.
Much safer in hands of owner.
Gaines's rifle. That takes us right back to the guy we started with.
But he's not gonna talk his way out of it this time.
- We got enough on him now to make a pinch.
- No use to hurry... unless sure of catching right train.
Then what would you advise, Charlie?
Wait for Miss Normand.
She give clue when conscious.
- Is she badly hurt, Doctor?
- There are two compound rib fractures... and a possible spine injury.
I sent for the fluoroscope before I risk moving her.
When do you think she'll regain consciousness?
That's almost impossible to say.
If something doesn't break when she comes to...
I'm gonna pinch the whole show.
[Lou Sobbing]
Excuse, please.
You recall where sister was night of May 30?
No, I don't, Mr. Chan.
I was-
I wasn't with her.
Perhaps she keep book of newspaper clippings?
Why, yes.
May I have permission to examine, please?
Yes. It's in the top tray of her trunk.
- Found something, Pop?
- Telephone police headquarters.
El Paso, Texas.
Get all information concerning this shooting at Ace Casino... also description of killer.
- What's on your mind?
- Have idea for quick solution... of mystery.
Important you return with report as soon as possible.
You can count on me.
Listen, Operator, you gotta get me through.
This is official business.
Clear all wires.
Yes, police headquarters,
El Paso, Texas.
Make it snappy.
And reverse the charges.
Mr. Macy, I can't stand it.
Why don't they do something for my sister?
Everything humanly possible is being done.
- Any change in condition?
- None.
Perhaps we'd better take action.
Each moment's delay increase danger.
I'll make the necessary arrangements immediately.
- [Chattering]
- [Sobbing]
Lou, your sister's condition is quite serious.
An emergency operation is necessary.
We can't move her to a hospital.
It will have to be done here without delay.
Lieutenant Macy, will you send into town for the equipment and assistance?
- Yes.
- [Sobbing Continues]
Don't worry, kid. I'll see that she gets the best of everything.
Drive to the hospital and see that the ambulance... and equipment ordered for Dr. Meade gets here without delay.
One moment, please.
Must ask everyone's cooperation.
Any noise or disturbance during operation may prove fatal.
Please to remain away from tent and be quiet as possible.
Get back to your quarters, folks.
Farrell, you and Blake look after the animals.
Yeah, that's right, Chief.
The Ace Casino, night of May 30.
I want his description.
Yeah. Yeah, I get you.
What? Repeat that, please.
Yes, we've got someone here who answers that exactly.
Don't worry, Chief. This is Mr. Chan Jr., and I'll get your man!
Hey! Hey!
[Ape Growling]
[Growling Continues]
[Banging]
[Growling]
Number one son late.
- Tim?
- [Tim] Aw, stop bothering me.
Do you suppose they'll be much longer with the operation?
- I'm worried.
- Worrying won't get you anywhere.
Why don't you be c-calm like me?
Ouch.
See? You made me cut myself.
I've got a funny feeling that something's going to happen.
Aw, stop acting like a kid.
Why don't you grow up?
[Screams]
The ape!
It's the ape!
- The ape!
- Look at the ape!
[Chattering]
Well, Charlie, your plan didn't work.
Whoever it was got by the guard and released the ape. All right, boys.
Marie!
[Gasps]
- What's happened?
- What's the meaning of this?
Necessary deception to protect life of Miss Normand.
Sister safely taken to hospital much earlier.
Rapid recovery assured.
Suggest you both go there immediately.
Oh, thank you, Mr. Chan!
Hey, Pop! Pop!
Pop, I got the information you wanted.
The description of the killer at El Paso fits Holt... and I just caught him letting the ape out.
- I tried to stop him, but he slugged me.
- Holt? Then he's our man.
Cover all roads out of town.
Send out a general broadcast.
One moment, please.
Unnecessary to search further.
Here is killer.
- Holt!
- [Murmuring]
Very clever scheme to establish perfect alibi.
When committing murder, turn ape loose... to give impression real ape guilty of crime.
First, suspected ape was man in disguise... from clue of hairs found on window sill at scene of crime.
Proved to be dead hairs not from living ape.
Second clue: Marks outside window of business wagon.
Real ape would never use barrel.
Would use feet to climb up to window.
And now, report from El Paso complete link in chain.
Mr. Kinney and Holt old friends.
Meet at gambling casino on night of May 30.
This clipping show they use crooked cards.
Were caught cheating.
And in fight that follow,
Holt kill sheriff.
Kinney protect him from police with job in circus as snake charmer.
Later, men quarrel over money won at gambling.
Kinney receive strange messages threatening life.
Send for humble self to discuss matter.
Holt, fearing Kinney would turn him over to police... resort to murder.
Today, when Miss Normand...
reveal knowledge of night of May 30...
Holt, fearing statement would incriminate him as murderer... attempt to remove her also.
First attempt fail.
Suspected he would strike again...
so with aid of Lieutenant Macy, laid trap.
Death write finish to mystery.
Yes, we cleared that up all right, Charlie.
But it doesn't clear you two of forging that phony marriage certificate.
Take them to headquarters.
Charlie, you're a great guy.
Put it there.
- I'll say you are.
- Thank you so much.
- Have a cigar, Mr. Chan?
- No, thank you.
- How about you, Mr. Macy?
- Oh, thanks.
Well, Gaines, I guess you can move the show out tonight, uh, unless Charlie here objects.
No objections.
But Charlie Chan... like sometime to see circus as simple spectator.
I'll attend to that.
You'll have a lifetime pass... to this show for yourself and family.
Now, how many shall I make it out for?
Fourteen or-
Think 14 quite sufficient.
Maybe more later.
[Train whistle blowing]
[john Philip sousa's "the stars and stripes forever" plays]
[Music stops]
And now, my friends, if there are any among you suffering from that scourge of mankind... toothache...
Let him step up here and be relieved...
Instantly, painlessly, and without charge!
[Music resumes]
Go on, Hank.
Oh, well.
How do you do, friend?
How do you do?
Come right here.
[Indistinct conversation]
[Music stops]
Now relax, my friend.
It'll all be over before you know it.
Be careful, doc.
She's awful sore.
You won't even feel it, my good fellow.
And now, my friends, you'll notice how quickly and painlessly all this is done.
No surgical shock and no nervous strain on the patient.
All right, my friend, let's have a look at it.
Open wide, please.
Aha.
Acute hemorrhoidal laparotomy.
Fortunately, it is one of my specialties.
All right, now, friend, relax.
Relax.
Open wide.
[Music resumes]
[Music stops]
Did I or did I not cause you any pain, my friend?
The gentleman says he never even felt it.
And now, my friends, who else wants a bottle of kink-away, that magic hair tonic?
The miracle preparation of the age, my friends.
A great scientific gift to mankind.
Are we asking a dollar for this priceless fluid?
We are not.
Half a dollar? No.
For the trifling sum of 25 cents, the fourth part of a silver dollar, you are privileged to take home with you a bottle of this magic lotion.
It gives your head a straight, strong, glossy hair that has the ladies leaping in your lap.
Excuse me, boss, but you sold me a bottle of that stuff down in Birmingham last month.
Well, it worked, didn't it?
[Train whistle blows]
[calliope music plays]
Here you are, folks!
Here you are!
The eighth wonder of the world!
A monument to human patience, endurance, and fortitude!
Think of it, my friends...
32 days balanced on the needle-like point of a flagpole on his way to a new world record!
Well, say, mister, can I ask you a question?
Sure.
How does he what?
[Chuckles] Say, that's a professional secret.
Aw, baloney.
Come on down.
We're a bust.
What's wrong?
Our racket's all wrong.
If the whole population was lying on its back, it wouldn't look up at you.
[Clicking]
No customers, huh?
No.
Must be the depression or something.
If all the penny-pinching yaps ever gathered together in one spot, they wouldn't give a dime to see the statue of liberty do the rumba.
Man:
Step right this way, folks!
This is the greatest show on the lot!
Admission... only 25 cents!
Never make you, never break you, never start you in any legitimate business.
Speculation, folks, is the life of trade.
Look, folks!
He tells the past, the present, and the future!
He answers your questions on money, marriage, and love!
Step right inside...
There's a guy with a sweet racket.
Admission... only 25 cents.
Don't crowd, don't push.
There's room inside for all.
Look how he's pulling them in.
Let's go over and see what he's got.
I know you'll enjoy this show, folks.
[indian accent]
A Patty wants to know if the handsome gentleman from the Oklahoma oil fields will propose marriage to her.
Is that your question, lady?
It sure is!
He's wonderful!
Hey, that dame's a plant.
She used to shill for me in an auction in 'frisco.
There's 40 people in this joint.
At 25 cents a head, that's 10 bucks of sucker money.
Boy, what a gold mine this is.
Hey, pipe down, pipe down.
"The first thing to be done by the crystal gazer
"is to rub the palms of the hands
"briskly for several minutes.
"Pick up the crystal with the left hand
"and make several passes with the right hand
"over and above the crystal,
"which will have a tendency to magnetize it
"and bring results more quickly.
"Always gaze calmly into the crystal,
"but do not at anytime strain the eyes.
"Try to avoid winking.
There's a difference between staring and gazing."
It says here that 30 million people spend about 125 million bucks every year just to get their fortunes told and their minds read.
125 million smackers.
Say, how long has that been going on?
Geez!
Say, I must have been daffy to overlook this!
It's a sure cleanup.
Any schoolboy can get rich doing it.
All you got to do is look wise, tie a bath towel around your head, and tell the chumps what they want to hear.
The whole world's full of hopeful suckers.
Just keep promising them things.
They'll believe you.
And pay for it, too...
Pay big!
Look.
[Deep voice]
Little lady, listen well.
I see a tall, handsome, dark, distinguished-looking gentleman, a man with millions and millions made in the cattle business in the Argentine.
And don't kid yourself.
There are plenty of dames that'll go for that hooey.
[Normal voice]
And now we got to get a name...
A name that'll catch their eye and stick in their minds.
"Something" the great, the great "something", le blank, le Von, divon, the great livoni, the great divoni...
The great baloney.
[Laughs]
Boy, that's a pip...
The great baloney.
Yes, silly.
Why don't you try helping me?
Perfect.
Look, look.
Look at that. Just what we need, just the name for me.
Chandra?
Or cookies?
[Deep voice]
Chandra.
Chandra the great.
Frank: Chandra the great reads your mind like an open book.
Ladies and gentlemen, it is now my pleasure to introduce to you the world's master of mental mysticism... chandra the great!
[Gong crashes]
I shall now pass among you, giving each and every one of you a piece of paper on which to write your questions.
Don't let your neighbor see what you write.
Mohammad, have you faithfully performed your mission?
Are all the questions in the basket?
Yes, great master.
Burn them.
Consign them to the flames.
"I have lost my keys.
"Please tell me where I can find them.
Signed,
George Thomas."
George Thomas has lost his keys.
I see them...
Yes, I see them at home.
They are in the door of your liquor cabinet.
Who won the fourth race at belmont, Sam?
Blue boy.
Why don't I drop another 2 bucks.
Who'd you bet on?
Rollaway.
That coyote couldn't beat a fat woman going up a hill.
He showed plenty of speed at latonia.
Yeah? Racing a lot of cockroaches?
Besides, he wasn't in the second race.
You're trying to tell me he didn't win the second race at latonia last Saturday?
I'm telling you he wasn't in the second race.
He was in the fourth race.
Conditions in the spirit world seem disturbed.
Get your dough out.
A dollar will get you 10.
A dollar?
No, I-i-i ain't gonna bet you.
I'm a sporting man.
Ah, everything is clear again.
"Am I going to marry and settle down here,
"or will I go to Chicago and look for a job?
Signed, Sylvia r."
I see a little lady who is perplexed as to her future...
Whether to stay in this city and enjoy the soft protection of matrimony or to fare forth and hew out a commercial career for herself in... Chicago.
The solution to your problem depends entirely upon yourself.
But I can state...
That a very great change is coming into your life very soon, my dear Sylvia r.
Did you ask that question?
Yes, I did.
[Scoffs]
He's daffy.
You don't really believe all that hooey, do you?
Why, I certainly do.
I won 5 bucks on rollaway in the second race at latonia,
I'm telling you.
The only bet I win in a month am I gonna forget it?
I'm telling you, that beetle wasn't in the second race.
Pete slovak, you are wondering whether you are going to have any children.
I don't see you having any children at all.
But I see...
Your wife having three.
Aw, that's enough of those yaps, chan.
This concludes my public demonstration for today, but I can be found between the hours of 10:00 A.M. and 3:00 P.M.
Every day, with the exception of the sabbath, at your charming little hostelry, the commercial house, 2nd and market streets, suite "a."
Those with pressing personal problems may come to me there for private readings.
All communication sacred and confidential.
The fee is $1.
Frank:
Learn of private matters in a private interview for the small sum of $1.
Excuse me, lady.
Here you are, folks.
Make an appointment here for a private reading.
It's only a dollar.
Here you are, folks.
Step right up.
[calliope music playing]
Learn of private matters in a private interview for the small sum of $1.
Here you are, folks.
Step right up.
[Normal voice]
Well, how are the suckers?
Did you get any nibbles?
Beautiful.
Five yaps, and two of them look awful promising.
One dame's married to the first national bank here in town.
I'll have the spirits tell her to give us a couple of liberty bonds.
Maybe you won't have to.
I just grabbed this leather.
Haven't had a chance to open it yet, but it feels fat.
Hey, why don't you lay off that petty-larceny stuff?
Someday you'll get your mitt caught in an orchard gate trying to steal a rotten apple and crab the racket for all of us.
Woman: Excuse me, gentlemen,
I lost my purse.
I'm sure
I lost it in here.
[Deep voice] Why, during the performance, madam?
Yes. I know I had it when we came in.
All my rent money was in it...
Almost $50.
You didn't lose it.
Somebody stole it.
Mr. chandra, surely you can help me locate it.
The location of missing articles is often very difficult.
But if you'd care to have a private reading tomorrow,
I might be able to help you.
Mr. Franklin, give the lady a card.
Good night, madam.
I hope you find it.
Oh, aunty, you didn't drop it in the street.
I've looked everywhere.
Can't you help us?
Why, possibly, my dear.
Possibly.
What'd I tell you?
It isn't here.
But what are we going to do?
We need that money so badly.
Quiet, please.
I see a purse...
A brown purse with silver trimmings.
Yes, yes!
That's it.
Your purse is in the shadow, under a coat.
A gray coat.
The man who has it is clutching it tightly.
He is trembling, uneasy.
He is a man of medium height, straight, dark hair, aquiline features.
He is perspiring.
I can see him so clearly,
I can almost put my hand on him.
He has a long, gray beard.
He is a farmer.
But how can I get it back?
I can't tell you the exact address.
But I can go unerringly to the house.
If you will give me your name and address,
I will guarantee to return your aunt's bag with its contents intact by tomorrow.
Oh, Mr. chandra, how can we ever repay you?
The privilege of serving youth and beauty is payment enough.
Here's my address.
Thank you so much,
Mr. chandra.
It's nothing.
Nothing at all.
And rest assured your property will be returned.
[Sighs]
[Normal voice] That's what I call a pretty dame.
Well, not worth 50 bucks.
I can get you
10 dames for 50 bucks.
Come on, give it to me.
Aw, chan, you're breaking my heart.
You really saved our lives.
I don't know what we would have done if we lost that money.
[Deep voice] Things are as bad as that, eh?
Well, I haven't worked since last spring.
You are much too pretty to work, anyway.
That wasn't why I lost my job.
The factory closed.
You mean to say that you worked in a factory?
Mm-hmm. Stenographer.
Living in this town and you've got a job is dull enough.
But when you're not working, it's deadly.
Oh, well, let's not talk about my troubles anymore.
I'm sick of them.
I don't see how people stay more than a week in one place.
Must be glorious to live the way you do.
New faces, new scenes, meeting interesting people.
I guess
I'm pretty lucky.
I have an interesting life, a congenial profession.
And the satisfaction of knowing that you're helping people wherever you go.
And yet, the responsibilities of my profession are quite heavy.
My daily public appearances, my private readings, say nothing of my mail.
Why, would you believe it?
I never get less than
300 letters a week.
Boys, this is miss Roberts.
Mr. Franklin and Sam.
How do?
How do you do?
That's a nice-looking girl.
She ought to be, for 50 bucks.
8 is the point.
I had no idea people depended on you so.
They have great confidence in me.
It's my life's work never to betray them.
But do you have to answer all these letters?
And by tomorrow, there'll be twice as many.
It's getting beyond me.
I wish I could help you.
Look, if you'll dictate the answers, I'll type them.
Well, that'd be great, but...
We're leaving town on Sunday.
Why couldn't
I go with you?
I told you last night that a great change was coming into your life.
It's here.
You're hired.
Do you mean that?
Shake.
I tell you, these village belles are dynamite!
All you have to do is shake hands with one of them and say, "hello, jail!"
You fixing to get us all shot.
We're liable to get tarred and feathered.
[Normal voice]
You guys don't understand.
I get it. You don't have to draw me no diagrams.
Most likely she's underage...
All hick dames are.
The minute they get into court, they're all 16 or under!
You got me wrong.
Did you ever hear of a guy named mann?
He's got an act.
Sam: And he ain't in vaudeville.
Remember that little blonde tomato in pottstown?
You ducked the joint that time by a whisker, and here you go again!
Listen, you chumps.
That girl's going along as my secretary.
She's gonna do her work, get paid, and that's all there is to it.
Yeah?
What are we stopping for?
[Deep voice] I don't know.
What is it?
Hotbox.
How long will we be here?
Oh, about half-hour,
I guess.
Come on.
Let's get some air.
I've seen pictures of places like this, but I never believed it.
Oh, I wish we could... I wish
I could stay here forever.
Won't you make it "we"?
Maybe.
Well, staying here forever wouldn't be such a bad idea.
What about the train?
[Chuckles]
Well, after all,
I was only wishing.
Beautiful.
Yes, it is gorgeous, isn't it?
Not it. You.
Do you really mean that, or are you just trying to make me happy?
Both... I mean it, and I'd like nothing better in the world than to make you happy.
Oh, you're sweet.
What's on your mind?
You ought to know.
You're the mind reader.
[Chuckles]
One look from you and my power of concentration is scattered.
Really?
I haven't thought of much else except you for the last few weeks.
I think about you all day.
I dream about you at night.
Do you ever think of me?
Of course.
What?
What do you see in your crystal?
I see us becoming good friends...
Close friends.
Closer... And closer.
Wouldn't that be glorious?
I see us brought together by that universal force...
The power that makes these blossoms, the urge that makes all of life...
The force that makes the world go 'round.
Love.
And I suppose all this is very far in the future?
No.
Well, when?
Now.
I can see you in my arms.
I hear you say,
"I love ..."
[Train whistle blows]
And I can hear the train whistle!
Come on!
We'll have to run for it!
[Train whistle blows]
Frank: "I have been married 10 years."
"I love children.
Will I ever have a baby?
Signed, Mrs. b."
"I have saved up $900.
"Please advise me what would be a good investment, or ..."
So this is the way he reads their minds.
I thought chan told you to stay out of here while he's working.
Sure, he did, and now I know why.
Well, I told him when he took you with the show he was shaking hands with trouble!
My good friends, this will conclude the performance.
[Audience murmuring]
Chan's gonna be sore at you if he finds you in here.
Lying and cheating the public...
That's a fine way to make a living.
Sylvia.
I am ashamed of you.
I admit that this part of my act is a fake.
It's got to be.
The great chandra.
All these fairy tales about your supernatural powers!
[Scoffs]
Sylvia,
I have supernatural power.
Yes, this looks like it.
What did I tell you?
Dames is just bad news!
That's what they are!
Just bad news!
Go on. Get out of here.
Get out!
All right, all right.
Don't bawl me out.
I ain't the one sore at you.
It's your funeral.
Sylvia, this is very simple to explain.
Would you have contempt for a man who advertises the goods he wants to sell?
What's that got to do with it?
My occult power is my stock in trade.
I use a little ballyhoo to attract attention.
Is it wrong for the manufacturers of soap, toothpaste, chewing gum, automobiles to ballyhoo their product, to advertise them in newspapers and magazines, to plug them on the radio?
But that's different.
They're trying to sell honest merchandise.
So am I.
There is no difference.
I'm just trying to convince the public that it's worth their while to pay for a private reading.
And, my dear, I assure you, when I'm alone with a client and it's quiet and I can concentrate,
I don't need any mechanical help.
I'm sorry, chan. I didn't know what I was talking about.
Will you forgive me?
Forgive you?
Why, it makes me so happy to know that I meant that much to you.
Now run along, darling, while I change my clothes.
I'll take you to dinner.
All right.
Frank: So, she's just your secretary.
[Normal voice]
Yep.
Well, it looks like she's gonna get promoted.
[Train bell dinging, brakes squeal]
[Deep voice]
Greetings, gentlemen!
Man: The chief of police wants to know if you intend doing your stuff here.
I am going to give a demonstration of the occult science five times daily all this week.
Print that on the front page of your paper.
Maybe you never heard there's an ordinance against fortune-telling in our city.
But not against demonstrations of science.
Ah, so that's what you call it, huh?
[Laughter]
Evidently, it is up to me to give an immediate demonstration of the power of mind over matter!
Do any of you judges of the universe and its peoples know how to take a pulse, that very simple but certain and universally used method of determining the blood flow from the heart?
Gentlemen, I will now prove, for your edification and for my own satisfaction, the power of mind over matter.
I will now stop and start my pulse at will.
If you please.
Got it?
Sure.
You haven't lost it.
I've stopped it.
Now it's going again.
Yeah.
Got it?
Yeah.
I will now stop it again.
Maybe I'm crazy.
Are you trying to kid me?
Got it?
Yes.
Say when you want it stopped.
Stop.
Why, that beats anything I ever heard of.
How do you do it?
Just an elementary principle of the occult science.
I simply tell my pulse to stop.
It stops.
[Chuckles]
How do you do it?
You simply roll a handkerchief into a hard ball, place it under your armpit against the artery.
When you press your arm against it, it stops the blood and the pulse.
It's a beauty, but it ain't gonna save you.
That chief of police has got a head on his shoulders.
Yeah? What do you think I got?
A casaba melon?
Oh, I never should have let you talk me into this.
Just like I said...
Chief of police and two dicks sitting out there.
Why, you'll have them right in your lap!
Well, it's my lap.
Yeah, and it's my carnival.
Where's Frank?
He didn't show up.
He must be drunk again.
Well, he sure picked a sweet night for it.
How are you gonna get by without Frank?
Sylvia can run the phone for me.
Can you?
I can do it as well as Frank.
Darling, are you nervous?
Oh, a little bit.
But it's nothing.
I'll be all right.
Now, all you've got to do is read the questions clearly and distinctly.
You understand?
I've got it.
[Gong crashes]
S.T.K. Wants to know if his real-estate investment will pay.
Well, he ain't answering.
Give it to him again.
S.T.K. Wants to know...
What's the matter?
He ain't getting it.
S.T.K. Wants to know about his real-estate investment.
S.T.K.
There's something wrong with the wiring.
I must set aside all questions for the moment.
Shall I go get him?
Wait a minute.
Let's watch him squirm.
Okay.
I see disaster.
Grave disaster.
A crime about to be committed.
A man walking along a dark street.
Now he stops at a corner, looks furtively around.
I see... The street names on the lamp posts.
Chestnut and Nash.
Chestnut and Nash?
That's fagan's jewelry store!
Of course it is.
The man looks up and down the street to see if he is observed.
The street is deserted.
Now he picks up an object.
It is a stone!
I see the shattering of glass.
The window is broken!
The stone smashes in amongst the jewelry!
The criminal cowers in the doorway, waiting to see if the noise has attracted attention.
[Crowd murmuring]
The vision suddenly fades out.
I am very tired.
It has been a great strain, my friends.
Mr. chandra, you saved one of our most prominent merchants a great loss.
A mere matter of routine in my profession.
[Chuckles]
If you'd had that vision a few minutes earlier, we'd have had that gorilla in the morgue.
Visions as clear as that
I only see as they are actually transpiring.
Well, I want to apologize for ever doubting your ability.
Don't even mention it.
We all must be convinced.
Uh...
Can I see you a minute?
Will you come over to dinner with us tomorrow night?
Wife and I'd sort of like to have a...
Private reading.
It would be a great honor.
You will?
[Chuckles]
I'll call for you at the hotel.
Good night, chief.
Good night!
Lead me out of here before I start believing in you.
[Chuckles]
[Normal voice]
Hey. Come here.
You sure nobody saw you tonight?
Not a chance.
Everything's Jake.
And I didn't do so bad for myself, either.
What?
Ain't that a honey?
Thanks.
I can use that.
What for, I'm asking you?
What for?
For an engagement ring.
I'm gonna be married.
You're gonna be what?!
Say that again.
Married... to Sylvia.
You? Marry that dame?
What for?
Listen... that girl's the first decent thing that's ever come into my life.
She's a swell kid,
Frank.
I love her.
All right, love her!
But why marry her?
Oh, well, you wouldn't understand about a girl like Sylvia.
So you're gonna marry her?
Legal?
Yeah, if she'll have me.
Marry.
You need a wife about as much as
I need a cage full of white mice.
What are you gonna give me for a wedding present?
A nice, tight, tailor-made straightjacket.
[Laughing]
[Train whistle blows]
And another thing!
You know a tough judge could very easily divide 30 years among the three of us!
Ohh!
Sylvia?
Sylvia?
Sylvia?
Well, she ain't here.
When she comes in, you got to get that ring back.
How?
What'll I tell her?
I don't know.
But you got to get it!
The jeweler's association have sent out a description to every cop in the state.
Geez, you sure got us on a spot.
I got you on a spot?!
Well, you stole the ring, didn't you?
All I wanted you to do was throw that rock through the window.
We're just lucky the cops didn't get wise the whole thing was a fake.
Arguing ain't getting us anywhere.
If the cops spot that rock on her finger, it's curtains.
You could slip it off her finger when she's asleep.
In the morning, tell her she mislaid it or the chambermaid pinched it... anything!
But for the love of Mike, get it!
Well, what did you give me the ring for, anyway?
I didn't give it to you!
You pinched it from me!
Well, I'll get it back some way.
Well, if you don't,
I'm liable to go to jail.
And believe me,
I'll have plenty of company.
Hello, darling.
Just get in?
Mm-hmm.
Just this minute.
Well, is there anything wrong?
No, just a little headache.
Oh,
I'm sorry, darling.
By the way...
I've got a surprise that'll cure that headache.
Hmm? What is it?
A new ring... a big square-cut in a platinum setting.
We'll turn this in on the new one.
Well, I'd rather see the new one before I give this up.
I might like this one better.
You don't have to see it.
Take my word, it's a knockout.
Chan, tell me the truth.
Why are you so anxious to get this ring away from me?
[Knock on door]
See who it is.
Are you chandra?
No. He is.
Yes? What is it?
You wrote this to me?
You help folks that's up against it...
Poor trash what's in trouble, don't you?
Why, yes. Sit down.
What is it you want to ask me?
[Voice breaking]
Ask you? Ask you?
I didn't come to ask you nothing.
I've come to tell you something.
I've come to tell you you spoiled my life!
Spoiled it, do you hear?!
You told me things that ain't come true.
Well, I'm sorry.
Sorry? You?
What have you got to be sorry for?
I'm sorry, do you hear?
I'm sorry for what you done to me, you faker.
What right have you got to tell me who to marry?
Well,
I married him, see?
A man I didn't care nothing for
'cause you told me to.
You said I was gonna be happy and have kids.
Well, my husband ran off, left me right after we was married.
And the man I really loved...
Do you hear me?!
The man you told me not to marry...
He killed himself.
Do you hear me?!
He killed himself over me!
That's how good you help people!
[Sobbing]
You faker!
I hate you!
I hate you!
Come on. Get out of here, you crazy...
He killed himself!
Do you hear me?!
He killed himself!
He killed himself!
[Screams]
Come on.
Let's get out of here.
[Train bell dinging]
Sylvia!
Sylvia!
Sylvia, what's the matter?
Where are you going?
Anywhere...
Anyplace to get away from you and your lies and deceit.
Come here a minute.
Darling, I couldn't help what happened.
That girl was out of her mind.
You're nothing but a cheap, despicable faker, preying on people's minds and giving them a lot of stupid, silly advice that just drives them to trouble and unhappiness.
You drove that girl to suicide just as surely as you're driving me away from you.
Sylvia, you've got to listen to me.
I've listened to your lies long enough.
You never drew an honest breath in your life.
Telling fortunes.
Selling little books on astrology when you don't know the difference between the noonday sun and the north star!
I hate every rotten, crooked thing you represent, and I'm through with you!
Sylvia,
I'm everything you say.
I know how you feel, and I don't blame you.
But, Sylvia, if you stick with me,
I promise you'll never regret it.
I've learned my lesson.
You've got to believe me.
You could never change.
It's born in you.
No, you're wrong,
Sylvia.
For you,
I could do anything.
You're the only thing I love.
I need you now more than ever.
All aboard!
Well, I've made up my mind.
You'll have to give up this lying, cheating game or give me up.
Sylvia, dear...
I promise to give up the whole rotten mess.
I'm finished forever.
I love you and want to make you happy.
Good morning, madam.
Would you like to make $10?
Why, I'm too old.
No, I mean save $10 on your household expenses.
Madam, I represent the gower brush company...
Ah, go to heck!
[Exhales deeply]
Things are sure breaking tough.
I hope I have a little luck today.
Well, you're trying.
That's something.
Don't get discouraged.
It's only that I hate to make you live like this.
Oh, I don't mind it if you don't.
[Chuckles]
You're about the bravest little guy in the whole world.
Frank: Hey, chan!
Hi, Frank.
Gee, chan,
I'm glad to see you.
Yeah.
Nobody else is.
What?
What are you doing?
Selling brushes and getting nothing but flat thumbs from pushing doorbells.
A guy with your con, your larceny, selling brushes?
What's the idea?
I'm on the straight and narrow.
You know, the wife.
The wife.
Love. Marriage. Honesty.
Now there's a combination guaranteed to get anybody into the poor house.
Yeah, and I'm just about there, and I ain't kidding.
Here. Try one of these narcotics.
A buck a smash.
So this is what you've been doing.
You know, chan,
I was wasting my time hustling around them carnivals.
Well, you look like you've been eating regular.
I eat the best groceries a couple of French chefs can put together.
I drink nothing but vintage wine.
That thing you got in your kisser is a sample of the heaters the boss and I smoke.
I got a swell room right in the boss's park Avenue joint.
They heat it and cool it by electricity.
Mm. Who is your boss?
Mr. and Mrs.
Wilson Douglas Austin.
A jolly couple.
He's got controlling interest in a big brunette up on riverside drive while the wife is dancing around with a shiny-haired gigolo that used to be a barber.
And I'm collecting a salary from each of them to play dumb.
Well, maybe you know where I can get a job.
I'll do anything.
I'm flat.
If you were only back in the old racket.
This Austin woman is a pushover for mind readers, crystal gazers...
Anything that's daffy.
Why, there's hardly a week goes by that she don't call on three or four of them.
Why don't you go back in the racket?
Nah, no, Frank.
Anything but that.
No, I'm all washed up.
Don't be a sucker!
What are you gonna do, starve?
The world owes us all a living.
I'm getting mine, and I got a plan where you can get yours.
You're my pal, and I ain't gonna see you perish by the roadside.
Now, listen.
It reads like a million dollars.
You said it.
She'll rub it in her hair.
Now, get this straight.
It goes right there, in place of this article.
Now, understand you got to copy and print up a whole new front page.
I see.
And we got to have it the first thing in the morning, early.
It's, uh...
I'm taking a big risk.
You're getting paid for it, ain't you?
Hello.
Hello, honey.
Can you make it tonight, baby?
You bet.
Great. Got a match?
Sure.
Here you are.
Thanks.
See you tonight.
Uh-huh.
She went for it like a ton of brick.
She'll phone for an appointment.
Swell.
Now here's all the dope.
You better write it down.
Shoot.
The husband's name is Wilson Douglas Austin.
He's medium-complected, getting bald.
About 5'10", weighs around 180.
Got that?
Yep.
What about the gal?
Her name is Kent...
June Kent.
June Kent.
About 5'7", weighs about 130...
One of them willowy brunettes with curves like a 3rd Avenue "I."
Uh-huh.
What color eyes and hair?
Black as ink.
Go on.
They been playing house together for almost two years.
He took her out of the follies.
You're perfectly astounding,
Dr. munro.
Please go on.
[Deep voice]
What I see now is of such a confidential nature that I hesitate.
You must tell me.
I insist.
But, madam, it, uh...
Might alarm you.
Please.
As a special, personal favor.
Very well, madam.
But remember, the truth sometimes hurts.
I see your husband in an apartment with another woman.
A woman?
Who is she?
I see her name.
Jean. Jean.
No. June Kent.
What does she look like?
Tall.
A striking brunette.
Very dark complexion.
Lustrous black eyes.
A colored woman?
Oh, no, no,
Mrs. Austin.
Your husband took her out of the follies.
My dear, he's simply marvelous.
What's his name?
Oh, Dr. munro.
Dr. munro...
M-u-n-r-o.
Oh, Dr. munro!
Oh, he told me the most amazing things.
Oh, Dr. munro.
Tell me all about him.
The detectives and I went there, broke down the door, and there he was.
Oh, my dear, he's just the man
I'm looking for.
This Dr. munro is simply amazing.
Oh, Dr. munro.
Well, maybe he can tell me a few things about George.
If there's anything you want to know of a confidential nature, ask him.
And you say he's good-looking?
Seven homes since the first of the year.
Isn't that terrible?
[Normal voice]
It sure is.
I'll bet that Dr. munro doesn't sleep nights.
No, he probably doesn't at that.
Aren't you glad
I made you give it up?
[Chuckling]
Of course, dear.
And we've never been happier in our lives.
Oh, what if we did have a little tough luck at first?
You've got a good job now, earning a nice salary.
And you told me yourself they may make you division sales manager before long.
[Chuckles]
Let's change the subject.
To what?
To this.
The address is 148 west 59th street, apartment 6a.
Her name is Cooke...
Gloria Cooke.
She's a blonde.
Swell. Do you take him there every day?
Just about.
You see, the stock exchange closes at 3:00.
Well, I pick up
Mr. holman around, uh, 4:00 and deliver him to her about 4:15.
What's his old lady think he's doing?
Playing squash at the racquet club.
[Laughs]
You know, my boss tells his old lady that he's playing polo.
He's got a helmet and a couple of mallets he always takes along in the car.
Does Mr. holman generally have dinner at the hideout?
Never... I pick him up at 6:30 and drive him home for dinner.
Where he arrives all worn out from playing squash.
[Laughter]
That's great, Joe.
Here. Get yourself a house and lot.
Thanks.
[Deep voice] Your reading has ended, Mrs. holman.
I can't continue.
Please go on...
I can tell by your face that you know something you don't want to tell me.
But, my dear Mrs. holman, it is of such a...
A delicate nature that...
That I must ask you to excuse me.
Dr. munro,
I promised you $500.
I'll double that amount if you'll go on.
You mean that?
I certainly do.
I'm dying of curiosity.
But remember, Mrs. holman, the truth sometimes hurts.
I see your husband embroiled with another woman...
A blonde.
The apartment number is...
6a.
Wretch!
The dirty sneak!
And all the time he told me that he was playing squash.
[Muffled upbeat music playing]
Don, open that door!
Don, open that door, or I'll break it down!
I know you're in there with that blonde hussy!
[Metal clangs]
[Music continues]
Man: Mrs. holman, is that your husband?
It certainly is.
I'd know those feet anyplace in the world.
Hello, Alice.
Hello.
Oh, Mrs. Chandler, mama says she can't go shopping with you this afternoon.
Why not?
She has a headache or something.
Must be awful because she's crying.
Where is she, dear?
In the bedroom, but she told me not to bother her.
[Crying]
Why, Ellen, honey, what's the matter?
I'm leaving.
Never coming back.
I'm taking Alice with me, too.
If he thinks he can get away with...
Well, wait a minute. Leaving?
Why? What's happened?
Ralph.
He's got another woman.
I've suspected it for months, but this morning...
Well, I found out all about it.
You mean you actually caught him?
Same thing. It's been torturing me for weeks.
I had to make sure.
I couldn't stand it any longer, so I went to Dr. munro.
The fortune teller?
He told me the girl's name, gave me the address of the apartment, and the hours
Ralph is with her.
And those are exactly the hours he's away from home.
It's true!
I know it! I feel it is!
And Alice and I are getting out forever!
Oh, Ellen, you're not going to give up a home and happiness just because some idiot has put a lot of nonsense into your head.
Oh, don't believe it.
It isn't true, any of it.
It must be true. Haven't you been reading the papers?
Everything that man tells people actually happens.
Oh, well, I suppose this munro is a little more clever than the general run of fortune tellers, but they're all cheats and fakes.
He told me things about Ralph
I know are true.
Where does this...
This great wizard hang out?
Why?
Never mind.
What's his address?
His card's in my pocketbook.
Sylvia, what are you going to do?
Now, look,
I want you to promise me that you won't leave here or do anything foolish till I get back.
I'm going to have a little chat with this Dr. munro.
Is Dr. munro in?
I-I don't know.
I just-a clean here.
Oh.
You Dr. munro's secretary?
No.
Is he in there?
I don't know.
I was just going...
Are you Dr. munro?
Yes.
What do you want?
I'm don holman.
So, you're the dirty rat that tipped off my wife and broke up my home.
Well,
I'm gonna teach you to keep your dirty nose out of other people's business.
Now, wait a minute, friend!
Are you quite sure you know what you're talking about?
You wouldn't want to attack an innocent man.
This is one jam you're not gonna talk yourself out of.
Now, go on.
Get out of here.
Go on.
Get out!
[Gunshot]
[Breathing heavily]
So you don't know
Dr. munro?
No.
Never saw him in your life?
No.
What do you do for a living?
I'm a married woman.
How long you been married?
About a year.
What's your husband do?
He's assistant sales manager for the gower brush company.
Well, well, that's fine, and what were you doing in munro's office after business hours?
But I've told you,
I had to go there because this friend of mine...
For the love of Pete, are you gonna start that again?
Come on. What were you doing in his office?
You saw Mr. holman go in there, didn't you?!
Yes.
But you didn't see munro?
I've never seen the man in my life!
Did you ever happen to see this man?
Why, that's my husband.
Yeah.
It's Dr. munro, too.
It is?
He... he's munro?
[Laughter]
Are you trying to tell us you've been married to the guy for a year and didn't know it was Dr. munro?
Come on.
Where's munro hiding?
I don't know!
I tell you, I don't know!
All right, lock her up.
She'll talk in time.
This way.
[Train whistle blows]
[Piano playing, indistinct conversations]
[Gong crashes]
[Gong crashes]
Yes.
I...
In a way...
That's...
Goes...
Come on!
Snap out of it!
[Groaning]
Snap out of it, will ya?
We're on next.
Ladies and gentlemen!
You are now about to witness one of the scientific marvels of the age!
You are about to see the great divoni in an exhibition of mind-reading that has baffled doctors, scientists, and college professors!
It has made him the favorite entertainer to the princes, kings, and potentates of Europe.
He reads your mind like it was an open book.
Introducing the great divoni!
[Gong crashes]
[Piano playing, conversations continue]
Snap out of it.
What shall I do with the questions, great master?
What shall I do with the questions, great master?
Great master says burn them.
Come on. Snap out of it, you chump.
These tamale-knockers will tear the joint down.
Isabella Gomez wants to know if Manuel is going to marry her legally.
Got it?
Isabella Gomez wants to know if Manuel is going to marry her legally.
[Slurring]
I get a message from...
Isabella Gomez.
She asks me if...
She asks me.
Why should she ask me?
What do I know about anything?
Of all the dirty, rotten, lowdown figures, I'm it.
Everything about me is crooked.
Everything about every mind reader is crooked!
You ask me questions...
Ha ha! And I answer them!
[Laughing]
Sure!
I'll show you how!
Here... a guy downstairs reads me your questions over these phones.
And you think
I'm supernatural.
[Laughing]
You're saps!
You're fools! You're idiots!
You ask me to tell you things!
You think I know!
I'll tell you what I know.
I'm the guy who knows how stupid you are.
You pay me money to wreck you, torture you, boil you up, play to you, and laugh at you, sitting there like a school of fish with your mouths open!
I made a woman kill herself!
I've broken up homes!
Ha ha!
I've broken up my own home!
[Laughing]
Here! Take it with you!
Gaze into it!
Play with it like a coconut, you sillies!
[Indistinct shouting]
All right, send him in.
Man: Yes, sir.
Are you the district attorney?
I am.
You're holding a woman on suspicion of murder, the holman case.
That's right.
Mrs. Sylvia munro.
She's in a prison hospital, sick, isn't she?
Well?
If I can prove that she had nothing to do with the crime, no knowledge of it, is absolutely innocent, that would clear her, wouldn't it?
Naturally.
All right.
I killed him.
I'm Dr. munro.
It was self-defense.
That night, about 6:00,
I was just leaving my office, and the door flew open, and holman came...
Now wait a minute.
Uh, sit down.
[Click]
Send in a stenographer and a couple of witnesses right away.
Man: Yes, sir.
Well, Sylvia, it's all over.
You're clear and free.
Yes, they said I could leave just as soon as I'm well enough.
And don't worry about me.
Don't give me a thought.
Chan, how can I help it, after what you've done?
I've got the best mouthpiece in town... self-defense.
It's an open-and-shut case.
Got me out on bail like that.
Says I'm a cinch to be acquitted in a one-day trial.
Cinch to be acquitted?
I know I haven't got any right to ask this, but, uh...
I want you to do me a favor.
Sylvia...
[Chuckles] Well, this is kind of tough to say, but I've hurt you so much already,
I might as well go all the way.
Our lives are a million Miles apart.
I've pretended to be happy with you, but I never really was.
Oh.
Well, it's not your fault.
I'm to blame.
I'm just no good.
I... I want you to divorce me.
Divorce you?
But you're young and fine...
On the level.
You got everything in the world to offer.
Your whole life's before you.
It'll be clear sailing without me.
Besides, I don't love you.
I never did.
Chan, you're lying.
But you haven't fooled me a bit.
I know you're in terrible trouble, and you're trying to carry it alone.
Well,
I brought it all on myself.
Why should I divide the load with you?
I'm a flop, a failure.
Oh, of course you're not.
If you were fool enough to take me back,
I'd only crush you up again.
You wouldn't.
I know you wouldn't now.
But I tell you, I'm no good.
I never was. I never will be.
Of course you are or you wouldn't have come back.
Oh, there you go, bulling yourself into it.
I don't care what you say or how black you paint yourself.
You need me now more than ever, and I'm going to stick.
I'm going all the way with you.
Come on. Time's up.
I'll be all right.
You can come to see me.
I'll be...
We'll be all right.
Say, these are pals of mine.
Can I say goodbye?
Okay.
Gee, boss, that crystal sure done us wrong.
Never picked the right horse.
Now it sends you to the can.
So long, pal.
I got to hand it to you for coming back and taking it on the chin.
Thanks.
But I guess maybe somebody must have dropped you on your head when you were a baby.
[Laughs]
2 to 10 years.
That's an awful long time.
I wonder how much you get off for good behavior?
Don't ask me.
You're the mind reader.
Man:
Let's get going.
So long, boys.
So long, chan.
So long, boss.
Say, boss, give my regards to Louie.
You remember
Louie the fire eater?
He's up there for life!
It sure is tough to be going away just when beer's coming back.
What's up?
What's happened?
Somebody is a little drunk.
It's Mr. Harker! He's fallen from the penthouse!
- Harker?
- Is he dead?
- I'll say.
- We better call the police!
Come on, let's pick 'em up and carry 'em inside!
No, don't touch 'em until the police get here!
Calling Car 14.
Calling Car 14.
In 13's district, at 921 Lake Street.
921 Lake Street.
Harker Apartments. Investigate an accident.
That's all.
What are you doing, Wilford?
Reconstructing the accident?
I'm afraid I fell.
Yes, I'm afraid you did.
The next time you do it, see if you can't be a little nearer the edge of the roof.
If he jumped from here, it would land him just about where he fell.
Well, why do you say 'jumped'?
Because I'm an inspector and I can say anything I want to.
- I only thought --
- I know.
I've warned you against thinking.
You think I'm so dumb I haven't considered the possibilities of a murder.
 But I have, Wilford. That's why I'm having so much fun.
Who's the young lady?
If I take her word for it, she was Harker's secretary.
Must be pleasant having such a secretary living on the premises.
I wonder if I could've been wrong about you all this time.
Do you know any reason why Mr. Harker would commit suicide, Ms. Terry?
No. I can't imagine him doing it.
- Now, now I'm --
- Wilfred.
Why don't you go in with the doc? He might need you.
Oh. Oh, yes. Yes, sir.
How long have you been working for Mr. Harker?
Only three weeks.
Not long enough to know much about his affairs, eh?
No.
Did he always have his secretaries live on the premises?
I believe so.
Anyone else live here?
Any servants or housekeepers?
You mean a chaperone?
There's only one maid, Augusta.
She's a little bit dumb, but very respectable, I assure you.
Would you like to meet her?
Just a minute.
Thanks.
Where is your bedroom?
In there.
What time did you go to bed?
About 9:30.
I went to my room earlier than that to read.
I heard Mr. Harker go out about nine o'clock, but I didn't hear him come in.
Do you sleep soundly?
I suppose so.
And you heard nothing? No other disturbance until the shriek?
Not a sound.
Alright. Let's see the maid.
This way.
Listen!
That's in her room!
Augusta! Are you alright?
Yes. No.
I am not. There's a man in my room!
- Where?
- Him!
Oh, he's a police inspector.
Mr. Harker's had an accident.
No!
Was anybody hurt?
He's dead. He fell from the roof garden.
Mr. Harker? Oh, the poor man.
What was he doin' hangin' over the roof garden?
That's what we want to know.
Now, were you here all evening?
Yes, I was.
I meant to go out, but I was reading such an exciting mystery...
... all about a green face that floats up to windows.
Can you imagine that?
I don't know how respectable she is, but you were right about the dumb part.
Outside of green faces, did you see or hear anything?
Now, that's funny. I did.
At least I think I did.
I was asleep when I heard it.
But I was dreaming such an exciting dream,
I wouldn't let myself wake up...
 ... for fear of missing the finish.
You could've stayed for the second show.
What?
Nothing. Let it go.
Well, as I was saying. I heard the noise, but I don't know if it was a real noise...
... or just a noise in the dream.
You see, I can hear dreams as well as see them.
Where's Wilfred?
- Wilfred?
- Yeah, my secretary.
I want him to meet Augusta.
They have so much in common.
What was the noise you may not have heard?
It was a sort of hiss.
Like that.
That settles it. You've got to meet Wilfred.
Gee. You're not at all like Phil O. Dans.
Well, that's alright. You're so much like the maids in the mystery novel...
... that I'm almost convinced that Harker was murdered.
Murdered?
If you're through with me for the moment,
I'd like to go get dressed.
Sure, go ahead. But don't leave the apartment.
Pleasant dreams.
Hello, Inspector Russell speaking.
Who lives in the penthouse across the hall?
 Why, it's vacant, sir.
Oh. Who lives in the apartment directly under this?
Mr. and Mrs. Tom Colby.
Well, give 'em a ring and find out if they heard any disturbance up here tonight.
Call me back.
Yes, sir.
Hello, Jim.
Say, listen, Jim, I...
No, no, I...
- Hello, Eddie.
- Hello, Ted.
- What's the latest?
- Oh, nothin' much.
Gang's still waitin' upstairs.
Why don't you go up?
I'm stuck down here. Chief told me.
Oh.
Say, Eddie, you wouldn't like to make a fin, would ya?
A fin?
This another one of your jokes?
No, on the level.
One of those who's upstairs bet me a ten-spot that there was no eagle on the lieutenant's badge.
Do I collect?
Accordin' to my tag, you do.
Wait'll they see that. I'll give ya five bucks for helpin' me win it.
Too easy.
I'll say it is.
I beg your pardon, gentlemen.
Wait a minute.
Who do you think you are?
You must be a new man.
Old enough to know a wise guy like you.
Sorry, Lieutenant. Go right in.
Don't make that mistake again, my good man.
No, sir.
How is it?
Smells alright.
How'd you get in here?
Power of the press.
Well, suppose you just press right out again.
I thought you might need my help.
Not while I have Wilfred.
Beat it.
Alright. You'll be sorry.
- Well?
- No marks of violence.
But it looked like he clutched at something as he went down.
Three of his nails were broken off.
Three of his nails, eh?
Wonder how that happened.
Did you find any evidence of suicide? Any notes?
Nope.
Murder?
Nope. Nobody heard a sound.
Then it must've been an accident.
Yes, I guess it was.
Central 5800.
Morning news? City editor, please.
Mr. Perkins, Pat Morgan.
I don't know enough yet, but you can give it a spread, one of those question things.
'Was Harker murdered?'
Alright, give me your rewrite man.
Hello?
Pat Morgan on the Harker case.
Who?
Stop asking questions and take this down.
I may get stopped any minute.
Okay. Go on.
You can give it a heading in questions.
'Was Harker philanthropist or crook?'
'Who was the mysterious Bee (B - double E) who telephoned Harker's apartment...'
'... two hours before his death and said,
"I've got to see you"?'
'Why was Martini, big underworld boss, a frequent and secret visitor at Harker's apartment?'
Got it. Go on.
'What was the meaning of the serpent card sent to Harker twelve hours before his death?'
I have it, but I'm afraid I can't get it to you tonight.
Describe it.
Picture of coiled serpent in corner of card.
Phonetic spelling of 'hiss' coming from it's mouth.
Letters clipped from newspaper and pasted on card read 'You will hear it'.
Another question. 'Was the hissing sound the maid heard the materialization of the threat of the card?'
And last. 'Was Harker's death accident, suicide, or murder?'
That all?
- Okay.
- Thanks.
I thought I told you to get outta here.
I'm goin'.
Hey. Hey, get a load of this, will ya?
Why didn't you send in the dope on that Harker death?
But I did, Mr. Perkins.
I gave it to a rewrite man.
You gave it to The Express!
I placed you on the spot three weeks before the murder happened!
And when it breaks, we're carrying a spread of the European debt situation!
You're fired!
But --
Hello, close out Pat Morgan.
I found it under the rug, ma'am.
Oh, so that's who it was!
Oh, what a dirty trick!
I'll slash his throat!
What a low double-crosser!
I'll get even with him if it takes my last brain cell!
And he knew it'd cost me my job.
I'll get even with him and how I'll get even! I'll kill him! I'll kill him!
Is it somebody you don't like, ma'am?
Help! Help!
Lordy!
Help! Help! Lordy, Lordy!
What's the matter? What's the matter?
There's a lady dead!
Who?
Ms. Colby done turned blacker than I is!
I'll see you at the office.
Was she strangled?
Looks like it.
You want to see something interesting?
Come here.
Does that suggest anything to you?
Harker could've fallen from here instead of from the roof garden, couldn't he?
He not only could, but we believe that he did.
That broken pole suggests that someone clutched at the curtain in an effort to save himself.
Now Harker's nails were badly broken.
And there are deep scratches in the paneling there.
 And now we'll talk about you.
You don't mind, do you?
Of course not.
What do you wanna know?
Do you know a reporter by the name of Ted Ryan?
 Yeah, I can see that you don't.
Well, he got a lot of first-hand information in his paper this morning and I can't figure out where he got it.
Unless it was from you.
May I see it?
Well? Did he get it from you?
Alright. Now let's have a little talk.
And then I'll decide whether or not I'm going to lock you up for withholding information from the police.
Yeah, Wilfred is on his way down now, with a picture of Colby.
He's been missing since last night.
Broadcast a description of him.
And tell Brown I want all the hotels checked.
 The steamboats, railroad stations.
Send out a general alarm.
When ya get him, book him for murder.
Alright.
Alright, what's your name?
It's Morgan. Pat Morgan.
I'm a reporter on the morning news.
That is, I was a reporter on the morning news, until Ted Ryan pinched my story last night.
What did they do -- fire you?
What was the idea of posing as Harker's secretary?
What are you after?
Harker. My editor got wind of some connection between Harker and Joe Martini.
He couldn't figure what the town's favorite saint was doing in business with a racketeer.
Were they in business?
I don't know. I know Martini was up here several times.
Always late at night, and always when Harker thought I was asleep.
But as far as getting anything definite on him, I didn't have any luck.
How about the Colby woman?
Her name was Bee, by the way.
It was?
Well, that looks like --
The world's oldest story. That's why we're after the husband.
But what I want to know is about that last phone call of hers.
How did you know about it?
I listened in on the extension.
Oh. What did you hear?
A woman's voice, and she said,
'This is Bee. I've got to see you.'
And Harker said, 'Alright,' and hung up.
Talkative huss, wasn't he?
Has Martini got an apartment here?
How did you get ahold of the serpent card?
Do you think there's anything in it?
I'm asking the questions.
How did you get hold of it?
I snitched it out of his pocket.
Been kind of busy, haven't you?
Did you see him when he got it?
How did he act? Scared?
Puzzled. He tossed it in the wastebasket, and then fished it out.
Studied it for a few minutes, and put it in his pocket.
Where is the card now?
I'll get it.
Did you find another one?
- Yeah.
- Where?
In Mrs. Colby's apartment?
In the wastebasket.
What does it mean?
Oh, it's either a threat, or some fake advertisement.
I'm checking now to see if anyone else in the house got one.
Well, is there anything else you want to tell me?
No. But maybe if I stayed on for a few more days, and went through his papers...
... I might run across something.
And as his secretary, I should help settle his affairs.
Don't you think it's a good idea?
I think it's a good penthouse.
You know, I oughtta lock you up.
If we'd have had this information last night about the Colby woman and her husband...
... we'd have Colby now.
What's the use of expecting a reporter to tell a cop anything?
But I'm not a reporter anymore, and I might run across something.
Don't you think it's a good idea?
I think you're trying to flirt with me.
If I didn't have four kids, and a wife that could lick her weight in wildcats...
... I might like it better.
Go on. Stay here.
But don't get the idea that you're smarter than the police.
And don't hold back anything that you find.
Hello?
I think we have Colby for you.
What do you mean 'think'?
Won't he admit it?
He isn't admitting anything.
He's down at the morgue, on a slab.
What? I'll be right down.
What is it? Where're you going?
Have they found Colby? Oh, let me go with you!
But --
But I'm not a reporter anymore. And you can tell me everything in perfect confidence.
Alright, alright.
Mark!
Hey! Hey, Pat!
Hey, follow that car, will ya?
Hurry up!
Well, I made it.
Hey! Hey!
Well, I'll --
Uh-oh!
 What you all got me down here for?
I ain't goin' in that place!
- Oh, yes you are.
- Oh, yes I ain't.
Can't get me in that place. I done seen one dead body today and that's enough.
It's too much, yes, sir!
We only want you to look at a man.
Dead?
Yeah.
Nothin' doin'!
Who is the man?
Colby.
Mr. Colby dead?
Why, I didn't like that man alive!
So what makes you think I'm goin' to like 'em dead?
Why didn't you like 'em alive?
He didn't talk enough. And it's a sure thing he ain't doin' no talkin' now.
All he did was sit around and look at the walls, starin'. That's what.
 And it ain't good when a man don't talk.
Well, it won't be good for you if ya don't get out of that car now.
It ain't gonna be good for me if I does, so I'm stayin'.
You want me to lock you up?
Where?
In the city jail.
They is alive in jail, ain't they? Alright, sir.
Lock me up with the livin'.
- What's the trouble?
- She won't budge.
I ain't anxious to start no trouble, sir, but I just naturally don't like dead people.
You the janitor?
Yes, sir.
You knew Colby before, didn't you?
Oh, yes, sir.
Alright, that's enough of identification. You can go.
- That a way?
- Right.
Yes, sir!
- Here ya go.
- Okay.
Hey!
Hey, Eddie! Open up, will ya?
Hey, listen. Stick around here, will ya?
I may be goin' right back.
- Hello, Eddie.
- Hello.
How's the boy?
Hiya, Sam.
What detained you?
I had some business to attend to.
What you mean is you wasted an hour hanging around the police station.
If you'd picked me up, I'd've told you they were headed for the morgue.
Is it the depressing atmosphere of this place or do I imagine that you're angry with me?
I angry with you? What have
I to be angry with you about?
You only pinched my story and made me lose my job.
And what does that matter?
You lost your job?
Yes, I lost my job. I suppose you think that's very funny.
It's probably the funniest thing you ever heard of.
Probably laughed yourself sick over it.
Oh, no, darling, I --
Hey, it's alright to cry in this joint.
But nix on the lovemaking.
Oh, you go to the devil, will ya?
Come on, darling, let's get outta this place.
He hasn't any romance in his soul.
Let's go to a speakeasy.
What's romantic about a speakeasy?
I'm gonna propose to ya again.
And no cracks from you.
The only funny crack I can think of would have to come from her.
Yeah? What's that?
If she said yes.
Funny man.
You know, darling? Eddie's wife got
'em the job here in the morgue.
She thought he'd take the hint and die.
Come on, honey.
Well, do we go straight to the marriage bureau or do I have to do some more talking?
You have to do plenty of talking.
 Okay, we'll go to Joe's.
I'll even take ya in the cab.
375 West 58th.
Couldn't ya sit a little closer?
Not without being arrested.
And speaking of arrest, did you know that the Harker case was all over?
All over?
Yep, all washed up.
What do you mean? What happened at the apartment?
Plenty. Did you see Harker's maid, Augusta, last night?
I don't think so.
You don't think so?
Well, believe me, darling, you'd remember her.
You called me 'darling'.
I didn't mean to.
Well, she's something to feast the eyes on.
Or was... She was found murdered this morning.
In Harker's apartment?
No, the janitor's.
Say, are you kidding me?
I? Listen, I'm the one who shouldn't trust you -- not you me.
I'm sorry, darling. Go on.
Well, they found a marriage license in the apartment.
Whose?
The janitor's.
It seems she was married to the janitor, but worked for Harker.
Oh. One of those.
Look here, you worked for Harker, too!
Only on a double-cross.
He only made a couple of passes at me.
He made what?
Why, I'll kill him!
Well, he's already dead.
The janitor killed him.
Killed him, and his wife, and then committed suicide.
They dragged his body out of the East River this morning.
That's what they had down at the morgue.
The janitor's body?
And the maid's, too.
Say, listen, has any of the mob got this story yet?
I don't think so.
Hey, driver. Driver, drive up to that drugstore, will ya?
Ya mind if I phone it in?
- No.
- I'll only be a minute.
- Alright, but hurry.
- I'll hurry.
Driver, drive on.
You don't want to wait?
I don't want to wait!
Driver, drive back to the drugstore.
I figured you might wanna go back.
That's why I made that right turn back there.
You know too much.
I've been drivin' a cab for ten years.
I've seen about all there is to see.
Here you are, miss, and there's your man.
Man? Don't be vulgar.
Where'd you go?
- Listen, Ted --
- What's the matter?
That story I told ya about the maid and the janitor...
Well, what about it?
It isn't the truth. I made it up.
I wanted to get even for last night, so I made it up. There isn't a word of truth in it.
Holy smokes!
Haven't you got a nickel?
No.
I didn't know you'd mind so much.
Mind? I phoned that story into your paper.
- My paper?
- Yeah, I wanted to make up for last night.
Haven't ya got a nickel?
No!
I told your editor what happened last night, and I held the scoop up...
... if he'd give ya your job back.
He said yes, so I gave him the story!
Haven't ya got a nickel?
No!
- Terry?
- Yes?
Come in here. I found somethin' just like in a mystery.
Come on, come on.
 What are you doing?
Oh. Mr. Harker's lawyer said I was to pack up
Mr. Harker's things and clear out the apartment.
But look at those drawers.
Mr. Harker's or the wooden ones?
Oh, Ms. Terry, aren't you the one!
The wooden ones! Do you see any difference in them?
Did they come out of the same chest?
They did, and so I investigated.
And look what I found!
I pressed and pressed all around here.
And finally, sure enough, there it was -- a little place behind there.
- Empty.
- But it wasn't.
There was a letter there.
And it reads like a threat.
And he signed himself 'The Juice'.
What?
Oh, that means the electric chair.
Central 5800.
Morning news? Get me to Files, please.
Hello?
Hello, Willie? This is Pat Morgan.
Would you do me a favor?
Why, yes.
Look in the files and see when and where a man by the name of Denny Fagan was executed.
That's all I have is the name.
What? The chair, yes.
And call me back at Drake 604A.
Thanks. And, Willie, see if it says anything about his relatives.
Particularly a brother, or anyone who visited him on the day of his execution.
That's right. Thanks.
Augusta, will you make yourself scarce?
Scarce?
Scarce. In other words, scram.
What are you going to do, ma'am?
If I wanted you to know, do you think
I'd ask you to leave the room?
Oh. I never thought of that.
Will you send the janitor up here right away, please?
Thanks.
Mr. Martini's apartment, please.
Mr. Martini doesn't answer.
Thank you.
- Janitor, miss.
- Yes, come in.
What's your name?
Peterson.
Well, look. Do you have a passkey to all the apartments?
Yes, ma'am.
For ten dollars, would you let me in an apartment for five minutes?
While you stand guard outside?
- What apartment?
- Joe Martini's.
No, I couldn't think of it, miss.
Not for twenty dollars.
Not even if it helped solve the mystery of Mr. Harker's death?
Mr. Harker's death?
Why, that's solved!
I identified Mr. Colby's body myself.
The police said he did it.
Maybe. But I don't think so.
Come on, nobody'll find it out. I just phoned
Martini's apartment and there was no answer.
Now, all you've got to do is stand guard out in the hall.
And if Martini comes out of the elevator, you whistle, or better still, you could hammer on something.
No, I don't like it, miss. I'd be sure to lose my job.
If I get caught, I'll swear I got in with a skeleton key. Come on!
Well, alright. If you'll keep me out of it.
But I don't like it.
Here you are, miss.
Now you stand by this radiator, and if you hear him coming, you hammer on it.
Alright, miss, but I don't like it.
It'll be alright.
Good afternoon, Mr. Martini.
Hello.
Ms. Terry, in Apartment A.
Just a moment.
Hello?
Oh, so it's you!
Well, I've called every speakeasy in town. Where are you?
I'm at home. What's on your beautiful little mind?
Little mind? Plenty.
Listen, I've just found something.
Did you ever hear of a man by the name of Denny Fagan?
What was that? Did you drop something?
No. Don't say anymore.
I'll be right up.
Thank you.
Blue steel revolver.
Black blackjack.
Pink toothbrush.
Well, what in the world?
I'm spending the night.
 - Here?
- Certainly!
You know, I didn't like that sound over the telephone.
Somebody was listening in.
What's this about Denny Fagan?
Do you remember the case?
Certainly. He was sent to the chair for killing Julius Brigman.
Well, look at this.
- What?
- We found this in Harker's things.
Anything else?
Plenty. Guess whose mob he was in.
I couldn't imagine. Not Mr. Josephus Martini's?
Yes, Mr. Josephus Martini's. I just got the dope on it from the office.
There may be something in it, and then again, no.
Listen, if Colby killed his wife, and then Harker and the case is closed...
Who's interested enough in this apartment to listen in over the phone?
Surely Colby wasn't listening in from the morgue.
Let's hope not!
Help! Help! Help me somebody!
Oh, Ms. Terry, where are you?
Right here. Stop shrieking!
It's only a fuse.
I'll call the janitor.
Oh! There's a man in the room!
I just touched 'em!
He's a friend of mine.
Keep your hands of 'em.
Certainly.
Hello. This is Ms. Terry. Will you send the janitor up right away?
The lights have gone out.
Thank you.
 - There's the ice.
- Thanks, Augusta.
 - Want a lemon?
- Yes, Augusta. Lemon.
You know, come to think of it. This Fagan kid was supposed to be mixed up with Martini.
- Oh!
- That got it, miss.
Oh. I'll see if any of the globes are burned out.
Alright, thanks.
Want some more ice in yours?
She's still lookin' for the lemon.
I'll find it.
Some people would thinks I'm a swell guy.
Oh, you're crazy!
Yeah? Well, that's your idea.
You're only showin' off for my benefit. I can use a gun.
You'd probably shoot me and become a widow before you'd tasted the joys of being married to me.
Good heavens, what a man!
Certainly!
Why don't you shut up and go to bed?
Well, I can't very well go to bed with you hanging around here.
I'm leaving.
And if anything should happen, you stay in here and keep the door locked.
Even if I hear you yelling, 'Pat! Pat! Come save me!'?
Certainly! Oh, go to the devil, will ya?
Don't drink all the scotch!
It's beer.
Come on. Stick 'em up and keep 'em up.
Now, then. Maybe you'll tell me what you're doing in here.
Martini!
Yeah. Old dry Martini himself.
Hey, wait a minute. I'll go with ya.
You stay here.
Don't be silly!
There's a deep cut in the head, but I'm not satisfied.
I want an autopsy.
Alright.
Alright, Martini, talk.
No, you talk!
What was one of your men doin' in my place?
Finding enough evidence to send you up for life.
Yeah, and did he have a search warrant?
I wouldn't be a bit surprised.
Weston was probably trying to serve it on you when you killed him.
You'll have to come stronger than that.
I wasn't even in the apartment when he died.
- How do you know when he died?
- I heard him yell.
They heard 'em yell, too.
I was with them when it happened.
So ya can't pin this on me!
Maybe not. But I can about six gang killings on you and that oughtta be enough.
Take 'em down and lock 'em up.
Who, me?
No, Wilfred. I want 'em locked up. Alright,
Brown, take a couple o' men with you.
Yes, sir. Shall I iron 'em?
You bet! And keep your eye on 'em every minute!
This is gonna cost you your job, Russell.
You shouldn't threaten a police officer. It isn't polite.
Get going!
Go up to the penthouse. I wanna have a little talk with you.
You stay here until I come back.
May I make a suggestion --
No, Wilfred. Make it to the doctor. I'm tired.
I wouldn't stay here another night for all the tea in China.
You're smarter than somebody else I know.
I want you to get outta here in the morning.
You're not only in danger, you're just plain dumb.
When you found this letter, why didn't you bring it --
I was going to.
You were going to?
But first, you thought you'd be smart. You had to go messing around in Martini's apartment.
He didn't see me.
He saw you alright. He thought you got the paper that my man got.
He was here tonight to get it back.
And in being here, he saved his own life.
 What makes you think that?
Brains. And a valentine.
 I can't figure out yet how the mistake was made.
But my man got what was intended for Martini.
We found it in Martini's apartment.
Then I was right. Colby didn't kill them.
 Maybe.
- Mail.
- Oh, thank you.
Good heavens, Augusta!
You look like you're going to a funeral.
I am, ma'am. Mr. Harker's!
Oh.
And they're buryin' Mr. and
Mrs. Colby today, too.
And if I hurry, maybe I can catch them both.
Well, have fun.
Oh, Ms. Terry! How you do say such dreadful things!
Who is it?
Where do you want this?
What's the matter, miss? Did I startle you?
Oh, I'm sorry.
But you told me to bring up the trunks.
Oh, I know. I forgot about them.
You can put them anywhere. It doesn't matter.
I wonder could you come down and pick out yours?
I got Mr. Harker's out, but I don't know yours.
Alright.
But couldn't we go down in the elevator?
Yes, ma'am.
You can't get my trunk up here any too quick to suit me.
I just got a warning that
I was gonna be killed.
You, miss?
Oh, who would wanna kill you?
I wish I knew!
Do you live down here?
Over there.
My, but it's dark!
I'm the janitor.
Where's the trunk room?
There, this way.
Aren't there any lights in here?
I'll go in and turn them on.
Why the gas in the bell?
I was just about to light the incinerator.
Well, that can wait. These gentlemen want you to go with them now.
We want to examine some of the apartments.
Yes, sir.
Start in on this one.
If you don't need me any longer,
I'd like to get back to my work.
Alright, but leave us your passkey.
Yes, sir.
May I make a suggestion?
 - No.
- But you --
I'm busy. Some other time, Wilfred.
What do you want?
Why, I...
Help! Help!
Help! Help!
Help! Help!
Help! Help! Help!
Help! Help! Help!
Help! Help!
Help! Help!
Help! Help!
Help! Help!
Help!
Oh, help! Help!
He's killing 'em, in there!
 Pat, Pat! Here, darling.
You're alright.
He tried to get away.
Hi.
Oh, Doctor, how is Ms. Morgan?
Oh, she'll be alright. Just keep her quiet a couple of days.
 Ted!
Try and keep 'er quiet.
May I come in?
Certainly. Hurry up.
- Has he confessed?
- Yep.
One, two, three, four, five, six, seven, eight, nine, ten!
Well, tell me about it.
Did he kill 'em all?
Yeah. With the exception of Colby.
 How?
With gas. They've just held an autopsy on all the bodies.
I know. Augusta was nearly broken-hearted because they called off all the funerals.
Why did he kill them?
Revenge. You were right, as usual.
He was Denny Fagan's brother. Fagan was a cab driver, just a kid and, according to him, honest.
Fagan was sharing an apartment with one of Martini's men.
 They used Fagan's cab to take
Brigman on his last ride.
They even planted the gun on the kid!
And he was the only one of the mob that didn't have an airtight alibi.
Ah, gee, ya look cute in that bandage.
Please, get on with the murders.
Well, that's all. Denny Fagan was sent to the chair.
That's all? Isn't that enough?
Just a young kid, too.
You're not going to feel sad about it, are you?
I would if his brother hadn't tried to stuff me in a furnace.
Where did Harker come in?
Harker engineered the Brigman killing.
Brigman was in Harker's way, so he ordered him snuffed out.
Martini's mob found it convenient to let Fagan take the rap.
You mind if I hold your hand?
Please, darling, hold my hand.
But why did he kill Bee Colby?
She wasn't mixed up in it.
No. But by killing Harker and her in her apartment, it drew suspicion on the husband.
He even sent Colby a letter telling him to watch her.
But when Colby found out what was going on, he didn't kill them.
He just jumped in the river.
My, but you take this lightly!
What if I'd been killed?
Oh, baby, I'd've written you a swell obituary.
I'll bet you would've, at that.
In some speakeasy!
Don't be silly, gal. You know
I don't go to speakeasies.
I got an idea!
How 'bout a last drink of Harker's scotch?
I've already ordered it. But you might go see if Augusta's drinking it.
Alright.
Is this... Is this Ms. Patricia Morgan?
This is she.
This is Perkins.
Not dear Mr. Perkins.
Cut that!
You wanna come back?
What do you mean 'how much'?
How much more?
We'll discuss that when I see you.
No, we won't, because you aren't going to see her.
What? Who is this?
Ms. Morgan's future husband.
Who says so?
I do.
A woman's place is in the home.
Hey, listen!
What home?
I have an apartment.
I'll bet the rent isn't paid.
Now, don't be mercenary.
Will you listen to me?
I bet you haven't the price of a marriage license.
I wanna talk to you!
- Augusta?
- Yes, sir?
Will you lend me three bucks?
Why, of course, Mr. Ryan.
I'll get it right away.
Certainly I've got three bucks.
Sure.
See here, Morgan! Haven't you any gratitude in your system?
Do you realize what I've done for you for the last three years?
I've kept you on the payroll of this paper!
I've given you more opportunities than any sob sister in the business!
Oh, let's get together on this thing, Morgan.
There ain't any use of us actin' like this.
You know, we've always been able to iron out the little things.
Morgan?
I say, Morgan!
Why don't you answer me?
I'm afraid you're on a wild goose chase, Mr. Chan.
Have sometimes caught wild goose.
Well, if you ask me, there's something fishy about the whole business.
A man walks out on a fortune seven years ago.
Then all of a sudden, he appears from nowhere to claim it.
A little tough on the Colby heirs if he's alive.
- Tough on Allen Colby if dead.
- Yeah.
Ah. They're bringing him up now.
Get back.
Take in on the winch.
All right, swing him aboard.
All right, get him down there.
Body not that of Allen Colby.
- Well, I guess that ends it.
- Not so certain.
Passenger list indicate
30 persons on board.
Twenty-seven rescued by lifeboats.
Two bodies recovered today.
Twenty-seven plus two make 29.
Leave one body missing.
Maybe Allen Colby escape by clinging to wreckage.
Well, if he did, the sharks got him by now.
You can't drift around in these waters for two weeks.
May have been picked up by boat without radio.
Must not overlook any possibility.
Mr. Chan.
- I found this in one of the bunks.
- Thank you so much.
Initials A.C.
Allen Colby.
As soon as you get Duke aboard, get under way!
How soon we make port?
Oh, a couple of hours.
May send radiogram, please?
Sure. They can relay it from the land station.
What do you wanna say?
To Mrs. Henrietta Lowell,
San Francisco.
Fate of Allen Colby still uncertain.
Leaving Honolulu at once on new clipper airship... to continue investigation on mainland.
Sign Charlie Chan, please.
"D."
"E."
"A."
"D." Dead.
There can be no doubt, Baxter.
Allen is dead.
It was a message from his father.
To be perfectly frank, madam...
- this sort of thing makes me quite creepy.
- Oh, nonsense.
A radiogram, Mrs. Lowell.
We haven't finished yet.
Sit down.
Hand me the telephone.
Oh, get off the wire, Alice.
You can talk to Dick some other time.
All right, Mother, in just a second.
Dick, I'll have to go now.
All right.
Now remember, darling... we've got a date tonight if the chief doesn't send me out on a story.
Well, I like that. You think more of your old newspaper than you do me.
Well, Dick, I simply must hang up now.
Mother wants to use the phone.
Of course I do.
Good-bye.
- Call Mr. Phelps's office for me.
- Yes, ma'am.
- What is the wire?
- Another radiogram from Charlie Chan.
- He's arriving sometime today.
- The line's busy, ma'am.
Try again. And remind me to call Professor Bowan.
I want to tell him that we're holding a séance tonight at 8:30.
If you have nothing else to do, take some flowers out to Colby House... and tell Ulrich to have everything ready.
- All right, Mother.
- Do you want Baxter to help you?
No, thanks. I'll shanghai Dick.
Hello, Mr. Phelps?
Just one moment. Mrs. Lowell.
Hello, Warren.
It's your mother.
Yes, Mrs. Lowell.
He's arriving today?
Yes, everything concerning the estate is in order.
I've been going over matters with your son-in-law.
He and Mrs. Gage are here now.
Certainly, I'll tell them to be there.
At 8:30.
Yes, I'll come too. Good-bye.
Was she talking about Allen?
No, Charlie Chan.
He's arriving this afternoon.
He must have definite news about Allen.
Otherwise, he wouldn't be coming all the way from Honolulu.
I don't see why Mother had to drag him into this.
Well, you can hardly blame her for being worried.
If Allen is alive, it places a great responsibility on her.
But from what you've said, it places a great responsibility on all of us.
We'll have to turn the estate over to him and account for every penny we've spent.
Well, after all, it was his father's money.
But Mother was Uncle Bernard's sister.
Regardless of Allen, she should be entitled to something.
Unfortunately not, if Allen is alive.
[Bell Ringing]
[Allen]
Ulrich.!
Ulrich.!
Ulrich!
Ulrich!
[Clock Chimes]
[Clatters]
[Clock Chiming]
- Hello, Alice.
- Hmm. Where were you when I called at the office?
Now wait a minute.
I had to go out on a story.
So I phoned your mother, and she said you were coming here.
- Well, I wanted you to help me with these flowers.
- More spook business tonight?
Oh, please don't kid about it, Dick.
At least not when Mother's around.
I'm always nervous when I come to this old house.
Oh, don't worry. I won't let the old bogeyman get you. I want you myself.
Even if Allen came back and claimed all the money and I was poor?
Say, when I marry,
I don't expect to work for a living.
Aw, go away.
You're just a fortune hunter.
How'd you guess it?
- [Loud Crash]
- Dick, what's that?
Well, it's not a ghost!
- [Meowing]
- [Alice] Oh, it's Lucifer.
Something must have frightened him.
There, Alice. You have the solution to all ghost stories.
Not to all the things that happen in this house.
You know, I don't see why your mother doesn't have this old squirrel's cage torn down.
She's too devout a believer in psychic research.
Why, this place means as much to her as it did to Uncle Bernard.
Yeah, and he was a little cracked.
Oh, don't say that, Dick.
He believed in it.
That's why he rebuilt this house with all these funny rooms.
So the poor spirits could have a home.
Come on. Let's get out of here and go somewheres a little more cheerful.
Not yet. I have to arrange those flowers for tonight's séance.
And you're going to help me.
I very rarely visit the old house, sir, since Mr. Colby died.
It was only because of your late arrival... that Mrs. Lowell told me to bring you here.
- Thank you.
- Oh, it's a pleasure, sir.
I don't mind admitting to you frankly, sir... that I don't feel at all myself in this atmosphere.
- No?
- No, sir.
There's a tinge of the graveyard which positively awes me.
Yes. Mysterious shadows of night cling to old house... like moss on tombstone?
Quite right— Quite right, sir.
That, sir, is the— is the front door.
The—The back door is... at the rear.
Most interesting.
Shall we enter by front door?
Yes. Yes.
This way, sir.
The family will be waiting for you in here, sir.
These are the accounts you spoke of, Mrs. Lowell.
No, not now.
- Mr. Chan.
- Oh. I'm so glad you arrived, Charlie.
I knew I could depend on you.
You know everyone here.
- Good evening, Mr. Chan.
- Greetings at end of journey... like refreshing rain after long drought.
Yes, yes, Mr. Chan, but let's get to your report.
Yes, Charlie.
What about Allen?
Uh—
[Screeches]
Then it's your belief that Allen is still alive?
Cannot be certain but, if so, suspect life may be in danger.
- Now why do you say that?
- Observe.
More than one attempt made on Allen Colby's life.
Just a scheme to create an impression.
This fellow may be an impostor.
Correction, please.
Passport visaed by French and British consuls... indicate he is real Allen Colby.
Then why did he wait all these years before communicating with his family?
Investigation prove Allen Colby... enlisted in French Foreign Legion... was taken prisoner by Riffs.
Escaped only recently.
Could not have communicated sooner.
Unless he was drowned, we can expect him to appear at any time to claim the estate?
[Mrs. Lowell]
He has a right to the money, more than we have.
What is it, Ulrich?
Uh, Professor Bowan and Carlotta are ready to start the séance.
Tell them we'll be there in a moment,
and see that we're not disturbed.
I can't stand that man!
He's forever staring at me.
- Why don't we get rid ofhim?
- We've gone over that before, Janice.
- Shall we go into the other room?
- Perhaps Mr. Chan would rather wait here.
- He may not be interested in a séance.
- I'm sure he will be.
Tonight Professor Bowan has promised us a message concerning Allen.
- I would like to have you present.
- Would appreciate very much.
- Chinese people interested in all things psychic.
- Yes.
Have they started the séance yet, Ulrich?
- They're just about to begin, miss.
- Thanks.
You're always causing me grief.
If we'd been late, Mother would have been furious.
- Is everything ready, Baxter?
- Yes, ma'am.
- Sorry I'm late, Mother.
- All my fault, Mrs. Lowell.
Say, you're Mr. Chan, aren't you?
- Humbly acknowledge name.
- Glad to meet you. I've heard a lot about you.
I'm Dick Williams of the Globe.
- Anything I can print on the Colby case?
- There's nothing for publication.
I've asked you repeatedly to consider our family affairs confidential.
- Yes, but—
- Mr. Gage very wise.
Best place for skeleton is in family closet.
Thank you.
Nothing to say.
Come, Charlie.
This is Professor Bowan, our adviser in psychic research.
And this is our medium, Carlotta.
So pleased.
Most fortunate gift to be able to cross bridge... to dwelling place of honorable ancestors before arriving.
Shall we begin?
If you'll take your usual seats, we will commence.
Take this chair, Charlie.
- Will that be all right, Professor?
- Quite all right.
Tonight I wish to ask for your special concentration.
We will try to bring word of Allen Colby from the beyond.
It may be difficult.
We shall ask his father,
Bernard Colby...
- who has been our guide before, to assist us.
- [Mouthing Words]
We will pause a moment in meditation.
Mr. Gage, will you turn down the lights?
##[Background: Eerie]
There is a presence here.
He has a message for Mrs. Lowell.
It is her brother, Bernard.
He says that Allen
is there with him.
He is happy.
He wants to come to you.
[Screaming]
- Stop it!
- Lights! Turn on the lights!
Allen Colby... murdered.
Notify police immediately.
Touch nothing...
until police arrive.
- Thanks for your information, Mr. Chan.
- You welcome.
You know, what beats me is how Allen Colby got ashore without our getting wind of it.
Somebody knew it. That's how he trapped Colby here and finished him off.
He must have been trapped, all right.
You know, Allen was the type of fellow who could have defended himself. A knife in the back.
If strength were all, tiger would not fear scorpion.
- Not a sign of fingerprints.
- Oh, he used gloves or a handkerchief.
This fellow was smart enough for that.
Have observed former resting place of murder weapon?
I've already checked that.
No fingerprints there either.
- What did you find, Doctor?
- Knife pierced right ventricle of the heart.
- He's been dead about four hours.
- You want an autopsy?
Oh, no, not necessary.
See you in the morning.
- Oh, Harris, got the rest of them in the other room?
- Yes, sir.
Come along, Mr. Chan.
You too, Williams.
I want to talk to everyone who was present here tonight.
Bowan, you must've been pretty sure
Colby was dead when you started your séance.
That isn't true. We were merely seeking a message concerning him.
Just before this terrible thing happened...
I felt a strange new presence about me.
I knew we were in contact with Allen Colby's spirit.
And with his body hidden behind the panel... it was easy for his spirit to get here, wasn't it?
Pardon interruption, please.
May ask cause of Allen Colby's separation from family?
Oh, certainly, Charlie.
There had been a quarrel... or rather a misunderstanding between Allen and his father.
You see, Allen didn't share our belief in psychic things.
Is this digging into family affairs necessary?
It is when we're looking for facts.
If all I wanted was a motive...
It is when we're looking for facts.
If all I wanted was a motive...
I wouldn't have to go any further than the Lowell family.
What do you mean by that?
Simple enough, isn't it?
Allen Colby alive meant the loss of a fortune for all of you.
So sorry again to interrupt. Uh—
Money from Colby estate used for psychic research?
[Phelps]
As executor of the estate, I can answer that.
Only such sums were used as Mrs. Lowell saw fit to donate.
And that would have ended, too, if Colby had returned?
Yes, I suppose so.
Were you here earlier today?
Why, yes. I stopped by
Ulrich's cottage about 6:00... to remind him to have everything in order for the séance.
You were here at house?
No. I've had a slight cold, and I left almost immediately to take care of it.
- Is that right?
- As far as I know, it is.
Pardon undue curiosity.
- You were here all day?
- That's what I get paid for.
Strange you did not know
Allen Colby had arrived.
I said once— I didn't.
Who else beside Professor Bowan visit here today?
Why, I was here.
- You also?
- What for?
He came here to meet me when I brought the flowers for the séance.
- What time was that?
- Uh, I was here first.
Alice came in at 5:30. I'm sure of the time because I noticed the clock was fast... and I was about to reset it.
Strange.
Ancient clock tell very latest time now.
Someone must have fixed it!
Well, who reset the clock?
You don't think I'm lying, do you?
You arrived at what time, please?
About a quarter past 5:00.
And the murder took place around 5:00.
I can tell you, Morton, there was nothing wrong when I was here.
You and Miss Lowell were planning to get married shortly, weren't you?
Why, yes. What of it?
Congratulations.
- Haven't we had enough of this inquisition?
- For tonight, yes.
But until this matter is settled, be on hand to give the authorities any help they need.
That's all.
Excuse, please.
- Ah, a headache for the police department.
- Yes.
Have you any ideas, Mr. Chan?
Solve mystery, cure headache.
[Chuckles]
Okay, we'll split a box of aspirin.
Oh, Harris.
See you in the morning?
Thank you.
Will bring aspirin.
- Ambulance here?
- They've just arrived, sir.
The men are coming in now.
- Almost finished?
- Yes, last plate.
I guess I'll have to quit. Pretty hard to catch up with murderers these days, Mr. Chan... especially when they don't leave their signatures.
That's what I call fingerprints— signatures.
But when they do leave them,
it's just like signing their confession.
Yes, fingerprints very valuable... if detective can catch owner of fingers.
That's right.
Found anything interesting?
As son Lee would say— play hunch.
- [Mrs. Lowell] Charlie.!
- Excuse, please.
Oh, there you are.
Come along with us.
We'll put you up at the house.
Thank you so much, but with your permission, may spend night here?
- Here?
- Yes.
Would like to make more complete investigation.
Oh, very well. As you wish.
Baxter, prepare one of the bedrooms.
And you had better remain here with Mr. Chan tonight.
- Oh, all— all night, ma'am?
- Certainly!
I'll send something over for your breakfast in the morning, Charlie.
But what about your breakfast, ma'am?
Nobody knows how you like your toast but me.
I know how I like my toast.
Good night, Charlie.
Quiet little place, isn't it, sir?
Yes. Very restful.
Oh, yes, sir.
Like, uh, silence in graveyard.
Oh. Y-Yes, sir.
Like a... graveyard.
This way, sir.
Uh, after you, sir.
Thank you so much.
[Exclaims]
Where'd the— Oh. Hello, sir.
Observe.
Oh, very interesting, sir.
Very, very interesting.
May I inquire what it is, sir?
Corroboration of deductions.
Then we can leave here at once, sir.
Should I pack your bags?
Thank you so much, but, uh... must first request able assistance... in subduing malevolent spirits in ancient house.
Ye—What do you mean, sir?
We investigate downstairs.
N-Now, sir?
Yes.
[Door Opens]
Do you think that could be spirits, sir?
Very practical spirit to enter by door. Come.
That's all. And see that those gates are locked.
Well, here I am.
Why you come back?
You said you were staying here to investigate.
I want to know what's going on.
Uh, others know you return?
I don't tell them everything I do.
- Think advisable
Baxter take you home immediately.
- Hmm!
He's quite right, ma'am.
Now, I think—
You don't think.
You think you think.
I think.
Where should we start?
In here?
Very well.
Perhaps woman's intuition, like feather on arrow— may help flight to truth.
That's settled.
- Baxter, the door.
- Oh.
Well, Charlie?
- May ask question, please?
- Anything you want to.
Phenomenon of music always accompany séance?
Nothing unusual about that.
That was merely a manifestation from the world beyond.
Electric fixtures repaired recently?
No. They haven't been touched for years.
- May step on table, please?
- Certainly, Charlie.
Very strange.
Brass tarnished with age... but screw head very young.
Boy Scout knife like lady's hairpin— have many uses.
Radio speaker.
Very simple solution of music from world beyond.
I can't believe that Professor Bowan and Carlotta... would purposely deceive us.
Necessity— mother of invention... but sometimes stepmother of deception.
Distinguished professor stand here tonight.
- Switch turn on radio receiving set up there.
- ##[Eerie]
If Bowan has done this... then all of our séances have been based on trickery.
When pilot unreliable... ship cannot keep true course.
- Permission, please, to try experiment?
- Certainly.
Turn down lights, please.
But... then we shan't be able to see, sir.
[Mrs. Lowell]
Do as Mr. Chan says.
- They're off, sir.
- Thank you so much.
Please to turn on dim light, as in séance.
Appearance of Allen Colby in secret panel most convenient.
Maybe find clue.
Please.
Would be so kind to take position... occupied by deceased body?
Oh, c-could I be excused, please, sir?
I-I'm not very good at that sort of thing.
Role of dead man require very little acting.
Oh, but really, sir, l—
[Mrs. Lowell]
Go on, Baxter. Go on.
May request, uh... holding handkerchief before face... when in position?
Charlie, look!
There, on the handkerchief!
Earlier in evening, use same handkerchief to wipe face of Allen Colby.
- Oh, now, really, sir, l—
- [Mrs. Lowell] Be quiet, Baxter.!
What about the handkerchief?
Chemical analysis of same... prove face of murdered man... treated with solution of quinine sulfate.
- For what reason?
- Quinine sulfate... when exposed to rays of ultraviolet lamp... produce mysterious light which accompany apparition.
Well, where could it come from?
Answer well hidden, but hope to find same.
Please! Do not move handkerchief.
Ultraviolet-ray lamp.
Filter on back of mirror... allow only invisible ultraviolet rays to enter room.
- Solves mystery of spirit light.
- It solves more than that.
It proves that Bowan knew that Allen was dead.
He may even have murdered him.
Finding web of spider does not prove
which spider spin web.
I gave Bowan all the funds he asked for.
I even made provision for him and Carlotta after my death.
And they knew that if Allen returned,
they would never receive another penny.
In face of present evidence... may be wise to change plans for future.
Huh! I'll see to that.
Mr. Phelps has an accounting of the estate prepared.
I intend to go over it.
And at the same time,
I'll make a new will.
Most excellent precaution.
[Baxter Yelping]
- You are all right?
- Except for the punch in the ribs you gave me.
- Why, you knocked me down.
- Most happy.
Punch in ribs more desirable than shot in back.
There's no argument about that.
Where's Baxter? Baxter.
- Here I am, ma'am.
- Well, you would be.
Well, what do we do next?
Suggest leaving here immediately.
That's a very good idea, sir.
We're—We're locked in, sir.
Locked in? Nonsense.
[Doorknob Rattles]
[Whispering]
Can you hear that, sir?
[Key Turning In Lock]
- Oh! Fred, it's you.
- What's happened?
Somebody tried to kill Charlie.
What?
I think you acted very foolishly in coming here at this hour of the night.
Fear for Mrs. Lowell's safety reason for visit?
Exactly. Janice and I went to her bedroom to say good night.
When I found she wasn't there,
I had a hunch she was over here with you.
I saw her car outside and came in.
Thank you.
Suggest you go home now—
Uh, with Baxter.
Have something very important.
Would like your able assistance.
Of course, if there's anything I can do.
- Now, look here, Charlie. I want to know—
- Tomorrow, please.
- You go home now.
- Oh, very well.
- Come on, Baxter.
- Thank you.
- Observe anyone leaving house when entering grounds?
- Not a soul.
- Ulrich admit you?
- No. The gates were unlocked.
Strange.
Someone very familiar with ancient house... fire gun from there.
I know this place inside and out.
It's a regular honeycomb of passages... that start everywhere and end nowhere.
- You want me to show you?
- No.
Will investigate honeycomb later.
Maybe find bee.
Shall we go?
At present, much concerned about Mrs. Lowell.
What do you mean?
Not so certain gunfire directed at humble self.
You think the attempt was made on her life?
Maybe. Suggest you go to police at once.
Request guard for Mrs. Lowell day and night.
I'll go immediately.
Caretaker keep very late hours.
Ulrich's a queer old bird.
Have noticed Ulrich not friendly to family.
May ask reason why?
Oh, Allen was engaged to Ulrich's daughter.
After he left home, he broke with her, and she committed suicide.
Ulrich held Allen responsible.
Strange house have more than one skeleton in closet.
[Bell Ringing]
[Key Turns In Lock]
- Good morning.
- [Muttering] Good day.
May ask question, please?
You were here yesterday at cottage about 5:00?
Yes.
Then if Allen Colby ring bell, would have heard same?
Well, uh, I didn't hear him.
Strange someone should climb over wall... without first trying bell.
If someone were sneaking in here to commit murder... do you think they'd ring the bell to let me know about it?
Correction, please.
Murderer would not climb over wall near gate.
Would look for more secret place.
Thank you so much.
[Hammering]
What do you want?
Pardon intrusion, please.
Observe radio aerial on roof.
Well?
Perhaps earphones reason for not hearing bell yesterday... when Allen Colby arrive.
I tell you I didn't hear the bell.
I don't know where I was or what I was doing.
Radio transmitter... used last night to broadcast music for séance?
You're barking up the wrong tree.
I don't know nothing about radio.
This stuff belongs to my son.
I'm shipping it to him.
You can't catch me on that.
Only thing Charlie Chan catch is cold in head.
[Sneezing]
[Sniffling]
Uh, can spare quinine, please?
I haven't got any.
Perhaps give to Professor Bowan who suffer from cold... when visiting here yesterday.
Why don't you go and ask him?
Very good idea.
Thank you so much.
So sorry professor not at home.
Hope to get valuable information about séance last night.
- Can I help you?
- Thank you.
Small point of information.
When in contact with spirit world... find ultraviolet light useful?
I don't understand you.
Very peculiar circumstance.
Allen Colby's face treated with solution of quinine.
When exposed to ultraviolet light...
produce glow not from spirit world.
If what you say is true, Mr. Chan... it has nothing to do with us.
There has never been any fraud connected with my work.
The power which was given me to communicate with the other world... has never been misused.
Have utmost respect for true believer in psychic things.
But can explain, please... source of music which accompany séance last night?
Yes. I'll show you.
It was sent from this transmitting set.
We always use music as a background for our work.
Hmm. Most interesting.
Repeating device... with control switch at Colby House...
so music can be picked up
at any time?
Shortwave coil.
[Groans]
That ought to keep him quiet long enough for us to make a getaway.
Then it's true.
You knew about Allen Colby.
There's no time to talk now. If Chan was that close on us, the police won't be far behind.
- Come on!
- I'm not going. I was no part of it.
- But you can't prove that to the police.
- [Doorbell Buzzing]
- Where's Bowan?
- You'd better go in there at once.
- Charlie.
- What happened?
Get a chair.
Are you all right?
Uh, when firecrackers stop exploding in head, will be quite all right.
You need the aspirin this time, Charlie.
Now, where's Bowan?
He left just before you came in.
That's why you sent us in here.
You were covering up for him to make a getaway.
- You're under arrest. Take her out, Harris.
- Let's go, sister.
Get on the phone and send out a general broadcast.
Yes, sir.
I want to be the first to congratulate you, Charlie.
You let the murderer of Allen Colby slip right through your fingers.
So sorry. Like child who play with matches, get burned.
- Live and learn.
- Yeah, live and learn.
When we pick up Bowan,
I'll send you an invitation to the blow-off.
Thank you so much.
I guess Morton's right. It must have been
Bowan who killed Colby... and tried to get Mrs. Lowell last night.
Wheel of fate has many spokes.
Which means you have something on your mind. What is it?
Mind at present like hangover after misspent evening.
Must keep important engagement with Mrs. Lowell.
Hat, please.
"And the sum of $100,000...
"to endow the Colby Foundation for Psychic Research...
"such foundation to be administered by Warren T. Phelps... on behalf of my dearly beloved friends
Alfred and Carlotta Bowan."
That is the clause you want to strike from the will?
- It certainly is.
- Then I'll draw up a new document.
I'll have it ready for your signature tonight.
Have you any idea how much these people have cost me so far?
I'll have to check over your accounts to get the exact amount.
We're going over
all the accounts tonight... when Mr. Phelps brings the new will.
When Mr. Phelps brings the new will.
- Ulrich wants to see you, madam.
- What is it, Ulrich?
- I've come to quit.
- That will be a relief.
And it'll be a relief to me too!
I don't have to stay here
to be spied on by policemen.
I don't know anything about Allen Colby!
It's his fault that my girl is in her grave... and he got what was coming to him.
That's enough!
Wait in the hall, and I'll pay you off.
- [Sighs]
- [Door Closes]
In my opinion, it would be better to watch Ulrich than look for Bowan.
He's hated Allen enough to kill him.
No one being overlooked.
When weaving nets, all threads counted.
- I'll be back with the new will after dinner.
- Make it 8:30.
I'll have those figures ready for you by then.
And don't worry. Mr. Morton will have a police guard here until Bowan is captured.
Good-bye.
- Good-bye, Mother.
- Good-bye, dear.
Well, Charlie, what are your plans?
- Uh, what hour is dinner, please?
And after dinner, what is usual occupation?
Generally, I spend an hour here at the Ouija board.
I must repeat, madam, that— that this sort of thing... leaves me a— a little creepy.
- Not much chance of anything happening.
Even one of Bowan's spooks couldn't get through this police net.
Unknown danger like summer lightning— strike where least expected.
I'll have another look around.
Just a minute.
- All right, Myers. Mr. Gage is one of the family.
- Thanks.
- Picked up Bowan yet?
- No, but we'll get him.
He hasn't a chance of getting out of town.
[Doorbell Rings]
Excuse me, madam.
- Good evening, sir.
- Has Mr. Phelps arrived yet?
Not yet, sir.
[Bell Tolling In Distance]
[Bullet Whistles]
Search the neighborhood.
What's the matter here?
Mrs. Lowell was shot through the head from outside the house.
- What?
- Must request no one enter except police at present.
- Yes, but you can't stop me.
- Better stay here. You wouldn't like to see it.
[Knocking]
- Find anything?
- Not yet. But this gentleman just drove up.
Dick has told me.
It— It seems unbelievable.
Whoever it was outguessed us.
I don't see how it was done with the place surrounded by police.
- Also strange murder should occur...
- [Phone Dialing]
At exact hour of appointment.
Hello. Morton speaking from the Lowell house.
Send out the homicide squad and the coroner.
You'll want to hold the body till after the inquest of course.
What's happened?
Was it Mother?
- Let me go to her!
- Can do nothing now.
Why did you let it happen?
You knew she was in danger.
It's all your fault!
- [Sobbing]
- Alice, please.
Better take the young lady away from the house for the night.
We'll have a lot to do here.
Come along, Harris.
Mr. Chan, I can't help but feel that Alice is right in holding you responsible.
You proved that Bowan was guilty of the murder of Allen Colby.
You knew he made an attempt on Mrs. Lowell's life last night... yet you failed to turn him over to the police.
Most humbly regret very fatal error... which cost life of dear old friend.
Mr. Chan.
I'm sorry I lost my head.
I know you did the best you could.
Extend deepest sympathy.
But though loved one seem to be taken away... remain always near.
[Crying]
- Mr. Baxter.
- Yes, sir?
[Yelps]
So sorry, but need your help.
What do you make of this?
Someone's been smoking, sir.
Oh. The villain must have stood right here when he fired that fatal shot.
No. Hasty deduction like ancient egg— look good from outside.
Shot come from high-powered rifle fired from distant place.
Really, sir?
May ask, please, to climb tree?
Oh, must I, sir?
Ample proportions limit athletic ability.
Ye—Yes, sir.
Will you give me a leg up, sir?
[Straining]
When I was young, l—
I used to be quite agile, sir.
Well, there—There's not very much to be seen from up here, sir.
Observe small branch near right hand?
Oh. Oh, yes, sir.
Break is clean cut?
Might have been done with a saw, sir.
Thank you so much.
Please hold finger on branch.
Oh!
Ahh!
Please remove body from line of vision.
Well, uh—Well, it— Oh!
Oh.
[Yelps]
Oh, Mr. Chan! Mr. —
Hey! Ohh! Ow!
[Doorbell Rings]
- Good morning.
- You're on the job early, Mr. Chan. Find anything?
- Hope to establish important fact.
- Let me in on it.
- Must first exact promise of silence.
- I promise.
As son Lee would say,
"Okeydoke." Let us go.
Well, what led you to this, Mr. Chan?
At last, find use for simple geometry.
High-power bullet take shortest distance... between three points.
Criminal very clever.
Arrange device so when electric hammer strike bell...
also operate trigger on rifle.
And after the first shot was fired, it kept pulling the trigger.
- Yes.
- Be careful. You've reloaded the chamber.
How you know magazine was full?
Well, l— I thought it might be.
- Quite right.
- But that's dangerous.
- When the clock strikes again—
- Do not disturb.
Twenty minutes after 9:00.
Suggest we return to Lowell house immediately.
She was sitting right there when the shot came through the window.
- Pardon interruption, please.
- Oh, come right in.
- Got into any new trouble?
- So sorry to disappoint.
May offer slight demonstration, please?
Help yourself.
What's it going to be— interior decorating?
[Scoffs]
Why don't you try a couple of sunflowers in it?
Atrocious libel on Chinese art quite sufficient.
Have only little time to wait.
Please to stand back.
- [Bell Tolling]
- Stand back!
- [Bullet Whistles]
- [Gasps]
- Are you all right, Baxter?
- I don't know, sir.
[Sighs]
You win, Charlie. What's the answer?
If tongue in tower bell could speak, would have solution.
- What does that mean in English?
- Suggest we take short walk.
[Ringing]
Hello? Hello?
It-It's your office, sir.
Hello. Morton talking.
Be there right away.
Well, they've caught Bowan.
Instead of your short walk, how about a short ride to my office?
Voice of professor may tell us more than tongue of silent bell.
I didn't do it, I tell you. Whoever killed
Allen Colby tried to hang it on me.
And I suppose you didn't plant that trick light... and wash Allen Colby's face with quinine... so you could pull a phony ghost at your séance.
- Have you anything to say?
- Leave her alone. She had nothing to do with it.
Well, how about it?
You can save yourself a lot of grief by turning state's evidence.
I have nothing to confess.
I have always acted in good faith.
[Sighs]
That's all for now.
Take 'em out.
Four hours wasted... but I'll get it out of'em if it's the last thing I do.
- Have idea.
- Another one?
With proper lever... baby's fingers can move mountain.
What do you mean?
Believe have plan... to secure much-desired confession.
I don't see why we should have been called here for this morbid nonsense.
There's no use complaining about it.
[Muttering]
Why, you got no right to bring me into this.
Yes? Well, you're here, brother.
All right, Harris.
Come on inside.
- All set, Charlie.
- Thank you.
Please.
Request everyone take same positions... as on night of eventful séance.
Oh, Harris. Stand by the door.
Have men in the hall.
- Be sure the outside of the house is covered.
- Yes, sir.
Pardon, please, inconvenience... of bringing everyone here tonight.
Motive for recent murders... like tangle of many strings... ends of which held by persons in this room.
First string held by psychic mediums.
Professor Bowan and Carlotta...
had $ 100,000 endowment
to lose by change in will.
Had $ 100,000 endowment
to lose by change in will.
Same change deprive Mr. Phelps, administrator of estate...
from handling large fortune.
Have ascertained... he had recently big losses in stock market.
Caretaker Ulrich have old-time grudge...
against Allen Colby
for tragedy to daughter.
Other strings held by Lowell family...
who have everything to lose
if Allen Colby return to claim estate.
Tonight, will try very sincere experiment... in effort to untangle motives.
Will call upon spirit world...
for message from great beyond.
Proceed, please.
Mr. Gage, will you turn down the lights?
[Switch Clicks]
##[Eerie]
We will pause a moment in meditation.
I feel... a presence... near.
It is a woman.
She is trying to come to us.
Her image is becoming clearer.
- [Mouthing Word]
- Clearer.
She is trying to speak.
She has a message...
- a message for—
- Mother!
I have come back... to tell you the truth.
I know now...
the one who fears discovery...
the one who murdered—
- [All Shouting]
- [Phelps] Turn on the lights.!
- [Morton] See that no one leaves this room.
Someone make very foolish mistake.
Throw knife at spirit reflection in mirror.
May come out now.
- Mrs. Lowell!
- Mother!
- Mother, darling!
- Oh, I'm so happy.
- Yes, dear.
You have to die to really find out how much people miss you.
- But why did you do this?
- I'll let Charlie explain that, dear.
Sincerely hope explanation will justify cause of anguish.
Person who throw this knife... also kill Allen Colby when he return to claim estate... place body behind secret panel.
Then use ultraviolet-ray device... to make body appear as apparition at séance.
Same murderer also try to kill Mrs. Lowell... on night of business conference...
but make mistake
of shooting dummy... which humble self and Mr. Morton place at study window.
Same murderer now in this room.
Use twin of knife that kill Allen Colby.
Observe.
Both knives now missing.
As I stood up right here, someone passed me in the dark.
I heard someone too.
It was you, Ulrich.
It wasn't!
I-I was over there near Mr. Morton.
- You went for that knife.
- I didn't, I tell you!
- Liar! I saw you!
- I didn't!
- Moment, please!
- You are guilty man.
- I? You're crazy.
Contradiction, please.
Took precaution before séance tonight... to cover blade of knife with graphite.
Telltale fingers sign confession.
Stand back! Everybody!
Stay where you are.!
- [Cat Screeching]
- [Baxter Yelping]
[Women Screaming]
[Yelping]
You commit murder in attempt... to cover evidence of forgery in Lowell accounts.
- Own act tonight convict you.
- All right, Harris.
Come on.
There, there, dear.
I know you had nothing to do with it.
Very grateful for valuable assistance.
Believe that, tonight, you practice deception for first time.
I wish I could say the same for you, Bowan.
After all, I'm the one who was imposed upon... and I withdraw all charges against them.
We'll mark it closed, Mrs. Lowell.
- Thank you.
- There's a train east at 11:45.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
You take now.
Oh, Charlie, I think you've earned a rest.
Now we can settle down to a comfortable visit.
So sorry, but, uh... must return to happy family in Honolulu.
You've done a great job, Charlie.
Heh. I wish I could make you a present of the city hall.
If family continue to increase, may consider generous offer.
[All Chuckling]
Thank you so much.
A little piece of lead stopped the brilliant career of one of the finest men who ever lived.
I'm sorry I never knew your father, sir.
He was a great liar, and Hendricks.
Every racketeer in the country feared him.
That's why they got him.
But you're carrying on, sir.
Oh, after a fashion, but I'd give anything in the world, if I could match that bullet.
Will you be wanting the car, sir?
Yes.
He wouldn't keep affidavits in here, Steve.
'Course not.
Lawyers got brains too.
You think you can make it, kid.
Say, this is as easy as a dimebag.
Nothing to it.
Quit patting yourself on the back.
Sorry to interrupt, boys.
The Shadow.
[phone ringing]
Hello.
Yes.
OK, I'll be right over.
Another one of those calls.
Come on Kelly.
Hey, what's your game, mister?
Well, it's a form of solitaire.
All right, boys, keep 'em up.
Well, if it ain't Red Hogan and his little playmate, Stevie!
Get going.
Beat it.
Yes, sir?
Things don't look right in there.
You better take 'em down.
I'll join you later.
OK.
Come on.
Get 'em up.
Well, what's this?
Hello.
Oh, I'm... I'm Mr. Randall.
I must thank you for coming to my rescue.
Say, did you just come in?
No, I was in my office.
To be truthful, I locked myself in when, I heard them working on the safe.
Hm.
Guess it's better to be careful, eh?
Mhm.
Oh, I'm glad you're here, Mr. Randall.
I have a few questions
I want to ask.
Oh, just routine stuff, you know.
I'm at your service.
We might be more comfortable in my private office.
Come in.
Yeah.
Sit down, Inspector.
Captain, Captain Breen.
Oh, I see.
Did you phone headquarters?
Yes.
Those papers in the safe must be pretty valuable, aren't they?
To me, yes.
I see.
All right, drop that.
Don't shoot, sir.
Don't shoot.
This place is full of burglars.
I'm sorry to disappoint you, Captain.
That nervous individual happens to be on my side.
Oh, I... I see.
Ma... may I relax, sir?
Yes, all right.
Oh, Hendricks, take those papers to my apartment.
You know the ones I want.
HENDRICKS: Oh, yes, sir.
And if you have any difficulty, remember, you're working for
Chester Randall.
- Oh, yes, sir.
- Thank you.
[phone ringing]
There's your phone, Mr. Randall.
Yes, thanks.
Hello?
Yes, this is Chester Randall.
I'm calling for
Mr. Caleb Delthern.
Mr. Delthern wants me to come to his home.
What?
At this time of night?
Sorry about the hour, Mr. Randall, but before Mr. Delthern's lawyer left for Europe, he insisted that we call you, in case of emergency.
Well, wouldn't tomorrow do?
Oh, I see.
Yes.
Well, what's the address?
Have you got a pencil, Captain?
Thank you.
Yes.
Fine.
Yes, thank you.
I'll be over as soon as possible.
Yes.
Goodbye.
What's up?
I don't know.
Well, thanks, again, Captain.
If you need me for anything later, I'm at your service.
Oh yeah.
Sure.
Oh, I think I'd better go along with you.
Well, I don't think that'll be necessary.
You don't seem to know what they want with you, and perhaps... yes, I think I'd better go along.
All right.
If you think it best.
Pardon me.
I'll get my briefcase.
Sure.
You're ready, Captain?
Oh, yes.
RANDALL: Would you mind locking the safe?
No at all.
Thank you.
After you.
Wait for us.
Mr. Randall?
I'm Mr. Randall.
Mr. Delthern is waiting, sir.
Thank you.
Anything I can do?
Oh no, sir.
It's really not that serious.
Thanks for your kindness, Captain.
Not at all.
Glad to have been of service, Mr. Randall.
You see, I've been out in the sticks for a long time, and we don't get to meet very many big time lawyers.
I was wondering why you hadn't recognized me.
Good night.
Good night.
Headquarters.
At your service, Mr. Delthern.
Sit down, please.
Thank you.
That's all, Wellington.
I'll have Mr. Randall help.
Yes, sir.
Good night, sir.
I thought there might be a possibility that you were in your office.
I'm glad I was, Mr. Delthern.
I want to be of assistance, but this is rather unusual.
Unusual, that's it.
That's why I need a lawyer.
This is my last will.
Read it.
Would you call that dangerous?
Yes, under certain circumstances, I would.
I guess you think
I'm eccentric.
Maybe I am, but I wanted one member of my family, the eldest, to be head of the Deltherns.
When you have a new will written,
I suppose it's my advice you want?
Yes, yes,
It would be better to specifically name your heirs in the amount that goes to each, instead of merely stating "to my eldest surviving heir",
I leave half of my estate."
That's what I want to do, Mr. Randall.
Fine.
Well, then, if you'll stop into the office about 10:00 in the morning, we can...
That may be too late.
Well, I don't understand.
Well, I've never been a man to let my imagination get the better of me, but I have a feeling that my life is in jeopardy.
Who knows the contents of that will?
To my knowledge, nobody, with the exception of my niece and nephews.
I told them about it a few days ago.
But I don't think that any one of them would deliberately plan to get me out of the way.
I wish you'd make a new will for me right now.
Why, I'd be glad to, Mr, Delthern, if that'll make you feel any better.
Have we some paper?
Yes, certainly.
Who is Winstead Comstock?
He's my nephew.
He's about 35.
The eldest of the lot.
And Humphrey Comstock?
Humphrey is his younger brother.
Now, Marcia and
Jasper Delthern, are they your children?
No, I've never had any children.
They were my brother's.
He and my sister were killed in an accident five years ago.
Oh, I'll close it for you.
So many weird things have happened the last few days.
Where do your niece and nephews live?
Here, with me.
Humphrey's the only one who's home.
I want a clause written that Marcia is to be completely disinherited if she married Warren Ru...
[gunshot]
Ugh!
Uncle?
I heard a shot, Mr. Humphrey.
He's dead, Wellington.
Stand back.
I've got you covered.
Huh?
Hendricks, what are you doing here?
What happened, sir?
Mr. Delthern's been shot.
You do it, sir?
Well, no, certainly not.
Well, let's get back, before you become involved, sir.
That's precisely what I intend to do.
Perhaps it'd be a good idea to pick up Mr. Randall's briefcase.
But who could have killed him?
I don't know, sir.
I left him in here with
Mr. Randall, a lawyer.
Your uncle sent for him.
Did you find any trace of the murderer?
No, I didn't.
You're Humphrey Comstock.
Your uncle said you were at home.
Yes, I'm somewhat dazed by the suddenness of this.
It might be a good idea, sir, to phone the police.
HUMPHREY: Yes, of course.
[dialing]
Get me a headquarters.
You're not going?
Oh no.
Naturally, the police will want to question you.
Yes, of course.
Hello, police headquarters?
This is Humphrey
Comstock speaking.
Caleb Delthern was just murdered.
What's the matter with you tonight, Marcia?
You've been so quiet and preoccupied all evening.
I don't exactly know, Warren.
I...
I suppose after we're married, we'll live scrappily ever after.
I'll be all right tomorrow.
Don't come in.
Good night, darling.
Good night.
Why don't you call it a day and get yourself some beauty sleep, Wellington?
I... I have some very bad news for you, Miss Marcia.
What is it?
Your uncle, Miss.
I wouldn't advise your going in.
Take it easy, Marcia.
Why, he's dead.
I don't understand.
He was feeling all right after dinner, when I left him.
Uncle Caleb was murdered.
This is Mr. Randall.
He was here with
Uncle when they...
Then you can tell us about...
There isn't much to tell.
We were seated at the desk, and a bullet came through that window.
Maybe...
[buzz]
That's the police, Wellington.
Let them in.
WELLINGTON: Yes, sir.
You started to say something.
Oh.
Oh, nothing.
This way, gentlemen.
I think you'd better hold that man, officer.
He seemed very anxious to get away.
I think I can explain that.
What are you doing in this house?
Your uncle sent for me.
That's right.
I was in the office when Mr.
Randall got the phone call.
As a matter of fact, I drove out here with him.
Pardon me, Mr. Humphrey, but
I happen to know your uncle was expecting him.
Where'd the shot come from?
Through that window, Captain.
All right, Kelly.
Take Graham and search the grounds.
Sure.
Where's the telephone.
Hello.
Is this is the coroner?
This is Breen talking.
I'm up at the Delthern's.
Yeah.
Mr. Delthern.
Right away.
Goodbye.
I'm sorry, old man.
Forget it, please.
Hiya, Breen.
After this, don't drive so fast.
We couldn't keep up with you.
Someday, I'm gonna be fortunate enough to lose you newshounds.
So Delthern was plugged, huh?
That's just what we needed, a nice murder.
Yeah, well, don't touch the body, you understand?
I think we'd better go to another room.
Who done the job?
Don't know yet.
Stick around, Davis.
See that these highbinders don't get away with anything.
OK, Captain.
Grab some pictures.
I'll wake up the city editor.
Hm.
Taking a little stroll?
Why, yes.
It's a nice night, for it, isn't it?
Yeah.
Come on.
Take a walk with us.
Oh.
Oh, I can't do that.
I... I'm going in there.
I'm Winstead Comstock, you know?
Well, now, isn't that a funny coincidence.
Yes, yes.
That's just the way you we're going.
Oh, really?
- Yeah, come on.
- Here.
Don't do that.
Come on.
I don't know who done it.
It's a mystery, I tell you.
Now, watch the birdie.
We found him outside.
What's happened to my uncle?
Hold the wire.
Well, in case you don't know it, your uncle's dead.
Dead?
Well, he was quite all right when I left here.
Where is Breen?
MAN: In the other room.
Breen?
Who's Breen?
Oh, you'll find out soon enough.
Come on.
They'd have a motive, particularly the eldest.
Winstead.
We found him roaming around outside.
I'm sure there's been some mistake, officer.
Marcia, who are all these men?
Please explain where you've been.
Hmm?
I said, where have you been?
Oh, out walking.
Why?
Where's your hat?
I presume you wear one.
Oh.
Yes, I... I left it at the cinema, the Palace Cinema.
Oh.
The show has been over for two hours.
Where have you been since then?
I don't remember.
Walking around.
BREEN: You didn't stop anywhere where we could check up on your story?
No.
Of course, you're aware of the contents of your late uncle's will?
No.
That's a lie, Winstead.
Why, he told us about it only a few days ago.
See here, young man.
Are you arguing with me?
Realize that...
I beg your pardon.
You seem to have all the matches.
May I have a light?
No.
No, of course not.
Thank you.
You're welcome.
All right.
Take him in, Kelly.
Take?
Hmm?
Come on.
You mean to say that you are going to take me to what you call your hoosegow without what
I would call my mouthpiece?
- You got it, brother.
- I got what?
My hat?
Come on.
Come on.
Come on.
Come on.
Hello.
Hello.
Get me a rewrite man, quick.
What?
Have I got a story?
Well, what do you think I got?
The Saint Vitus Dance?
Hurry up and get me somebody, quick.
Hurry up.
Well, you cleaned me in a half hour.
Here you are, Brosset.
Put it among your souvenirs.
If I remember correctly, you owe me 10 grand.
Oh well.
Maybe my luck will change.
Well, one way or another,
I want your account straightened out by tomorrow night.
By tomorrow night, you'll be owing me money.
Oh, Adams.
Give Delthern another grand.
Yeah, sure.
Gordon's waiting for you in the office.
Gimme, gimme.
Keep your shirt on.
Oh, ti's too late for that.
Brosset's got it.
Take it easy, kid.
What's on your mind?
I just talked with Red and Steve.
Yeah, it's about time they showed up.
Where are they?
In the tank.
The cops picked 'em up at Randall's office.
What happened?
The Shadow stepped in.
I'd just like to know who he is.
Mr. Jasper came home about five minutes ago, Miss.
You wanted to know.
Thank you, Wellington.
Jasper?
[mumbling]
Go way.
Leave me alone.
Maybe Winstead is innocent.
I guess we'd better phone the police.
We can't do that, Humphrey.
No?
What do you suggest?
This Mr. Brosset's a very popular man, sir.
He's even wanted in China.
Yes, the Chest Randall will never get him.
These affidavits won't help much.
Brosset seems to have an alibi for every occasion.
[phone ringing]
Hello?
Who?
Mr. Randall?
Well...
Hello.
Yes, this is Chester Randall.
Oh, hello, hello.
Well, what's the trouble?
You can't tell me over the telephone?
Well, that's all right.
Yes, I'll be right over.
Goodbye.
I gave her my telephone number.
She said she'd keep it confidential.
I sincerely hope she does, sir.
Maybe I'd better come with you.
Well, what's the matter?
You afraid I'll invite
Breen to tea or something?
Oh no, sir.
I don't think you'd do that.
Then, thanks for your faith in me, Hendricks.
And by the way, I've got a job for you.
Yes, sir.
Go to the Palace Theater and get the head usher.
See if he found any hats there last night.
And here, go to this place, Barney's Cafe.
Find out if they know a Winstead Comstock.
And in the meantime, if you want me, I'll be at...
Yes, I know, Mr. Delthern's.
That's right.
I hope you didn't mind my calling you.
Oh, not at all.
It was a pleasure to hear from you.
I hope you'll telephone again.
I thought you would help.
Otherwise, I wouldn't have phoned.
Don't worry, please.
Everything's going to be all right.
Hello, Randall.
Oh, hello, Humphrey.
I still think we'd better call the police.
Yes, I think that's a good idea.
Hello.
Is Captain Breen there?
Oh, at home, catching up with some rest.
I see.
This is Chester
Randall speaking.
Is that you, Kelly?
Could you give me the caliber of the gun that killed Mr. Deltern?
Yes.
I see.
Thank you.
Goodbye.
Well?
Uh, this is not the gun that killed your uncle.
[buzz]
I'll answer it.
Shall I put this away for you?
Put it in the drawer of the desk.
The desk?
In the library.
Pardon me.
Mr. Berranger, Miss.
Marcia, why didn't you call me?
I'm sorry, Warren, but there was nothing you could do, really.
Mr. Randall, Mr.
Warren Berranger.
How do you do?
So you're Warren?
Pardon me.
May I suggest that I fix a little breakfast?
Won't you join us?
Uh, yes, gladly.
Says the the boss was there.
Say, I thought Mr.
Randall was out of town.
He is.
Well, there's something screwy going on here.
Well, it won't take long to find out what it is.
Give me police headquarters.
Gee, this is exciting.
Maybe the guy's a crook or something.
May I talk to
Captain Breen, please?
[phone ringing]
I'll take it, Kelly.
Hello.
Captain Breen, speaking.
I'm Miss Hughes, Mr.
Randall's secretary.
I read in the paper that he was supposed to be in town last night.
But that isn't so, Captain.
He's on a vacation.
Oh, yeah, sure.
I'll take care of that, Miss Hughes.
Thanks very much for tipping me off.
Goodbye.
Mr. Comstock was at both places, like you thought, sir.
There he is, sir.
Thought I'd find you here.
Glad you dropped in, Captain.
Yeah.
You and that pelican-faced stooge or yours are pretty slick, but you can't get away with whatever you're trying to do.
Captain, I don't know what you're talking about.
Your secretary called me.
Oh, did she?
Yeah.
And she told me that Chester
Randall is not in town.
Well, there must be some mistake.
I'll say there is.
So you're a phony.
Certainly, you can prove who you are.
Yes, I think I can.
Captain, would you mind phoning my office?
The number is Madison 6432.
Ask for Miss Hughes, my secretary.
Yeah.
Thank you.
[dialing]
Hello.
Is that you, Miss Hughes?
I'll speak with her.
Hold the wire.
Thank you.
Hello.
Hello, Miss Hughes.
This is Chester Randall.
Oh no, it's me, all right.
It's nice to hear your voice too.
No, I'm sort of hiding out in town.
I thought perhaps I could get a better rest here than at one of those resorts.
But I'm still on my vacation.
Yes, no, I'll be in the office in a day or two.
Oh.
Well, if the Mayor telephones again, tell him I'll get in touch with him the first of the week, please.
Now, hold the wire a minute.
Would you like to speak with her again?
No.
No, that's all right, Miss Hughes.
Yes, thank you.
Goodb... oh, and remember,
I'm still on my vacation.
Yes, goodbye.
I'm sorry, Mr. Randall.
Why, nothing to it, Captain.
I'm glad to know that you have my interests at heart.
Thank you.
Oh, by the way, Hendricks checked on Winstead, and found out that he was at the Palace Theater last night, and then... then went to Barney's, where he remained until shortly before he was picked up here on the grounds.
I'll phone Barney right away.
If that's true, the murderer of Delthern is still at large.
Yes.
Captain, don't you think it'd be a good idea to see Barney personally?
Naturally, you'll want an affidavit.
Yes, that's right.
I'll go with you.
Fine.
Glad to have you.
You mind if Henricks remains here?
I'm expecting an important phone call, and I'd like him to take it.
No.
No, not at all.
See you later.
Hendricks, you'll take care of that for me, won't you?
Yes, sir.
Certainly, sir.
I'm sorry I'm late, sir, but I'm not as proficient in the art of connecting phones as I might be.
Well, you can practice in your spare time.
Thank you, sir.
Have you brought
Randall's papers?
Yes, sir.
Here, sir.
Very good.
We'll return them.
You mean, go back in his office, sir.
Yes, sir.
Certainly, sir.
Well, I guess my secretary didn't discover I was here.
Evidently not, sir.
Fill it up, Hendricks.
Yes, sir.
Miss Hughes, I've been sort of hiding out in town.
I thought I could get a better rest here than at one of those resorts, you know.
Pardon me, sir.
Don't you think it'd be safer if you spoke to Miss Hughes some other place?
Well... oh, what's this?
What's what, sir?
Memorandum.
Look at that second notation, sir.
Brosset wants him to call.
Oh, that's funny.
Probably thinks he can buy Mr. Randall off, sir.
It might be a good idea to drop in, and visit Brosset.
Hendricks, I think it'd be better if you waited for me.
Oh yes, sir.
Certainly, sir.
- Can I do something for you?
- Oh yes.
I'd like to see Mr. Brosset.
I think he's in his office.
This way, please.
Thanks.
[knocking on door]
Come in.
He wants to see you.
Is it OK?
Yeah.
Mr. Brosset.
Yeah?
I'm Mr. Harris.
Mr. Randall suggested
I pay you a visit.
Oh, he did, huh?
Yes, I've joined his staff of lawyers.
Oh.
William Gordon, Mr. Harris.
How are you, Mr. Gordon?
Fine.
Sit down.
Thank you.
What's on your mind?
Nothing.
I thought perhaps you had something on yours.
Chester Randall is still on his vacation.
I figured I could take care of what you wanted.
My business is with Randall.
I can't use you, Harris.
Well, I'll have to wire the boss.
Our office was broken into.
No.
I just said it was.
And peculiarly enough, the situation was saved by,
I think the underworld calls him "the Shadow."
That's interesting.
Have a drink, Mr. Harris.
No, thanks.
But I'll have a cigarette, if you don't mind.
How you doing, kid?
Well, I guess you'd better let me have another grand or two.
That's your guess.
I'll check with the boss.
I hear the Shadow's been making it pretty tough for some of the boys.
You evidently get first-hand information.
[knocking on door]
Yeah?
Jasper Delthern wants more chips on the cuff.
Yeah, I wonder if that fellas knows he's playing for keeps.
I've gone the limit with him, and I want the dough he owes me paid tonight.
Yeah.
Go tell him that.
Brosset has his own way of getting what's coming to him.
Well, business is business.
Yeah.
I see you gentlemen are engaged.
I shan't detain you any longer.
Thanks for letting me in.
You're going to settle tonight.
Well, you might give me a chance to get even.
If you know what's good for you, you better get even with Brosset.
You're Jasper
Delthern, aren't you?
Yes.
I'm a friend of your sister's.
I'm on my way to visit her now.
Why not join me?
I might as well.
There's nothing I can do around here but kibbutz.
Let's go.
To the Delthern's, Hendricks.
What, sir?
I said, to the Delthern's.
Oh yes, sir.
Certainly, sir.
You know, I was with your uncle when he was killed.
Oh, so you're Randall?
Yes.
I wouldn't have recognized you from my sister's description.
No?
She said you were handsome, with a charming personality, and most interesting.
Oh, well, that's encouraging.
I suppose since
Winstead's been freed, the police have practically moved in on you.
Yes, indeed.
The house has been infested with them all day.
Have they any clues?
No, but they're under the impression that one of us murdered Uncle Caleb.
Yes, I thought so, too, for a while.
The motive for the crime points so obviously in that direction, though, that I'm afraid someone's taking advantage of it.
Have you any suspicions?
No, not exactly.
Tell me, do you know if your uncle ever received threatening letters from a racketeer or gambler?
No.
I know about your activity in that field.
I'm afraid Brosset's going to force your hand.
I'll get it straightened out just as soon as I see Winstead.
Mhm.
I see you're are still on the job, Captain.
- Yes.
- Where's Winstead?
I haven't seen him for about a half an hour.
He's in the library, sir.
Winstead!
Shh.
What are you doing there?
Where have you been?
Hmm?
Come on.
Get a side angle.
We got a swell idea for a feature story.
It's called "the
House of Murder," and all the heirs gets killed the same place as their uncle.
No, now, you didn't tell me that.
'Course I didn't.
If I had, you wouldn't have posed.
Come on, handsome.
It's your turn.
Sit down.
Will you get out of here?
Well, how do you like that?
Here's a guy that don't want his picture in the paper.
Yes, get outta here.
Well, come on.
Let's throw them out.
Maybe we'd better get out.
These guys are half cracked.
Winstead.
Mhm?
I've got to have $11,000.
Hm.
Fancy that.
Where are you going to get it?
Why, I thought you'd loan it to me.
You thought I?
Well, you have another thing coming, young man.
Been gambling again, huh?
JASPER: Now, please don't lecture me.
What I need is that money.
Let's take a look around first, shorty.
Right.
Well, you're not gonna get it from me.
I've got to have it, tonight.
My dear jasper, you have my utmost sympathy, if that's any good to you.
You're pretty sure of yourself since the police let you go.
Why shouldn't I be?
You know, Winstead, there's such a thing as hiring a man to do a killing.
Are you accusing me of something we all know that you are...
The trouble is that we haven't had a fingerprint or a clue of any kind.
[gunshot]
Ditch the rod, Chuck.
Jasper!
Winstead's dead.
Well, at least we know who killed this one.
I'll...
Get him, Kelly.
But I didn't do it.
Well, what are you doing with that gun?
Picking your teeth?
No.
I thought I could force
Winstead to do something for me.
P... p... put your hands up, please.
Walk a little faster, gentlemen, if you don't mind.
I was afraid this would happen.
Warren Berranger, where have you been?
Out in the garden, having a smoke.
Got your alibi already, huh?
Pardon me, sir.
What Mr. Berranger said is the truth.
As a matter of fact, a few moments ago,
I overheard Winstead giving Jasper a lecture about gambling.
They were having it hot and heavy.
Warren.
May I see that gun, Captain?
All the cartridges have been fired.
It may interest you to know that we saw this gun this morning.
Miss Delthern saw it too.
One of the cartridges had been fired then.
You can make a paraffin test, and see if it's been fired in the last two hours.
What in the world are you doing, Hendricks?
I caught them running from the house, sir.
It's a little trick I learned when I worked for the telephone company, sir.
They may be the men you want, Captain.
I found this in the car, sir.
Frisk 'em, Kelly.
They're unarmed.
Come on, Jasper.
You'll have to come along.
My brother is not a murderer.
I think Captain Breen'll find that out for himself.
In the meantime, your brother will be in a safe place.
Please, don't worry.
I don't want to see
Jasper punished if he's innocent, but don't forget.
He's gained the bulk of an
$8 million dollar estate through Winstead's death.
That's a lot of money.
All right, take him in, Kelly.
Come on, Jasper.
Oh, this document is more valuable than ever.
Uncle Caleb's will?
Yes, will you please keep it in a very, very safe place?
Marcia, I don't understand.
What has changed you so completely in the last few days.
It seemed only natural under the circumstances, doesn't it?
Yes, I know, but your whole attitude toward me is different.
Probably your imagination is working overtime.
Possibly.
What is that man doing in the hall?
Oh, he's from the telephone company.
Excuse me.
Having a little trouble?
Well, a little.
I had a bad connection here.
Yeah?
Somebody yanked this cord out and stuck it back int place with chewing gum.
Why, yes.
I remember someone calling, and telling me to hold the line.
But then we were disconnected.
Well, that's all I wanted to know, Miss Hughes.
And thank you.
Thank you very much.
Then, he isn't Randall.
I'm positive that he isn't.
I'll send bird on a vacation.
Party of the first part, party of the second part.
Now, let's see.
Good morning, Hendricks.
Are you taking up law?
Not exactly, sir.
I was just looking up the penalty for one man impersonating another.
Good old, Hendricks.
I wouldn't worry about that, if I were you.
Pardon me, sir.
If you don't mind my saying so, but you have other way to do.
Yes, I know, but there's something about this Delthern case that fascinates me.
She's very charming, sir.
I wouldn't be a bit surprised if he had something to do with the murders, too.
Maybe it's a good idea my imagination worked overtime.
If I only knew where I could get a hold of him.
Why...
Do you know?
I'm sorry, but I can't help you get hold of him.
I'm so glad that you have my interests at heart, Captain.
I guess you can't talk, eh, Chuck?
I see.
They get Bill too?
Well, I'll try and spring you.
The Shadow get 'em?
Chuck didn't say.
They're both in with murder charges against 'em.
Oh, itchy trigger fingers, eh?
You better go see what you can do.
And tell those two mugs that Burt Webster's my mouthpiece, not them.
They oughta keep their mouths shut.
OK, Brosset.
- I've got to talk to you.
- Well, hello, there.
Get inside, quick.
Something wrong?
The police are looking for you.
Why?
They found out that you're not Chester Randall.
I guess it's dark enough to venture out, Hendricks.
But you promised Miss Delthern you'd remain here, sir.
Yes, I know.
I wonder if you'd mind my talking to you, not as a servant, but just man to man?
Oh, not at all.
Sit down.
Well, I suggest that you stay undercover until this Randall situation cools down a bit, and then get out of town.
No, Hendricks.
I'm going to carry on, as you so aptly put it.
But you're wanted by the police!
Now you'll have both sides against you.
You evidently forget that none of the gang leaders know who I am.
How long do you think you can keep your identity a secret?
I never cross a bridge before I come to it.
Well, it's about time you started.
You want to Brosset.
You'd match your life against the chance of getting the man who killed your father.
But well, you... you're only defeating your own purpose.
Now, don't think I don't appreciate your great loyalty and interest.
You still intend going out, sir?
I do.
Very well.
I'll get your hat, sir.
Thank you.
And where do you think you're going?
With you, sir.
Good, old Hendricks!
You'd better let me do this alone, Hendricks.
I'm sorry, sir.
I have a little carrying-on to do, too.
Oh, that's fine, old boy.
Well, drive the car around to the alley behind Brosset's office.
Be careful, and remember what I told you.
Yes, sir.
Certainly, sir.
[knocking on door]
BROSSET: Yeah?
Hello, Brosset.
BROSSET: How are you?
I was in the neighborhood, and thought I'd drop in.
See the publicity your boss got?
Yeah.
Have they caught the fellow that's impersonating him?
No.
It's a funny set-up, isn't it?
Yeah.
When's Randall coming back?
Tomorrow, I guess.
You play golf, Brosset?
No, not much.
I talked with Randall on the long distance telephone.
I don't think you'll have much difficulty getting him to listen to reason.
That's what you wanted, is it?
BROSSET: I'll talk to
Randall about that.
OK.
Hi.
Oh, hello, Gordon.
Hello.
I've got a little business with Brosset.
I hope you don't mind.
I see.
Putting me out again, huh?
Well, not exactly.
OK.
See you later.
So long.
So long.
So long.
Well?
What'd they say for themselves?
Webster talked to them.
They claim they didn't do the killing.
Burt'll bail them out tomorrow.
But I learned a couple of very interesting things.
Yeah?
Yeah, the Shadow had nothing to do with it.
Well, there's something, anyway.
What else?
Chuck told Webster about old man Delthern's will.
It seems Jasper's in line for an $8 million cut.
Yeah, I just read about it.
I thought maybe we could muscle in on it somehow.
Without that will, I guess the estate will be divided equally, huh?
Yeah, I guess so.
The answer is more simple than I expected.
All we've got to do is to get that little piece of paper.
And my friend Jasper'll pay, and play plenty.
[dialing]
The will's probably at the house.
Well, if you hurry, you won't have any trouble.
Gordon tells me Breen and
Kelly are at the station house right now, questioning Jasper.
Anything happening, Hendricks?
I say, Hendricks, what's the news?
What's new, sir?
Why, Brosset's sent a couple of men to get Mr. Delthern's will.
He figures he can make Jasper divide his share of the estate somehow.
Oh, he does, huh?
Well, what are you going to do, sir?
I'm going to the Delthern's.
Oh, you can't do that, sir.
The polic will...
But I'm not going there as the man the police want.
Good evening.
Not so fast.
We want Delthern's will.
[gunshot]
All right.
Over there, copper.
What's the meaning of this?
Hand over the old man's will.
Why, I haven't it.
Don't tell me, lady.
We know different.
It's upstairs.
I'll get it.
That's what I call a smart girl.
Hey, this was easier than I thought.
Let's get going.
Stay where you are, gentlemen.
Drop that gun.
Leave that paper in this house.
And he waited for the police, and then disappeared.
What gets me is how the Shadow knew what we had in mind.
Say, what about that guy, Harris?
Well, he left here before we did any talking.
Hey, take a look at this.
There must be some connection between that guy
Harris and the Shadow.
You were quite right, Warren, when you said I'd changed.
I didn't realize it myself.
But I do want to be fair with you.
Why, Marcia, you talk as though it's all off between us.
That's exactly what
I'm trying to say.
Oh.
I'm sorry.
So am I. Say, you aren't going for this mysterious tall, dark, and handsome, are you?
To be honest, I don't know.
Well, I guess there's no use in my hanging around here.
There's no need for you to hurry.
Goodbye, Marcia.
And good luck.
You'll need it.
Goodbye, Warren.
Thanks.
I couldn't help overhearing.
It's a peculiar thing, Wellington.
My competition happens to be a man of mystery.
Most mysteries are solved, sir.
Thanks, good night.
Good night, sir.
Well, anyway, we definitely know Brosset's a first class blackmailer, sir.
I feel certain we can get more on him than that, Hendricks.
Well, here's the alley, sir.
Do you think we should return there?
I know what I'm going to do.
How about you?
Maybe he'll come back.
He wouldn't have the nerve.
I... there's a car.
It looks like Harris.
We'll give him a chance to get set.
Turn out the lights.
It's dark, sir.
Guess they went out.
Yeah, well, they might come back.
Come in, Gordon.
And I thought that guy
Harris was on the level.
He had me fooled, too.
It's a good thing for us that I checked up on him.
Well, Sergeant hello.
Brosset talking.
Send a squad over here right away.
I think we can pick up a man you'd be very interested in getting.
Have the boys drive in the alley in back of my place.
I'll meet them there.
Anything wrong, sir?
We're calling it a day, Hendricks.
Drive through the alley around the corner.
Wait a minute.
Follow that car.
Put the car away, Hendricks.
Don't move.
Oh, hello, Wellington.
I'm here to kill you.
Well, I rather expected you to come here, but hardly to kill me.
[knocking on door]
Open it.
If you even hint that I'm here, I'll let you have it.
Hello.
Hello, Brosset.
I'm surprised to see you.
I thought you would be.
The Shadow, eh?
Oh...
I wouldn't move, if I were you, Mr. Shadow.
I've got you covered, Welling...
[gunshots]
What... what?
Keep him, Hendricks.
Yes, sir.
I'm through.
I was mad, I guess.
It I hoped to kill you.
I wanted my son to get some of the Delthern money.
Your son?
Yes.
Warren Berranger, my son.
Then, I'm forgiven,
Mr. Randall?
There's nothing to forgive.
I accomplished more by taking a vacation than I ever could have in the office.
That's most generous of you.
And thank you, Mr.
Cranston, for upholding the name of Chester Randall.
Good day.
Well, I guess we'd better shove off, too.
Oh, don't rush away.
There's no hurry.
You haven't forgotten you're coming to the house for dinner, have you?
No, dinner at 8 o'clock?
You could come earlier.
Thanks.
I will.
Goodbye.
So long.
I found this bullet in the wall, sir.
It must be from Brosset's gun.
I thought you might be interested.
Thanks.
Where are you going, Hendricks?
I thought I'd throw it away, sir.
I wouldn't do that, if I were you.
There may come a time when we can use the Shadow again.
GIVE ME THE POLICE STATION QUICKLY.
YES. THIS IS THE HOUSE
OF GOURNEY-MARTIN.
WE ARE BEING ROBBED.
DID YOU GET
A DESCRIPTION?
HE IS A TALL MAN.
HE HAS A LIMP.
WHAT'S YOUR ADDRESS?
254 VICTOR HUGO.
MY CAR! NOTIFY ALL BUREAUS.
MACHINE GUNS IF NECESSARY.
I WANT 6 MEN ON MOTORCYCLES.
PULL OVER TO THE CURB.
HELP!
H-
WHAT'S YOUR HURRY?
I'VE BEEN HELD UP
AND ROBBED.
YOU HAVE, EH? THAT'S TOO
BAD, MR. ARSENE LUPIN.
ARSENE-WHAT'S THE MATTER
WITH YOU? ARE YOU CRAZY?
I'M THE DUKE
OF CHARMERACE.
YEAH. AND I'M
THE QUEEN OF RUMANIA.
STOP FIDDLING WITH ME AND DO SOMETHING.
ONE OF YOU FELLOWS
GET UP FRONT AND DRIVE.
WHERE ARE YOU
TAKING ME?
I'M TAKING YOU RIGHT BACK
WHERE YOU CAME FROM.
YOU CAN'T VERY WELL
DO THAT.
THE OPERA WAS OVER
TWO HOURS AGO.
YES. WELL, THIS OPERA'S JUST BEGINNING.
GO AHEAD.
ALL RIGHT. SEE IF THERE
ARE ANY FINGERPRINTS THERE.
WHERE'S MR. GOURNEY-MARTIN?
HE HASN'T RETURNED
FROM THE OPERA, SIR.
EHH.
DID YOU FIND ANYTHING
DOWN THERE?
SOME WELL-DEFINED
FOOTPRINTS HERE, SIR.
ALL RIGHT. DEVELOP THEM AND GIVE
THEM TO ME AS SOON AS YOU CAN.
YES, SIR.
NOW THEN,
WHAT HAPPENED?
I GOT HIT OVER THE HEAD,
AND WHEN I CAME TO,
A MAN WAS JUST
LEAVING THE ROOM.
WAS THAT THE MAN?
THIS IS IDIOTIC.
I'M THE DUKE OF CHARMERACE.
WAS THAT THE MAN?
I DON'T THINK SO, SIR.
HE LOOKED BIGGER, AND HE
WALKED WITH A LIMP.
YOU'D BETTER REMEMBER THAT,
MR. POLICEMAN.
HE LIMPS.
NOW THEN, ARSENE LUPIN,
I'LL TALK TO YOU.
WHEN YOU DO, TAKE OFF
YOUR HAT. CALL ME SIR.
I BEG YOUR PARDON, SIR.
DOES THAT
SATISFY YOU? HMM?
ARE YOU HAPPY
AND CONTENTED NOW...
ARSENE LUPIN?
LOOK HERE...
YOU'VE CHEATED ME
AND TRICKED ME
AND MADE A FOOL OF ME
FOR YEARS.
NOW I'VE GOT YOU
RED-HANDED.
HA HA! THE DUKE
OF CHARMERACE.
HA HA HA! "I'VE JUST
RETURNED FROM THE OPERA."
HA HA HA!
WELL, CROOK, THIS IS THE
END OF THE GAY LIFE FOR YOU.
YOUR NEXT OPERA WILL BE CALLED
20 YEARS AT HARD LABOR...
AND YOUR NEXT DANCE
WILL BE THE LOCKSTEP.
HA HA! 1, 2. 1, 2.
AND REPEAT.
YOU HEAR THAT,
ARSENE LUPIN?
OH, I BEG YOUR PARDON.
MONSIEUR HENRI PIERRE
DU CHARMERACE,
DUKE DE LA BASTILLE.
STOP MAKING SUCH
A FOOL OF YOURSELF
AND TAKE OFF
THESE HANDCUFFS,
OR TOMORROW, I'LL SEE
THAT YOU LOSE YOUR BADGE.
I'LL TAKE 'EM OFF WHEN I
HAVE YOU SAFELY BEHIND BARS,
AND NOT BEFORE.
VERY WELL,
MY FRIEND-
ONLY REMEMBER THAT ANYTHING
THAT HAPPENS TO YOU AFTER THIS,
YOU ASKED FOR IT.
WHAT'S HAPPENED?
CHARMERACE!
WELL, WHAT ARE YOU
DOING HERE?
CH-CH-CHARMERACE?
NOT TDUKE
OF CHARMERACE?
NOBODY BUT
A DODDERING ASS
WOULD THINK
I WAS ARSENE LUPIN.
HERE.
ARSENE LUPIN?
ARE YOU SURE THAT HE'S
THE DUKE OF CHARMERACE?
OF COURSE I'M SURE.
YES, AND I
DON'T LIMP.
I- I DON'T KNOW
WHAT TO SAY, YOUR GRACE.
I DON'T KNOW HOW
TO APOLOGIZE.
OH, THAT'S
ALL RIGHT.
I PRESUME
YOUR STUPIDITY
ALL COMES UNDER
THE HEAD OF DUTY.
IF YOU'LL EXCUSE ME,
YOUR GRACE.
GLADLY.
YOU KNOW,
THE JOKE OF IT IS,
I HAVEN'T BEEN ROBBED
AT ALL.
OH, REALLY?
NO! ALL MY JEWELS AND BONDS ARE
DOWN AT MY PLACE IN THE COUNTRY.
OH. THAT SEEMS LIKE AN
EXCELLENT PLACE TO KEEP THEM.
WELL?
THERE ARE NO FINGERPRINTS HERE, SIR.
YOU KNOW, IF I WERE YOU,
I'D GO DOWN THERE
AND GUARD THOSE JEWELS,
AND I'D TAKE SOMEONE WITH ME
- SOMEONE I COULD TRUST.
YOU WOULD?
I WONDER YOU
DON'T OFFER TO GO, YOUR GRACE.
YOU'VE BEEN SO HELPFUL WITH
YOUR SUGGESTIONS AND ADVICE.
I CAN'T GO MYSELF. I'M GIVING
A BALL TOMORROW NIGHT.
OH, I WOULDN'T DREAM OF
INTERFERING WITH YOUR DANCING.
OH, I DON'T DANCE
ALL THE TIME.
BESIDES, IT SEEMS TO ME
YOU'RE THE MAN ABOVE ALL OTHERS
WHO SHOULD BE MOST INTERESTED IN GOING-
THAT IS, IF IT
ISN'T TOO FAR.
OH, THERE IS THE LONG ARM
OF THE LAW, YOUR GRACE.
TRUE.
THERE ARE ALSO THE NIMBLE
FINGERS OF ARSENE LUPIN.
AHH.
HAVE YOU GOT THE DATA
IN THE LUPIN CASE?
I'LL HAVE IT FOR YOU
IN A MOMENT, SIR.
THE MAN WEIGHS BETWEEN
185 AND 195 POUNDS.
HEIGHT 5' 9"
TO 5' 11".
HE WEARS BROAD-TOED SHOES, SIZE 101/2.
THE FOOTPRINTS SHOW A DEEPER
IMPRESSION ON THE RIGHT FOOT.
THE MAN
PROBABLY LIMPS.
ANYTHING ELSE?
YES. THE IMPRESSION
SHOWS 5 HOBNAILS
SET IN A SEMICIRCLE
IN THE RIGHT HEEL.
WHAT?
NO. THAT'S ALL RIGHT.
ALL RIGHT. THANK YOU.
UH, CAN I LOOK AT THE CAST
OF THAT SHOE, PLEASE?
CERTAINLY.
HERE IT IS.
I THINK I'LL TAKE THE CAST
OF THE IMPRESSION, TOO.
PARDON ME.
IT'S THIS ONE.
THANK YOU.
WELL, WHAT IS IT?
NOTHING, SIR.
GOOD MORNING,
GUERCHARD.
WHAT ABOUT
LAST NIGHT?
WELL, HE GOT AWAY
AGAIN, AS USUAL.
OH.
BUT IT WON'T
HAPPEN AGAIN.
YES. SAME OLD STORY.
NO. THIS TIME, I HAVE A
VERY GOOD DESCRIPTION OF HIM.
HE WEIGHS 190 POUNDS, WEARS A
SIZE 101/2 SHOE WITH A BROAD SOLE,
AND WALKS WITH A LIMP
IN HIS RIGHT FOOT.
IS THIS THE CAST
OF HIS SHOE?
YES.
MM-HMM. MM-HMM.
MM-HMM.
LOOK HERE.
LOOK AT THIS.
SEE THOSE HOBNAILS?
YES, I SAW THEM.
IT OUGHT TO BE EASY
TO FIND THAT MAN.
YES. UNFORTUNATELY, THERE ARE A
GREAT MANY MEN IN PARIS WHO ARE LAME.
I KNOW. I KNOW. BUT LOOK
AT THOSE MARKS ON THAT HEEL.
I TELL YOU, GUERCHARD,
ALL YOU HAVE TO DO
IS TO ARREST THE FIRST MAN
YOU FIND WITH A HEEL LIKE THAT.
OBVIOUSLY. BUT FIRST OF ALL,
I HAVE TO FIND HIM.
HOWEVER, THIS TIME, I
HAVE A VERY DEFINITE CLUE.
I'VE HEARD THAT
BEFORE.
YEAH. LAST NIGHT, HE TRIED
TO ROB GOURNEY-MARTIN'S HOUSE.
HE WAS AFTER THE FAMOUS
EMERALD NECKLACE,
BUT HE DIDN'T GET IT BECAUSE
THE NECKLACE WASN'T THERE.
IT WAS DOWN AT GOURNEY-MARTIN'S
PLACE IN THE COUNTRY.
HMM. I SEE.
AND THAT'S WHERE
I'M GOING TO FIND HIM,
BECAUSE THAT'S JUST WHERE
HE'S GOING NEXT.
OH...
IS IT?
WHAT ARE YOU
GOING TO DO ABOUT THAT?
YESTERDAY, THE PRESIDENT
SENT FOR ME
AND WANTED TO KNOW WHY I
HAVEN'T CAPTURED ARSENE LUPIN,
AND I'M PASSING IT ON
TO YOU.
WHY HAVEN'T YOU
CAUGHT HIM?
I WILL CATCH HIM.
I'LL GIVE YOU A WEEK,
GUERCHARD. A WEEK.
OH, I COULDN'T
PROMISE THAT.
I DON'T WANT A PROMISE. I WANT
ARSENE LUPIN HERE AS A PRISONER
WITH HANDCUFFS ON HIM
IN A WEEK.
I'LL DO MY BEST.
THAT ISN'T ENOUGH.
IT'S A STRANGE THING,
GUERCHARD.
YOU CAN ALWAYS CAPTURE
EVERY OTHER CROOK IN PARIS,
BUT EACH TIME YOU GO AFTER
ARSENE LUPIN, YOU FAIL.
YOU'VE FAILED
FOR THE LAST TIME.
UNLESS THAT MAN
IS HERE WITHIN A WEEK,
I'LL BREAK YOU.
AFTER ALL MY YEARS
OF SERVICE?
YES.
IN A MONTH, I'LL HAVE
SERVED 25 YEARS-
A QUARTER OF A CENTURY.
I WAS LOOKING FORWARD
TO MY PENSION,
GOING DOWN TO THE COUNTRY AND LIVING
WITH MY DAUGHTER IN PEACE AND QUIET
AWAY FROM ALL THIS-
YOU CAN HAVE ALL OF
THAT FOR ARSENE LUPIN.
OH, GIVE ME A MONTH.
IN A MONTH, HE COULD ROB ALL OF
PARIS, TAKE MILLIONS OF FRANCS.
I'LL GIVE YOU
A WEEK, GUERCHARD.
ONE WEEK.
REMEMBER THAT.
YOU LOOK ADORABLE
TONIGHT.
YOUR GRACE.
WHERE ARE THEY?
WELL?
HAVE YOU BOYS
REHEARSED THIS?
WHAT HAVE YOU GOT
THIS TIME?
IT'S TOO BAD,
YOUR GRACE.
IT'S AN ATTACHMENT
ON THE WHOLE HOUSE.
WHAT HAVE YOU GOT?
I GOT TO TAKE ALL
YOUR PERSONAL EFFECTS.
HMM. YOU'LL HAVE ME STRIPPED
LIKE MAHATMA GANDHI.
YOU COULDN'T WAIT TILL TOMORROW,
COULD YOU?
YOU SEE, I CAN'T VERY WELL
GO OUT AND TELL MY FRIENDS
THAT THE WHOLE HOUSE
HAS BEEN ATTACHED
BECAUSE I OWE A FEW FRANCS
HERE AND THERE, NOW CAN I?
BUT IT'S HALF A MILLION, YOUR GRACE.
MY DEAR FELLOW,
IF I CAN'T PAY IT,
WHAT DIFFERENCE DOES IT MAKE WHETHER
IT'S HALF A FRANC OR 10 MILLION?
BUT I CAN
PAY YOU TOMORROW.
HOW CAN WE TELL?
WHY DON'T YOU STAY RIGHT HERE
TILL I DO PAY YOU?
MAKE YOURSELVES AT HOME.
COME DOWN AND MEET THE LADIES.
OH, BUT WE'RE NOT
DRESSED FOR THAT.
OH, YOU LOOK CHARMING.
BY THE WAY, WHO IS YOUR TAILOR?
WHY DON'T YOU STAY HERE
AND HAVE SOME SUPPER, ANYWAY?
PLENTY TO EAT.
PLENTY TO DRINK.
I'LL GIVE YOU A ROOM
TO SLEEP IN,
AND IN THE MORNING,
I'LL PAY YOU. HOW'S THAT?
OH, HE HASN'T GOT
HIS NIGHTGOWN.
HMM.
I'VE GOT IT. YOU CAN SLEEP
IN YOUR UNDERCLOTHES.
EXCUSE ME.
HOW DO YOU DO?
BEAUTIFUL PARTY,
ISN'T IT?
YES. CHARMING.
THE DECORATIONS ARE
BEAUTIFUL, AREN'T THEY?
YES.
EVERYTHING READY?
I HAVE ALL THE DOORS
AND WINDOWS GUARDED
AND 4 OF OUR BEST MEN
HERE AS GUESTS.
SPLENDID.
THANK YOU.
STAY OUT OF HERE!
HOW DO YOU DO?
CLOSE THAT DOOR.
CERTAINLY.
WON'T YOU PLEASE GO?
CERTAINLY.
BUT FIRST
LET ME ASK,
HOW DO YOU LIKE
MY BED?
WELL, I DIDN'T MEAN TO,
REALLY. I WAS COLD.
OH. YES, IT IS A COLD NIGHT FOR MAY.
HOWEVER, DON'T YOU THINK PARIS
IS CHARMING IN THE SPRING?
WELL, I PREFER RUSSIA.
YOU SEE, I COME
FROM THERE.
REALLY?
HOW DELIGHTFUL.
I HAVE A PASSION
FOR CAVIAR.
WAS YOUR FATHER
THE GENERAL-
I PRESUME YOUR FATHER
WAS A GENERAL.
OF THE IMPERIAL ARMY.
YES. WAS YOUR FATHER THE
GENERAL FOND OF CAVIAR?
HE ATE IT ON PANCAKES
FOR BREAKFAST.
DID HE?
STAY FOR BREAKFAST.
WE'LL HAVE CAVIAR.
SIR, AREN'T YOU OVERSTEPPING
THE BOUNDS OF CONVENTION?
BUT, DEAR LADY, DIDN'T
YOU LEAVE THOSE BEHIND
WHEN YOU STEPPED
INTO MY BED?
OH, I ASSURE YOU, BEING
HERE IS NO PLEASURE.
OH, BUT THE NIGHT
IS STILL YOUNG.
OH, SIR!
PARDON ME. I, UH, I THINK
YOUR DRESS HAS SLIPPED.
I HAVEN'T ANY ON.
OH.
IS THAT A LITTLE
RUSSIAN CUSTOM? HMM?
WHO ARE YOU? HMM?
WAIT A MINUTE.
LET ME GUESS.
YOU'RE, UH... YOU'RE
THE BEAUTIFUL WIFE
OF THAT RED-NOSED OLD
GRAND DUKE ALEXIS. HMM?
NO?
YOU'RE THE STAR OF
THAT NEW RUSSIAN REVUE
WHERE THEY SING ALL THOSE
CHEERFUL LITTLE DITTIES
ABOUT THE FAMINE AND
THE SNOW AND THE WOLVES.
I KNOW-
YOU'RE HERE TO HELP THE
POLICE FIND ARSENE LUPIN.
HMM?
OH, NO, OF COURSE.
THAT'S ABSURD.
I'VE GOT IT.
THE DOCTOR BROUGHT YOU
IN A LITTLE BLACK BAG...
AND PUT YOU
UNDER A ROSEBUSH,
AND YOUR MOTHER FOUND
YOU AND CALLED YOU...
SONIA.
SONIA?
SONIA, WHAT ARE YOU
DOING IN MY BED?
I BROKE THE STRAP
ON MY EVENING GOWN.
IT'S BEING FIXED IN THE
NEXT ROOM, AND I WAS COLD.
AWW. POOR SONIA.
EXCUSE ME
JUST A MINUTE.
I HATE DANCING WITH MEN
WITH DAMP HANDS.
THEY RUB ALL THE POWDER
OFF YOUR BACK.
DARLING,
WOULD YOU PLEASE HURRY?
YES, MADAM.
WELL, HERE WE ARE.
IT'S VERY NICE.
IT'S A LITTLE NAUGHTY.
IT'S VERY NI-
YOU THINK YOUR FATHER THE
GENERAL WOULD APPROVE OF THIS?
MY FATHER THE GENERAL
ALWAYS SAID THAT A GENTLEMAN
WAS A MAN WHO NEVER WENT
TO BED WITH HIS SPURS ON.
ISN'T THAT A PITY?
I'M SO FOND OF HORSES.
I COULD GIVE UP RIDING,
I SUPPOSE.
GIVE ME THAT DRESS.
YOU CAN'T
GET INTO IT ALONE.
THE MAID
WILL HELP ME.
THE MAI... I KNOW MORE ABOUT
UNHOOKING THAN ANY MAID IN PARIS.
YES, BUT I WANT
THIS ONE HOOKED.
I'M GOING TO STAY RIGHT HERE IN
THIS BED UNTIL YOU LEAVE THIS ROOM.
WHAT ARE YOU DOING?
WELL, IF YOU'RE
GOING TO STAY IN BED,
YOU WON'T
NEED THE DRESS.
WAIT!
IF YOU'LL...
PUT OUT THE LIGHTS.
I THOUGHT
RUSSIA WAS A COLD COUNTRY.
PLEASE. PLEASE.
I THINK WE'D BETTER
GO AND DANCE.
LATER.
WELL, NOW, REALLY.
HA HA!
COME ON.
WE DANCE.
WELL, IF YOU
INSIST...
BUT IT WON'T BE
HALF AS MUCH FUN.
THERE'S THAT FASCINATING
GOURNEY-MARTIN.
I MUST MEET HIM.
REALLY?
HOW PECULIAR OF YOU.
HOWEVER...
GASTON! JUST A MINUTE.
COUNTESS SONIA...
KRISHNOV.
HMM. PERMIT ME TO PRESENT
THE HONORABLE GOURNEY-MARTIN.
I'M DELIGHTED.
I'M VERY HAPPY.
SHE THINKS
YOU'RE CHARMING.
REALLY?
AREN'T YOU GOING TO
ASK ME TO DANCE?
CERTAINLY. CERTAINLY.
I DON'T DANCE VERY WELL,
BUT I'M WILLING TO TRY.
CHARMING FELLOW,
ISN'T HE?
HE'S A GREAT
FRIEND OF MINE.
DO YOU
KNOW HIM WELL?
INTIMATELY,
BUT INNOCENTLY.
YOU KNOW, HE'S COMING DOWN TO
MY COUNTRY PLACE AFTER THE PARTY.
OH, I'M SORRY. WE'D PLANNED
A LITTLE EXCURSION TOGETHER.
THIS IS A SECRET,
BUT I'VE BEEN THREATENED
BY THIS ARSENE LUPIN,
AND CHARMERACE INSISTS ON
COMING DOWN TO PROTECT ME.
SO MY LITTLE EXCURSION
WILL HAVE TO BE PUT OFF.
NOW, THAT WON'T DO
AT ALL.
WHAT WERE YOU AND
CHARMERACE INTENDING TO DO?
WE WANTED TO GO AWAY AND
HAVE A NICE, LONG TALK.
OH, I SEE. I SEE.
WELL, THEN WHY DON'T YOU
COME DOWN TO MY CHATEAU?
AND IF YOU
RUN OUT OF WORDS,
I'VE GOT
A DICTIONARY.
YOU'RE SO
UNDERSTANDING.
PARDON ME.
I'M CUTTING IN.
SONIA, AFTER ALL
I'VE DONE FOR YOU.
BUT I THINK
HE'S CHARMING.
GOURNEY-MARTIN,
CHARMING?
MY DEAR CHILD,
YOU'RE MAD.
WHY, HE'S BEER. STALE,
COMMON, HEAVY BEER.
OH, AND YOU? YOU'RE
CHAMPAGNE, I SUPPOSE.
HMM.
WITH THE HEADACHE
THAT COMES AFTER.
NOT AT ALL, SONIA. I'M A
SPECIAL KIND OF CHAMPAGNE
FULL OF SPARKLE, WARMTH,
GAIETY, AND INTOXICATION,
THE KIND OF CHAMPAGNE YOU CAN
DRINK ANY HOUR OF THE DAY OR NIGHT-
EVEN BEFORE BREAKFAST.
REALLY?
SHALL WE DANCE?
SONIA, YOU'RE ALWAYS
SO RESTLESS.
POOR LITTLE THING.
YOU CAN'T RELAX,
EVEN IN BED, CAN YOU?
ARSENE LUPIN!
ARSENE LUPIN?
50,000 FRANCS
REWARD.
COME ON.
ARSENE LUPIN, IN THE NAME
OF THE LAW, I ARREST YOU!
OH, YOU FOOLS. GET OUT!
DON'T YOU SEE I'M BUSY?
SO WE SEE.
SO WE SEE.
PUT UP YOUR HANDS.
PUT UP YOUR HANDS.
WHY, YOU IDIOT.
PUT UP YOUR HANDS.
I'LL KILL YOU. I MEAN IT.
WHAT DO WE DO NOW?
WHAT DO WE DO?
GET THE DUKE. GET HELP. THERE'S
ONE OF HIM. THERE'S ONLY TWO OF US.
DON'T MOVE.
I'LL SHOOT.
QUIVERING JACKASS.
I'VE BEEN LOOKING
EVERYWHERE FOR YOU.
OH? WHY?
WHY? BECAUSE I WANTED
TO CUT IN AGAIN.
HOW SWEET OF YOU.
I'M SORRY YOU DIDN'T
FIND US.
SO AM I.
UH... WILL YOU PARDON ME
A MOMENT?
I'M AFRAID I'M NEGLECTING
SOME OF MY GUESTS.
WHAT'S THE MATTER?
WHAT ARE YOU DOING HERE?
WE'VE GOT HIM, YOUR
GRACE. WE CAUGHT HIM!
WHO DO YOU MEAN?
ARSENE LUPIN.
WHAT?
WE CAUGHT HIM
IN YOUR LIBRARY.
YOU MEAN, YOU-
THERE HE IS.
OH, MY GOOD MAN,
YOU'RE CRAZY.
THESE-
GET BACK THERE!
WHAT ARE YOU DOING,
YOU FOOL?
THIS MAN'S GUERCHARD,
OF THE POLICE.
WHAT?
THESE TWO FOOLS
THINK I'M ARSENE LUPIN.
THAT YOU'RE
ARSENE LUPIN?
WELL, OF COURSE,
MAYBE YOU ARE,
AND I'M THE QUEEN
OF RUMANIA.
I'M SORRY, GENTLEMEN,
AT YOUR DISAPPOINTMENT,
BUT THIS MAN
REALLY IS GUERCHARD,
ONE OF THE HEADS
OF THE SECRET SERVICE.
ARE YOU SURE?
OF COURSE I'M SURE.
THAT IS... OF COURSE
HE'S GUERCHARD.
BUT WE CAUGHT HIM
ROBBING YOUR DESK.
HUH?
WELL, LOOK HERE.
"WANTED DEAD OR ALIVE,
ARSENE LUPIN.
"50,000 FRANCS REWARD FOR THE
CAPTURE OF THIS NOTORIOUS THIEF.
"6 FEET TALL,
WEIGHS 190 POUNDS.
LIMP IN HIS RIGHT FOOT."
WELL, THAT IS FUNNY,
ISN'T IT?
I SAY, HOW TALL
ARE YOU, GUERCHARD?
I'M 6 FEET,
AND I WEIGH 190 POUNDS,
AND I LIMP
WITH MY RIGHT FOOT,
BUT I'M NOT
ARSENE LUPIN.
OF COURSE YOU'RE NOT.
HOW COULD YOU BE,
A MAN IN YOUR POSITION?
YOU'RE SURE YARE
GUERCHARD, AREN'T YOU?
YES, I AM!
THE ONLY REASON I ASK
IS THAT, YOU SEE,
YOU DIDN'T BELIEVE ME
WHEN I TOLD YOU
WHO I WAS.
YOU REMEMBER?
IF IT HADN'T BEEN
FOR MY FRIENDS THERE,
I DON'T KNOW WHAT
WOULD HAVE HAPPENED.
DO YOU THINK FOR A MOMENT THAT
I'M SOMEBODY THAT I SAY I'M NOT?
OH, NO, OLD MAN. NOT
REALLY. OF COURSE, BUT, UH...
WELL, AFTER ALL, YOU DO
ANSWER THIS DESCRIPTION.
YOU WERE FOUND
RIFLING MY DESK.
HAVE YOU ANY, UH,
CREDENTIALS?
CREDENTIALS?
YES. YOU KNOW, A LITTLE
BADGE OR A LITTLE LETTER.
YOU MEAN YOU WANT ME
TO BE IDENTIFIED?
WELL, WHY NOT?
I HAD TO BE.
I CAN SETTLE IT
QUICK.
I'LL TAKE HIM
TO HEADQUARTERS.
I'LL NOT HAVE IT!
I'M ON DUTY HERE,
AND THIS PLACE IS THREATENED,
AND I'M GOING TO STAY HERE.
AFTER ALL,
THAT'S RIGHT.
YOU SEE, IF HE
REALLY IS GUERCHARD
AND ARSENE LUPIN IS TRYING
TO ROB THIS HOUSE,
WE REALLY NEED HIM HERE,
DON'T WE?
I'VE GOT IT. I'LL TELEPHONE OVER
TO THE CHIEF OF POLICE
AND HAVE HIM COME
RIGHT TO THE HOUSE.
YOU'LL TAKE HIS WORD,
WON'T YOU?
WELL,
I GUESS SO.
ISN'T THAT FAIR?
YOU MEAN, I'M TO BE KEPT A PRISONER
IN THIS ROOM WITH THESE TWO FOOLS
WHEN I REALLY OUGHT TO BE DOWNSTAIRS?
ONLY TILL WE FIND OUT
WHO YOU REALLY ARE.
I'M GUERCHARD!
MY DEAR SIR, IF YOU ARE,
I'LL APOLOGIZE TO YOU
AS CHARMINGLY
AS YOU DID TO ME.
YOU BETTER WATCH HIM,
GENTLEMEN.
AND BY THE WAY,
IF HE ATTEMPTS TO ESCAPE,
PERHAPS YOU'LL
HAVE TO SHOOT.
TO KILL?
WELL, THE REWARD SAID
DEAD OR ALIVE, DIDN'T IT?
WILL YOU EXCUSE ME, OLD MAN?
I'LL SEE YOU LATER.
GET BACK THERE!
HE SAID TO SHOOT.
NO. NO, HE HAS
NO CREDENTIALS OF ANY KIND.
IT WOULD BE
A GREAT FAVOR TO ME
IF YOU COULD COME OVER HERE
RIGHT WAY.
JUST A MOMENT, PLEASE.
DID YOU RING, SIR?
HAVE THAT SURPRISE CAKE
SERVED RIGHT AWAY.
IN ABOUT
A HALF-HOUR, SIR?
IN HALF A MINUTE.
HURRY UP.
HELLO. 10 MINUTES? YOU CAN'T
DO IT ANY SOONER THAN THAT, EH?
WELL, THAT'S ALL RIGHT, OLD MAN,
IF YOU CAN'T MAKE IT ANY SOONER.
THANKS. THANKS VERY MUCH.
JUST A MOMENT,
LADIES AND GENTLEMEN.
DON'T BE ALARMED! THE LIGHTS
WILL BE ON AGAIN IN A MOMENT.
AS YOU KNOW,
THIS IS MY BIRTHDAY.
I HAVE A LITTLE SURPRISE
FOR YOU.
OH! OH!
WE WON'T
CUT THE CAKE YET,
BUT WHEN YOU DO, YOU'LL FIND A
LITTLE PRESENT FOR EACH OF YOU IN IT.
MY NECKLACE!
MY NECKLACE!
SOMEONE HAS
TAKEN MY NECKLACE!
OH! OH!
HERE, LET ME
OUT OF HERE!
GET BACK THERE.
GET BACK!
OH, YOU IDIOTS!
WHEN THE LIGHTS WENT OUT,
SOMEBODY TOOK IT.
TOOK WHAT?
MY TIARA. SOMEBODY PULLED IT
OFF MY HEAD IN THE DARK.
MY NECKLACE! SOMEONE STOLE IT
FROM ME WHILE THE LIGHTS WERE OFF.
WHAT ARE THEY YELLING ABOUT?
WHAT HAS HAPPENED?
MY BRACELET.
I'VE BEEN ROBBED!
ROBBED? MY DEAR CHILD,
THAT'S TERRIBLE.
ARE YOU SURE
YOU HAD IT ON?
I'M POSITIVE.
I CAN'T
UNDERSTAND IT.
DID YOU FEEL
ANYBODY TAKE IT?
WHY, NO.
I WAS STANDING-
WELL, NO ONE'S
BEEN NEAR ME BUT YOU.
KEEP YOUR PLACES, PLEASE!
KEEP YOUR PLACES.
NO ONE WILL BE PERMITTED
TO LEAVE THIS FLOOR.
WHAT DO YOU THINK YOU'RE
DOING? WHO THE DEVIL ARE YOU?
ORDERS FROM
HEADQUARTERS, SIR.
SEE THAT NO ONE GETS OUT OF THE WINDOWS.
OH, YOU'VE HAD YOUR MEN
HERE ALL EVENING?
YES, SIR.
MY DEAR FELLOW, THAT'S VERY
INTELLIGENT OF YOU. I CONGRATULATE YOU.
THANK YOU.
NOT AT ALL.
EMILE.
I'M GLAD YOU'RE HERE.
WHAT HAPPENED?
THERE'S BEEN SOME SORT
OF A ROBBERY, APPARENTLY.
WE TURNED OUT THE LIGHTS
TO SHOW MY BIRTHDAY CAKE-
WHERE'S GUERCHARD?
OH, THEN HE REALLY IS
GUERCHARD?
I DON'T UNDERSTAND
YOUR GRACE.
GUERCHARD WAS SENT HERE TO SEE THAT
NO ROBBERY WAS COMMITTED. WHERE IS HE?
WELL, HE'S UP IN THE LIBRARY PRESENTLY.
GET GUERCHARD.
THE REST OF YOU GUARD
THE DOORS AND WINDOWS.
YOU SEE, THERE WAS SOME SORT
OF DOUBT ABOUT HIS IDENTITY,
AS I TELEPHONED YOU
BEFORE,
AND WE DETAINED HIM
UPSTAIRS.
HMM. I SEE. AND WHILE HE WAS DETAINED,
A ROBBERY
WAS COMMITTED?
SO IT SEEMS.
YOU'LL PARDON ME,
YOUR GRACE.
DID YOU SEE ANYTHING? DID
YOU FIND OUT WHO IT WAS?
NO, SIR. THE LIGHTS WENT OUT.
I COULDN'T SEE A THING.
OH, YOU BLIND FOOL!
YOU COULDN'T SEE ANYTHING
IF THE LIGHTS HAD STAYED ON.
I'LL TAKE CHARGE
OF THIS.
VERY WELL.
LADIES AND GENTLEMEN,
I REGRET TO INFORM YOU
THAT IT WILL BE NECESSARY FOR
YOU ALL TO SUBMIT TO A SEARCH.
THE GENTLEMEN WILL REMAIN
IN THE BALLROOM,
AND THE LADIES
WILL GO UPSTAIRS.
THE POLICE MATRONS
ARE ON THE WAY NOW.
MY DEAR GUERCHARD, I CAN'T
APOLOGIZE SUFFICIENTLY.
NOT NECESSARY
AT ALL.
NOT NECESSARY,
YOUR GRACE.
NOW IF YOU WILL KINDLY TAKE YOUR PLACE
WITH THE OTHER MEN
TO BE SEARCHED.
WHAT?
JUST AS A MATTER
OF FORM.
I HOPE THEY'LL BE GENTLE.
I'M AWFULLY TICKLISH.
WELL?
PERFECT. HE FOUND ME IN HIS BED.
I KNOW.
IT WAS MY OWN IDEA.
YOU TOLD ME TO GAIN
HIS CONFIDENCE.
SO DID YOU?
I WAS VERY CHARMING.
MM-HMM.
WHAT ELSE DID YOU DO?
I DID ENOUGH.
I DON'T DOUBT THAT,
BUT WHAT DID YOU
FIND OUT?
CHARMERACE LEAVES
WITH GOURNEY-MARTIN
FOR THE COUNTRY
TONIGHT,
AND I'M GOING
WITH THEM.
OH, SPLENDID.
SPLENDID.
NOW KEEP YOUR WITS
ABOUT YOU
AND WATCH CHARMERACE.
YES. AND YOU?
OH, I'LL LIMP A LITTLE
AND SLOUCH A LITTLE
AND LOOK MORE STUPID
THAN EVER.
I'M DOING VERY WELL.
GO ON UPSTAIRS
AND GET SEARCHED.
I TELL YOU, I'VE SEARCHED
EVERYTHING AND EVERYBODY.
EVEN THE DOORS
WERE LOCKED,
BUT IN SPITE
OF THAT,
HE GOT AWAY AGAIN.
OH, DARLING,
I'M SO SORRY,
BUT, FATHER, I KNOW
YOU'LL CATCH HIM.
NOBODY'S AS SMART
AS YOU ARE.
I KNOW I'M SMART,
AND YOU KNOW
I'M SMART,
BUT ARSENE LUPIN,
DOES HE KNOW IT?
OH, COME ON NOW.
LET'S GET OUR HEADS
TOGETHER.
MAYBE WE CAN THINK
OF A WAY TO TRAP HIM.
OH, I'VE GOT A PLAN,
ALL RIGHT.
OH, I KNEW IT.
IT PROBABLY
WON'T WORK.
I BET IT WILL.
WELL, ANYHOW,
GIVE THE OLD MAN
A KISS.
WE'LL HAVE TO STOP
AND GET MY THINGS.
HOTEL D'ARBY
ON RUE ST-ROCH.
YES, SIR.
BUT, YOUR GRACE...
UH...
I'M TERRIBLY SORRY. I'M
AFRAID I CAN'T GO WITH YOU NOW.
THERE ARE A COUPLE OF
DISTINGUISHED GUESTS I'VE FORGOTTEN.
BUT HOW ABOUT
ARSENE LUPIN?
THAT'S ALL RIGHT.
I'LL TAKE THE ROADSTER AND
BE DOWN IN A COUPLE OF HOURS.
I'M SURE I'LL BE THERE
BEFORE HE WILL.
GOOD NIGHT.
SEE YOU TOMORROW.
GOOD NIGHT.
GOOD NIGHT.
I'M AWFULLY SORRY. I FORGOT
ALL ABOUT YOU FELLOWS.
NOW, LISTEN. I'VE GOT TO
BE AWAY FOR 4 OR 5 DAYS-
MAYBE ONLY TWO DAYS-
THEN I'LL COME BACK AND PAY
YOU EVERYTHING I OWE YOU.
MEANWHILE, YOU CAN HAVE
THE RUN OF THE HOUSE.
PLENTY TO EAT,
PLENTY TO DRINK,
AND LOTS OF SLEEP.
AND I'LL GIVE YOU A COUPLE
OF GOOD TELEPHONE NUMBERS.
TELEPHONE NUMBERS?
HELLO.
IS THIS MONSIEUR GUERCHARD
OF THE POLICE?
IT IS ALEXIS PETROVICH,
SONIA'S COUSIN.
HUH? YOU KNOW, SONIA,
WHO WORK FOR YOU.
SHE WANTED ME
TO TELL YOU
SHE JUST LEFT FOR THE COUNTRY
WITH GOURNEY-MARTIN IN HIS CAR.
HUH?
OH, CHARMERACE.
OH. HA HA!
THE SILLY ASS.
HE'S GOING TO FOLLOW HER
DOWN THERE.
YES. HA HA HA!
IT'S WORKING.
WHAT IS?
A TRAP.
I SET A TRAP AND BAITED
IT WITH A PIECE OF CHEESE.
CHEESE?
NOT THIS KIND
OF CHEESE,
BUT A SMILING,
DAINTY, VOLUPTUOUS,
HIGHLY-PERFUMED LITTLE PIECE OF CHEESE,
AND THE MOUSE,
HE'S NIBBLING.
WHAT IS IT?
TELL ME.
HA HA HA!
MMM. MMM.
AAH!
WHAT TIME DID MR.
GOURNEY-MARTIN GET HOME?
UH, ABOUT
AN HOUR AGO, SIR.
AH.
YOU NEEDN'T UNPACK THOSE, OLD MAN.
VERY WELL, SIR.
I'LL DO THAT MYSELF.
I SAY...
DID YOU, UH, ATTEND TO THAT
CHAMPAGNE I TELEPHONED YOU ABOUT?
I'VE ARRANGED
EVERYTHING, SIR.
THAT'S FINE.
WILL THERE BE ANYTHING ELSE, SIR?
NO, THANKS.
GOOD NIGHT.
GOOD NIGHT, SIR.
OH, BY THE WAY,
AT WHAT TIME DOES MR. GOURNEY-MARTIN
HAVE BREAKFAST IN THE MORNING?
ABOUT 9:00, SIR.
THANKS.
OH.
HANDS UP!
GOURNEY-MARTIN!
CHARMERACE.
WELL, WHEN DID YOU
GET DOWN?
JUST A FEW
MINUTES AGO.
YOU KNOW, I THOUGHT
YOU WERE ARSENE LUPIN.
HA HA HA! AND I THOUGHT YOU WERE!
YOU, UH, APPEAR TO BE
ROBBING YOUR OWN SAFE.
NO, NO, NO.
YOU SEE, I HAVE A LOT OF BONDS IN THERE,
AND I WAS
A BIT NERVOUS-
BONDS THEY SAY
I GOT ILLEGALLY,
BUT NEVERTHELESS, YOU
KNOW, I WANT TO KEEP THEM.
I DON'T BLAME YOU.
THAT'S A FUNNY-LOOKING
SAFE YOU'VE GOT THERE.
IT, UH, HAS NO
COMBINATION.
NO, IT HASN'T.
OPEN IT.
WHAT?
GO ON. OPEN IT.
OH, ALL RIGHT.
OW!
HA HA HA!
THAT'S THE ELECTRIC
CURRENT.
TRY TO GET AWAY.
DAMN IT, I CAN'T.
THIS IS A GREAT IDEA.
I CONGRATULATE YOU.
OW! THAT HURTS!
DOESN'T IT?
YES.
CAN'T YOU GET
YOUR HAND AWAY?
NO, I CAN'T. WAIT TILL
I TURN OFF THE SWITCH.
HA HA HA!
WELL...
I'M PRETTY WELL-PROTECTED AGAINST
OUR FRIEND LUPIN, DON'T YOU THINK?
I SHOULD SAY SO.
YOU KNOW, YOU'D BE JUST AS
WELL OFF IF I WEREN'T HERE.
YEAH?
I'M DELIGHTED
THAT YOU CAME DOWN.
I APPRECIATE IT.
THAT'S ALL RIGHT,
OLD MAN.
I THINK IT'S ALL
RATHER FUN.
FUN? WELL, I'M GLAD
YOU'RE ENJOYING IT.
MY DEAR FELLOW, I WAS NOT ONLY AMUSED,
BUT INSTRUCTED.
WOULD YOU HAVE
A DRINK BEFORE YOU GO TO BED?
NO, THANKS,
OLD MAN.
WELL, GOOD NIGHT.
SEE YOU AT BREAKFAST.
GOOD NIGHT.
GOOD NIGHT.
SONIA-
ASLEEP AND HELPLESS.
NOT THAT WAY, DARLING.
THIS WAY.
WHOA.
I MUSTN'T
FRIGHTEN HER.
I'LL WAKE HER
VERY GENTLY.
SHE'S NOT ASLEEP.
SHE'S DEAD.
IT BEATS.
I THINK IT BEATS.
DARLING...
I HATE TO TAKE
ADVANTAGE OF YOU
IN YOUR HELPLESS
CONDITION,
BUT, YOU KNOW,
THERE'S ONE THING
THAT'S NEVER
FAILED YET,
SOMETHING THAT'LL MAKE THE
BLOOD RUN THROUGH YOUR VEINS
AND LITTLE SHIVERS GO
UP AND DOWN YOUR SPINE.
IF YOU SLEEP THROUGH WHAT
I'M GOING TO DO TO YOU,
YOU'RE NOT THE WOMAN
I THINK YOU ARE.
OH!
BUT, GUERCHARD, ARSENE
LUPIN MUST BE HERE.
WHEN I WOKE UP
THIS MORNING,
THERE WAS THIS BEAUTIFUL
DIAMOND BRACELET IN MY ROOM
AND THIS NOTE-
EXCUSE ME.
"MY DEAR COUNTESS,
"LOVELY LADIES SHOULDN'T
WEAR FALSE JEWELRY.
"I TOOK FROM YOU
LAST NIGHT
WITH SOMETHING MORE
WORTHY OF YOUR BEAUTY."
AND IT'S SIGNED
"ARSENE LUPIN."
IS THERE ANYTHING
I CAN DO?
KEEP YOUR EYES OPEN
AND KEEP IN TOUCH
WITH ME HERE.
ALL RIGHT. I WILL.
WELL, WHAT DO YOU THINK OF MY ANCESTORS?
HMM. ARE THESE ALL
YOUR ANCESTORS?
WELL, I BOUGHT THEM.
THAT MAKES THEM MINE,
DOESN'T IT?
THAT'S ONE WAY
OF GETTING THEM.
THAT'S WHERE IT HUNG.
WHY HAVEN'T YOU
COVERED THAT UP?
YOU KNOW, THE PAINTING THAT HUNG THERE
WAS THE MOST VALUABLE
PAINTING IN FRANCE,
WITH THE EXCEPTION
OF THE MONA LISA.
I LEFT THE NAME THERE
TO REMIND ME.
YOU KNOW, THAT FELLOW WROTE TO
ME AND TOLD ME TO SHIP IT TO HIM,
AND WHEN I DIDN'T,
IT DISAPPEARED.
HUH. THAT'S EXTRAORDINARY, ISN'T IT?
I WAS STANDING RIGHT HERE
LOOKING AT THAT PAINTING
WHEN MY BUTLER
HANDED ME A LETTER.
UH, PARDON ME, SIR,
BUT THE MESSENGER SAID
THIS WAS IMPORTANT.
STRANGE.
THAT'S THE SAME PECULIAR
TYPE OF ENVELOPE.
HERE. YOU READ IT FOR
ME, WILL YOU, PLEASE?
I HAVEN'T MY GLASSES.
WELL? WHAT'S IT ABOUT?
IT ISN'T
VERY POLITE.
NEVER MIND
THE POLITENESS.
WHAT DOES HE SAY?
"GOURNEY-MARTIN,
"YOU MADE MILLIONS IN WAR
PROFITS WHEN MEN WERE DYING.
YOU'VE STOLEN FROM
WIDOWS AND ORPHANS."
OH, YOU COULDN'T
HAVE DONE THAT.
OF COURSE NOT.
WHAT ELSE DOES HE SAY?
"YOU'VE HAD ALL THIS
MONEY LONG ENOUGH.
"I'M GOING TO TAKE YOUR
JEWELS AND YOUR PAINTINGS.
"I'LL CALL FOR THEM
AT MIDNIGHT.
"PLEASE
HAVE THEM PACKED.
ARSENE LUPIN."
HAVE THEM PACKED? HE'S
GOING TO ROB ME AGAIN?
YOU KNOW, I WOULDN'T
TAKE THIS TOO LIGHTLY
IF I WERE YOU.
WHY DON'T YOU SEND FOR THE LOCAL POLICE?
WE HAVE NO LOCAL POLICE.
I'LL SEND FOR GUERCHARD.
THAT'S WHAT I'LL DO.
THAT'S A GOOD IDEA.
TELL HIM TO SEND AN
OFFICER AND 4 OR 5 MEN.
YOU'LL WANT
THE HOUSE, UH,
PRACTICALLY
SURROUNDED.
IT'S GOOD OF YOU TO TAKE
SUCH AN INTEREST IN THIS.
WELL,
MY DEAR CHILD,
WE'RE ALL
INTERESTED.
PERSONALLY, I CAN'T THINK
OF ANYTHING MORE AMUSING
THAN CATCHING
ARSENE LUPIN.
WOULDN'T YOU LIKE
TO CATCH HIM?
YES.
I THINK SO.
YES, I WOULD.
WELL, CAN'T YOU
MAKE UP YOUR MIND?
WELL, I-
GESUNDHEIT.
I WOULDN'T BE
TOO SURE OF THAT.
I'VE ALWAYS HEARD ARSENE
LUPIN KEPT HIS APPOINTMENTS.
WHO SHALL I SAY
WANTS TO SEE HIM?
NEVER MIND.
I'LL GO RIGHT IN.
GOOD EVENING.
I'M SORRY TO BE LATE.
WELL, GUERCHARD, YOU SCARED US TO DEATH.
WE THOUGHT YOU WERE
ARSENE LUPIN.
YOU'RE NOT, ARE YOU?
NI'M NOT.
UH, ANYTHING HAPPEN?
NO, NOT YET, BUT YOUR MEN ARE ALL HERE.
YES. THEY'RE ALL
OVER THE PLACE.
I'VE POSTED THEM
MYSELF.
OH, SPLENDID. SPLENDID.
OH, BY THE WAY,
COUNTESS
KRISHNOV,
PERMIT ME
TO PRESENT
PROBABLY THE GREATEST THIEF-TAKER
IN THE ENTIRE
WORLD-
MR. GUERCHARD
OF THE POLICE.
I'M CHARMED.
HOW DO YOU DO?
HAVE YOU LOCKED UP
YOUR EMERALD NECKLACE
AND YOUR OTHER
VALUABLES?
YES.
WHERE?
IN MY SAFE THERE.
OH, EXCELLENT.
UH, WELL, I'LL GET BACK
TO PARIS THEN.
UM, I'LL SEE YOU ALL
IN THE MORNING.
AREN'T YOU
GOING TO STAY?
NO, NO.
NO NEED FOR IT AT ALL.
MY MEN ARE ALL HERE.
DO YOU, UH, WANT TO GO
BACK TO YOUR SOLITAIRE,
OR WOULD YOU PREFER SOMETHING
THAT REQUIRES TWO PEOPLE?
LET ME HAVE
THE KEY
OF THE FRONT DOOR,
WILL YOU, PLEASE?
WHAT FOR?
DON'T QUESTION
MY MOTIVES.
JUST LET ME HAVE IT,
PLEASE.
THAT'S IT.
NO ONE.
I- I UNDERSTAND.
CHARMERACE-
ASLEEP AND HELPLESS.
HE'S NOT ASLEEP.
HE'S DEAD.
POOR MAN. SOMETHING
MUST BE DONE ABOUT THIS.
THERE'S ONE THING
THAT HAS NEVER FAILED.
NEVER MIND THAT.
IDIOT, WHAT ARE YOU DOING HERE?
SHH.
Just a minute.
What have you got?
Loot.
What?
Why not?
YOU DON'T EXPECT ME
TO HIDE IT FOR YOU?
WELL, NOT ALONE.
WE'LL DO IT
TOGETHER.
I'VE BEEN ROBBING
THE ICEBOX.
I'M STARVING TO DEATH, AREN'T YOU?
FAMISHED.
YOU KNOW, THAT'S REALLY
A CHARMING BRACELET.
YES. IT-IT DOES
SUIT ME, DOESN'T IT?
PERFECTLY.
I MUST SAY THAT FELLOW
LUPIN HAS EXCELLENT TASTE.
HASN'T HE?
OH, I'D LOVE
TO MEET HIM,
BUT, YOU KNOW, I THINK
I'D BE A LITTLE AFRAID.
WHY?
WELL, AFRAID THAT I MIGHT
NOT BE ABLE TO RESIST HIM.
WHAT MAKES YOU FEEL
THAT WAY ABOUT IT?
WELL, THERE'S-THERE'S SOMETHING
EXCITING ABOUT ARSENE LUPIN,
BUT OF COURSE A MAN LIKE
YOU WOULDN'T UNDERSTAND THAT.
OH, I DON'T KNOW.
I THINK I COULD HAVE
AN OPEN MIND ABOUT THAT.
HE'S A PECULIAR
CHARACTER.
I SUPPOSE HE'D
STEAL FROM ANYBODY.
POSSIBLY.
BUT I DON'T THINK HE'D EVER
TAKE ANYTHING FROM A WOMAN
THAT SHE WASN'T
WILLING TO GIVE.
NO.
I THINK YOU'RE PROBABLY
RIGHT ABOUT THAT.
HMM.
GOOD NIGHT, SONIA.
YOU'RE GOING?
GOOD NIGHT.
WAIT.
WHERE ARE YOU GOING?
I'M GOING TO BED.
WHERE DOES ONE USUALLY
GO AT THIS TIME OF NIGHT?
ARE-ARE YOU QUITE SURE
YOU'RE GOING TO BED?
WHY, OF COURSE.
WHAT'S ON YOUR MIND?
WHAT ARE YOU
SHAKING ABOUT?
I'M AFRAID FOR YOU.
WELL, WHAT COULD
HAPPEN TO ME?
I'M AFRAID YOU MIGHT
GO DOWNSTAIRS
AND THEY'D MISTAKE YOU
FOR ARSENE LUPIN.
OH.
SONIA,
YOU'RE A DARLING.
WHAT MAKES YOU THINK THERE
ISN'T MORE DANGER HERE
THAN ANYWHERE ELSE
IN THE WORLD?
HERE?
WHAT DO YOU MEAN?
YOU KNOW,
EVERYTHING ABOUT YOU
IS A LITTLE BIT
DANGEROUS, SONIA.
I RECOGNIZED THAT THE
FIRST TIME I SAW YOU,
BUT I COULDN'T DO
ANYTHING ABOUT IT AT ALL.
I TRIED TO,
BUT I COULDN'T.
WHAT-WHAT POSSIBLE DANGER
COULD YOU BE IN WITH ME?
YOUR EYES,
FOR INSTANCE.
ARE YOU AFRAID THEY
MIGHT SEE TOO MUCH?
WE COULD CLOSE THEM,
PERHAPS.
AND YOUR MOUTH.
ARE YOU AFRAID IT
MIGHT TELL TOO MUCH?
NO...
BUT IT'S DANGEROUS.
I WONDER IF ARSENE
LUPIN WOULD BE AFRAID.
YOU KNOW, I NEVER HEARD HE WAS A COWARD.
HELP! HELP! POLICE!
HELP! HELP! POLICE!
WHERE ARE
THOSE POLICE?
LOOK!
I'VE BEEN ROBBED!
LOOK! THEY'VE TAKEN
ALL THE GOOD ONES
AND LEFT THE FAKES!
WHERE WERE YOU?
WHERE WERE
THE POLICE?
WE'LL FIND OUT.
POLICE! POLICE!
WHERE ARE THOSE POLICE?
IT'S NO USE.
THEY'VE GONE.
GONE?
YOU MEAN THEY'VE STOLEN
YOUR POLICE, TOO?
HA HA HA!
WHAT'S THE MATTER
WITH YOU?
ARE YOU CRAZY?
LOOK.
WELL, WHO ARE THEY?
WELL, SERGEANT,
HOW DID THIS HAPPEN?
MR. GUERCHARD,
I WAS NEVER SO HUMILIATED.
WE WERE ENJOYING A LITTLE
BOTTLE OF WINE ON OUR WAY HERE,
AND THE NEXT THING
WE KNEW,
WE WOKE UP IN THE BUSHES
UNDER THE BRIDGE.
WELL, DON'T WORRY
ABOUT IT.
YOUR CLOTHES WILL BE
HERE IN A MINUTE.
WHAT'S ALL THIS ABOUT?
AH.
THERE THEY ARE NOW,
SERGEANT.
COME ON.
GET OUT AND LINE UP.
COME ON. LINE UP HERE.
WELL, ODILLE, DID YOU HAVE ANY TROUBLE?
NO, SIR. WE CAUGHT THEM
JUST AS YOU SAID WE WOULD.
ALL RIGHT. BRING THEM INTO THE HOUSE.
I WANT TO TALK
TO THEM.
WHAT'S THE-WHY-
NOW, YOUR PICTURES
WILL BE IN THE GALLERY
IN HALF AN HOUR.
ALL RIGHT. COME ON.
MY DEAR FELLOW, THOSE MEN
ON GUARD HERE LAST NIGHT
WEREN'T OUR MEN.
NO?
NO. THEY WERE
ARSENE LUPIN'S.
OH.
CERTAINLY.
MY OFFICERS COMPLETELY
SURROUNDED THE ESTATE.
I THOUGHT THAT WAS THE
CLEVEREST WAY OF CATCHING THEM.
OH! LOOK!
ROBBED AFTER ALL!
ROBBED AFTER ALL!
COULDN'T HAVE
HAPPENED.
COULDN'T HAVE HAPPENED,
I TELL YOU.
I WASN'T OUT OF THE PLACE 10 MINUTES.
WELL, OF COURSE
IT COULDN'T HAPPEN.
OF COURSE
IT COULDN'T.
THE SAFE
OPENED ITSELF,
AND ALL MY BONDS AND MY
JEWELS JUST BLEW AWAY!
STOP YELLING THAT WAY.
HOW LONG HAVE YOU HAD
THIS TRICK SAFE?
ABOUT A MONTH.
ANYBODY KNOW
HOW TO OPEN IT?
NO. NOBODY.
JUST I, MYSELF.
OH, WAIT A MINUTE.
CHARMERACE.
CHARMERACE?
YEAH. HE SAW ME SWITCH OFF THE CURRENT
AND OPEN
THE SAFE.
ODILLE!
YES, SIR.
UH, GO UPSTAIRS AND ASK
THE DUKE OF CHARMERACE
TO COME DOWN
AT ONCE.
YES, SIR.
AND WAIT
A MINUTE.
IF YOU HAVE ANY TROUBLE
AT ALL, BRING HIM DOWN.
YES, SIR.
YOUR GRACE.
YOUR GRACE.
WELL, DUVALL, THE LAST TIME,
YOU DID 3 YEARS FOR BURGLARY.
WHO'S YOUR BOSS NOW?
UH, I DON'T KNOW,
HONESTLY.
I WENT TO BED LAST NIGHT IN MY OWN HOUSE
AND WOKE UP RIGHT HERE IN THESE CLOTHES.
AH.
OH, LEROUX.
YOU DID 5 YEARS FOR
HOUSEBREAKING IN MARSEILLES.
WHAT ARE YOU DOING
DOWN HERE?
CAME DOWN HERE TO
SEE MY GRANDMOTHER.
SHE'S EXPECTING
A LITTLE ONE,
AND I WANTED
TO BE HERE.
NOW, IF THEY
WON'T TALK-
KEEP OUT OF THIS.
I'LL ATTEND TO THIS.
WELL, CONSTANTINE,
YOU HAVEN'T ANY POLICE
RECORDS YET, HAVE YOU?
NO, SIR.
WELL, YOU WILL HAVE
IF YOU DON'T ANSWER ME.
ARE YOU GOING TO TALK?
I CAN'T, SIR. I HAVE A SORE THROAT.
AH. PFFT!
SO HAVE I.
WHAT'S YOUR NAME?
JEAN MOUCANT.
AH. YOU'RE ABOUT 19,
AREN'T YOU?
YES, SIR.
MM-HMM. EVER BEEN
IN PRISON BEFORE?
NO, SIR.
NO. OH, THAT'S
A BAD PLACE.
YOU WANT TO KEEP
OUT OF IT.
YOU KNOW, UH, A CRIME LIKE
THIS, IT'S, UH, 15 TO 20 YEARS.
20 YEARS!
YES. YOU'LL BE 40
WHEN YOU GET OUT.
YOU GOT A GIRL?
YES, SIR.
NOW LOOK HERE.
SUPPOSE I HELP YOU
OUT OF THIS MESS,
GIVE YOU SOME MONEY
AND SEND YOU TO AMERICA,
WHERE THE STREETS
ARE PAVED WITH GOLD
AND EVERYBODY'S RICH
AND HAPPY AND PROSPEROUS.
HUH?
NOW, I-I'LL DO THIS
FOR YOU,
AND ALL YOU HAVE TO DO
IS TO TELL ME
WHO PAID YOU
TO COME DOWN HERE.
I COULDN'T, SIR.
I'M AFRAID.
THERE'S NO NEED
FOR THAT.
I'M GUERCHARD.
I'M THE POLICE.
I'M FRANCE.
I'LL PROTECT YOU.
BRAVO!
THAT'S A BEAUTIFUL SPEECH!
MAGNIFICENT!
HA HA HA!
NOW LOOK HERE.
I'LL LET YOU GO,
AND I'LL GIVE YOU
50,000 FRANCS
IF YOU'LL TELL ME WHAT
YOU KNOW ABOUT THIS MAN.
IS THIS ARSENE LUPIN?
GO AHEAD,
YOUNG MAN.
TELL THIS NICE,
KIND GENTLEMAN
WHAT HE WANTS
TO KNOW.
I NEVER SAW HIM BEFORE
IN MY LIFE.
YOU DIDN'T
REALLY THINK
I WAS
ARSENE LUPIN,
DID YOU,
OLD MAN?
NOW LOOK HERE,
YOU MEN.
I'M GOING TO
GIVE YOU A CHANCE.
THERE'S FREEDOM FOR ANY
MAN THAT TELLS THE TRUTH-
FREEDOM
AND A CLEAN SLATE.
WELL, HAVE YOU GOT A
TONGUE? DO YOU KNOW HIM?
NO, SIR.
YOU KNOW HIM?
NO, SIR.
YOU KNOW, GUERCHARD,
I THINK I'D KEEP AN
EYE ON THESE FELLOWS.
I'M QUITE SURE
ARSENE LUPIN
WOULD NEVER LET SUCH
LOYALTY GO UNREWARDED.
I'LL BET YOU ANYTHING
YOU LIKE HE GETS THEM OFF.
AH, ENOUGH OF THIS.
UH, WILL YOU GO IN THE
LIBRARY, YOUR GRACE?
TAKE THESE MEN
BACK TO PARIS.
WE'LL FIND A WAY
OF MAKING THEM TALK.
YOU KNOW,
GUERCHARD,
I DON'T UNDERSTAND
ONE THING,
AND THAT'S
YOUR FIXED IDEA
THAT I'M
ARSENE LUPIN.
REALLY, YOUR GRACE,
YOU MUST FORGIVE ME.
I'M VERY SORRY, BUT AS A
MATTER OF FACT, I'M QUITE UPSET.
UNDER MY VERY NOSE,
SO TO SPEAK,
THE SAFE WAS ROBBED.
OH, I CAN'T
BELIEVE IT.
WELL, IT'S TRUE
JUST THE SAME.
HERE, YOU CAN SEE
FOR YOURSELF.
AAH!
WAIT A MINUTE.
WAIT A MINUTE.
THERE.
SO YOU DID KNOW
HOW TO OPEN IT.
WHY, YES, OF COURSE
I KNEW HOW TO OPEN IT.
I WAS CAUGHT
THE SAME WAY MYSELF.
GOURNEY-MARTIN SHOWED ME
HOW TO GET FREE.
OUTSIDE
OF GOURNEY-MARTIN,
YOU'RE THE ONLY MAN
IN THE WORLD
THAT KNOWS HOW
TO OPEN THAT SAFE.
HMM.
WHERE WERE YOU
WHEN IT WAS ROBBED?
I DON'T KNOW.
WHEN WAS IT ROBBED?
LAST THAN
HALF AN HOUR AGO.
OH. LET ME SEE.
WHERE THE DEV-
OH, I REMEMBER.
I REMEMBER WHERE I WAS.
I WAS RIDING
A PINK OCTOPUS
IN A BAD HAILSTORM.
WHAT?
IN MY DREAMS.
I WAS ASLEEP
AND DREAMING.
OH, THEN YOU WERE
IN BED ALL NIGHT.
I WAS.
YOU HAVE NO WAY OF
PROVING THAT, HAVE YOU?
NO, MY DEAR SIR.
I'M A BACHELOR.
WELL, NOW WE'LL
FIND OUT THE TRUTH.
SONIA, WERE YOU
ON DUTY LAST NIGHT
AS PER INSTRUCTIONS?
YES.
IS SHE
A POLICE AGENT?
SHE CERTAINLY IS. NOW,
YOU HEARD HIS GRACE SAY
THAT HE SPENT
THE NIGHT
IN HIS OWN ROOM.
IS THAT THE TRUTH?
NO.
NO, I DIDN'T THINK
IT WAS.
NOW, TELL US EXACTLY WHERE
HE DID SPEND THE NIGHT.
HE SPENT IT WITH ME.
WITH YOU?
YOU TOLD ME
TO WATCH HIM.
YES, I KNOW.
HE CAME TO MY ROOM
LAST NIGHT
WITH CHAMPAGNE
AND SUPPER.
HOW LONG
DID HE STAY?
ALL NIGHT.
EATING ALL THE TIME?
OH, NO-TALKING.
WE TALKED
TILL MORNING,
AND THEN I HEARD
SOMEONE SCREAMING
THAT HE'D BEEN
ROBBED,
AND WE RAN OUT
INTO THE HALL.
AND WHERE DID HE GO?
I SAW HIM GO
INTO HIS OWN ROOM,
AND I STOOD THERE IN THE
HALL FOR A FEW MINUTES
UNTIL A POLICEMAN
CAME UP THE STAIRS,
AND THEN I WENT
INTO MY OWN ROOM,
AND THE MAN KNOCKED
AT HIS DOOR.
I SEE. YOU'RE IN LOVE
WITH HIM.
YOU TAKE MY PAY,
MY PROMISES OF FREEDOM,
BUT YOU'RE LIKE
ALL CROOKS.
YOU CAN'T PLAY SQUARE.
YOU'RE LIKE ALL THE REST OF
THEM. YOU'VE FALLEN FOR HIM.
JUST BECAUSE I WOULDN'T LIE ABOUT HIM?
OH, SONIA,
WHY ARE YOU SO EASY?
YOUR FREEDOM
FOR A FEW CHEAP KISSES.
WHY, HE'LL
PASS YOU UP-
WELL,
THAT CONCERNS ME!
NOW, JUST A MINUTE,
GUERCHARD.
THAT CONCERNS ME, TOO,
A LITTLE.
YOU SEE, THE COUNTESS KRISHNOV
AND MYSELF-
COUNTESS KRISHNOV?
HA HA HA!
SAY, THAT'S
A GOOD ONE.
SHE'S
SOPHIE KRELBERG,
A SWINDLER-
A CONVICTED
SWINDLER.
A SWINDLER?
CONVICTED?
EXACTLY. I THOUGHT
THAT WOULD GET YOU.
YOU MEAN
SHE'S BEEN IN PRISON?
YEAH. WHAT HAVE YOU
GOT TO SAY TO THAT?
NOTHING MUCH...
EXCEPT I THINK
SHE'S QUITE THE MOST
ADORABLE SWINDLER...
I'VE EVER MET.
2 1/2 YEARS
IN A STONE CELL
WON'T HELP
HER LOOKS ANY.
21/2 YEARS?
YEAH, EXACTLY.
SHE'S OUT ON PAROLE
TO DO THIS LITTLE
JOB FOR ME,
AND IF SHE FAILS,
BACK SHE GOES.
WELL, SONIA,
I'M GOING TO GIVE
YOU ANOTHER CHANCE.
WHERE WAS THIS MAN
LAST NIGHT?
WITH ME.
OH, I'LL STOP
THIS LYING.
ODILLE!
YES, SIR?
TAKE THIS WOMAN
BACK TO PRISON.
YES, SIR.
AND SEE THAT SHE HAS
THE NICE, COZY
LITTLE CELL
THAT SHE HAD BEFORE.
YES, SIR.
WELL, SONIA?
GO ON, DON'T BE SILLY.
TELL THEM THE TRUTH.
HE WAS WITH ME
ALL NIGHT.
YOU KNOW SHE'S LYING
TO PROTECT ME, DON'T YOU?
HA HA! OF COURSE
SHE'S LYING,
BUT SWILL TELL
THE TRUTH,
AND WHEN SHE DOES,
YOU'LL BE ON YOUR
WAY TO PRISON,
MR. ARSENE LUPIN.
WHAT'S THAT?
"GUERCHARD-UNLESS MY MEN ARE
RELEASED BY NOON TOMORROW,
"YOU'LL BE DISGRACED
FOREVER.
"UNDER YOUR NOSE,
I'LL STEAL THE MONA LISA
OUT OF THE LOUVRE."
AND IT'S SIGNED
"ARSENE LUPIN."
OF COURSE
I'M ARSENE LUPIN!
I'M OUT IN THE GARDEN
THROWING ROCKS
AT MYSELF.
GET OUT AND FIND THE MAN
THAT THREW THAT STONE!
I'LL ATTEND TO YOU
WHEN I COME BACK.
IT'S OUTSIDE
THAT WINDOW.
COME ON.
SURROUND THE HOUSE.
SEARCH EVERY INCH
OF THE GROUNDS.
IS THAT ALL?
YOU KNOW WHAT TO DO.
GO AND DO IT.
LEAVE IT TO ME. I HAVE
A WAY WITH THE WOMEN.
NOW, WE'VE GOT THIS
ALL STRAIGHT.
ON THE FIRST WHISTLE,
YOU AND YOUR CROWD MOVE.
I UNDERSTAND.
ON THE SECOND,
IT'S YOU.
I START
ON THE THIRD WHISTLE.
FINE. COME IN.
HELLO.
OH, HELLO, LAURENT.
WELL, GENTLEMEN,
GO TO IT. GOOD LUCK.
WHAT DID YOU
FIND OUT?
THEY HAVE EVERY
DOOR AND WINDOW GUARDED,
AND TWO POLICEMEN ARE
WATCHING THE MONA LISA.
THEY ARE, EH?
IT WILL TAKE
MORE THAN THAT
TO KEEP THAT LADY FROM
STEPPING OUT THIS EVENING.
AH...
SIT DOWN A MINUTE.
MARVELOUS.
I CAN'T BELIEVE IT.
YOU LIKE IT?
IS IT REALLY
ALL RIGHT?
YOU LOOK LIKE ME, BUT
YOU DON'T TALK LIKE ME.
WELL, YOU SILLY OLD GOAT,
WHEN I'M AS OLD AS YOU,
I WILL TALK LIKE YOU.
HA HA HA!
COME A LITTLE CLOSER,
LADIES AND GENTLEMEN.
THIS IS THE MOST FAMOUS
PAINTING IN THE WORLD.
IT IS THE MOST VALUABLE
PAINTING IN THE LOUVRE.
ARTISTS HAVE TRAVELED
THOUSANDS OF MILES
TO SEE IT,
AND AFTER
HAVING SEEN IT,
THEY FELT THEMSELVES
FULLY COMPENSATED.
OH, I'VE BEEN
LOOKING FOR YOU
EVERYWHERE,
MR. GUERCHARD.
WELL, WHAT'S
THE MATTER, LAURENT?
I WANTED TO GIVE YOU
YOUR FLOWER.
OH, THANK YOU.
THERE'S A BIG CROWD HERE
TODAY, ISN'T THERE?
TOO BIG.
WE DON'T OFTEN SEE YOU
HERE, MR. GUERCHARD.
GO AWAY.
THIS IS THE FAMOUS
MONA LISA,
PAINTED BY DA VINCI
IN 1501.
IT TOOK THE ARTIST 4 YEARS
TO PAINT THE SMILING LADY,
AND NOBODY KNOWS WHAT
SHE'S SMILING AT OR WHY.
OH, SHE'S PERFECT-
PERFECT.
SHE'D MAKE
THE MOST WONDERFUL WIFE-
SMILES ALL THE TIME
AND NEVER TALKS.
HA HA HA!
HELLO.
WELL, CAN YOU BLOW
THAT GREAT BIG WHISTLE?
CUTE. HAVE HIM
DO IT AGAIN.
BLOW YOUR WHISTLE,
CHARLES.
LAURENT! GO TO IT.
STAY WITH HIM. DON'T
LEAVE HIM FOR A MINUTE.
ALL RIGHT.
BLOW IT AGAIN.
FIRE! FIRE!
FIRE! FIRE!
FIRE!
FIRE! FIRE!
WHAT'S THE MATTER,
MR. GUERCHARD?
IS THE PLACE ON FIRE?
DON'T BOTHER ME,
LAURENT. DON'T BOTHER ME.
COME ON.
STAY BACK, PLEASE.
STAY BACK!
HEY, COME ON.
STAY BACK!
GET THOSE GATES CLOSED.
NO ONE'S TO LEAVE THE BUILDING,
YOU UNDERSTAND?
FIRE! FIRE!
FIRE! FIRE!
FIRE!
WHAT DOES THAT MEAN?
IT MEANS
I'VE FAILED.
THAT'S A FAKE
PLANTED THERE
TO TRAP
ARSENE LUPIN.
NOT THE REAL
MONA LISA?
NO. THE FIRE WAS
A FAKE.
THE CROWD WAS
A FAKE.
THEY WERE ALL
HIS MEN.
I GAVE HIM EVERY CHANCE IN THE WORLD
TO TAKE IT.
WHERE IS
THE REAL PICTURE?
OH, THAT'S SAFE ENOUGH, THANK HEAVEN.
THAT'S OVER THERE
IN THE VAULT.
HE NEVER IN THE WORLD WOULD...
THE VAULT'S OPEN.
WHY, IT'S GONE!
CAN'T YOU SEE
IT'S GONE?
HE'S GOT IT,
BUT HE CAN'T GET AWAY WITH IT.
I'LL SEARCH EVERYONE
IN THIS PLACE
DOWN TO THEIR HIDE!
NOTHING HERE, SIR.
ALL RIGHT,
TAKE HIM OUT.
COME ON.
SEE THAT HE GETS OUT OF THE BUILDING.
OH, MR. GUERCHARD,
MR. GUERCHARD!
COME ON,
GET BACK IN LINE.
OH, SEARCH ME NOW, SIR,
AND LET ME GO.
YOU KNOW I WAS WITH YOU
ALL THE TIME.
ALL RIGHT,
SEARCH HIM.
HE'S GOT
NOTHING, SIR.
TAKE HIM OUT.
OH, THANK YOU, SIR.
COME ON,
COME ON.
HEY,
WAIT A MINUTE!
WHAT ARE YOU IN SUCH A HURRY ABOUT?
THAT'S MY LUNCH, SIR.
OH, PLEASE
LET ME GO, SIR.
YOU KNOW I HAVEN'T
GOT ANYTHING.
HERE YOU ARE.
GET OUT!
TAKE HIM OUT, AND IF HE TRIES
TO GET BACK AGAIN, KILL HIM.
OH, THANK YOU, SIR.
THANK YOU.
NO. COME ON.
OH, PLEASE.
ALL RIGHT.
HURRY IT UP.
THANKS.
ALL RIGHT.
SO YOU GOT AWAY,
LAURENT.
YES, THANKS.
HA HA HA!
WHAT ARE YOU DOING IN HERE?
WHAT ARE YOU
DOING IN HERE, HUH?
LET ME GO!
MR. GUERCHARD! MR.
GUERCHARD! MR. GUERCHARD!
I JUST FINALLY LET
THAT OLD FELLOW OUT,
AND I FOUND THIS MAN
IN THE-
I UNDERSTAND!
THAT WAS LUPIN.
HEY!
STOP THAT FLOWER SELLER
THERE!
OH...
COME ON, FOLLOW ME
IN HERE.
OH, ALL RIGHT. OH!
GIDDY-UP!
LET HIM ALONE.
I'VE SEEN YOU
RIDING AROUND
THE STREETS OF PARIS
FOR THE LAST 15 YEARS SOUND ASLEEP
AND THE HORSE TAKING YOU ON YOUR ROUNDS.
OH, YOU MUST
BE MISTAKEN, SIR.
I'M NOT MISTAKEN.
THERE'S ONLY ONE WAY
LUPIN COULD HAVE GOT TO
LOOK SO MUCH LIKE YOU,
AND THAT'S WITH YOUR
HELP. NOW, WHERE IS HE?
I- I DON'T KNOW.
I DON'T KNOW WHAT
YOU'RE TALKING ABOUT.
IF YOU WON'T TALK,
YOUR HORSE WILL.
DROP THOSE REINS.
GIVE HIM HIS HEAD.
I WAS SENT TO BRING YOU WITH ME RIGHT
AWAY, MISS. YOUR FATHER'S BEEN HURT.
HURT? IS HE
BADLY HURT?
NO, MISS,
JUST VERY SLIGHTLY,
BUT HE WANTS YOU
RIGHT AWAY.
HE SAID YOU WERE
TO COME ALONG WITH ME.
WAIT. I'LL GET
MY THINGS.
I'VE GOT IT!
I GOT IT RIGHT UNDER GUERCHARD'S NOSE.
LOOK! THERE SHE IS,
WRAPPED AROUND MY UMBRELLA
BUT STILL SMILING.
WHY, IT DOESN'T SEEM
TO AMUSE YOU.
I'M NOT AMUSED.
I'M AFRAID.
WHAT FOR?
PRISON.
OH, DARLING,
DON'T BE SILLY.
THEY'LL NEVER TAKE YOU BACK THERE.
NOT FOR ME-
FOR YOU.
FOR ME?
LISTEN, YOU'VE NEVER
BEEN IN PRISON. I HAVE.
YOU DON'T KNOW
WHAT IT WILL DO TO YOU.
YOU'LL COME OUT
WHIPPED AND BROKEN.
OH, I LOVE YOU
SO MUCH.
IF YOU LOVE ME,
DON'T LET ME SEE
THAT PRISON LOOK
ON YOUR FACE.
I COULDN'T BEAR IT FOR YOU.
I COULDN'T BEAR IT.
ALL RIGHT, LADY.
I'LL BUY
YOUR VIOLETS.
YOU MEAN
NO MORE STEALING?
NO MORE DISHONESTY?
IF I HAVE YOU,
THERE'S NOTHING LEFT
WORTH STEALING.
AND YOU'LL
SEND THIS BACK?
I CAN'T DO THAT.
YOU SEE, UH...
THIS MEANS THE SAFETY OF 6 OF MY FRIENDS
WHO ARE IN PRISON
ON ACCOUNT OF ME.
I'M TRADING THIS
FOR THEIR FREEDOM.
THAT'S WHY
I STOLE IT.
COME ON, DARLING.
LET'S GO.
WE'LL BE OUT OF PARIS IN AN HOUR.
WHAT IS IT?
GUERCHARD. COME ON.
IT'S TOO LATE.
THEY'RE ALL AROUND US.
NOW, LISTEN.
NO MATTER WHAT I DO
OR WHAT I SAY,
DON'T TALK.
DON'T SAY ANYTHING.
I'VE GOT TO MAKE GUERCHARD BELIEVE THIS.
HERE, TAKE THAT KEY.
KISS ME.
NOW, REMEMBER-
DON'T SAY ANYTHING.
YOU LITTLE RAT!
ARE YOU
SATISFIED NOW?
I LOVED YOU.
I TRUSTED YOU!
YOU LITTLE LIAR!
YOU POLICE SPY!
TRAITOR! TAKE THESE HANDCUFFS OFF ME!
SO YOU GOT HIM,
SOPHIE.
YOU CAME TO YOUR SENSES
AT LAST.
THAT'S A GOOD GIRL.
I'M PROUD OF YOU.
HAS HE CONFESSED? HAS
HE ADMITTED EVERYTHING?
WELL-
WHAT MORE CONFESSION DO YOU
WANT THAN THAT, YOU LITTLE...
I'M ARSENE LUPIN.
NO, YOU'RE THE QUEEN
OF RUMANIA.
WELL, SOPHIE, HAVE YOU GOT TMONA LISA?
YOU'VE GOT ME
HANDCUFFED.
THAT MEANS SONIA GOES FREE,
IS THAT RIGHT?
YES. SHE'S DONE
HER JOB.
NOW, LISTEN, GUERCHARD,
I'M THE ONLY PERSON
IN THE WORLD
THAT KNOWS WHERE
THAT PICTURE IS.
NOW, LET'S
DO BUSINESS.
I'LL TRADE YOU
FOR THE PICTURE FIRST,
AND I'LL TRADE YOU FOR
MY FREEDOM AFTER THAT.
I WON'T TRADE
WITH YOU.
I WON'T DEAL
WITH YOU.
I'LL FIND
THAT PICTURE
IF I HAVE TO TEAR
THIS PLACE DOWN
STONE BY STONE.
DO YOU
UNDERSTAND THAT?
ALL RIGHT,
ALL RIGHT.
NO USE BREAKING
MY UMBRELLA.
YOU'RE CAUGHT, AND YOU'RE
GOING TO STAY CAUGHT.
YEAH, YOU'VE GOT ME,
BUT YOU'VE LOST
THE PRIDE OF FRANCE-
THE MOST FAMOUS PICTURE
IN THE WORLD-
AND YOU'LL BE
DISMISSED IN DISGRACE.
I WON'T TRADE
WITH YOU.
ALL RIGHT, EXPLAIN
TO THE PEOPLE OF FRANCE
JUST HOW YOU LET THAT PICTURE
SLIP THROUGH YOUR FINGERS.
THEN YOU TELL THEM
WHERE IT IS.
HOW MUCH
DO YOU WANT?
HOW MUCH MONEY HAVE I GOT TO GIVE YOU?
I DON'T WANT ANY MONEY.
I WANT MY MEN.
GIVE ME BACK MY FRIENDS.
TURN THEM OUT.
AND IF I DO?
YOU'LL GET
THE PICTURE.
ALL RIGHT.
AS LONG AS I'VE GOT
YOU AND THE PICTURE,
WHAT DO I CARE ABOUT
SCUM LIKE THAT?
I'VE GOT YOUR WORD
ON THIS, GUERCHARD?
YOU HAVE.
THEY'RE FREE.
NOW, WHERE'S
THE PICTURE?
YOU KNOW, THAT'S WHY
I DIDN'T WANT YOU
TO BREAK
MY UMBRELLA.
HA HA! "DON'T BREAK
MY UMBRELLA," HUH?
HOLIE!
WHAT'S THIS?
WELL?
THE GIRL'S
ACROSS THE BORDER.
THEY'RE TALKING ABOUT
YOUR DAUGHTER, GUERCHARD.
MY DAUGHTER'S
AT HOME.
YOUR DAUGHTER'S
BEEN KIDNAPPED.
SHE'S OUT OF THE COUNTRY
ACROSS THE BORDER.
YOU KNOW WHY THEY SEND
GIRLS OUT OF THE COUNTRY-
YOUNG, PRETTY
17-YEAR-OLD GIRLS?
AH, YOU'RE TRYING
TO FRIGHTEN ME.
I HAVE FRIGHTENED YOU.
LIAR.
HELLO.
UH, PASSY-1612.
HELLO, ROSE. ER, UH,
IS MY DAUGHTER THERE?
I WANT TO SPEAK TO HER.
WHAT?!
ARGH! YOU RAT!
YOU SLIMY-
THAT WON'T GET
YOUR DAUGHTER BACK.
I'LL GET HER BACK!
ALIVE OR DEAD?
NOW, IT'S
PERFECTLY SIMPLE
FOR YOU TO BLOW
THAT WHISTLE.
THIS WHOLE HOUSE IS
SURROUNDED BY YOUR MEN.
BUT IF YOU DO,
IT MIGHT MAKE MY MEN
TOO ANGRY TO CARE WHAT
HAPPENED TO YOUR DAUGHTER.
BUT YOU CAN
BUY HER BACK.
THINK WHAT MIGHT HAPPEN
TO HER WHERE SHE'S GOING.
YOU'D DO THAT
TO AN INNOCENT CHILD?
IF YOU SEND ME
TO PRISON.
SHE'S GOT EVERYTHING IN
THE WORLD TO LIVE FOR.
CHARMERACE,
YOU CAN'T DO THAT.
I'M FIGHTING
FOR MY LIFE!
I'LL USE
ANY WEAPON
I CAN LAY
MY HAND ON.
PLAY FAIR, CHARMERACE.
I HAVE.
SO HAVE YOU UP TO NOW,
BUT THIS-
THE DUKE OF CHARMERACE
DESCENDING
TO A BARGAIN LIKE THIS.
THEN SET ME FREE.
I'LL HELP YOU.
I'LL ASK CLEMENCY FOR YOU.
I'LL DO EVERYTHING
I CAN FOR YOU,
BUT SET YOU FREE?
I CAN'T DO THAT.
YOU KNOW
I CAN'T DO THAT!
GIVE HER BACK TO ME,
CHARMERACE.
SHE'S ALL I'VE GOT
IN THE WORLD.
WHY, I-I'VE
TAKEN CARE OF HER
EVER SINCE
SHE WAS A BABY.
I'VE DONE EVERYTHING
FOR HER.
I TAUGHT HER TO WALK.
I... I WANTED HER TO WALK
STRAIGHT AND BE HAPPY.
GIVE HER BACK TO ME.
THEN TAKE THESE OFF.
ALL RIGHT.
SONIA,
GIVE ME THE KEY.
I WON'T DO IT.
CHARMERACE,
I WON'T DO IT!
IT'S MY JOB.
I'M NO CROOK!
I'M ON THE LEVEL.
I WON'T DO IT.
NOT EVEN
FOR YOUR DAUGHTER?
NOT FOR ANYBODY
IN THE WORLD.
I'VE GOT A JOB TO DO,
AND I'M GOING TO DO IT.
YOU KNOW, THERE
OUGHT TO BE A LAW
AGAINST FOOLS
LIKE YOU.
YOU MAKE FOOLS
LIKE ME
A LITTLE ASHAMED.
HA HA HA!
ALL RIGHT...
SEND HER IN.
DAD, ARE YOU
ALL RIGHT?
WELL, IT ALMOST WORKED.
OH, I KNEW IT.
YOU'RE
A MUCH BETTER THIEF
THAN YOU ARE A LIAR.
I THOUGHT I WAS GOING
PRETTY GOOD.
I'M SORRY, CHARMERACE. I'VE
GOT TO TAKE YOU WITH ME.
I KNOW.
AS FOR YOU, SOPHIE,
THERE'S A FRENCH LINER
LEAVING AT NOON TOMORROW
FOR AMERICA.
TAKE IT.
COME ON,
CHARMERACE.
YOU KNOW,
I'M AWFULLY LUCKY.
IF THEY'D CAUGHT ME
JUST ONE WEEK AGO...
I'D NEVER HAVE
KNOWN YOU.
COME ON.
CAN'T YOU SMILE
AT A GUY?
SO WHAT DID YOU DO
WITH GOURNEY-MARTIN'S
JEWELS?
I HID THEM IN THE
MATTRESS OF HIS OWN BED.
SO WHERE DID YOU
GET MY SHOES?
YOU REMEMBER THAT OLD CLOTHES DEALER
CAME TO YOUR HOUSE A
COUPLE OF WEEKS AGO?
THAT WAS ME.
YOU DON'T LIMP.
I DO IN YOUR SHOES.
HUH?
I LOST A MAN
AT THAT BRIDGE ONCE.
HE DIVED OVER
WITH HIS HANDCUFFS ON
AND GOT AWAY.
WHAT DID YOU DO?
OH, I JUMPED
OUT OF THE CAR
AND FIRED
5 SHOTS AT HIM,
BUT I MISSED HIM.
I'M A BAD SHOT.
CAN YOU SWIM?
AND HOW.
THAT LAST SHOT
GOT HIM, SIR.
YEAH.
I FIRED 4 SHOTS
AT HIM.
HE SCREAMED AND FELL
IN THE WATER.
THAT'S THE END
OF HIM.
THAT'S FINE,
GUERCHARD.
YOU'LL BE
A PUBLIC HERO.
IT'S A GOOD TIME
TO QUIT.
MY RESIGNATION.
I FEEL
THAT I'VE FAILED.
BUT HOW? HERE IS
TMONA LISA.
LUPIN IS DEAD.
I KNOW, BUT I PROMISED
TO BRING HIM TO JUSTICE,
AND I DIDN'T.
GUERCHARD,
YOU CAN HAVE
ANYTHING IN THE DEPARTMENT YOU LIKE.
I'D LIKE A REST.
I'D LIKE TO STAY HOME
WITH MY DAUGHTER.
I'M A LITTLE TIRED.
THIS IS VERY LOVELY.
IT IS NICE.
BEAUTIFUL.
MAY I SHOW YOU
SOMETHING?
NO, THANKS. I'LL
PICK OUT WHAT I WANT.
AHEM.
YOU, UH...
HAVEN'T ANY SOLID GOLD
HANDCUFFS, HAVE YOU?
GOLD HANDCUFFS?
WELL, THAT'S
NEAR ENOUGH.
WE'LL TAKE IT.
WOULDN'T
OLD GUERCHARD
LOVE TO SEE ME
BUYIJEWELRY?
The following story is fictional.
All resemblance to reality is mere coincidence.
A nation conceived in freedom...
and based on the equality of men.
Abraham Lincoln.
What the South has always wanted...
is that the Union, according to its creation...
and the original organization of your government,
be directed with purity and truth.
General Robert Lee.
It's time to go.
The parade will start.
They are waiting for us.
Sv, it's true. The parade.
I was dreaming.
Dreaming of when we were in Chattanooga.
ΏRecordαis?
Curious, I dreamed with the same!
It is not time to soar!
Today we will march... to March!
Some stopped doing it.
We are six!
Those damn Yankees!
The next year...
Maybe we are five.
Or four.
Or three!
Maybe none!
Maybe...
Then you will forget...
Do not forget! Never forget!
We will leave our graves to record it.
Walking...
The whole city will be watching us!
It is the only dva of the year that belongs to us!
"In our archives..." figure that we received your letter...
11th June... and our delivery order... dates from June 17.
I gave the order myself... to send you a copy... today, by urgent service.
"If by some inconvenience..."
You must write on the line, not below.
I think I'll never make it, Mr.
Hale.
I will teach you.
Next time, recover it.
Thank you very much. I will do it.
"If by some inconvenience,
I would not have received it in mid-July..."
Cancel the class!
I tell him to cancel it!
Can I ask you why?
You must ignore that today is the Commemoration.
What?
For the dead confederates.
In the North, we call it
Dva de los condecorados.
Well, you and the other
Yankees llámenlo as you want!
But in the South it is memorial dva.
And in this school it's a part-time party!
It is clear that Mr. Hale... he also needs some instruction!
The class is canceled!
Stop!
- Are you going to continue?
- I can not help it.
When I think of Hale's face, when Buxton told him he needed instruction...
I can not avoid the laughter!
The one who believes himself to be a superior being!
It will have come down to earth.
It was not funny! I could have said it in private.
You must feel it for him...
Sv, I'm sorry.
If I was in love with him, I would feel it too.
You're jealous because you do not pay attention!
Not as much as Joe...
What will he say if he finds out?
Dirva the same as me:
Take care of your affairs.
- What do I serve?
- A cherry juice.
And to you?
A malted chocolate with a very fresh egg...
I'll ask my hens...
- Hurry.
- Me too.
If you want to see the parade, I leave at 2...
Thanks, but I have an appointment.
Are you still angry?
You know what happens to me right away.
In addition, it is true that I am in love with him.
He is so handsome...
You also like it...
Sv, it's true.
But he ignores me.
I always think that he is going to stop at my desk, as it does with you.
And that we will have a romance...
Between teacher and student, as one reads in magazines.
But nothing ever happens.
It always passes by.
And I'm reading my magazines.
Asv is life!
Well sv.
It's 20 cents, little one.
My name is Mary Clay.
- I do not have 20 cents!
- What's the matter?
I forgot my toilet in the institute.
Could I go find him before my appointment?
- It's 1 and 45.
- And the appointment with Joe?
At 2, next to the statue of General Lee.
Go, I pay for the drinks.
What an adorable creature!
If you were not so stubborn, we would not walk.
We are...
Like when we carried the drums!
And we have more breath!
Well, asv! Asv is!
- Ώ Proud of mv?
- Always.
The applause could turn into boos.
Jamαs. They love you too much.
We'll see...
The only thing we will see is you as a senator.
Do not talk so loud.
- Griffin comes behind.
- Griffin does not count.
In polvtica, my dear, everyone counts.
They applaud the Governor more.
- It does not mean anything.
- They are votes in power.
- When you make your speech...
- They will applaud him even more.
We'll see.
Remember that it is a Mountford.
His father was a judge.
Your grandfather, general.
His name is part of the history of the South.
And you are called Griffin.
They do not know him yet.
Making a name takes time.
I do not need a prestigious family to endorse me.
I need something... that makes them forget immediately everything that he has done.
Something, but very important!
Something that makes me succeed.
Something spectacular!
Professor Buxton!
Why did he come back?
I forgot my toiletry bag and without it, I feel naked.
If you prefer stairs, better for mv.
And we pray once more.
So that prejudice and hatred... be buried in this holy land.
May they never rise again... to contribute to death and destruction.
Governor, let me congratulate you.
Only you, a figure from the past, can talk about him.
Thank you, Mr. Griffin.
The more I know my coetains,
I expect a return from the past to the present.
TO THE SOLDIERS OF
THE CONFEDERATION
- Who are you looking for?
- To a student.
- There's no girl left.
- I wanted to make sure.
Any problem?
Find a student.
You should know that it is memorial.
It's closed. It's holiday.
- What a novelty!
- I just wanted to help him.
If I need help, I'll ask for it!
I will kill her! Leave me to mv!
Adiσs, Tump.
Good evening, Mr. Hale.
- Is my wife?
- Sv.
While the South was celebrating...
a sunny memorial dva, in
New York it was snowing...
and in Chicago it rained.
These southerners...
There is an odd smell.
It will be gas.
No, it's cheap perfume...
You are tϊ.
I? It's my hair.
It smells horrible, is not it?
The barber took advantage that I sleep!
I do not know how you have not noticed that smell...
- What's the matter?
- Nothing.
You seem worried.
Is nothing.
A hard dva?
No, I had half a day of partying.
We could have spent the afternoon together.
I heard today, when Buxton humiliated me in public, for not knowing the traditions of the South.
And, like a Pharisee, he told the whole class:
"It is clear that Mr.
Hale needs instruction."
The students laughed.
At that age, girls laugh at everything.
Do not worry.
Why? It's about my job.
Asv, the students will lose my respect.
Where did you go?
What? This afternoon?
I stayed correcting proofs.
Then I went for a walk.
- I saw the parade...
- Really? Me too.
It has been exciting.
Veterans marching, the music, old melodvas that we hear from children...
I still seem to ovrlas.
It's as if a history book became real.
Aplaudv so much, she looked like a certainty.
Sybil, let's go from here.
- Go? Where?
- North, where we are from.
Why?
I could never adapt.
You were recently here.
Enough to know that I was wrong.
There is a barrier between people and me.
An increasingly insurmountable barrier.
- Maybe you put it on...
- Maybe, I do not know.
It's the first time we've saved.
- Only 200 dollars in 6 months.
- It's better than nothing.
Better than living in the misery of New York, without knowing what will happen at the next dva.
At least, we leave all that.
You have suffered with me.
If necessary, do it again.
But let's try to get ahead here.
Let's stay a while.
We will make friends and you will be happy.
I will make you happy.
You can continue to respond to job announcements.
And if you find something, we can go back.
- And if nothing happens...
- If nothing happens?
Being with you is enough for me, whatever happens.
You have a stain.
Good subject for when we make love.
There is a stain.
The barber cut me.
ΏCured?
You do not have spots.
- And then?
- I'll kiss you anyway.
Since the Armistice there is no parade asv.
More people.
Sv, but less fuss.
No injuries, no fights. Nothing.
I racked my brains to write something.
Bill Brock's article is exciting.
Listen.
"The crowd, crazy with emotion", by William Brock.
In person.
Good article.
Necessarily.
It took me years to write it.
If something happens in this city, it will show you... how could you write an excellent article, if I had a subject.
Then you could commit suicide and write your obituary.
Serva interesting.
I do not want to win you by the hand again.
You won't win me, if you were underground.
You look tired... Anything new?
- Any.
- That's what I told the boss.
That nothing will happen in the city tonight.
But he insisted.
And here I am.
And there I go.
Do not get away much.
You never know.
Anyway, I've already written an article.
A forecast of the 24 hours following the parade. It never fails.
Veterans soak their bunions.
Mrs. Jones fights with her husband.
The police arrest her.
Somebody parks his car badly.
The police arrest him.
Game table on Main Street.
The police arrest... and he keeps the pasta.
You should have more respect for the police.
ΏRespect?
I do not respect myself.
- See you later, guys!
- I'm with you.
Not tonight.
I have an appointment with a dream.
ΏQuote with a dream?
I will follow him. Do not be something that happens to you...
Well, this was...
Come outside to see it!
There are better places to sleep than a police car.
Do you believe?
A date with a dream!
Send me the police!
Wake up!
- What's the matter?
- A murder.
- What? Who?
- I do not know!
I did not go!
Cαllate! We'll see...
You were tϊ! You killed her!
You will pay!
MARY CLAY ASSASSINATED
AT THE BUXTON INSTITUTE
BLACK ARRESTED UNDER SUSPECT
It was like a doll.
When I saw it for the first time, it seemed beautiful to me.
Like a doll.
And besides, it was very sweet.
How did they kill her?
It is awful!
To think that she was with us and then she appeared dead!
I will take care of of this investigation.
What's wrong with Redwine, the black one?
- Continue with the same story.
- Have you checked?
- Why not?
- It will not be necessary.
Give me one more hour and I'll confess it.
I do not want violence.
Let us act our way.
Well, no.
Not this time!
It is not just any case, this is important.
A girl has been murdered.
A young woman.
Many people have daughters that age.
They want a culprit.
And I am the person who will find the culprit.
Speak clearly... and high!
If you do not want me to talk about the last two murders,
Do what I say.
- The Clay.
- Pass them.
Wait outside.
The other door!
Ώ Luther Clay?
It's me, and he's Shattuck.
And the other, Ransom Scott Clay.
That's.
Sit down.
We prefer to stay on our feet.
I call them because I need them.
Listen...
Escϊchenos you!
That Redwine guy...
Before getting angry, wait a bit.
For now, we have no evidence.
But I promise you that if it was he who killed his sister,
I'll go to the electric chair, like my name is Griffin.
It's better!
I need some information about your sister.
Age, history, customs.
Friends, enemies.
I need to know everything.
All!
What do you want us to tell you?
It's enough for us... accept your...
She who was like a flower, for all.
When I was a child, and we return from the factory at night, we ovamos... revr, we watch her smile, and now all that is over.
It's dead.
And we only have the memory of the old man, and the broken heart of my mother.
That is all!
I am sorry.
He feels it!
That will not return it!
Speaking is useless!
- Cαlmate.
- Let me talk!
You are not sure if it is the goalkeeper.
Maybe he's right, maybe not.
Better to find out soon.
Because otherwise, with reason or without reason, I will kill him.
Stop!
Asv does not solve anything!
We still do not know if I killed her.
And if he did,
It can not escape.
Bring Joseph Turner, apprentice of the steel factory.
Your address
I'll have about 20 years, brown, blue eyes...
He was Mary Clay's boyfriend, or one of them.
Bring it to the Buxton Institute.
Laneart, take my car.
See you allv.
It will take us a few hours...
Do not you think he rushes to free Redwine?
I'm not going to let go, just dead.
And if he did, what?
I will not succeed at the expense of an unhappy man.
I pretend something better.
Look out the window.
These people want the killer... of Mary Clay is prosecuted and convicted.
They will admire the man who condemns him.
That man would be me!
The dva of the parade told him that, to succeed, I needed something big.
If I'm not mistaken, I found it!
I solve this case or I kill myself.
We go to the Buxton Institute.
Buxton is inside.
Is that all you can tell us?
It's all I know.
All right...
Believe me,
I would have preferred to die than to endure such a tragedy.
For 3 generations, the Buxtons never... we were involved in a scandal.
And my graduates hold high positions... in the bosom of our community.
- Believe me...
- We have Turner.
Tribe it.
I would like to return to my house.
I do not feel well.
A thing asv disturbs anyone, but it will stay until the end of the inspection.
I'm stopped?
We can say that sv.
Just for a few hours.
I get it.
- Joe Turner?
- Sv.
Are you having a date yesterday with Mary Clay at 2?
- Sv.
- She did not go?
What did you do?
Look, I do not...
I asked you what you did.
I stayed waiting a bit.
Then I thought maybe he was still in high school.
The doorman came out...
I have nothing to do!
Follow.
The doorman came out and said it was closed.
He asked me what he wanted.
I replied that I was looking for a student.
He said no one should be there.
That irritated me. I almost pushed him and went in to check it.
- If only I had done it...
- Follow.
A white tvo came out and the doorman told him what was going on.
The white told me there was no one left.
So...
Well, I went to play pool with some friends. Ask them.
How was the target called?
I think his name was Hale.
Mr. Griffin, you mean Robert Hale.
One of the young teachers.
Why did he stay?
I do not know.
Can I go?
At the moment, no.
I want to corroborate your version.
Take it to my office.
I will continue interrogating him.
I told the truth!
Why did he lie?
She was my girlfriend!
He will not imprison me!
You must believe me!
I'm innocent!
- Where are you going?
- To the Institute.
It's closed. It can not be passed.
Nobody can enter or leave.
Retreat.
- Is he a student?
- I'm a teacher.
- Professor?
- Sv. What does he care?
Do not be offended I am a journalist.
Do you know Mary Clay?
Cuéntele...
Of course he knew her.
I'm sorry, I'm in a hurry.
What's so sociable!
It could have been gentler...
Did you know that I was crazy about him?
- ΏLoca? Who?
- Mary Clay.
She was a student of Professor
Hale and crazy about him.
- ΏLoca by Hale?
- Loquvsima!
- And what happened?
- They tried to force me to confess.
But nobody gives
Joe Turner orders.
I told the cabrio:
"I will not get anything out of me.
I'll just talk to the prosecutor."
- Are not you afraid?
- Afraid of what?
I had nothing to hide!
- What happened next?
- I spoke with the prosecutor.
A kind tvo, when you know him well.
I told him what he knows.
- What did you say?
- That's between me and the prosecutor.
You have become famous.
They published your photo in the newspaper.
Remember that I am a key witness.
Tell us the true.
Do you have a date with Mary?
I veve all the dvas!
I was crazy for mv!
Seriously?
Hello, Shack.
Seriously?
I loved her.
Really!
Really!
When I knew I was...
It was like...
The querva! You must believe me!
You have to believe me!
He will not lie to you!
Shack, I feel the same as you at this time!
I loved her! You must believe me!
I believe you, Joe.
Thanks, Shack.
Lev you said you'll catch the killer.
Whoever it was.
Sv, I said that.
When the time comes, recover it.
I remembered it!
We will all remember it!
Do not forget it,
I will thank you, because we know...
How will this end?
I do not think it's either
Buxton, or Redwine, or Turner.
It is someone who fits ahv.
- Is it a tic-tac-toe?
- How did you enter?
I help your butler to win in the races.
- Pretty halo of the girl.
- I'll take it off soon.
- Who's going upstairs?
- Mr. X.
- Give it to me.
- You will know at the time.
- I'll know now. You will tell me tϊ.
- I'm busy.
Are you so busy that you do not want help to complete your painting?
- What do you know?
- I asked before. Who will go there?
- I already told you, Mr. X.
- You're lost, huh?
For the moment, sv.
- And the doorman?
- Tell me what you know.
First, the doorman.
- I think it was not him.
- A jury maybe sv.
That is not enough.
You mean to say that condemning him is not enough.
- It will not give you votes.
- Brock!
- Are not you looking for the truth?
- What do you know?
- I have not finished. And Buxton?
- Circumstantial witness.
Asv cases have been won.
Well this, no. Not with Buxton.
And here, where prestige counts so much.
You have a great instinct of self-preservation.
You are not different.
It is true.
Do you know something or do you just waste my time, as always?
Let's make a Deal. If my forecast is good, I'll have the scoop.
Done deal.
There's a guy named Hale.
- Teach at Buxton.
- Hale?
I've investigated it after Turner named him.
And?
- I was crazy about him.
- Who says it?
A companion. He was too.
And then?
He was still in high school when they killed her.
Adiσs, Sherlock Holmes.
If you need a detective, do not hesitate to call me.
Remember the deal!
What does it say?
Not much. I arrived 8 months ago.
He is married.
27 years. Live at the
Bedford Arms Apartment.
No children or relatives.
It's like a stranger.
An unknown?
And she was crazy about him.
And he was when they killed her.
Mr. X.
Maybe we fill that space, after all.
Please, send an answer.
Signed: Robert Hale.
- Ready?
- Ready, boss.
Aquv has.
I CAN ACCEPT THE EMPLOYMENT
THAT YOU PROPOSE
SEMESTER FINISH
PLEASE SEND ANSWER
- ΏY?
- Perfect!
When you are a great executive,
I will be your secretary.
Do not dream it.
I prefer you as a woman.
You already kissed me asv and they fired you.
It will not happen again.
I feel we will soon leave for Chicago.
Will not you tell Buxton anything?
No, he will not miss me, nor I at the institute.
Less since the crime.
How horrible, is not it? Do you know her?
She was my student.
Was she pretty?
Ώ Guapa? Sv, it was.
Was it the doorman?
Better not talk about that.
I am sorry. I did not realize.
- Let's send it.
- And your breakfast?
- I send it and I'll be right back.
- Wrap it up by phone.
I do not want you to point it out badly.
- Envvalo when going to work.
- I can not wait.
Grab your hat, it's cool.
ΏFresco, in the South?
I miss you.
I'll be right back.
That is Mr. Hale.
- What happens?
- Nothing serious.
The prosecutor wants to question him about Mary Clay.
She was one of his students.
- I do not know anything.
- Voucher.
Give it to the boss. That he does not know anything about the girl.
Was he planning to travel?
- You have no right!
- Of course not.
Mr. Hale!
- I could not remove the stain.
- What's wrong?
In his jacket.
It must be paint or blood.
Voucher. Give it to my wife.
We will take it to you.
We will keep it.
Come on.
- I want my hat.
- Why?
I will notify my wife.
- We accompany him.
- As you say.
Have you returned?
Escϊchame.
- Who are they?
- Do not be scared, they're detectives.
- ΏDetectives?
- The prosecutor wants to interrogate me.
They question those who know
Mary Clay, do not they?
It is true. Just some questions.
Do not worry. I'll be back soon.
Sv, do not worry.
Come back soon.
Very good. Come on.
Quiet.
Are you nervous?
I do not have why.
I hope so.
Are you sure you do not know anything else?
Nothing.
Except that I'm innocent. I have nothing to do with the crime.
That is all. I want a lawyer.
You have the right to a lawyer.
And I, to continue interrogating him.
Lock him up
I want to see my wife!
For now, he can not see anyone.
Tell me to call her.
Call your wife.
What is the number?
Magnolia, 6321.
Magnolia, 6321.
I'm sorry, they do not answer. Come on.
Asv that is only indications.
If you could, will you process it?
- Not sure, no.
- What do they condemn?
Do you want more information?
I have stopped Hale to continue questioning him.
That is all. Adiσs.
Just a moment.
I can give you one more data.
That I do not mix political issues, and that I will not process anyone until I know if he is guilty.
Ok, Colonel.
And I will, Harmon.
I'm sure of it.
At least, tell me to talk to him.
Why can not I talk to you?
He's there, is not he?
Ahv est. Mrs. Hale in person!
- What do they want?
- Data! Photos!
- The wife talks.
- The press influences justice.
If you help us, we will help you.
Smile.
- Her husband...
- What's wrong with my husband?
What's wrong with him? Do not you know?
I only know that they took him this morning to interrogate him... and I have not seen him again.
Someone must tell him.
Your husband is in jail.
In the prison? Why?
- For the murder of Mary Clay.
- Ώ Murder?
Of Mary Clay?
Murder!
Faints! I managed it!
Take care of her.
When you return to sv, you will speak.
- I will sniff.
- Well, we'll all sniff.
This sv that is first:
"Honeymoon".
To think that at that moment they were so happy.
Poor guys. His honeymoon...
It was not long ago.
They make me sad.
Well to mv, no. Dαmela.
It will give me even more grief.
He is arrested on suspicion.
They have no evidence.
- It will not happen at all.
- Do you believe?
Dolly jamαs deceived her.
Dolly knows how she feels.
Cálmese and cuíntemelo everything.
It will be easier to let off steam with a woman.
Did you meet him in New York?
We worked on Wall Street.
It must have been one of those courtships between executives.
And did he seduce her like a tornado?
Robert is a calm person.
We walked together.
We went on an excursion to Coney Island.
Ahv declared to me.
- And they were happy.
- We always were.
- You never argued?
- Never.
Not even the smallest fight since they got married?
It's incredible, dear.
One, recently.
It was because he wanted to leave here.
Jamαs got used to this place.
He always thought that the southerners reject the North, that the civil war is still going on.
Absurd, is not it?
Very absurd.
Do not publish all this.
It's our life. It is private!
Do not worry.
HALE WAS PLANNING TO FLEE!
- It seems that this time is yours.
- Maybe.
There is no doubt, according to what the press says.
The question is to prove it.
Listen, if there is something to prove,
Andy is the right person.
What irritates me is what it says about the South.
Since he thinks that, why does he not return to the North?
Now, go back anywhere!
With the tests you have,
I assure you that it is enough to declare him guilty.
There is no doubt, according to what the press says.
The question is to prove it.
Try it?
That they put me on the jury.
I have enough evidence!
And me.
This case is already resolved.
That tvo is already condemned!
Excuse me, gentlemen.
I'm in a hurry.
If little Andy wins this case, he will be governor.
I finally decided.
There is only one possible conclusion.
I want you to make an accusation against Hale.
Hale accused! Read the news!
Hale accused!
I did not say what the press published.
They lie!
I will not process it for what the press publishes.
I process it because I think he's guilty.
It is impossible.
Robert, no. Lmposible!
You must free it!
The facts speak for themselves.
Acts!
The only thing he has are the lies of the press.
The facts are these.
She was in high school when she was murdered.
He liked Mary Clay.
It is not true.
There was blood on his jacket and he planned to flee.
At least, let me see it.
Clear. I'll let you see it.
Aquv has it. Five minutes!
What good to be together again.
Be in your arms, talk to you, kiss you.
- Even for a few minutes.
- A few minutes, sv...
They only leave that to us. Soon they will take everything away from us.
Do not say that.
They can not leave you here.
They will release you.
Do not cheat.
Soar will not help us!
I will not come out alive.
I know it since the day they brought me here.
- I have no way out.
- There must be!
It would not bother me to die if my death were justified.
But in this case, it is not.
It's stupid.
Live, Robert.
You are innocent!
That does not matter to them.
- We'll try it.
- ΏCσmo?
With a lawyer.
Will we pay with the
200 dollars we save?
Maybe your mother can help us.
Can not.
He has no money for her.
Please, dear, escϊchame.
Do not be pessimistic, for your sake, for ours!
It is not all lost.
Somewhere, there must be someone who can help us.
THE CASE HALE CONMOCIONA
TO THE NATION
FIRST THE PREJUDICES
THE NORTH PRESS WANTS FACTS
MORE PEOPLE IN THE HALE CASE
FIRST THE PREJUDICES
FAMOUS DETECTIVE OF NEW YORK
GO TO INVESTIGATE
Hello Andy. It's your dear Brock.
Do not you know the novelty?
The war has begun!
I returned the civil war!
The Northern press accuses us of prejudice.
What do we do?
We accuse them of the same.
It will be a great event, will not it?
And to you, it will be great!
Send Pindar to investigate the case.
Sv, the famous detective Pindar, able to find a needle in a haystack.
If you have something to hide, skim it quickly.
I do not have anything to hide!
Not Pindar or anyone!
Asv that comes Pindar.
You'll see, that Pindar!
The only thing that will see is that we are cooperative.
You will be able to see and talk to whoever you want!
With the doorman, too?
With the goalkeeper, too.
You've already oved it!
I do not have anything to hide.
- Mrs. Hale?
- Sv.
Pending?
Sv, it's me.
The detective that those of the North keep.
Sv, why?
We just want to see it.
It does not bother you, is it?
Come on, Mrs.
- We follow him?
- Let him sniff a little.
It does not matter what you discover!
We already know how this will end!
- Ahv est, Mr. Buxton.
- Thank you.
Above!
Good dvas, Tump.
This is Colonel
Foster, your lawyer.
ΏAbogado?
I do not have money to pay him!
I'll pay, Tump.
You've been working for me for a long time, and I always help the people who work with me.
I do not know why
I need a lawyer.
I did not do anything!
Nobody accuses you!
But you can do it.
- Who?
- The detective of the North.
- What do you want?
- Release Hale.
- They can accuse you.
- I did not do anything!
The North are smart.
Be careful what you say.
I'll tell him the same thing
I said to Mr. Griffin.
With Griffin, there's no problem.
He and we believe you innocent!
But they do not!
They will want to indict you.
We must improve your version of the facts.
- If you do not want to be electrocuted.
- ΏElectrocuted?
Find out more things!
They will blame you!
The judge will say: "Tump Redwine",
I condemn you to die in the electric chair." no, not that!
I have nothing to do!
If they release Hale, people will not want to wait.
They will catch you, even if you run fast or hide.
That's worse!
I did nothing!
I do not want to die!
I do not want to die! I'm scared!
You do not have to be afraid.
No, if you listen to me well.
The question is...
I have found that the tests are irrelevant.
Any court will reject them.
- Will I be an exception?
- I do not know.
It has to all the public opinion against.
That influences the jury.
Did you get a lawyer?
The court appointed me one.
- How is it?
- I do not seem excited.
I get it.
Do not worry.
I'll get you a good one.
And in the meantime?
Nothing. Do not contradict anyone.
Watch every word and every move you make.
It is not easy.
Sometimes, when they bother me,
I want to...
I know, but test yourself.
It is now when they are prosecuting him.
Good, care for me, step by step.
When leaving the institute,
He went to the barber.
Ready, sir.
He shaved me beautifully.
- Good barber.
- I have to be.
- It's been many years.
- The store is yours?
For 25 years. Mva and my wife.
She attends the beauty salon.
There must be many clients with this judgment.
For mv it is the same.
I already have my clientele.
Sometimes someone new comes, like you, but it's weird.
We do not see many strangers.
35 cents.
- Aquv has.
- Thank you.
And when he sees an outsider, he remembers it.
I never forget anything.
Names or faces!
Everyone will tell you that
Jim Timberlake never forgets.
Why do you ask?
To talk.
Strange way to engage in conversation.
- Who are you?
- It's Pindar.
The detective of the North.
Here is your picture.
- Do you think you're very smart?
- Do not.
- I just want to know the truth.
- I already told the prosecutor.
- I'm not sure.
- Long from here!
He said he did not remember... whether he shaved or not to
Hale the dva of the parade.
And he just told me he never forgets!
- Is he calling me a liar?
- No, nothing like that.
But maybe you forgot to remember!
Out of here!
Just a moment.
It is not easy to be involved in a crime, but know that your testimony can condemn a man,
Maybe he's innocent.
- Tell the truth.
- I said the truth!
Go and do not come back!
Voucher.
Do you know where the
Clay family lives?
I'll tell you, since nobody does it.
Follow the vvas of the railway and turn right.
The second house passing the factory.
THE DETECTIVE PINDAR IS HIT
THE NORTH ACCUSES VANDALISM
THE SOUTH REJECTS
NORTH INTERFERENCE
THE PREJUDICES CONTINUE FIRST
MICHAEL GLEASON WILL DEFEND HALE
THE PREJUDICES CONTINUE FIRST
MICHAEL GLEASON GOES TO JUDGMENT
MOTHER OF HALE GOES TO JUDGMENT
If you find the one who aporreσ
To Pindar, thank him.
Just what we needed to close the case!
The atmosphere is heating up.
Everyone comes to the trial.
Do you know why?
Because a new star will enter the scene.
Michael Gleason!
He comes to defend Hale.
It will arrive tomorrow.
A crowd will meet you at the station!
Me, in your place, facing Gleason, go home to review my law books.
Have not you slept at all?
It's the second night that he does not sleep.
I could not.
You should see a doctor.
Flodden! Flodden!
We are approaching Flodden!
Down here?
- Will it stay long?
- I do not know.
Do not miss the trial.
It will be exciting.
I will not miss it.
They say it will be the judgment of the century.
Where will you stay?
I'll go look for it.
Thank you, but I will be with my daughter-in-law.
What a coincidence! Me too.
I can not stand my daughter-in-law, but I was not going to miss such an event.
We have arrived in Flodden!
- Mamα!
- Sybil, dear!
We have talked a lot.
We have become great friends.
I told him he should take advantage and go to trial.
There is no doubt that Hale is guilty and will be executed.
Please no!
Please! It's Hale's mother.
How could I know?
Come on, dear.
Aquv play hard.
That's nothing.
Already see within a few dvas.
What happened at the station reflects what happens in the city.
We have to put an end to it.
I'm not interested in people's bad mood, but my duty to her.
There has been a crime.
People expect justice to be done.
We only point out that his duty does not mean... that instigates people.
They are boiling.
We do not want disturbances.
We are sitting on a barrel of pσlvora.
What can I do?
Make sure he is guilty.
I swear by my reputation that he is guilty.
My honor is not enough?
That is not relevant.
We are worried about what will happen to this city.
Do they refer to their properties?
Well, I'll tell you frankly what I think.
They should have thought about that, before your newspapers published those headlines.
Before knowing if Hale was guilty or not.
You, Mr. Wimple, the great banker, the public opinion creator, have thought better before declaring... that in his opinion,
Hale was guilty.
And you too, Mr. Piggot, the great marshal of the city.
Before saying that if I do not solve the case, you will find the man who did it.
I am that man, I have solved it.
They should have thought about that, but they did not.
Now they are afraid.
It's great for you.
But to mv, no.
You started this, but I'll finish it!
At 9 o'clock, I would process
Hale for the murder of Mary Clay.
And nothing and nobody can stop me!
His setrorva.
Members of the jury.
In my capacity as district attorney,
I affirm that it is not about prejudice or persecution.
The accused is innocent until convicted.
The fact that it is under arrest, or that he has been accused by a grand jury,
It should not influence.
He still has the right, like any person, to be considered innocent, until you,
They are sure of their guilt beyond all doubt.
What does it mean...
"beyond all doubt"?
It is not about the doubt that one will give to a friend.
The truth is not always deduced from an absolute certainty.
For a certainty resulting from tests, direct or circumstantial,
It will be enough to condemn him.
I will explain what is a circumstantial test.
The difference between direct and circumstantial is this.
In direct evidence, the witness testifies to what he saw, and you, as a jury, draw their own conclusions.
Remember that the law stipulates that both tests work.
For example,
They accuse a man of murder and a witness says:
"I saw him kill her."
That is a direct proof.
But another one only saw the shadows of the murder,
I heard a scream or a shot, and then steps, and it witnesses what he saw and heard.
That is a circumstantial test.
Consider now, the crime that the State wants to clarify.
That crime, or rather, that alleged crime,
It was on April 26 of this year, dva that, as you know,
It is commemorative.
Eyewitnesses will prove to us... that Mary Clay went to the institute that day.
We will prove... that after the class was canceled, she and her friend,
Imogene Mayfield, went to a bar, on Main Street.
At a quarter to two, he returned to the institute, to find your vanity case
An eyewitness...
Professor Buxton, he saw her enter. Another witness, a friend, Joe Turner,
He went to see if he was there.
Redwine and the defendant told him no one should be there, that Mary Clay was not there.
That was a lie!
Because, in reality, she was in high school.
Sv! Mary Clay has already been murdered!
The State asserts that nobody saw Mary Clay leave alive!
And that dva, when she came back to the desert institute,
He was waiting for her to kill her!
My son, no! Lmposible!
It's a defense trick to win the jury.
The objection to the accusation is absurd.
They have rehearsed it.
Cheap, disloyal tactics!
You must go, mamα.
You have to see them ahv, in front of the jury.
Lying, looking for compassion.
I suffer enough at home.
What good is it that these strangers see me suffer?
He must help punish the man who killed his daughter.
Mr. Griffin will send you a car.
You must go, mamα! You must do it!
Miss Mayfield, this morning...
He declared that Mary Clay was crazy about Hale.
What does it mean?
What it means is... that he liked it!
I get it. He liked.
Did you see the defendant courting Mary Clay?
Did you hear the accused piropear her?
In short, he never saw them together.
He never saw them talking.
And he testified that they were crazy for each other.
That is all!
His setrorva.
Can I ask the witness one more question?
Proceed.
Remember how Mary Clay was dressed that dva?
Did he carry this?
I protest! That type of detail influences the jury.
I present this garment as proof B.
An explosive headline!
Mother against mother!
I will break my heart to everyone!
Griffin showed the clothes and a scream was heard.
It was Mrs. Clay!
But another mother screamed too.
It's not about Gleason against Griffin,
but of one mother against another and of a life.
ΏCuαl serα the decisive testimony?
The one with Carlisle Buxton?
Continue, Mr. Buxton.
Good,
He was alone in his office and it was almost one o'clock.
- What are you doing?
- He said he rangva exams.
It's what Robert said.
I told him to have the afternoon off.
I remember that we had a slight dispute, about the memorial dva.
I thought that as I came from the North,
It's good to see the parade.
Nothing did that cabrón good!
I protest! That statement is totally irrelevant.
They are prejudices with which the prosecutor tries to solve the case.
Given the excessive fuss, the session is suspended until two o'clock.
Sv, sir.
When I arrested him, he trembled like a leaf.
Especially when they brought his bloodstained jacket.
That's it, Mr. Laneart.
Thank you.
Your turn, Mr. Gleason.
In his police career, Mr.
Laneart,
Did you ever stop a man who did not get nervous?
Clear.
Criminals are usually calm when arrested.
So the criminals do not get nervous.
But an innocent...
I protest, your love!
Continue.
That is all.
"That's it," Mr. Gleason said to Mr.
Laneart.
But Mr. Laneart said everything he had to say.
Matalla Gleason will face to the great witness of the accusation.
Joe Turner, Mary Clay's boyfriend.
Joe E. Turner!
Hale said: "It's closed.
Nobody is left."
But I did not like his look.
Then, I wanted to go in to check it.
But he did not let me. He interposed.
He said if it happened, it would make me arrest.
He did not want to have problems with the police.
Asv I went to play pool.
According to your original testimony, Mr. Turner,
Hale told him it was closed, and you left.
Why did not the rest count?
I thought it did not matter.
- And now, sv?
- Now, sv!
Why?
Because in the meantime, you decided that Hale was guilty.
I protest!
Objection accepted!
Agree.
Let's go back to your relationships with Mary Clay.
He said he had been her boyfriend for 4 years.
In all that time, he said he had never kissed her.
I would have kissed her once or twice.
Goodbye kisses.
Is it prohibited?
Answer Did you notice Mary Clay?
Well sv! And what?
Then, before I minted.
No mentv! I am not a liar!
I forgot.
He has forgotten...
Maybe he has forgotten other things.
I protest!
Your relationship with Mary
Clay has nothing to do with it!
They have a lot to see.
He said he was her boyfriend.
He said he had lied and that he had forgotten.
Listen, I answered your question.
What is between us is not your business.
Bravo, Joe! Bravo!
Another disturbance of this kind and I will evict the room.
Continue.
Seeing Hale in my office, he said he had never seen him.
Now he says he went to the barber,
Between 2 and 3 o'clock of the crime date,
Why did he change his mind?
First, I did not recognize it!
After thinking about that and seeing your photos in the newspaper,
- I remembered!
- I get it.
How long does it take to cut the hair and shave?
Half an hour.
Can you tell me if the defendant did better at 2 or 3?
I do not know.
The barberva is mva, I'm not anxious to leave.
If he arrived at 2, he left at 2:30.
How is the barber of the institute?
10 minutes on foot.
One more question, Mr.
Timberlake.
Cortito a Hale when he shaved him?
ΏSv or not?
ΏSv or not?
No, I did not cut it!
THE BARBERO DENIES HAVING CUT IT
GRIFFIN DESTROYS THE
BARBER'S TESTIMONY
THE BARBER FINDS
THE HALE COURTARD
THE DOOR'S TESTIMONY
CLOSES THE MAJAN JUDGMENT
Tump.
He said he had seen Hale twice, when everyone left.
First only, in the classroom, at about one o'clock.
Then, around 3 o'clock, when he was leaving.
Try to remember.
Are you sure you have not seen it between 1 and 3?
I protest! Inductive question!
- Objection accepted.
- I'll say it in another way.
Ask the jury, in his own words, what he saw and heard... between 1 and 3 in the afternoon of the crime.
As I said, I saw him alone in the classroom.
So, I went to the basement.
I stayed asleep for a while.
Sonσ the bell, and I took the elevator to the third floor.
Allv was Mr. Hale and he told me that...
Lie! I did not see him or speak to him!
Lie intentionally!
Control the defendant's starts.
Go ahead, Mr. Griffin.
Continue, Tump. What did he tell him?
I do not remember exactly.
He asked me something about a noise.
I do not remember. I do not remember!
What aspect did he have?
Parecva...
I seemed to be nervous.
I will kill him! Matσ my sister!
I will evict those who do not respect this court.
Continue.
Continue, Tump. Who else saw?
I can not continue.
Follow, Tump.
I tell him I can not.
I do not remember.
Everything that is...
He saw it in the building,
I asked him something and he seemed nervous. That is all.
Just a moment! Thats not all.
- Why did not he say it before?
- It's scary!
He is also afraid now, is not he?
- No?
- Sv.
I'm scared!
- From what?
- Well...
I'm a black man I do not know what I say.
- Not for what I fear.
- Well, I sv!
She is afraid that they know that she was the only person in the building!
It was not me, it was not me!
- I was sleeping!
- All the time?
All the time!
Then, he did not hear the bell, and he did not see Hale.
I talked! ΏSv or not?
Answer, Tump.
He has been speechless.
Let's see, answer this.
If what you say is true,
It will be you who condemns
Robert Hale to die!
Can you leave this room knowing this?
No I can not!
I will not do it!
I do not care what they do to me!
I will not do it!
What I said before was very confusing and does not count.
I will not let a man die because of me.
I do not know what happened in high school.
I was sleeping. I saw no one.
I did not hear anything.
The only thing that I know is that I did not go
I did not go.
I did not go! I did not go!
And the black was retracted of his testimony.
But nobody believes in that!
If he retreated, it was because of fear,
and I think the jury believed the first testimony.
It was the most exciting dva of the trial.
Penalty for the absent.
The outcome is announced very bad for Hale.
Maρana prestaα your last statement.
Before God, I would tell the true story, the whole story.
I do not know anything about what happened in the institute between 1 and 3.
Not even Mary Clay's death.
I will not talk much.
They want this to end soon, and me too. Either way!
Before they pronounce their verdict,
If they have not done it yet,
I want to point out that the question here, is whether or not I am guilty of Mary Clay's death.
And not if the North hates the
South, or the South the North!
Poor imbecile!
He has dug his own grave!
Mr. Gleason, proceed with your final plea.
Members of the jury,
For the first time in my career I have a client, that summed up the case better than me.
It went directly to the center of the question.
He was brave, his valentva does not match the cowardly murderer... who says it's the accusation.
It was not about establishing your innocence or guilt.
The tests were not enough!
Tests!
Since when are the tests consisting of rumors?
And the witnesses presented against Hale?
ΏWhen the word of witnesses is accepted...
What could be the culprits of the crime?
Sv, each of them could be guilty!
Sectors, we all know who are the witnesses against Hale.
The only tests...
They constituted the force of the accusation!
These witnesses are present where injustice reigns.
And their names are hate, fear, and prejudice.
What happens?
Gleason just finished.
He made a very long plea.
He must be tired.
How would you feel if you spoke to a wall?
Allv is Griffin!
Wave your arms! Shouts!
Andy sv who will race in polvtica!
It is not the first time that someone talks about prejudices.
But in general, it is about the accused of atrocious crimes.
Prejudice!
Many North Americans live in our city.
In peace, calm, happy.
Do they talk about prejudices?
No, because they do not hide anything.
Because they are free and honest.
And they know that while they are asv, they will not have problems.
But when a man comes and commits such a mean crime, and unimaginable It is the first... in talking about the hate of the
North for the South and vice versa!
Sectors.
I, who love the South, respect, like everyone, the North.
But I do not admire everything that the North produces.
Nor do I admire everything that the South produces.
It says that all the witnesses could be guilty!
Sectors.
We do not need those witnesses to condemn him!
This is the proof that condemns you and you know it!
Well, I tell you, ladies, fulfill their duty to society, humanity, justice, family of that girl.
Consider the case, remembering that they swore to be impartial.
And they will reach the only possible verdict.
"The members of the jury declared Robert Hale...
Guilty, guilty!"
Do you hear me?
Nothing. The jury has not returned.
Let's keep talking, asv we'll try the lvnea.
It did not surprise me that they cut it.
All controlled.
Dinny is in the other window.
It is impossible to lose him unless he is pushed.
Do not you want me to take a picture from here?
There are thousands of people and it is burning!
But what is incredible is that they are silent!
VOTE GUILTY IF YOU DO NOT WANT TO DIE
If you do not want to die!
No one is going to scare me!
- Where was he?
- In my pocket.
I'm going to vote whatever you want!
Are you going to be the only one to disagree?
I will be the only one to vote what I want.
And not because... You will not dare!
Enough already!
Listen, son.
The important thing is not the case in sv itself, but what people will say about you.
The bravest is not what you think, but tell yourself, without considering the warning:
"I'm brave because I decide this before mv and before God."
"Because I will vote guilty," since someone murdered to that poor girl... and everything indicates that it was Hale...
If you vote innocent, I assure you... that nobody will say that you have more courage... than the rest of us.
They're coming out, Jeff!
They're coming out!
The police force drives people back.
They asked for reinforcements and there is an atmosphere...
You must see the people!
Not a word!
This will explode anytime!
I assure you that they give me chills.
Allα van!
To the courthouse!
Soon everything will be over!
Members of the jury, have they reached a verdict?
Sv, your setrorva.
The jury finds the defendant guilty of murder.
They have already condemned him!
What else do you want?
What else do you want?
HALE SENTENCED TO
DIE ON OCTOBER 3
THE SUPREME COURT REJECTS APPEAL
THE LUCK OF HALE IN
THE GOVERNOR'S HANDS
The governor takes time to decide.
If he helps, he will see them with us.
Be careful, there are soldiers.
Better that they take care of us!
Go show.
Once I told you that the applause...
They could become boos.
It has reason.
Do you know what they expect?
Let the decision you make be fair.
Nothing of that.
They expect me to do what Griffin did.
Condemn Hale to die.
And if you do not?
Finish my career and start Griffin's.
Do you think he's guilty?
Telegrams have arrived from all over the pavs, of people of all conditions, who asks me to commute his sentence... until your innocence is proven.
- It's a fair trial.
- You have not answered me.
The Supreme Court said it was not unfair.
And what do you say?
That the Supreme Court had partial information.
They did not witness the trial.
If they had witnessed it, they would surely think like me.
That there was a lack of evidence to condemn him to death.
That if a man deserves to be tried again,
That man is Hale.
Do you know, Thomas?
I'm a little tired of public life.
ΪTϊ, no?
Wilson!
Tell the press to come.
I'm going to make a statement.
What did he say?
He commuted Hale's sentence to life imprisonment!
- Guys, let's go!
- We're not staying?
No, we have something else to do.
Does it fail a lot?
Let's see.
We must be about 30 miles from the state prison.
We will arrive in an hour.
One more hour...
Why did they get me out of the other prison?
Why did not I see my family?
Cαlmate, Hale.
Good! Answer!
Ten, smoke a cigarette It will do you good.
Open that door.
Come down, Hale!
We have been waiting for you for a long time.
Come on, Hale!
No one is going to commute your sentence now.
Come on, Hale!
Give me a chance!
A work of art, Andy.
Above all, that cefo.
Only the great men frown the ceo.
Napoleon frowns on the cemetery.
Enough of ridicule.
Do you think I can win?
With me and with my newspaper, and with the Hale case, consider yourself senator.
Mrs. Hale.
What happens?
Ahead.
Lucky you both are here.
I received a check from you.
Why?
I heard that he was leaving and needed money.
- It is true.
- It is not true.
He thought that he would have a clear conscience.
Why did not you send me another one?
I will not forgive you for so little!
I'm sorry about what happened.
But you can not blame me for what people did.
My duty was to do what I did.
- It is true.
- Like you!
I am a journalist and I write how I understand it.
How he fulfills his duty.
Try to understand.
The only thing I understand is that they killed my husband.
They will not go unpunished!
I will condemn those responsible!
You are the only responsible!
They at least have a reason.
They loved the girl!
They want revenge,
How I want to do it now!
But let them live, to remind you that it was you who killed him.
They filled the South with prejudice as Gleason filled the North.
Only for ambition!
For a good article!
But everything did not end with his death.
What they did never ends, and will accompany them all their lives even if they want to forget it, even if they succeed and reach far, or become millionaires.
In the depths of their souls they know that it is true!
Andy, some things he said...
Nothing.
Now that everything is over,
I wonder if Hale killed her.
Me too.
Subtitles by Nostromo
Belishner pass
Belisner,next door,child
Pleasant dreams,deary
What do you know about my dreams?
Nought,Mr Roorich,nought
Have another?
You've had 5 since you come in
You know
Here
Here
What's that you say?
Power on,I'm saying
Christ,assured
Unintelligible!
Remember what he cost me?
3 and 6 of thimble full
A Gentleman Joe is
What are you dreaming about?
Talk
Do they talk,your charming patrons
You ever understand what they say in their dreams?
Not a word,Mr Roorich
Their dreams is too pleasant
Have another,it'll make six
Here
5 is 10 shillings 3 shilling and sixpence for a thimbleful! I'll tell you
And you only leave 5 bobs
-Good Evening,Mr Dean
-Good Evening
Mr Jasper was took a little poorly,Sir
Say taken to the Dean
And how was Mr Jasper taken?
-Mr Jasper was that breathed
-Breathless to the Dean,Durdles
It was some sort of a fit it seemed to me
Poor Mr Jasper has been going up to London
 twice a week for treatment,Sir
But he will soothe for that
 it is nothing serious
Indeed I trust not
Jack
Ned
Oh my dear Edwin I didn't
 expect you so soon
Let me take your coat
Aren't your feet wet? Pull your boots off
My dear Uncle I'm dry as a bone
There's slippers in your room
Don't mollycoddle me, I'm 21 you know
But it's hard enough to
You must remember I made a habit of it for 14 years
Would it be mollycoddling you to give you a hot drink
Oh,good old fellow
Up to much to the old days
When you are 34 you won't want to be called old
Don't be silly
You have find my sketch of
 Rosa in a place of honour
Yes,Ned
It's the best drawing you ever made,that's why I put it there
I should be able to catch that capricious expression,I've seen it often enough
I don't find it on her face when
 I go to see her,I leave it there
Come in
Well if it isn't Mrs Tope
Lovelier than ever,give me a kiss because tomorrow is Rosa' birthday
Your Uncle spoiled you, young man,that's what it is
I think you have the right to make ??with anyone
I've a mind to tell Miss Rosa on him
And you engaged to her in your cradle
When two people are engaged ,they are cradles
There are a certain flatness to it
Everything is settled before you begin
You know I almost envy you Jack
Your life hasn't been measured up for you
You envy me?
As you are free and independent, respected as a lay clerk here
And chose your own society, no wife when you want one,
One of the most popular man in Cloisterham
I hate it here
The cramped monotony of my existence grinds me away
 How does our service sound to you?
Beautiful! Quite celestial
It often sounds to me quite devilish.
I am so weary of it all
No wretched monk who ever droned his life away in that gloomy cathedral can have been more tired of it
He could take to carving demons for relief and did
What shall I do?
Must I take to carving them out of my heart
I thought you had so exactly found your niche in life,Jack
They all think so
Rosa think so
When did she say so?
The last time I was here
How did she phrase it?
She said you were made for your vocation
How's she doing with her music?
Need more lessons
She won't be taking many more lessons from you,Jack
I know it
I'm going to Egypt after Christmas, that engineering job is all settled
I might as well marry her
 and take her with me
But she is still a child, she's still in school
She's 18 tomorrow
Does Rosa know about this?
I came down to tell her
-Miss Rosa Bud,please
-Yes,Sir
-You sit in Miss Twinkleton's parlour
-Thank you
-Oh don't Eddy
-Don't what,Rosa?
Coming in nearer
-So absurd
-What's absurd?
To be an engaged orphan
You've given me an affectionate
 welcome,I must say
Well, I will in a minute, Eddy, but I
 can't just yet.A acidulated drop
How do you do,Mr Drood.Very glad indeed
 to have the pleasure.Pray excuse me.
Tweezers.Thank you
-Your birthday present
-Gloves?
How did you guess?
Because you gave me gloves last year and the year before
Don't let's start nagging
Sorry,my fault
Thanks for the gloves
All the girls gave me presents
We had a dance last night
Without any partners? How dull
Chavey girls pretended to be their brothers
It WAS so droll
-Did anybody pretended to be..
-To be you?-Yes
Indeed yes,and I refused to dance with you
-But why?
-Because I was so tired of you
Don't be angry,you were just as tired of me
I trust I disturb no one; but there WAS  paper-knife
Mr Drood is well; though I needn't ask,
 if I may judge from complexion
I have something very important
 to tell you,a decision I've come to
Then let's go for a walk
Has anybody seen my pearl button-holder?
Can we go for a walk,Miss Twinkleton?
You can ,the question should
 have been,may you
You may
Think of all we can see out there
Sphinx,the pyramids, the hot sun
But I don't want to go to Egypt
??moneyed and fanned
But you are 18 if we are going to do it the way
our parents wanted us to we'd better get it over with
I suppose so
Give me a kiss,a quick one
Nobody is looking
Can't,you stick it
You never want to kiss me
-What are you eating?
-Lumps-of-Delight
What's that?
A Turkish sweetmeat, don't
 you know anything?
-Might after eat one
-Sorry that was the last
That's Jack,poor fellow he's
 going to miss us
I don't like it here,do you?
Oh,we had not a very happy walk,have we?
We seem to try one another
I am a young little thing to have an old heartache
But I really,really have sometimes
Don't be angry with me
-I know you have one too
-Shut up
We may be happy yet
You are sticky
Oh,why couldn't I ??????
I am very fond of you and yet
I don't have any more fun walking with you than I do walking with Miss 
Twinkleton and the girls
Now young ladies,remember
eyes sat modestly down,hands crossed, step neatly paced and no indecent exposure
 of the ankles,let us proceed
No staring,no giggling,no laughing and no swishing
Look,Neville,now we can see
 the spires of the cathedral
Such sleepy place it looks
All these changes behind us and no more comfort
I cheated already
Careful with that whip,my man, you know it can cut my face
I know how to handle a whip,Sir
Forgive me
All right,Neville,go back in the vehicle
Now behave yourself
-Your hat,Sir
-Thank you
-Good Morning
-Good Morning
Young ladies,order
A crisis is a test of breeding. 
Remember you're Britains!
Let us proceed
Miss Helena Landless,I presume
I'm Septimus Crisparkle and we are to tutor your brother
How do you do
My brother jumped off the coach
Your brother jumped off the coach?
We had a ?? ???
Well,however he may be,Mr Crisparkle,I am
 glad you have that heathen by you
-Oh,Neville,are you all right?
-Yes,of course
Welcome to Cloisterham,Mr Landless
-I'm Crisparkle
-How do you do
Oh,please Neville
Tomorrow you're my pupil, but
 today you are my guest.
George,send the rest of the rest of the luggage up to my house,this way
You're very kind
My mother is expecting you both to dinner
She's inviting three young
 people to meet you
So you won't think everybody here is edgy
For you,my mother dear
I accept they are the last of the season
They are just the colour of the roses of your cheek
Oh,I do hope the roast didn't overdone
I wished we hadn't come to England
I'd rather be shot than meet them
At least you have the name of our jailer
You don't have to be cooked up in a school with a lot of giggling girls
Being cooked up is detestable
Miss Landless
Yes,Mr Crisparkle
Miss Twinkleton,let me present Miss 
Helena Landless your new pupil
How do you do
And  Mr Neville Landless,my new pupil
How do you do
Miss Bud
This is Miss Landless who is to be your new school mate
How do you do
And her brother
How do you do
You're the one brought in
 the London coach
Yes
From Ceylon I believe bounded on the north side in the Indian Ocean
Bounded on the south by the Indian Ocean
I see you know
How do you do
Oh Miss Landless
Helena,I'm so glad you are room with me,we are going to be such friends
-Thank you,Miss Bud
-No,Rosa
Isn't it an absurd name Rosa Bud
Of course they all call me Rose Bud,
I hate it,you won't,will you?
Never
-Neville
-Yes
Mr Drood,this is my guest and pupil,Mr Neville Landless
How are you,have you been
 in England before?
No
-From Sumatra you said?
-Ceylon
Oh,Ceylon, I'm sorry,where the tea comes from,isn't it?
Will everyone please come to table
-Miss Twinkleton,on my son's right
-Thank you Mrs Crisparkle
And you sit on the second feet on the left
You look very lovely tonight,my dear pupil
Thank you,Mr Jasper
-Mr Neville,you sit next in row with me
-Thank you
-And you sit next to me
-Thank you
Perhaps in going like you in Ceylon 
I think it will be to see the island
It is an island,isn't it?
It is an island
I love your sister,Mr Landless
I'd never jealous of my sister until this minute
Look at Rosa,flirting with him
You think she'll look at me like
 that after she married me?
Is Rosa going to marry you?
Yes,of course,didn't you know?
We've been engaged since we were babies
I hope you both be happy here
You doubt it?
Cloisterham must seems so?? in Ceylon
I had no idea what Ceylon is like
Ceylon is hell
England with people like you
 living in it must be heaven
I want to propose a toast
To the most charming young lady in Cloisterham
On the occasion of her 18th birthday
May she always be cherished as she is now
Rosa
I didn't know she had birthday
?? always inspired me
Listen may I have a word with you
-Alone?
-Now?
On something this..
Well my boy
I've got to tell you,I can't hide things
My sister and I came here telling the quarrel but you'd gone away
Really
Heavens name,what?
We hated everyone who ever had charge of us before so we made up our minds to hate you
Me
I took a knife to my stepfather
That's why we were sent to England
I surprise you,Sir
You unspeakable shock may..
Have you ever seen a man beat your sister?
Why are you telling me all this?
Because you're kind,and I'm grateful to you
And.. I mean do...
Play the game by you
Only
You have to make allowances
 for my violent temper
I wish I'll charge you
-Shall we go in?
-Yes
Just one question,Sir
Please
This Mr Edwin Drood is he? 
Is Miss Bud a relation with his?
No,but they are soon to be married
So that's it
Thank you
Trying???
Rosa is not used to an audience
Miss Landless,will you get her salt
Go quick,Helena,please
You're such a conscientious,Master Jack,
I believe you make her afraid of you
-No wonder
-No wonder
You would be afraid of him too,wouldn't you?
Not on any circumstances
Jack's gone Rosa
I don't think he liked to be charged of being the monster that frightened you
Ten o'clock
Come my dear
A very Good Night to your husbands
But I'm glad you are giving
 so much presents
-Good Night,Gentlemen
-Good Night,thank you for your escort
-Good Night
-Come here,ladies,Miss Landless
How all girls have a pitch of the vapours
The men never no why
You bare lucky to have a sister like Miss Helena
You are luckier being engaged
 to a girl like Miss Rosa
Cloisterham is a hotbed of gossip
Is it bad form,Sir,to refer to an approaching marriage?
Not an ordinary one
Why is yours extraordinary?
We don't cross examining people in England
Heavens,I though it was ridiculous about my name
Ridiculous? You ought to be proud of it
I don't know what people are most
 proud of they ???with strangers
They prefer to call it ridiculous
In England,just on make the rules
 and mind their own business
And in Ceylon,gentlemen use respect
 when speaking of their women
Perhaps you have to go back there, clearly you don't belong here
Ned,Ned,Ned
What's wrong here?
Nothing worth to kick in,Jack
Just a little exhibition of
 Ceylonese manners
Ned
Mr Landless is a stranger here
We are his hosts
I ask for no allowances from you or anyone
Young blood,hot blood
Now come,we should drink a toast to each other in my bachelor gatehouse
Now what can two people who have only just met find a quarrel about?
Obviously nothing
There has been no quarrel
You will be a friend of me,won't you Rosa?
I need a friend
Helena I'm terrified
Mr Jasper?
He haunts my thoughts like a dreadful ghost!
When I am undressed I
I feel as he were looking
 through the wall at me
-No,no,Rosa
-I know it's absurd
But I feel as I was never safe from him
When I play
He never takes his eyes from my hands
And when I sing he never takes his eyes from my lips
Till I see??
-As he was threatening
-Threatening what?
Threatening who?
I don't know
I don't even think or wonder
Does Mr Drood knows how
 this man affects you?
Oh no,no I couldn't tell him,he loves Jasper
Jasper has done everything for him
I'd never told anyone but you
Somehow the glaze comes over his eyes
He seems to wonder away into a frightful
 sort of dream and take me with him
You've been staring at that portrait,Mr Neville
Yes
It scarcely flatters the original
Don't be hard upon it,it was done by Ned
If I known I was in the artist's presence
Just a little sketch of mine,Sir
I am sorry,Mr Drood
Here
If Rosa is a good girl,one of these days I'll do a real portrait of her
One you may approve of
Come.Mr Neville,we'll you drink to Ned?
Mr Neville
Ned
You and I aren't lucky,are we Mr Neville?
It may not be as fine as all that
Maybe we won't hit it off
Hey,Rosa
It might have been better for Mr 
Drood to known some hardships
Yes
And may we know why?
It might have made him more
 sensible of good luck
Have you ever known hardships may I ask?
I have
And was it made you sensible of?
-I told you once before
-You've done nothing of the sort
Then I'll tell your vanity is intolerable
Your conceit is beyond endurance
You talk as if you were some rare and precious prize,you don't deserve
-Ah
-Oh
So that what it is
We,English,don't encourage fellows
 with dark skin to admire our girls
You
Ned
That black
-He meant murder
-No,he dropped the knife
We were both drunk
Mr Crisparkle I
You are not sober,Neville
I'm afraid not,Sir
I've done something terrible
Well?
You see
I admire Miss Rosa,Sir,so very much
I just can't bear her to be treated with conceit or indifference
What did you do?
Drood insulted me
Grossly
I've lost my temper
And
And I drew a knife on him
Neville
What's to be done with you
I love Rosa,Sir
Do you realize what you are saying?
I love her with all my heart
But she and Drood are to be married almost at once
He's not worthy of her
-He talks of her as..
-Neville
You must learn to fight down this sudden infatuation
No good can come of it
Good Night
I'm sorry
All right but
It's no use being sorry if you don't learn to control your temper
Go to your room and try to sleep
-Jasper? Won't you come in
-No thank you,Crisparkle
I've come to return Neville's hat
It's no fault of his that he didn't kill my nephew
He's very repentant
I dread to think what may happen when those two come together again
-Good Night
-Jasper!
We must keep this quarrel tonight as secret
I assure you,I'll be the last to wish it known
He looked wildly at the wall??of
 life and whipped it out???
That young heathen
Left and right,he's snatching around with his knife
He?? on the wall on Mr Jasper's??
And just driving Mr Droods on
Perfectly scandalous man,threw a knife and fork at Mr Drood
Then up with the decanter and threw that at Mr Drood
It seems that Miss Landless brother threw
 a complete dinner set at Mr Drood
A 128 pieces
What will Rosa do?
That's all there was to it
You understand Miss Rosa?
I wanted to be the first to
 tell you about this quarrel
That's kind of you,Mr Landless
I know how you must feel
And how you must blame me
Why only you?
But I lost my temper
Eddie can be too provoking
-He often makes me cross
-I won't let it happen again
Promise?
Yes
I promise
You can apologize,can't you?
Apologize?
You can't ask that of him,Rosa
But think
Unless they make it up we..
We shan't all see each other
Be friends
Of course,I'll apologize
I'll promise you I'll shall
I can't let you go to Egypt remembering
 the worst of me
My poor Neville
She forgave me
Being a particularly angular man, who doesn't fit into the social circle
I'm not used to giving anything away
Least of all a young lady on her wedding
But Mr Grewgious you're Rosa's guardian between now and next week there's any time to find a substitute
If you won't give me away no one else shall
My apprehension is a little dull but that seems to
Settle it
I have now a personal trust to discharge
My dear Miss Rosa
Though I know nothing of the softer side of life
Yet I feel that the wishes of the dead who loved you both
Are worthy of your attention
Your mother
As she lay dying
Took this ring from her finger
Give this,she charged me,to Mr Drood's boy
Tell him to place it on Rosa's finger if you have so truly deeply with all his heart,if not
Command him from the dead to give the ring back to you
I accept the responsibilities,Sir
Oh isn't it beautiful
Did my father give it to her?
On the day they then first plighted their faith
Hard man as I am
I should hate to see such a trust to the living,Rosa
And the dead,your mother
Abused
Bless my Soul
I thank you my dear
The
The honour it almost equal to the pleasure
Good Morning
Oh,Eddie you are a darling
From now on we're brother and sister
Never be husband and wife
-Never
-Of course you're right
I've noted too but I've tried not to admit it to myself
But it's natural we should both feel sorry
But how much better this way
Now we can always like each other
Always
Rosa
Are you interested in Neville Landless?
He's certainly not interested in me
He doesn't call at the school anymore
Don't you know why?
He loves you,and then he thinks we were to be married,don't you see?
Do you really think that's it?
I know it,I quarrelled because he felt I wasn't good enough for you
Well,don't quarrel anymore will you?
Why should we
-And you make it up
-Of course
Your old Jack's arranging a little peace on earth supper for Neville and me
I'm so glad
Rosa
If you love him I wish you both luck
What will the girls say
What will all Cloisterham say next week's wedding called off, what will be the gossip
Poor Jack is going to take this hard
Let's not tell him yet let not spoil his Christmas
All right
One must give the ring back to Mr Grewgious
No I won't I'll keep it a while
Then if you and Neville should come to an understanding
Oh,Eddie for the first time
I very much want to kiss you
Good Evening,Durdles
Whom you've come to bury,Mr Choirmaster
Why don't you remember,Durdles?
You promised me to take me around
 the crypts by moon light
It's a wonder ?? you aren't tired of the cathedral
I am a bit of an antiquary
I have an eye for beauty and a mind to see the spirits at midnight
You bring the spirits and 
Durdles?? your own
I noticed it was a cold night
It's always a cold night to Durdles
We're taped them spirits
Better then you can get in the taproom
Even stronger I'll get my keys
Why,Durdles,you are undermined with pockets
They open the crypts
They open the monuments
And they opens the way to the tower
And they open the cathedral
Mr Choirmaster
These gravestones all mine
You're like a popular ordainer
 surrounded by his works
Come on Durdles
Widdy widdy wen!
Widdy widdy wen!
Here you wait what
 are you doing?
I throw rocks at him
Give me that stone
It's Deputy,I'll give him a penny to stone me home at night
When it's drink it's the only way I can get home at all
Please and now you leave me alone
Away with you now,Durdles has the reason to be out with him tonight
This way Mr Jasper
I gave that boy an object in life
At the??, nor a window,nor a horse,nor a dog,nor a cat,nor a bird,nor a fowl,nor a pig
What that boy has in stone for want of an????
Now he stoned you
Ay,Durdles give him three pence a week
I'm wondering if he has no competitors for the job
He has but he stones them all away
Here we are
Well, that's lime,Mr Jasper
What you call quick-lime
Ay,quick enough to eat your bones
Anything new down here,Durdles
There's ain't no place for novelty
Your always finding more
 ?? as you call them
There was an old one
An archbishop
Durdles find him last Michaelmas
Slides right into coffin with a??
And there he lies
Crock and mitre all
An he gives Durdles a look with his open eyes as much as they say
I've been looking for you for a devil of a long-time
And then he turned into dust
What I dwell upon most is the remarkable ease with which you seem to find where people are buried
It is just so
Durdles will show you
Here they are all???????
You pitch a note when you sing ,don't you?
Right
Just so,so Durdles sounds his notes
Empty
Solid
Still solid
What's in here?
That
Empty
Come on Durdles,you'll freeze here
Durdles no freeze
Where does this lead to?
That's the way to the Tower
Sleepy?
Strongest of the ....
You stay here,I'll find my way to the belfry
Wake up Durdles
Durdles it's past one o'clock
Why didn't you wake me?
I couldn't
We'd better take this with us, come on,let's hurry,it's late
Nothing rises as ever, happen to Durdles before
Widdy widdy wen!
That's him again
-You were watching us
-I wasn't
I was getting home,I got all my money in???
He's been spying on us
Don't hurt the boy,Mr Jasper,
Thank you,Durdles
Good Night
Widdy widdy wen!
Thank you,thank you
Boys,it's best to run home before it starts to rain
We will
Why do have stick?
Walking tool,yes
What does Mr Crisparkle thinking of you going away like this
Just before Christmas time
He knows I'm having a miserable
 struggle with myself
And he thinks that the change will do you good?
Besides
If I am not here all the rest of you can dine cheerfully with him tomorrow
It's time for me to go out
I wish I wasn't going to Jester's dinner for a moment
Maybe a little awkwardness
But you are sure of yourself?
I wish I felt as sure of everything else, as I feel of myself
Strange you speak
-What do you mean?
-I don't know
I only know I don't like it
But I promised her
-Good Night
-Good Night
Are you ill?
What are you doing here?
I came looking for someone
But I ain't found him yet
There is no time to look for anyone
Why don't you go home and get warm
I need 3 and six pence to get home
Give me
Only 3 and 6 pence
-Here you are
-God Bless you,Bless you
What's your Christian name?
Jack,Jack Robinson,why?
Be thankful that it ain't Ned
Why?
It's a bad name just now
How so?
A threatened name,a dangerous name
Threatened men live long
Then Ned is so threatened, he'll live forever
Would you come in?
My company waits bad manners in a host
I'm sorry,you've never been merrier in your life than you was tonight
I've never felt a better spirit
Because you are a peace maker
Wasn't it better???coming in my custody shaking hands
Well I would bet,if I ever did bet that your company will have a gay host tonight
-Good Night see you tomorrow
-Good Night
Let me venture to suggest to the very Rev the Dean
That Cloisterham has never seen such a storm during my incumbency as Mayor
The powers of evil seem to have been abroad last night
Crisparkle
Crisparkle
Crisparkle
Yes,yes,Sir
Crisparkle,where is my nephew?
How should I know?
But he he left my house last
 night with Neville Landless
Mr Sapsea,my nephew is missing
Calm yourself my dear,Sir
No one has ever stayed missing since I was Mayor
Beg you pardon,Sir,is Mr Landless that dark,foreign looking young gentleman
-Yes
-Ay,I've seen him
Across the bridge to the high road,eh
When he whispered ??sounds,bundle he had
Was he alone?
He's run away
Nonsense,he's gone on a walking tour
Are you a pack of thieves?
I won't surrender
-He is here,Your Honour
-Bring him in
Bring him in
Neville
I demand a meaning of all this
It's blood on his stick
I was attacked by these men for no openly reason
He had it with him last night in my house
In Heavens Name what does this mean then?
That was I want to know
Silence,let us proceed in order
As for the blood,your Worship
We preached him an ??? and
 he gave us as good as he got
There,the blood explained and everything else will be
Neville
Mr Landless,where is Edwin?
Edwin?
Isn't he at home?
What have you done with Ned?
When did you last see him,my boy
We went down to the river to watch the storm
-Yes?
-Yes
We said goodnight at
 a fork on the road
Which way did Edwin go?
The one that bears to his Uncle's
Why did you run away?
I didn't run away,why should I run away?
What are you trying to insinuate against my brother?
Let us proceed in order
Now,Sir,why did you leave Cloisterham in
 a wind like this for a walking tour
An excellent question,Mr Sapsea
Why did you?
I wanted to see the country
-Very suspicious
-May I?
-Ask him a question ,Your Honour?
-Quite
Mr Neville,in my presence a few nights ago did you or did you not rise a knife against Ned?
I did
A knife
Mmmm... most un-English!
But last night we made up our quarrel,we parted friends
What was your quarrel about?
That I shan't tell you
The case has a dark look
I have a mind to get out a warrant and commit him to jail under grave suspicions
You can't get out a warrant without evidence but I will hold myself responsible to produce Mr Landless if required
Why should Ned have disappeared
Is it likely he returned to the
 river alone and was drowned
We will search the river
You will leave this ?? to help us find Edwin,Mr Landless
Gladly
Mr Jasper is out of his mind with distress
Miss Bud is right
In my distracted state of mind
I have been hasty
Mr Neville must have an opportunity to prove his innocence
At least he can show us the spot where he
Parted from my poor boy last night
Let us go
Come Neville
Thank you for your trust in me
I understand why you went away,Helena told me
For the same reason I'll spare no effort to find the man you love
There he is
All right as soon as we get them hot drink in we'll push on again
He could take us to the right spot if he would
If you ask him perhaps he'll stay for something to eat
Neville
-Come to the fire you're wet and cold
-I don't mind that
There's nothing else to mind
As long as you believe in me
We all believe in you
Except Mr Jasper
Rosa,what did you think happened?
I daren't think
That's why we got to go on searching him
I found something
What is it,Crisparkle
Look what we found
Ned,his
He's dead
My boy is dead
Who is it?
I can't see anyone
It's Mr Grewgious,????,Sir
Let him come in
This is strange news
Strange and fearful news
How is Miss Rosa?
You imagine her condition
Have you seen his sister?
Whose?
The suspected young man
Do you suspect him?
-I can't make up my mind
-Nor I
But you spoke of him as the suspected young man
I thought you had made up your mind
Mr Jasper
I have a communication to make that will surprise you
At least it surprised me
What is it?
I might you guess sooner but it never occurred to me
What is it?
Your nephew was my ward
Although so long betrothed and
 so near to be married
Made up their minds only yesterday
That they were not meant to be husband and wife
Not
They broke their engagement and parted firmly on the evening when you last saw them together
Miss Rosa can I show Mr Jasper out here?
Why? Why did you say I was in
Well,Miss,seeing the other young ladies have all gone to the picnic and you so lonesome like I thought
I have been waiting for sometime to be summoned back to my duty near you
Didn't you forget them
The duty of teaching you music
I have left off that study
Not left off,discontinue
I'm resolved to leave off
Dearest Rosa
Charming Rosa
I do not wish to hear you
We cannot always do as we
 wish without harming others
I do not forget how many windows
 command a view of us
I will not touch you again
Sit down
My beloved
There will be no mighty wonder in your music-master's leaning idly on a sundial
In talking brief
Rosa
Even when my dear Edwin
 was a fiancée to you,I loved you
In the distasteful work of the day or wandering from the paradises and hell into which I rushed carrying your image
I loved you madly
As the ties with me my deer boy been less strong
I might have swept even him from your side
What do you mean?
Judge for yourself whether I shall allow another man to love you
I have devoted myself to discovering Edwin's murderer
I have worked patiently to widen the net around him
It is slowly,winding as I speak
I know Mr Landless is innocent
Circumstantial evidence will accumulate so strong,lady, even against an innocent
 man that it may slay him
So
You're clear enough
Rosa,I give you my fidelity to my dear dead boy
I give you my vengeance,my peace,my despair if only you will give me yourself and in exchange I give you 
Neville Landless life because I love you,I love you,I love you
Never,never
Neville
Oh Neville I'm afraid
-You're trembling
-You're in danger
Who frightened you like this?
Jasper said if I refused his love, he'll send you the gallows
And you came to warn me
To save me,why?
-Why?
-Because I love you
In your??that??
Yes,but tell me
I couldn't speak because Edwin was here
No I mustn't because he doesn't hear
Our engagement was broken
Broken?
I was going to tell you at Christmas
Edwin knew that you and I loved each other,he was going to give you the ring
What ring?
My mother's ring
He took it with him to his death
The death I'm supposed to have caused
Don't say that
Everybody thinks so
But you and I know it isn't true
You and I can't fight the whole world
Why not?
I wouldn't let you share my humiliation
Everywhere I go people whispering behind my back
"There goes the murderer of Edwin Drood"
Oh my dear
Rosa,I'm going away
But that will seem like
 a confession of guilt
Trust me it's for the best
If I go Jasper will have no hold over you
But you'll come back
Not until I've been able to prove to the whole world that I didn't kill Edwin Drood
Mr Sapsea,there's been a miscarriage of justice!
Impossible. I've never left my desk
Mr Mayor,I promised to produce Neville 
Landless,remember he was wanted
I'm therefore bound in honour to inform you he has left my house without
 a word to anyone
When did he leave?
When we went in to call him this
 morning his bed had not been disturbed
It's a confession of his guilt
The Law has permitted a murderer to escape
The Law can do nothing without a corpus delicti
Then you still propose to do nothing?
Do nothing! I shall allow him
??? I shall notify London
I shall bring this fellow Landless back in chains held as a material witness
Most quiet room you'll find Mr Mr
Datchery
Mr Datchery
From the eyes of bishop's palace
 but you'll have a fine view
-Good Morning
-Mrs Tope
That's Mr Jasper
Him with the tragedy
-And it'll be 40 shillings a month
-That's all
Of course you heard how 
Drood was made away with
So many people are constantly making a way with so many other
Depot 20 shilling in advance
Thank you
That's Mr Jasper playing ???
All he has in life is music
And tracking down his nephew's
 murderer,an ?? sworn to death
Are you alone?
Alone deary
Why if you Mr Roorich
Well you show surprise
You kept away a long time
You're in mourning too,why didn't you come for a little bit of comfort
Or did they leave you money so you didn't want no comfort
Hurry will you
Who was that it has died,deary?
A relative
Died of what,???
Death
Short and snappy ??
For want of a little???
Hurry,please
?? all over doesn't it, deary
We ought to have forgetfulnesses,we will
You learned your lesson in London very well
You make a most convincing old gentleman Mr Datchery
I must be convincing
It's my only hope to clear myself
I discovered these in a secret place in his room
I never had much power of deduction but
 these undoubtedly prove Mr Jasper to be
As I have surmised
An addict to some drug
You buy and return where from?
As a straightforward man 
I'm used to plotting
I would suggest that you keep them
Mr Grewgious,you claim that you're cold and dense but you helped and heartened me as only a true friend could
Nonsense I'm a hard man I hate
 to see the wrong man hanged
If he isn't it'll be thanks to you
What do you make of that?
A wax mould
Now if I were imaginative
Which of course I'm not
I'd say that someone have been trying to
 get into some place that he shouldn't
This key must be heavy enough to
To open a tomb
Pleasant dreams,deary
Over and over again
All of it again
All over again
Always in the same way
Always in the same way
Hundred of thousands of times I've done it
It's to be hoped it was pleasant to do
It was
Pleasant to do
So often I'd done it
But when it was really done
It seemed not worth for doing
It was done so soon
So soon
Ned
Ned
Ned
Ned
Oh my boy
My boy
Why didn't you kill me
Why?
Rosa
Rosa
You do anything to get how are you keep talking about,wouldn't you?
Rosa
She's mine
She's mine
No one shall have her but me
What was I doing?
Strangling me you was,you can't go round
 strangling people without paying for it
There's silver
Silver
And you're paying the gentlemen ?????
Quiet
I'll not be shut twice with???
I'll not be shut twice
Edwin Drood
Edwin
Ned
John Jasper
200 pounds
Mr there
Mr Roorich
Are you looking for anybody?
I've come to find Mr Roorich
There is no Mr Roorich
What are you giving me
I've just seen him come in
That was Mr Jasper
He who offers the reward?
The same
Roorich Jasper
Then it's Jasper that I come to see
Has he a calling, good gentleman?
Calling? Yes he was in the Choir
-In the spire?
-In the Cathedral
With a bishop over it
A dean
I'm mighty dean what might be interested to know
Yes
Nothing,deary
If you want to see Mr Jasper now
Here the stairways to his room
You don't want to see Mr Jasper now
No I changed me mind
Help a poor old woman,dear gentleman
Help a poor soul
What's coupled with a grievous cough
It was here in Cloisterham
A young gentleman gave me 3 and 6, I wanted
 the money to lay out on some medicines
What medicines?
Something that makes you forget
It was last Christmas Eve just after dark
Once when I was here before
That young gentleman give me the 3 and 6
An the young gentleman's name was Jack
And I told him it's better than Ned
Because Ned
It's a freaking name
Do you know that
A guinea,a golden guinea
All of them ?? as golden
If you wait in here for 5 minutes
No,no don't hurry me through the public streets it's not my personal dignity, the dignity of my office as mayor
Haven't we'd better send for Mr Jasper
Later,later the representative of the Queen's Authority
Should hear her first
Queen's? Oh,yes,yes,yes of course the Queen's authority
Look
It's shall all be done in order
Let nothing be touched
Mrs Tope no emotions
Tope sum the Coroner
-What's happened here?
-Dead,dead
Who is she?
She came here asking for you
For me?
I don't know her
She said that she knew something
 about Edwin Drood
About Ned?
Ned
My nephew
That explains why she asked for me
-Did she tell you anything?
-No
One thing at a time
Law must determine how this woman died
There's blood on the ??
She was killed,when she came in
She must had a seizure and
 struck her head there
I had myself reached that conclusion
The coroner,Sir
An accident Mr Coroner,I have determined the cause
You'll ascertain the identity of this poor creature
Those ?,please,? you can't come in here
Can't come in here
I'll bet Mr Jasper done her in
Arrest that brat
Widdy widdy wen!
He threw a stone at me
 once,and I punished him
Yes,yes,of course
Come here
Don't you try to attack me
See that six pence
Come now
What made you tell that lie about Mr Jasper
As he tried to choke me once,murder on his face
Why?
Because one night him and 
Durdles come out of the Cathedral
Way down they was in the cellars
Hours and hours
I waited for them and he said I was spying on him
When was this?
I don't know
I know that it occurred before the great storm
-You know Mr Durdles
-Do I know him?
I stole the????
You take me to him now
 and I'll give you one shilling
Come on then
Widdy widdy wen!
You owe me a tuppence
I do not
Who's been saying ???
Hello,who are you?
I've been told that Mr Durdles knows more than the Dean about the fine Norman
 crypts in your cathedral
You are another of them Antiquarians?
Could you take me down in those crypts tonight?
I take any gentleman
 that brings liquor for two
Or even liquor for one
I'll bring it along about 10
Why anyone shall go down amongst the dead ones at night,beats Durdles
Weary that lime Datchery
By your foot
It's gone that's weird
Durdles has not done any work down here since that lime was brought down
Mr Jasper gave me the bottle beforehand
That's for??
Only one of it's kind
Mr Jasper gave me the bottle beforehand
Let's go on
That's were I slipped when 
I showed Mr Jasper around
I had a?? then
Did you sleep long
Long enough to dream
It seems could hear Mr Jaspers footsteps going through them gates
Why shouldn't he?
How could he go through the gates who was locked when Durdles has the only key?
We are in heavenly dreams,tell me
Durdles,tell me is it true that you can tell by the sound of your hammer where dead are buried?
Durdles will show you
Some of them older in them was some ??
Listen
Sorry
Why should some tombs be empty?
???by Richard 3 in the War
 of the Roses,I've heard
Now this is an empty one
Now you listen to the difference in the sound
Sounds the same to me?
It was empty
Durdles told Mr Jasper so
Durdles makes never mistakes
It's fresh plaster
Give me your hammer
That's strike with ??
Go to the Mayor's house,bring 
Mr Sapsea here and Mr Brudles
And Mr Crisparkle tell them to hurry
What's this all about
Tell them I think I found
Edwin Drood
Why are you opening this tomb?
If it contains what I think it does
The murderer of Edwin Drood is found
You know where Neville Landless is?
I do
Then why not produce him and you shall have the reward whether
 you find Edwin Brood or not
But you see Mr Jasper Neville 
Landless did not kill Edwin Drood
This way
-Very strange
-Almost unimaginable
-It's Mr Jasper
-Neville
I found him here,arrest this man
What does this mean you being found here
Look in that tomb
Just a few bones
Quick you must ????
The identification is impossible
I venture to disagree
I gave this ring to Mr Drood
The day he disappeared
Just before his engagement
 to Miss Rosa was broken
You remember Mr Jasper
Landless came back here to get the ring
Durdles and the boy Deputy will be the chief witnesses against the murderer of Edwin Drood
Them footsteps no dream
Them spirits??
The quick-lime,you used it
The tomb empty,you filled it
He's locked it
Arrest that man
Sound the alarm
Ned
What have I done,what have I done
What have I done
So soon
Rosa
The journey is made
Rosa
Mrs Landless
Subtitles by Nostromo
How much farther?
Soon now.
Anyone else living round the old Norman place, besides Miss Lu?
Who?
That woman, the Creole who was with him when he died.
Do you know her?
Hmm.
Anyone else living there?
No people.
There it is.
Here.
Come back for me in two hours, hmm?
Uh-uh.
No more ride for you tonight.
Tomorrow.
But listen...
Oh.
How do you do,
Mr. Crosby?
How are you, Miss Lu?
Are the others here?
Not yet.
Clock's fast.
It stopped when the master died.
You let it remain just that way for 10 years?
Nothing has been changed here.
Everything is just as he left it.
He would've wanted it that way.
Yes, and everything will be the way he wanted it tonight.
We'll read his will in the library at midnight, just 10 years from the time he died.
But that's the end, Miss Lu. A dead man can't stop the clock forever.
There'll be a change from now on.
Yes.
You ought to be glad. It must've been rather lonely here all these years.
I'm never lonely.
I've got my friends.
Friends?
Yes, my friends!
From the other world.
There are always murmurs.
The house is full of murmurs.
They tell me things.
Oh, you believe in spirits, huh?
Well, have they told you that the heirs and I have to stay here all night?
I've prepared for it.
Some of them are coming now.
You've got sharp ears, Miss Lu.
Why, it's not at all involved.
We are second cousins once removed.
Our great aunt Elizabeth was very...
Well, how should I put it, very, uh...
Prolific?
Well, at any rate, she had a large family.
Twenty-nine.
Don't exaggerate, darling.
Thirty.
What are you talking about?
Crocodiles!
Alligators, to you.
Why did old man Norman want to live in this dismal place?
Well, of course, Cyrus was somewhat eccentric.
What you mean is plain cuckoo.
Young man, have you no respect for a dead relative?
None whatever, unless of course he happened to make me his sole heir.
I doubt that.
Cyrus always professed a great weakness for me.
Yeah, you said he was eccentric.
Say!
There it is, just as Mr. Norman put it there 10 years ago.
Exactly as he put it there.
Hello, this envelope has been tampered with.
Both of them.
Somebody must have opened the safe and read the will.
How could they? Nobody knows how to open the safe but you.
Well, I didn't do it.
You aren't suspicioning me, are you, Mr. Crosby?
Well, if anyone tried to change it, he wasted his time.
I made a duplicate of the will, at Mr. Norman's request, and put it in the vault of the
Trust Company in New Orleans.
Someone at the front door.
See who it is.
And mind you, say nothing about this.
Good evening.
So, you're still here.
Hello.
Wait.
Huh?
I know Miss Tilbury, and you,
Miss Cicily, but who are you?
Fred Blythe, one of the family.
You must be the old boy's housekeeper they talk about.
I was very devoted to Mr. Norman, which is more than his family can say.
Really?
I don't think I'm going to like it here.
Shh. Don't say a word.
Are we the first to arrive?
Lawyer Crosby is in the library.
What happened?
Sometimes they get into the machinery.
Sometimes who gets into the machinery, Aunt Sue?
How should I know?
Oh, so it's you,
Miss Tilbury. Cicily.
Evening, Fred.
Hello.
Excuse me.
Hello. Hello, Charlie, nice to see you again.
Thanks, Mr. Crosby.
Same here.
He's pretty, isn't he?
Does he belong to us?
Yes, dear, second cousin twice removed on his father's side.
Hello, Aunt Susan.
Charlie.
This is your cousin Cicily.
I'm so glad.
How do you do?
And here's Fred.
Oh...
Do we have to shake hands?
Oh, come now, boys, whatever the quarrel is between you two...
No quarrel on my side.
No?
Mmm-mmm.
All right, skip it.
When are you going to read the will?
As soon as the others arrive.
What others? Of course, there's Joyce.
Yes, Joyce Norman.
Joyce... Is she the one that draws pictures for the magazines?
Mmm-hmm. The other's
Wally Campbell.
Wally Campbell, the actor?
On the radio?
The original flutterbrain.
Well, maybe I'm going to like this place after all.
Hey!
I'm not really frightened,
I'm just naturally nervous.
Eating in restaurants all the time, up half the night playing Chinese checkers.
Besides, this is my first sea voyage.
You seem like the jolly type,
Clarence. Do you like jokes?
You don't mind if I ramble on, do you?
It kinda keeps my mind off the malaria germs.
Anyway, here's one.
A farmer had a cow, see, but he couldn't afford to feed it alfalfa, so he fed it sawdust.
He saved a lot of money, all right, but he sure wasted plenty of time getting the splinters out of the milk.
Doesn't that just...
Splinters, milk.
Don't you get it?
Hmm. Heard it last year.
Jack Benny Program.
Yes, Cyrus Canby Norman died in that room across the hall, hating all his close relatives.
Well, he certainly didn't hate me.
And if Cyrus turned against any of us, I know where to put the blame.
It was the influence of that...
What is it,
Miss Lu?
Mr. Campbell is here.
Introducing your favorite and mine, Wally Campbell.
May I join the party?
I was invited.
I hear old Uncle Cyrus's ghost is holding bank night.
Oh, I'm sorry, just a pleasantry.
Hello, Mr. Crosby.
Hello, Wally.
This is your cousin,
Miss Susan Tilbury.
I'm charmed. How do you do? He's the actor.
Your cousin,
Cicily Young.
How do you do?
Fred Blythe and Charlie Wilder.
Nice to see you.
Thanks, thanks.
Well, where's the leading lady?
Leading lady?
Young man, did you inherit the streak of insanity that runs in this family?
What was that leading lady crack?
Oh, nothing really, but all this, midnight, the alligators...
I mean, the heirs, and the family lawyer all gathering to hear the reading of the will.
It reminds me of a lot of melodramas and murder mysteries I played in.
It does?
Thanks.
And in every one of those plays, there was a leading lady, young, beautiful, modern, charming...
Would you take this for me, please? Thanks.
Well, I got here.
Oh, I'm terribly sorry to be so late.
Oh, dear Aunt Susan.
And Cicily. Well, this is like old times.
Charlie, they told me you weren't coming.
It's good to see you.
And, Fred.
Hello, honey.
And...
Well, of all people,
Wally Campbell.
Well, don't you remember?
The little girl you took to a high school dance and deserted.
You used to call me the twerp.
The twerp?
Joyce Norman! Say, when did you grow up and get pretty?
Have I kept you waiting?
I'm so sorry.
That's all right, my dear.
Now, shall we proceed?
What a house.
Isn't it?
That's Uncle Cy.
Hello, Uncle Cy.
They tell me he was so crooked that when he died, they had to screw him into the ground.
Shh. Quiet.
Oh, sorry. Here you are, Joyce.
Thank you,
Charlie.
Now as soon as we're all comfortably settled, we'll begin.
Here.
Thanks.
Mr. Norman made his will in two parts.
I will now read the contents of envelope number one.
Oh, tell me. Tell me.
Miss Lu? Miss Lu?
Tell me the name, Master.
The name.
Miss Lu!
What?
What was that noise, like a gong?
It's the warning.
It came just before the master died.
You know, I've been thinking there's no use in my staying here.
After all, I've never inherited anything, except hay fever.
So if nobody objects, I think
I'll swim back to the mainland.
You're going to stay right here...
Yeah, but I can...
I have a million questions to ask you.
Yeah, well, ask her one for me about those seven bells.
They are the spirits.
They mean seven may live.
There are eight people in this room.
One will die before morning.
I feel very faint.
Yeah, well, it's been nice knowing you all but honestly, it's hot in here,
I have to get some air. I...
Now, wait, wait.
Stop all this, Miss Lu.
Do you want to frighten these ladies out of their wits?
There's not much danger of that.
It has happened.
The insane asylums are full of people who've lost their minds through fright.
Oh, may we hear the will, please?
Yes, let's hear it.
I'll bet you two to one that Joyce is the heir.
What's that?
Oh, did I speak out of turn?
What was at the back of your remark?
Oh, why, nothing.
Come on, you know something.
Oh, nothing really.
Well, it's just that in practically every mystery play I've been in, the leading lady turns out to be the heir.
You have the power.
Yes, I... Me?
There are spirits all around you.
Well, could you put some in a glass with little ice?
I need it badly.
Don't you ever stop babbling?
Attention, please.
Usual date and so on.
"I, Cyrus Canby Norman, being of sound mind and body,
"do hereby bequeath all my money, bonds, securities and estate
"under the following provisions.
"Whereas I believe a streak of insanity to be in the family,
"in the event that the heir hereinafter named
"should prove to be of unsound mind,
"or if said heir should become insane
"or should meet death within a month of inheriting,
"then my estate is to be given to the person
"whose name is contained in envelope number two."
Was that his idea or yours?
What's wrong with it?
Well, that will is practically an invitation to commit murder.
Murder?
Certainly.
What's behind that "meeting death or insanity within a month of inheriting"?
That's easily explained.
Mr. Norman was afraid that the shock of inheriting the fortune might prove too much for an unbalanced brain.
And it's also a strong encouragement to the number two heir to do everything possible to unbalance the brain of the number one heir.
Fred, come off. You're talking a lot of nonsense.
Yeah? Murder is committed frequently for less money than old Cyrus left.
That, gentlemen, is precisely the reason why the name of the alternative heir was sealed in this envelope, so that no one should know his identity.
Yeah?
You know who it is, don't you?
Naturally, I drew the will.
"I therefore will that my entire estate be divided equally
"among such descendants of mine of sound mind and body
"who are assembled in my library at midnight
"on the 10th anniversary of my death,
"who bear the surname of Norman."
Norman?
Well, I'm the only one here with that name.
What did I tell you?
I knew it.
It becomes my pleasant duty to proclaim you the sole heiress of the Norman fortune and the new mistress of this old house.
And I sincerely trust that this second envelope shall never be opened.
Thank you.
Oh, it's wonderful,
Joyce, I'm so glad.
Thanks, Charlie.
I congratulate you with all my heart, Joyce.
Well, that's sweet of you, Fred.
It's so unexpected,
I can hardly believe it.
I wish I couldn't believe it.
I'm sorry, Cicily.
You're not a bit sorry.
I know I shouldn't be if I were the heir.
Well, I congratulate you, dear, with definite reservations.
Oh, thanks, darling.
Well...
Well, aren't you going to congratulate me?
Oh, sure. I'll do more than that.
I'll recommend a nice, quiet bombproof cellar to you for the next 30 days.
Thanks.
Here are the keys to the house, Miss Norman.
Oh, well, won't you remain as my housekeeper?
Mr. Norman told me to give this letter to the heir after the will was read.
How did he know you'd be here?
I told him I would be.
It's the first
I've known of it.
Well, what do you suppose...
That's probably about the buried treasure.
Buried treasure!
What are you talking about?
Yeah, well, there's always a buried treasure, isn't there?
You know a pot of gold, or a diamond necklace, or a...
Don't pin me down.
It's very peculiar that you should mention a necklace.
Yeah? Why?
There was one.
See!
Well, did somebody tell you about it?
Now let me think. Oh, it must have been my mother.
The last time you saw your mother, you were three years old.
Yeah, I was just...
I doubt if you'd remember the conversation.
What sort of a necklace was it, Aunt Susan?
Diamonds and emeralds, worth a fortune.
After Cyrus had it made, it was stolen.
Who stole it?
Well, don't look at me.
I just got here.
I've never believed it was stolen.
I always thought Mr. Norman hid it here in this house.
Why would he do that?
Because he was a nut.
There's food in the dining room.
I don't want anything to eat.
Personally, I've changed my plans and I'm leaving.
That's impossible, there are no more trains out until morning, even if you could get to the mainland.
Why can't we get to the mainland?
Because of members of Local Number
2 of the Bayou Canoe Paddlers and Putt Putt Pushers Union won't putt after midnight.
You mean we've got to stay here whether we like it or not?
I arranged it that way and I think you'll all be very comfortable.
So shall we eat, drink and be merry?
For tomorrow, we...
It's on the house.
My house, come on.
Cicily.
I could use a drink.
Yeah, I could, too.
I think I could stiff.
Might as well be a live stiff as a dead stiff.
Since we are all to be prisoners in this terrible house until tomorrow morning,
I suggest that you and I sleep together.
I suggest we all sleep together.
Miss Lu knew we'd have to stay here and...
Oh, Miss Lu.
I don't know much about the house yet, but are there rooms for everyone?
Yes, Miss Norman. The main bedroom, your bedroom, is here.
Mr. Campbell, at the head of the stairs, Lawyer Crosby...
What happened?
They do that when you don't pay your bill. Are you all right?
Yes, of course, but...
Well, how am I?
I'm all right, I always shake this way. Don't...
Well, what in the world's the matter, Miss Lu?
Miss Lu?
Did you have to break one of those old crystal glasses?
I didn't break it.
It was knocked out of my hand.
Come on.
Don't take it so big.
Go ahead.
Keep your shirt on.
I'm just telling you, you keep away from Joyce.
What's the matter? Not afraid of a little healthy competition, are you?
I'm not afraid of anything you've got to offer. I'm just warning you.
Yeah?
What's this all about? I wouldn't know.
Better ask Fred.
Why blame it on me?
Two grown men, it's too absurd.
Fred, I want to talk to Charlie.
Oh?
I'll just be a minute.
Same old Casanova.
Well, I'll be in the dining room, if you need me.
Now, Charlie, once and for all...
Joyce, why do you hate me?
I don't hate you,
Charlie, I...
You were in love with me once.
No.
Yes, you were.
Darling, can't we...
We had this all out a long time ago, Charlie.
Give me another chance, Joyce.
I won't fail you this time,
I swear I won't.
You can forget that girl.
No, it wasn't just that, it was...
We can't thrash it out tonight.
Tomorrow, then.
Tomorrow is better.
Yes, tomorrow is much better.
Here you are, Cicily.
Oh, thank you, Wally.
You know, I've always wanted to be an actress and now, just think of it, some of the same blood that flows through my veins flows through yours.
Yeah, it's gruesome, isn't it?
Let's change the subject.
I may not see you people in the morning,
I have a luncheon engagement in New Orleans.
I have to get up early.
Early? Well, you certainly don't expect to sleep in this terrible house.
Don't big, empty houses scare you?
Not me, I used to be in vaudeville.
Oh...
Here.
Oh, Wally, you give me such a comfortable feeling.
First this old house gave me the creeps.
But with you here,
I don't know what fear is.
That's right, nobody's afraid of an old house except a coward.
Turn out the lights.
What is it?
I don't know.
He's coming toward the house.
Oh, Cicily.
What are you doing?
It's the only way to stop a scream.
Oh, is that so? With me, it's for sneezing.
With me, it's for screaming.
Oh, I didn't...
I got it. Hold it.
Cicily!
She's all right.
She's okay.
We thought we heard some shots.
We thought we did, too. Well, hadn't we better investigate?
Say, maybe you're right.
You may be wrong, though.
Well, I want to go, too.
No, you'd better stay here with Cicily. Come on, Wally.
Oh, no. I'm awfully sorry.
I screamed...
What is it?
Could I talk to you a moment, sir?
Well, come in.
I don't want to alarm you folks, but...
But what?
I'm the head guard over at Fairview.
Fairview?
The insane asylum?
Yes, ma'am. One of our patients got away from us this afternoon.
That's all we needed.
Well, anyway, he'll feel right at home here.
Is he a dangerous maniac?
Yes, ma'am, he's...
He's a killer.
Oh!
How did he escape?
I wish I knew.
We followed him into the bayous, but then we lost him.
But you took a couple of shots at something out in the garden.
I thought I saw him, but the shadows fooled me.
What does the poor fellow look like?
Say, don't waste any sympathy on him, mister.
He'd just as soon rip you wide open as not.
Oh, please, please. There are ladies are present.
Oh, I'm sorry, ma'am.
We're still waiting to hear what he looks like.
Oh. Well, he's about 40, but strong as a tiger.
He has sharp teeth and long fingers and fingernails like claws.
And when he's violent, he crawls around on all fours like a...
Like an animal?
Yes, sir, like a cat.
What some guys won't do for a laugh.
Look!
Scat!
That's a good joke on us, all right.
Yeah, I'll say.
That's better.
Well, I guess
I'll be moving on.
Maybe he isn't even around here.
But if I were you,
I'd stay in the house and be sure that all the outside windows and doors are locked.
I agree with you, locked and nailed. I'll handle that.
Won't we?
I'll be around the neighborhood and let you know if we get the Cat.
The what?
Uh, the Cat. That's what the other inmates call him, but they're all crazy.
Well, good night.
Good night.
Listen, I don't think we better say anything about this to Joyce or Cicily.
That's right, there's no use in frightening them, too.
That's a fatheaded suggestion of yours.
If there's any danger, they ought to know it.
Well, somebody ought to go down and lock the cellar doors and windows, anyhow.
Yeah, well I'm going.
I'm... Don't rush me.
I'm going to ask you all not to tell the girls.
Have I your promise?
Good heavens, do you think I'm the type that can't keep a secret?
It's understood, then?
Hey, what's going on?
What are you all talking about?
Nothing.
Nothing.
Well, I'm going to bed.
Good night, all.
Good night.
If you're going to lock up the cellar, you'd better do it now.
That's right.
Oh, that's right.
Is anything the matter?
No, nothing's the matter.
Except there's a maniac loose in this house and we'll all be murdered in our beds.
That a girl. Hold it right there. Stay there.
Well, where's that cellar?
Oh, say, in case I don't come up in about five minutes, better make it four, or even three, you...
Is there a Brother Elk in the house?
I'm not an Elk, but I used to be a Girl Scout.
Oh, good, then you can start a fire with sticks in case our feet freeze.
Come on.
Well, everything's fine.
Well, don't you people want anything more to eat?
Uh-uh.
What's going on?
Oh!
Why...
You go ahead. I'll be with you in a minute.
Listen, Joyce...
Uh-huh?
You know how it is in a play, when just before the first act is over somebody always comes to the beautiful heroine and tells her that she's in great danger, and sometimes she is?
What are you talking about?
Yeah, I know it sounds kind of silly, but...
Keep your eyes open, baby.
Thanks.
Well...
Say, why don't you go to the library? It's much nicer in there.
The library, nicer?
What are you...
Well... Well, there's a lamp there.
It hasn't got the jitters like these lights.
Can't do more than explode.
Hey! I'm scared.
Aren't you coming?
Did you find out? Can we go through that way?
Uh-huh.
Oh, well...
Well, I'll be seeing you, I hope.
This is the door all right, but it won't open.
The key, honey.
One turn...
Oh.
Here's a switch.
Won't switch.
You want to go first?
Yeah! No, no.
Certainly not. Ladies always go first.
Oh.
Go ahead.
Thanks.
I think it was awful funny what Miss Lu said about the spirits being all around you.
What's funny about it?
Well, I mean, I'm psychic, too. I was in a trance once.
I know, I know. When are you coming out of it?
Just kidding.
It's awful spooky down here.
Do you believe in reincarnation?
Huh?
You know, that dead people come back?
You mean like the Republicans?
Shh, listen.
What's the matter?
That noise.
Well, what kind of a noise?
It sounds like wheels going around.
Shh. Watch that step.
Watch that...
Hey!
Hold my nose.
I'm screaming!
I can't.
Why can't you?
It's got me. It's got my hands. It's got me.
What?
It's got me. I...
Cheese!
You're not hurt?
No, this one here.
Look, look.
Hurry, hurry.
Oh.
My knee.
Oh, you're not hurt. Come on. We've got work to do.
That window's barred.
I like that.
I hear it now.
What? That noise you just heard.
It's in there.
Oh, that's it.
A home electric plant.
They're nothing but trouble.
How come you know?
We had one down on the farm.
I used to fix it so the lights would go out when my boyfriend was calling on me.
Oh, yeah? Did anything happen when the lights went out?
He always went to sleep.
Wally?
Oh, Mr. Crosby.
Hello, Joyce.
You here alone?
I don't want to worry you, but there's something you ought to know.
Well, won't it keep until morning?
Tomorrow may be too late.
You know, Mr. Norman was a very eccentric man, and I've just made a discovery.
I've been going through some old papers of Mr. Norman's and I...
And I've found something which... Well...
It convinced me it would be dangerous for you to be left here alone.
Mr. Crosby, really.
Don't laugh, Joyce. I know what
I'm talking about, believe me.
I'm alarmed.
I want you to take me seriously.
Joyce, you're in danger, great danger.
Thank heaven I can tell you who they...
I've heard so much about ghosts and spirits tonight that I...
I'm getting jittery.
I'd rather not hear...
Mr. Crosby?
Mr. Crosby?
Oh. Where did
Mr. Crosby go?
I haven't seen him, miss.
But he must have passed you in the hall.
I haven't seen anyone.
Wally. Charlie! Aunt Susan! Wally Campbell.
Coming.
Did someone call?
Are you sure Mr. Crosby wasn't in the dining room?
Positive.
And you didn't see him as you came downstairs?
I did not.
What's wrong?
Well, it's unbelievable.
A few moments ago
I was sitting there,
Mr. Crosby was over there talking to me and suddenly he...
He vanished.
Vanished?
But, Joyce, people don't just vanish.
Well, Mr. Crosby did.
I ran to the door and Miss Lu was there.
I swear nobody left this room.
Are you sure he was in here?
Well, of course.
You must've heard him talking to me.
I only heard you, talking to yourself.
Well, I'm afraid the strain of excitement's been too much for you, Joyce.
When a woman starts talking to herself, when she sees people vanish right in front of her...
Oh, good heavens, what am I saying?
You're inferring rather plainly that Joyce is losing her mind.
Really? Oh, dear.
You mean you don't believe me?
Why, certainly we do.
Certainly.
But you do believe Mr. Crosby disappeared in front of me?
Well, if that's my imagination, where's Mr. Crosby?
Well, he's probably out in the garden with Fred.
Come, Cicily, let's go to our room, pile the furniture in front of the door and go to bed.
With a house full of maniacs, what good is the bed?
There must be some explanation.
Look, where was Crosby standing when he disappeared?
Exactly where Wally is now.
Can you still see me?
Wally, do go outside and see if Mr. Crosby's with Fred.
Outside?
I'll go...
Oh, but, don't you think I... I'll go.
Charlie, you look upstairs in Mr. Crosby's room.
All right. We'll find him. Don't worry. Yeah?
"You will open this envelope tonight in my room, where you are to sleep."
That's the room where he died.
Oh, I didn't hear you come in.
The room is ready for you, if you aren't afraid to sleep there.
Unpack my bags, please.
I'll be right in.
Have they found
Mr. Crosby?
Nobody's going to find Mr. Crosby.
The demon in this house has got him.
Don't say such things.
Fred?
Oh, Fred?
Is that you, Fred?
Are you catching cold? Your voice sounds a little hoarse.
Fred?
Oh, it's you.
What do you want?
I was...
Hello. Have you seen Crosby?
No.
When did you come in from the garden?
Who told you
I was out there?
Well, I was just...
Why, everybody.
Everybody was wrong.
What's your game,
Campbell?
My game?
Well, I shoot between 90 and 100.
I used to hook my drives but now I slice my putts.
Have you tried that...
Whatever you're trying to do, keep away from Joyce.
Let her alone, see?
Just let her alone.
I'll put these in the top drawer, miss.
Thank you.
When did Uncle Cyrus give you this?
Ten years ago tonight, just before he died on that bed.
It's no use, miss, trying to keep it to yourself.
Keep what to myself?
The thing that frightened you just before you ran in here.
Oh, that was only my imagination.
It was a warning.
I don't believe in spirits, Miss Lu.
You're afraid.
You're afraid the demon that got
Mr. Crosby is coming after you.
Why, that's absurd.
What is it?
Hello.
Oh, Charlie, what is it?
Well, it's...
Miss Lu, aren't you through in here?
Yes.
Well...
Joyce, you'd better lock your door tonight.
Why?
Oh, just to be on the safe side.
Perhaps I'd better sleep in the library.
Oh. Why should you do that?
In case you need me.
Why should I need you?
I don't know.
You might get nervous or something.
What about? Everyone seems to be acting so strangely,
I'm beginning to think
I'm losing my mind.
Well, anyway, if you want me, call.
Thanks.
Oh, and, Joyce, don't forget your promise to...
See you tomorrow.
Oh.
Don't worry about a thing.
You don't have to lock it, I'm here.
No, I'm rather glad you are here, Wally.
Oh, really?
Yeah, it's nice seeing each other again like this after all these years.
Mmm-hmm.
How you feeling?
Oh, I'm all right.
I'd feel better if they'd find Mr. Crosby.
Wally, tell me, what's going on?
What are you all driving at?
Oh, I don't know.
I don't know.
But whatever it is,
I just want to tell you that I'll protect you.
There isn't anything living that I'm afraid of, hardly.
Oh! It's only the clock.
Oh.
Oh, I thought my time had come.
I'm awfully sorry. I guess this house is getting me.
Now what was I saying? Oh, yes.
I'm not afraid of...
You know I'm lying, don't you?
I'm scared stiff.
But I'm always like that.
I'm always nervous just before I go into action, so scared or not, you're gonna get protected.
You always did fight for me, didn't you, Wally?
Even back there in Wickford.
Remember when you used to carry my books to school?
Yeah, what a racket that was.
Yes, and the time Big
Jim Daley pulled my hair and you flew at him and what a terrible beating...
He gave me.
I'll never forget it.
Seems I always got licked fighting for you.
Well, maybe it was worth it.
Cicily!
Oh, listen, Joyce, if there's a rumpus or anything, don't come out.
You just sit tight and yell like the devil.
Well, what will you do?
Why, I'll...
I'll run and get help.
Don't worry.
I don't worry when you're around, Wally.
Oh, really?
Mmm-hmm.
Thanks. Good night.
Good night.
Good night.
It just makes my heart ache to see her.
I'm afraid she's beginning to break.
Who, Aunt Sue?
Joyce.
All she needs is one more shock.
A remark like that wouldn't sound very well, in case you happened to be the second heir.
If Cyrus hadn't been utterly incompetent,
I'd have been the first heir.
What's that?
Mr. Crosby?
No, sir. This is
Hendricks, from the asylum.
Can I be of any service to you?
I thought you'd gone.
I can't leave, ma'am, till my men come back for me with the boat.
Oh. Well, have you seen Mr. Crosby?
He's the grey-haired gentleman you were talking to a while ago.
No,
I haven't.
He disappeared.
He couldn't have gone far, unless he went swimming.
Would you mind looking about the grounds for him? lt'll be a pleasure, ma'am.
Thank you so much.
Well, if you need me, just call.
My room is right up there.
Thanks, Fred. I guess
I'll be pretty safe tonight with all the men guarding me.
Charlie just told me the same thing.
So he was here.
Leave it to him to get anywhere first.
Shh!
I wouldn't do that if
I were you, beautiful.
Do what?
Entertain any more people in your room tonight.
I won't.
Have you read the letter?
No, I haven't.
Wally, come in here a minute.
"You will open this envelope tonight in my room,
"where you are to sleep."
Don't do it.
Why not?
I don't know. My Aunt Minnie brought me up to always bite half dollars.
Look, Miss Lu says that
Mr. Norman gave this to her.
But how do we know he did?
Maybe Miss Lu is in cahoots with someone who wants to know exactly where he can find you tonight, while you're alone.
But who would that be?
Well, the person whose name is in the envelope that Crosby has.
Whoever it is would become the heir, in case you were out of the way.
Wally, that's a horrible thought.
Yes, it is, isn't it?
I got goose pimples.
Even my goose pimples have goose pimples.
Let's get a gulp of fresh air.
I'll bet there hasn't been any fresh air in this house for a long time.
There. That's better.
Yes.
Oh, you're going to...
I thought I would as long as you're here.
"To my unknown heir, man or woman,
"because I can take no earthly possessions with me
"I am compelled to leave them to you.
"Your hour will come, too."
"In your brief span of life,
"enjoy the glittering symbols of the world, which I now renounce."
Ooh, that gives me the creeps.
Here's a verse. It's a little more cheerful.
"Find the number beneath the vine.
"The sparkling gems will then be thine.
"O love, what number rhymes with mine?"
It's a silly little verse.
Yeah.
Say, Wally, it's the key to the necklace.
Yeah.
"What number rhymes with mine?"
Well, it ain't 10.
Nine. "Beneath the vine."
That must be outdoors in the garden.
Why does he say "o love"?
What does love have to do with it?
Love, affection, Venus, the goddess of love.
Say, is there a statue of Venus around this joint anywhere? I don't know.
Wait.
Look.
The fountain.
Cupid. Sure. Venus' little problem child.
Let's go.
Let me get my jacket.
Wally.
Hmm?
Look.
How funny.
How comforting.
Come on.
Which way?
Up there at the end of the hall.
Shh.
There's someone in
Mr. Crosby's room.
Maybe it's
Mr. Crosby.
What are you doing in there?
Waiting.
What's she waiting for?
Certainly will be glad to get out of this terrible house.
Well, here's love.
The vine. The vine.
Beneath the vine.
Yes, the vine.
Do you suppose we have to dig it up by the roots?
I don't see any number nine.
Look, look, the knobs.
Yeah. Maybe he meant the ninth knob.
Where do they start? I don't know.
One, two, three, four, five...
Six, seven, eight, nine.
Wait a minute. Here's one that's loose.
Now that we got it, what are we going to do with it?
I don't know.
Turn it, pull it.
Nothing happens.
Well, Uncle Cyrus was left-handed.
Would that make any difference? No.
Well, maybe.
No, I guess the old boy was kidding.
It's no good.
Oh, dear.
Hey, look.
Say...
What's the matter?
Something soft.
Here, I'll get it.
No, I... Let me.
Say...
Wow!
I bet there's a catch in this somewhere.
Oh, Wally!
Say, wouldn't it be a good idea to put it back in there where it'll be safe until daylight?
Well, I don't know... No, I think it'll be safer with me.
Come on, let's go.
Isn't it terrific?
Terrific.
Thanks for everything, Wally.
Uh, say, if you're gonna sleep with those pebbles tonight, you'd better take the gun.
You used to be quite a shot with an air rifle.
Remember the time you shot the hole in old Scrooge's silk hat?
I haven't fired a gun since...
Did you know this was empty?
Empty?
How do you like that?
Hey, wait a minute, I was out there all alone.
Never in my...
Oh. I guess I'm beginning to see things.
What is the matter?
I don't know, only...
I guess, I think.
What's that?
Think nothing of it.
Now, what were you saying?
Keep talking.
It wasn't important.
It was only that I think every woman is happier when she has a lot of...
Oh, be careful.
A cat.
Of all the ridiculous things I ever saw in my life.
You with the chair, creeping up to the window.
Wham! And a cat.
Take it easy.
Joyce! Joyce!
Aunt Sue is loose again.
Joyce! Joyce, are you there? Open up.
Yes. In a minute.
Come on.
Wait. My mother brought me up never to be caught twice in the same lady's bedroom.
Joyce!
Joyce, what happened?
Just a minute.
Open the door, Joyce.
Are you all right? Oh, yes, I am all right.
It was so silly.
What?
I wanted to get a breath of fresh air and the window stuck.
I broke it just as I was trying to open it.
Oh, is that all? How did you get the...
But then I got all tangled up in the curtain with the cat.
The cat. Miss Lu, will you please take your cat?
Now I promise to go straight to bed and I won't disturb you any more.
Well, that window is barred, so I guess it's all right.
Good night.
Oh, wait for me, Fred. Good night, dear.
Good night.
Did you say the window stuck?
Yes, it stuck.
Okay.
Wally. Wally!
Come in.
Pretty good, huh?
Ouch!
Riding boots.
I suppose your Aunt Minnie taught you that cute trick.
No, I got that one from her boyfriend.
Oh, I'm sorry.
Well, I guess
I'll run along.
Do you want me to lock the shutters?
No. Just don't make any more noise.
Oh. Well, good night.
The road's clear. Be sure and lock the door after me.
Don't worry,
I will.
Good night, beautiful.
I didn't mean to be cross.
I'm getting so nervous, I could holler.
Would you like something to quiet you? A sleeping powder?
No, thanks. I have one in my bag.
Well, how about letting me have it?
Good night, Wally.
Never mind the powder.
Who wants to sleep?
Open! Please!
Please, Wally!
Joyce, open up.
Open the door.
Haven't you got another key?
It's locked on the inside. What's happened?
We don't know.
She's alive, thank heaven.
Miss Lu, get a little brandy.
Please help! Please, oh, please! Help me! Wally!
What happened, baby?
I don't know. My eyes were closed.
It was a hand! It came from the dark.
I felt it.
For heaven's sake, do try to be coherent!
Well, it touched me!
The necklace.
It's gone.
What necklace?
Well, the necklace.
Wally and I, we found it in the garden.
Hanging from a tree, I suppose.
It's true, we did find it.
But it's gone.
The hand took it.
Hand. What hand?
Oh, I don't know.
Just a hand.
It came out of the wall.
Oh. We'd better send for a doctor.
An alienist would be better.
The poor child's gone stark staring mad.
Shut up.
Every one of you thinks just the same as I do, that Joyce has lost her mind.
But I haven't.
You must believe me.
How can we, Joyce?
After all, when someone starts concocting a story about a hand coming out of a wall...
You can't...
You don't really think that I...
Susan's right.
Every one of you feels exactly as she feels about me, only...
Only they haven't got the courage to say it.
I don't.
I know you don't, Wally.
I've been through enough tonight to drive anyone mad.
But I'm not.
Now listen.
Wally and I found the necklace that Cyrus left me in the garden.
Then he said good night to me and I got ready for bed.
Someone was watching me. I know that now.
Someone who was trying to frighten me.
Then...
Just as I was falling asleep,
I felt somebody in the room.
I opened my eyes, a long claw-like hand came out of the wall!
And it came nearer and nearer to me...
I couldn't move and it touched me.
Very sad.
You'd all like to prove that
Joyce is crazy, wouldn't you?
Because that would give you another chance at old Norman's dough.
That's pretty rotten talk, Wally.
Well, that's the way I feel.
Personally,
I believe Joyce.
You believe that fantastic story?
Haven't you clucks ever heard of secret passageways and panels?
Panels.
Well, how else could the hand that Joyce saw come through the wall?
Let's see this.
It came from right there, Wally.
Well, there's nothing here.
Wait a minute.
This is loose.
Hey, what's this?
Listen, baby, don't be surprised if we discover an old skeleton in here.
Crosby.
He's dead.
What a terrible thing.
Poor Mr. Crosby.
It might just as well have been any one of us.
Can you imagine being in bed with a hand reaching for your throat?
Quiet! Where's Joyce?
Miss Lu and Wally took her into the dining room.
The poor kid. What she's been through.
Isn't anybody going to do something?
Well, if you mean isn't anybody going into that dark passage to argue with a maniac, the answer is no.
You know, I doubt very much that it was a maniac.
Whoever it was in that secret passage acted quite sanely.
That's right.
What would a lunatic want with a necklace?
Don't ask me.
You've got to be loony to answer that question.
Just what's in your mind, Fred?
Well, I...
Wait a minute.
If somebody's trying to drive Joyce out of her mind, it's no impromptu affair.
Well, one of our little family party has called the turn on everything that's happened here tonight.
Uh-huh,
Wally Campbell.
That's a lot of hooey.
Yeah? Don't you remember he wanted to bet you that
Joyce would be the heir?
Yeah.
Well, he was with Joyce when she located the necklace.
But he wasn't with her when it was taken.
And he knew where to find that secret panel in the wall, too.
If you're hinting that Wally
Campbell murdered Mr. Crosby,
I don't believe it!
Neither do I.
Oh, darling, are you better?
Yes, I'm all right but what were you saying?
Go on. I want to hear it.
Well, I was just...
Go ahead, Fred.
I'm just saying, suppose Wally knew that his name was in that second envelope. As the alternate heir?
Well, that's ridiculous. How could he know?
How could anyone?
Someone knew.
Both envelopes had been opened before Lawyer Crosby got here tonight.
Now I know what happened to Crosby.
There must be an entrance to that secret passageway from this room.
What?
Yeah.
Crosby knew the danger Joyce was in, and while he was warning her...
Somebody pulled him in behind the panel and strangled him.
The explanation is so obvious to anyone with an ounce of brains.
You don't have to get insulting about it.
It was a pleasure.
Maybe you and I had better finish this conversation outside.
All right. Fine.
Hey, now. Cut it.
Listen, you gave Wally plenty of reason for any crack he could think of. Now cool off!
A fight won't prove who killed Crosby.
That's the important thing right now.
There's that clock.
It isn't the clock.
Oh.
Five.
Six.
The warning has come again.
Oh.
Nothing can stop it.
Oh.
Last time that gong rang, Mr. Crosby...
All right, take it easy, Cicily.
I'm going to my room.
If Charlie will walk upstairs with me.
Certainly.
And we'll be glad to have you,
Joyce, if you care to join us.
Thanks.
Listen, everybody, until we can notify the police, nobody, under any circumstances, is to go into that room where Mr. Crosby is.
Who wants to?
Whether you want to or not, that's the law.
Meanwhile, I'll try to find Hendricks and send him for the police.
You know this whole thing has a phony ring to me.
A killer who thinks he's a cat.
Have you ever seen a man who looked and acted like a cat?
A woman, yes.
But a man...
Anyway, how do we know a lunatic escaped from an asylum?
Well, the guard,
Hendricks.
Yeah, but how do you know he is a guard?
Just because he wears a cap and a badge?
You can rent them at any costumers.
All right. But why?
To frighten you out of your beautiful wits, baby.
Yes. But why should he?
Why should he?
I don't know.
I wish I knew who that next heir is.
Maybe it's a woman.
Let's see. What women have we?
There's Miss Lu.
Miss Lu, how about her?
She must know a lot about that secret panel.
Why has she lived here all these years if she didn't expect to...
What's the matter?
I'm going into that bedroom and get that envelope out of Crosby's pocket.
The name of the second heir is in that envelope, and the name of the second heir is the name of the murderer.
Oh, if it turns out to be my name, I'm only kidding.
Wally, please don't go in there.
Suppose we've been overheard?
Suppose the murderer knows you're on the right track?
What good would an empty gun be?
But it isn't empty now.
I found the bullets.
Where?
In Miss Lu's room. Here.
You keep it. Well...
Well, legs, let's get going.
Oh, Wally, how can you joke?
I always joke when I'm scared.
I kind of kid myself into being brave.
Ain't that silly?
Uh-huh.
Oh, easy, baby, easy.
I remember a situation almost like this in an old play called The Fatal Hour, or She Should've
Known Better.
At the end of the second act, the leading man takes the heroine in his arms and kisses her.
Then, filled with new courage, he starts out after the villain.
And of course, he comes back in the third act?
Oh, sure.
No, in the third act he's found dead in the bathtub.
Oh, well, that was just a play.
I'll leave the door open.
Say, if anybody comes down, don't let them know what I'm doing.
Wally!
Wally, what is it? Wally!
Somebody please! Wally.
What's happened now?
I don't know.
I don't know. Look, is he badly hurt?
He's got a swell bump.
It's hard to say whether somebody hit him or whether it came from a fall.
What was he doing in here?
He came to get the... To get my jacket.
Charlie?
Hmm?
It's gone.
What?
Crosby's gone.
Oh.
Who could've done such a thing?
The one who killed him.
The law can't convict you of murder if there's no corpse.
Help me up.
Who did it?
I haven't the smokiest idea. I was just...
What became of Crosby?
Are you sure you don't know?
I'm not sure of anything.
Just when I get the whole thing figured out, it goes and gets itself all balled up again.
We saw Crosby fall to the floor, didn't we?
Yes. He was dead, wasn't he?
Yes.
Uh-huh.
Ah-ha!
What is it, Wally, what is it?
How do we know he was dead?
He was, wasn't he?
Well, I suppose he was, but that doesn't prove it.
I couldn't swear he was dead, neither could you.
Could you? What are you getting at?
Maybe the whole thing was only a plant.
Maybe he was faking all the time to frighten you and waiting in there to wallop me.
Oh, no, Wally.
No. You don't think much of that?
No.
Neither do I.
Oh, Charlie, did you find Hendricks?
Yes. He said the police can't reach here until morning.
He's still waiting for his own men.
They're lost somewhere in the bayou.
The telephone.
Either you don't know the nearest telephone is 20 miles away or else you should know more about this thing than is good for you.
Who? Me?
Same place.
Why don't they have a telephone?
People going around here bopping each other on the head, they need a phone.
What is it?
Nothing, I just wanted to make sure you were all right.
Thank you, Charlie.
I can't stand another minute.
Oh, that's just what they're hoping for, honey.
But you can take it. Come on, roll with the punches.
Let's go over here by the fireplace and relax. There.
You know, what this party needs is more drinks and more laughs.
I'll tell you.
I'll bring a bottle of
Scotch from the dining room and we'll sit around here and drink Scotch and make wry faces.
You get it?
Scotch and rye?
Here. I don't need a gun with jokes like that.
Look, you play Jesse James and I'll play, well...
Well, I'll play like I'm getting a bottle of Scotch.
Come on, relax.
All right.
Whoever it is, speak or I'll fire.
Speak or I'll fire.
I knew it. Joyce!
Joyce!
Joyce, look here.
Wally?
Wally, where are you?
Wally?
Wally!
Joyce, I found it, the clue. I...
Joyce.
Joyce!
Joyce!
No, you don't.
One killing is enough.
Bringing guns and scaring women's one thing, murder's something else.
I'm all washed up.
Where's that necklace?
That's all I want out of this.
Joyce!
I wouldn't do that if I were you, Charlie.
Charlie!
Don't move.
You robbed me of my inheritance.
I was the old man's favorite.
I should have been his heir.
I am the next heir.
Stop.
I've waited 10 years for this.
You poisoned old man
Norman's mind against me.
I've always hated you.
And now
I've got you.
Don't come any closer.
Don't take another step.
Joyce! Joyce!
Wally!
Where are you, Joyce?
Joyce, are you all right?
Yeah, she's all right.
Oh, boy. Some fun.
Hold it. Miss Norman, tell me...
Oh, don't ask me questions, boys.
Wally, Mr. Campbell here, is the real hero.
Mr. Campbell, what was the clue you found?
Hold it.
You'll get a better picture of me from a front angle, Rembrandt.
I knew all the time that whoever killed Crosby was the second heir.
And you found the second envelope?
I found it in the coat that was covering Crosby's body in the secret passage.
It was Wilder's coat.
Say, you better get a couple of shots of Miss Norman and me together.
You're liable to need them very soon for your page of social events.
Yeah?
Congratulations.
How did you know... Do you intend to live in your house,
Miss Norman?
No, it's
Miss Lu's now.
I'm giving it to her.
How did you know the
Cat was Charlie Wilder?
Well, I found something earlier in the night on the floor in the hallway.
What, a weapon?
Patience.
You know,
I always suspected that the
Cat was wearing a make-up.
As an actor I've often used sponge rubber in putting on a character make-up.
So, gentlemen, when I found this piece of sponge rubber...
Sponge rubber?
Have you got it?
Let me get a picture of it. Of course, my good man.
Shove off.
There they go.
Why don't we get started?
Bye.
Goodbye, Joyce.
Bye, Wally.
Goodbye. Bye.
Wally. This rubber, it must have fallen out of my coat.
It's the eraser I use when I'm sketching.
What was that?
What did you say?
Oh, that's funny. She says that's the eraser she...
Huh? What?
~~[Orchestra: "San Francisco"]
[Thunderclap]
- [Woman] Dirty Dora again.
- I had it last time.
- Care to join us, Mr. Chan?
- No, thanks. I... gotta walk.
Ah, taking a little stroll? That's the spirit.
Please, l-I'd like my parachute now.
Why, these planes are perfectly safe, Mr. Chan.
And besides, San Francisco reports clear weather ahead.
- How far ahead?
- Oh, a few hours.
- A few hours?
- [Thunderclap]
You're not worried, are you, Mr. Chan?
Oh, no. No.
Most statistics prove that you're safer in a modern plane than in your own bathtub. l- I'd rather be taking a bath.
- Tell me, how old are you? - Twenty-one.
- Twenty-one, eh? - If
I reach my next birthday.
Well, according to my insurance figures... you can expect 45.16 more years of life-
barring, of course, a fatal accident.
Oh-
[Thunderclap]
Hi, Jimmy. Gimme a hand, will ya?
I'm on the last chapter of this yarn.
What would a fella do- a fella like you- if faced with certain death?
Oh. Pop!
Pop, before it's too late, I think there's something you ought to know.
Number two son resemble criminal about to make confession.
I don't know whether I've told you yet or not... but I think you're the swellest pop a fella ever had.
Humble parent thanks unsettled weather for expression of love from favorite offspring.
Oh, but I mean it, Pop. Honest.
Then do not let fair skies tomorrow change restless mind.
Oh, I won't. I'll get right on the train and go back to school.
Appreciate decision. One scholar in family better than two detectives.
Well, Charlie, this'll make a lot of people's hair stand on end.
Don't tell my readers, but the real mystery in this whodunit... is how I ever finished it.
Only diligent workman can survive Hawaiian hospitality.
Yeah, what a vacation. Stella was right.
This trip blew the cobwebs out of my head.
There's one wife in a million, Charlie.
Correction, please. Also have excellent wife in same million.
Wife? After giving you 13 kids, she's an institution.
Sorry, Mr. Gregory. I don't want my manuscript mixed up.
You can buy a copy after publication.
It'll cost you two dollars.
I go to a lending library.
- Friend?
- Pest.
Says he's an insurance actuary.
Had the bungalow next to mine at Waikiki.
And when he wasn't annoying me, he was shooting little birds with a.22.
Strange for man who gambles on life for business to cause death for pastime.
- Oh, can't anybody talk about anything but death?
- Don't worry, Jimmy. It'll soon be over.
- Radiogram for you, Mr. Essex.
- Thanks.
Oh, Pop, l-I feel silly.
Most usual.
Unhappy news sometimes corrects self next day.
What month is Scorpio?
Scorpio? Um, October-
Tomorrow is first day of scorpion symbol in Chinese calendar.
You believe in astrology?
No.
No, this is something else.
Paul, could old friend help relieve distress?
No, thanks, Charlie.
I've gotta send a radio.
Well, I hope that isn't bad news.
- Hope what is not bad news?
- That radiogram he just got.
How did you know Mr. Essex receive message?
Oh, the steward brought it to me by mistake.
- Why, Pop, he's a- - Please.
- This is the only way to travel.
- Imagine- San Francisco already.
- There's the World's Fair, Treasure Island.
- [Man] Where we're gonna land.
[Woman] Oh, it looks like a big wedding cake.
- [Woman #2] What's that big tower out there?
- [Jimmy] The Chinese Pagoda.
- [Man] No, that's the Tower of the Sun.
- It is the Chinese Pagoda.
- The smaller one's the Tower of the Sun. - [Woman] Oh, I see that-
Gee, Pop, I hope Mr. Essex isn't missing any of this.
[Chuckles] Don't miss the view, Mr. Gregory.
- It's the Fair.
- I'll wait and see the one in New York.
You would. I'll take California.
Hey, Mr. Essex, come over on this side... and maybe you can see your wife from here.
Hey, Mr. Essex, wake up.
Paul. Paul?
Pop! Hey, Pop, something's wrong.
Paul.
- He must be sick.
- Take your seats, please. We're landing.
Your seats, please. Something wrong?
- Is he... dead?
- [Steward] Must have been his heart.
- [Man] What's the trouble?
- Go back to your seats, please. We're about to land.
- Please be seated.
- [Woman] I don't know what happened.
L- Look, Pop. The radiogram was on the floor.
"Sign of Scorpio indicates disaster...
"if zodiac obligations ignored.
Unsigned. "
"Zodiac"? Isn't that the chart astrologers use to tell fortunes?
And Scorpio, I believe, is the unfortunate symbol of death.
Not correct, but thank you.
All luggage to be inspected at Customs.
All luggage to be inspected at Customs.
All luggage to be inspected at Customs.
- Say, Pop, have you seen Paul's briefcase?
- No.
- [Woman] Too bad about Mr. Essex.
- It was here a minute ago.
Where's Gregory?
Perhaps will find same holding briefcase in Customs.
Why, I'll take care of him.
Say, Pop, l- I just thought- Paul's wife-
If she's there to meet him, what are you gonna tell her?
Only that which comes from heart.
- [All Chattering]
- [Man] Hi, Ed!
- I don't see Paul yet. - Paul wouldn't be in the line yet-
- Oh, there's Charlie over there. Mr. Chan! - Who? Oh, uh-
Oh, Mr. Chan!
- I'd better go back to Customs and try to find Gregory, Pop.
- Mmm.
Hello, Charlie. It's grand to see you again. Where's Paul?
Oh, uh, you don't know my uncle, Mr. Redley.
- I've heard a lot about you, Mr. Chan.
- Thank you.
Stella, wish tongue could find words to tell you-
What's keeping Paul? Oh, you've no idea how I've missed him this past month.
Impossible to miss someone who will always be in heart.
Why, everybody's gone. I don't see him.
- Where is he,
Charlie? - Stella-
Is that someone from the plane?
Most unhappy accident.
Something's happened to Paul.
Strength of heart not equal to homecoming.
Paul's dead?
Oh, no! Oh, Paul!
I knew there was something wrong. His strange radiogram-
It came last night. We couldn't understand it.
"Can't escape zodiac.
Good-bye, my love. Paul."
May see, please?
We don't know what he meant by that word "zodiac."
Paul certainly didn't believe in astrology.
Think best you take Mrs. Essex home now. Will join you there.
Oh, uh, did he finish the manuscript?
There's a check waiting for it from his publisher.
Please, what is your interest in same?
Why, I handled his business affairs.
- Better to consider Mrs. Essex at this time.
- Yes.
- Cab, sir?
- Uh, thank you. May reserve one, please?
- [Whistle Blows]
- Number eight up!
- Get in.
- Uh, must wait for son.
- That's all right, sir. You can wait in the cab.
- Oh.
Excuse, please. Have no wish to intrude. Wanted private cab.
Never mind what you wanted. Stay put.
And don't try anything funny.
Something very funny in being taken prisoner in broad daylight... in city renowned for hospitality.
You're gonna get plenty of hospitality.
Hope hospitality will have same generous size as shoes of brother policemen.
- [Both Laugh]
- Hey, why'd you go for the rib, huh?
We couldn't put anything over on you, Charlie.
[Men Shouting]
- Some pinch, eh, Charlie?
- How was it?
Recognize your hand in joke, Mr. Kilvaine.
Well, we just couldn't let you slip into town without a welcome, Charlie.
Appreciate most hospitable welcome... but have matter of importance which need attention first.
Oh, don't give me that.
Come on into my office.
It's been a long time since
I've seen you, Charlie.
You and I are gonna have a good old- fashioned chin-fest. How's everything in Honolulu?
- Anybody stealing pineapples?
- What are you horning in for?
- Charlie doesn't want to be interviewed.
- Interview, my eye.
I've known Charlie ever since I started covering the police blotter...
- at the old Powell Street station.
- Police reporter...
- Pete Lewis friend of many years.
- Well, I'm on time.
Oh, it's you. Say, isn't that sign
"private" on my door big enough for you?
Forget it. I told him to meet me here. Fred, I want you-
Don't tell me. Charlie Chan.
I'd know that face anyplace.
Can return compliment. You are magician named Rhadini.
Cannot forget watch you borrow five years ago for trick and return in many pieces.
- [Laughing]
- You're lucky you got it back at all.
Rhadini's improved now,
Charlie. He's a big shot.
Has his own theater
- the Temple of Magic on Treasure Island.
And my paper's backing him in an exposé of fake psychics.
Would you like to see some of my press clippings?
Pete's paper's offering a thousand dollars to any psychic... phony or otherwise, whose stunts I can't duplicate on the stage of my theater.
[Pete] And so far no one's collected
- not even the great Dr. Zodiac.
- Zodiac?
- Yeah, he's the big shot in the spook racket around here.
The only trouble is, he won't fall for our challenge.
- He won't come out in the open where I can get at him.
- Now listen, you two mugs.
If you don't mind, I got Charlie up here for a little private conversation.
He's heard all he wants about black magic.
No, no. Most interesting.
Sometimes black magic very close relative to blackmail.
Now who said anything about blackmail?
Why, don't you get it? Those phony psychics dig up the dirt... hand it over to the customers in a séance, then hold them up.
That might be the reason for those three suicides recently.
Say, they all happened to be clients of Dr. Zodiac.
Yeah, but they're dead. They can't help us prove anything.
And the living ones won't talk because they're afraid...
of rattling the skeletons in the family closets.
[Kilvaine] Ah, you're talking through your hat.
If there was any evidence connecting
Zodiac with those suicides, I'd-
Well, what can I do without evidence?
Uh, very little, perhaps. But will ask coroner to perform autopsy...
on body of Paul Essex, who died most suddenly on China Clipper this morning.
Essex, mystery writer?
He took a trip to Honolulu about six weeks ago to write a story about the spook racket?
Say, we were talkin' about
Zodiac. Or does that connect up?
[Rhadini] It might-if Essex was a client of Dr. Zodiac's.
- What are you holding back?
- Did you speak to Essex before he died?
- Did he tell you anything?
- Was he a client of Dr. Zodiac's?
- Did he commit suicide?
- Please, please. Cannot answer question now.
But in humble opinion, suicide induced by blackmail is murder.
So sorry. Must leave now... to meet unfortunate widow, Mrs. Essex.
Excuse, please. Excuse.
- Gimme that telephone!
- Outside! This is for official business.
Hey, Charlie said he was going to meet Paul Essex's wife.
- One'll get you 10 he's on his way to Zodiac's right now.
- And he'll get in. Come on!
- What are we waiting for?
- To give him a head start. We'll crash Zodiac's gate with him.
Hey, Pop. The taxi starter told me a couple of fellas brought you here. What's up?
They merely brought greetings from old friend Deputy Chief Kilvaine.
Oh. I didn't find Paul's briefcase.
Gregory gave me the slip at Customs. But if we could get ahold of that manuscript-
Please remember
- Have given trusting parent promise... to apply mental ability to schoolbooks.
- Mr. Chan, I've got a message for you.
- Oh.
What is it?
What is it, Pop?
Here. Engage rooms at St. Francis Hotel.
And when Mrs. Essex call, say will be delayed.
- But what's in the note?
- Ancient Chinese proverb, badly misquoted.
Should read: "Do not challenge supernatural... unless armed with sword of truth."
[Vehicle Approaching]
- Wait for us.
- Nothin' doin'. I know this spook joint.
Full of dead people talkin' their heads off.
[Chuckles] Well, Charlie, fancy meeting you here.
Had anticipated fancy. Surprised you did not arrive first.
Oh, let me introduce Professor Bixby of Berkeley. Great psychologist.
- Mr. Chan.
- Most happy to meet eminent professor of magic...
hiding under psychological whiskers.
- Quiet, Charlie.
- I told you we couldn't fool him.
If Zodiac finds out Rhadini's with us, he'll never let us in.
Thrown me out a dozen times, but I figured
I could sneak in under the hair mattress.
Will make first test of Dr. Zodiac's mystic powers on penetrating false whiskers.
Let's go.
Excuse, please. May consult with Dr. Zodiac?
Dr. Zodiac will be happy to receive the celebrated detective, Charlie Chan...
and his friends.
Thank you so much.
It beats me, Charlie. That face of yours can open more doors than a passkey.
Dr. Zodiac is native of San Francisco?
Dr. Zodiac is a native of the universe.
He knows all things about all people.
Follow me, please.
In this room, gentlemen.
- ~~[Eerie Background]
- Make yourselves comfortable, please.
I will announce you to Dr. Zodiac.
Boy, what a layout.
Say, I couldn't put on a better act myself.
He's got all the props: incense, music-
Advise caution. Even draperies may have ears.
What a lot of phony junk.
No. Very genuine and valuable antiques.
Table lamp of ancient Egypt
- Ramses dynasty.
This is Persian sacrificial knife.
Also very, very old.
[Gong Resounds]
[Man's Voice] Dr. Zodiac, the Eye of Allamata.
Mr. Chan, I am honored.
Thank you. Privilege is mine.
It certainly is a privilege, Dr.
Zodiac. I'm Pete Lewis of the Chronicle.
How do you do, Mr. Lewis?
I have heard of your campaign to expose the charlatans... who prey on a too-susceptible public.
- I heartily agree with it.
- And I'm Professor Bixby of Berkeley.
I'm profoundly interested in your work, Doctor.
Thank you. Be seated, gentlemen.
You will make a most intelligent and unusual circle.
How can I serve you?
Humbly request you penetrate beyond the mystic veil of life... and communicate with friend recently departed.
That is the supreme demonstration.
Please join me in silent meditation... while I seek my control-
an Egyptian priestess who passed beyond 3,000 years ago.
[Moaning Through Horn]
[Rattling]
[Woman's Voice] Zodiac. Zodiac.
I am here.
I am here.
You have a message for Mr. Chan?
There is someone... newly arrived in the spirit world... who wishes to get through to Mr. Chan.
I will help him.
He is a man who was named Paul Essex.
Ask the question that fills your mind, Mr. Chan.
Paul, old friend...
Charlie Chan most grieved.
Cannot understand death which struck so suddenly.
[Paul's Voice] My heart-
My heart was tired.
Stopped.
Who drove you to suicide?
[Paul's Voice] No suicide.
Then you were not victim of blackmail?
There was no blackmail.
What was meaning of radiogram,
"Cannot escape zodiac"?
Stars were against me.
[Charlie] Can explain more clearly, please?
[Woman's Voice] Paul Essex... is not strong enough yet to talk any longer.
Do either of the other... gentlemen care to ask a question?
Yes. I'd like to know something about a girl.
And she's not in the spirit world either.
You want to know about... a girl named Eve Cairo.
You must not think of marrying her. She is psychic.
She is one of us.
You must not interfere with her work.
So that's what you've been telling Eve! I know she comes here.
- You might have her buffaloed, but you don't fool me.
- I've had enough of this faker.
How can you sit there and insult our intelligence? I'm going to expose your tricks-
Stay where you are, Mr. Rhadini.
So you thought that I would not see through your childish disguise.
I would have let it pass in respect to
Mr. Chan had you not shown your hand.
- Now leave this house. - Why, you cheap four-flusher. I'll give you a blast... in print that'll run you out of this town like the rest of the gyp fortune-tellers.
If you do, Mr. Lewis, your paper will pay me a large sum for damages.
I do not predict the future.
What you witnessed here was a scientific demonstration.
Regret most sincerely unfortunate termination of séance.
I accept your apology, Mr. Chan.
I know these two... gentlemen forced their company on you when you entered my house.
My servant will see you out. Good day.
Are we gonna let him get away with that?
- We oughta take the place apart.
- Would not recommend violence.
Have no authority to intrude on privacy without search warrant.
The fee for the consultation, gentlemen, will be $20.
- What?
- What? Try and get it.
If request music, must be willing to pay for fiddler.
- I could get you a whole orchestra for that price.
- [Charlie] Should not complain.
Received most enlightening message concerning lady friend.
Well, Eve and I are going to get married, no matter what that faker had to say.
Eve Cairo's part of my act,
Charlie. Pete met her through me.
She's tops in mind reading.
- Mind reading?
- She's on the level, Charlie. Her stuff's no gag.
And I'm gonna have a showdown with her tonight. She's not coming here anymore.
Very wise. Dr. Zodiac man of great ego.
Enjoys using power to dominate lives of others.
Advise caution. To destroy false prophet... must first unmask him before eyes of believers.
[Phone Rings]
Yes, please?
Oh. Hello, Mr. Kilvaine.
You get autopsy report?
You had a hunch, Charlie. There was enough poison in Paul Essex's stomach... to have polished off 10 men.
Think it was plain suicide or fancy murder?
Voice of crime still very faint.
Think it best you tell newspapers, coroner reports suicide.
Pete tells me you sprung the blackmail angle on Zodiac.
What's up, Charlie? Was he squeezing Paul Essex?
Hunch say yes, but facts say maybe.
Will keep you informed. Good-bye.
[Deep Voice] Good evening, Mr. Chan.
May I have a minute of your time?
Do you have a son named Jimmy Chan?
Wearer of disguise only fool chambermaid.
[Normal Voice] Aw, gee, Pop.
Father who depends on son is happy or foolish according to son.
Please, job.
Hey, this is my tie
- my best tie.
Little mouse lucky his clothes do not fit elephant.
You haven't asked me where I've been.
Looking for Mr. Gregory.
Yeah. I checked at several hotels, and I found him too.
He's registered at the Walling, and he's got Paul's briefcase with him.
But when he saw busybody son, he vanished.
That's right. When he saw me, he ducked out of the lobby, and then I lost him.
What time was this?
Gee, Pop, l-I'm awfully sorry.
I didn't look at the time.
Was Gregory at Hotel Walling at 4:00?
Yes. No, uh, earlier, I think.
Yes, earlier. No, I'm... not sure.
But if it's important, I can check.
- Right now check into dress clothes.
- Where are we going?
Have invitation to a small party
Mr. Rhadini gives on Treasure Island.
- You don't like parties.
- Am anxious to make acquaintance... of girlfriend of newspaperman- girl who believes and obeys Dr. Zodiac.
But I'd like to help out. We've got to find that briefcase.
Can best help out by disguising self as obedient son for few hours.
Come.
Don't wait for me, Pop. See you later.
What you say?
- ~~[Hawaiian]
- [Men Chanting]
Hello, Irma. How are you?
It's swell of you to come. Glad to see you.
Make yourself at home, will ya?
~~[Continues]
Hey, why aren't you serving?
- You told me to act like a guest, didn't ya?
- Now look, Elmer.
I only asked you to be helpful.
Now leave the food alone.
What's the matter? Ain't it any good?
~~[Continues]
Okay. I can take a hint.
I've been anxious to meet you, Mr. Chan.
Also happy to meet future wife of old friend.
Very future. I'll have a long white beard down to here if she keeps holding out.
Pete told me what you're up to, Mr. Chan, and you're wrong.
Dr. Zodiac's a genius. You'll never expose him as a fraud.
[Pete] Don't stop a fella from trying.
Pete, if I have any gift for reading minds, then-
There's no argument about that.
Then others can be gifted to read the future.
Can tell if anything is on mind of that young man?
[Grunting]
- [Grunting Continues]
- [Others Screaming]
[Pete Laughs]
- Oh, hello, darling.
- Hello, Mrs. Sibley.
Still monopolizing Mr. Chan? Won't you give poor little me a chance to talk to him?
Here he is. Talk your head off.
Tell him what a great guy Zodiac is.
- [Eve] Now, Pete, none of that.
- [Pete] Sometimes I think she steers for him.
- What on earth do you mean?
- You got Eve to go to Zodiac. She was sane till then.
Darling, she didn't make me go.
We never had a row till you met him.
- You better get ready, Eve. You're on soon.
- Yes. Excuse us, please.
Well, Bessie, I see you've cornered Mr. Chan.
You better watch out, Charlie. Mrs.
Sibley thrives on scandal and husbands.
Never let one go around with a mussed-up tie.
[Rhadini] You, uh, better not let my wife catch you doing this.
Mmm. She knew she was marrying a popular man, didn't she?
Yeah. She hasn't asked for a divorce yet either. [Chuckles]
Well, let's sit down.
- Oh, hello, Myra, darling. Where have you been?
- Behaving myself.
- Do you know Mrs. Rhadini?
- We've met.
- Now who on earth mussed you up?
- Huh? Oh.
Does anybody want some of this stuff? It ain't bad.
No, Elmer.
Well, I just said it ain't bad, that's all.
The people my husband picks up. Anything for a laugh.
Myra, darling, you're not looking a bit well.
Hasn't Dr. Zodiac been able to cheer you up?
- I wouldn't believe that faker under oath.
- Then why go to him?
[Myra] It was Mrs. Sibley's idea.
Oh, but you were so worried about
Rhadini and his popularity with the girls.
- [Laughs]
- Darling, let me worry about him.
You worry about that husband of yours who died.
What do you mean?
Didn't his sudden exit have the district attorney bothered?
- Oh, now, Myra- - It's awfully stuffy here.
Excuse me, please.
Why, that jealous guttersnipe.
Don't ever pick a knife thrower for a wife, Mr. Chan.
- Sharp words from sharp tongue?
- No, I mean real knives.
She used to be in vaudeville.
Thinks she's an actress.
Dr. Zodiac can't help her. She's too conceited.
I beg your pardon. Are you Mr. Rhadini?
No. There's Mr. Rhadini over there.
Oh, thank you. Excuse me.
- What- Uh, excuse, please? -
[Bessie] I said she's too conceited.
Good evening, Mr. Rhadini. It's awfully nice of you to invite me here tonight.
I'm glad to have you. Make yourself at home. Give the house a good name.
Thank you. I'll do my best.
Say, Bessie, you know everybody.
Who's that fellow over there?
Thank you.
Well, he's a new one to me.
But he looks interesting.
- You do not know own guest?
- I never laid eyes on him before.
Pardon me, Mr. Chan. You're wanted on the telephone.
- I'll show you the way, Charlie.
- Excuse, please.
Hurry back, Mr. Chan. I want all the news about Honolulu.
Oh, excuse me a minute, Charlie. The phone's right over there. You can't miss it.
How many times do I have to tell you?
Didn't you say I could be a guest?
I didn't tell you to make a pig out of yourself.
Well, if you invite me, you gotta invite my tapeworm.
Yes? Who, please? Who?
It's only me, Pop-Jimmy.
I've located Gregory, and he's registered right here in our hotel.
Mr. Gregory here at party now.
I know it. I sent him a fake invitation so that he'd leave his room, and I could search it.
You invite Gregory?
Keep an eye on him, will you? Good-bye.
- ~~[Ends]
- Uh-
- [Applause]
- Mr. Chan, I thought I recognized you.
- Good evening.
- Strange we should meet again so soon.
Odds are about 40-to-1 against travel mates meeting within 48 hours.
- I've made a study of it.
- Even here you pursue art of statistics?
Everywhere
- even in my sleep.
[Bells Chiming]
Charlie, Eve's just about to go on, and I don't want you to miss her.
Now look, if you folks will bring your chairs up a little closer... we're gonna have a little entertainment for you... by one of the finest prestidigit- presti-
He's a magician. I know you all know him. Needs no introduction to you.
The Great Rhadini! Ta-da!
Thank you, thank you. Now before we go any further, l-
Uh, Irma, would you mind holding this cage for me, please?
- [Irma Laughs]
- Just a sample.
As you all know, I give two performances a day at the Temple of Magic.
I didn't ask you to come here tonight to watch me perform.
I want to introduce a little lady from my show whom I consider... the world's greatest living mind reader.
It gives me great pleasure to present Miss Eve Cairo.
Would you mind putting out the lights, please?
Thank you. Now, ladies and gentlemen,
I must ask for absolute quiet.
Under hypnosis, Miss Cairo becomes a delicate radio-receiving apparatus... tuned to every forceful mind.
Thank you.
[Steady Ticking]
Your eyes close.
You will sleep.
I am your control.
You will seek the mind I name.
I will seek the mind you name.
All right, give me something
- anything.
What have I in my hand?
It is a ring- a gold wedding ring.
In it are engraved words:
"Bopsie loves Toots."
- [Woman Laughing]
- Okay, Toots?
- Oh, why, it's simply incredible.
- All right, how about you?
- No?
- Very clever. How does he give her signals?
I tell you, it's real.
They don't use any code.
- Would you care to try it?
- I would.
- [Whispering, Indistinct]
- What? Again?
I've been asked a question. What is it?
The lady wishes to know if- if she will marry again this year.
- Oh, that's wonderful. That's right. Will I?
- [Gregory Chuckles]
I'm sorry. She cannot predict the future.
There's nothing supernatural about Miss Cairo's powers.
They've been recognized by scientists as extrasensory perception- or the "sixth sense"
- which we call mental telepathy.
[Pete] Go on, Charlie. Test her.
[Ticking Continues]
What have I in my hand?
A card.
There are... Chinese characters on it.
Possible to read characters?
I tell you what you do, Charlie.
You concentrate on the translation, and Eve will read it from your mind.
The Chinese words mean...
"Great happiness follows great pain."
Is mind still open book to young lady?
Can you tell us what else Mr. Chan is thinking?
Dr. Zodiac.
I hear the name "Dr. Zodiac" in his thoughts.
Most uncanny.
All right. Now let's have something real hard.
This last demonstration proves that she doesn't read my mind alone.
She can read any strong, dominant thought.
- Would anyone else care to try it?
- [Woman] I would.
[Rhadini] Will you please concentrate, Miss Cairo?
What do I hold in my hand?
It is-
You-
- There's someone else!
- [Ticking Continues]
I can't go on!
I can't! I hear death among us!
I'm frightened! There's evil here!
Someone here is thinking murder!
[Audience Murmuring]
- [Pete] That was Charlie, all right. He came in this way.
- Are you sure?
Sure. Hey, Charlie. Come out, come out, wherever you are.
- [Whispering] Please, quiet.
- [Gasps] Don't do that.
You left like a bloodhound on the trail. I knew you were up to no good.
He had a hunch you were coming this way.
Do not need brass band to commit simple burglary.
Burglary? Which window do we use?
Better to ring bell like law-abiding citizen... to make sure house is empty.
- [Pete] But suppose the Turk's here.
- That'd be a break.
He'd either talk or take a punch in the nose.
- [Pete] I think we ought to try a back window.
- No, try bell first.
Oh. Only honorable sprout.
Gee, Pop, I wasn't expecting you.
- Surprise mutual.
- You scared the daylights out of me.
Can explain presence here?
- I wanted to find out who the doctor is for you.
- How'd you get in?
- Through an open window upstairs.
- Where's the light switch?
No. No lights.
Please remove disguise.
[Jimmy] Gee. Nothing but black curtains.
- This must be the spook room.
- ~~[Eerie Background]
- [Pete] What was that?
- Shh!
- [Gasps] Pop!
- [Crash]
- [Moaning Through Horn]
- [Tambourine Rattling]
- Hey, look!
- [Gasps]
Ectoplasm most interesting.
Ghost filled with hot air.
Well, what about Paul Essex's voice?
Proof Dr. Zodiac knew Paul Essex.
Doctor excellent ventriloquist.
Uncle maybe to Charlie McCarthy.
Yeah? What makes all this operate?
Mechanical spirits respond to buttons concealed in floor.
Dr. Zodiac sit here with feet hidden underneath table... and conduct spook show like leader of orchestra.
Observe.
Boy, oh, boy. Whoever rigged this up is a mechanical genius.
I could use him to design some illusions for my show.
So this is how he fools his customers.
Favorite pastime of man is fooling himself.
- [Door Opens]
- Pop!
[Quietly] Get beside door.
[Switch Clicks]
You will please drop revolver to floor.
Mr. Chan makes empty command.
Man with gun stand behind you.
- Drop it.
- [Gun Hits Floor]
- Search him.
- Now don't try to put anything over on my pop.
Please lock door.
Go ahead, Pop. Ask him anything you want.
[Door Closes]
Finger of death fit glove perfectly.
- What are you getting at?
- This weapon sought my life at party tonight.
- [Pete] Did he try to kill you?
- Believe gentleman to be same.
Gee, Pop, you got him for attempted murder!
- [Pete] Lights! Hey, turn on the lights!
- Come on. Put 'em on, will ya?
- I can't find the button!
- Well, feel around there. You had it before!
- [Pete] Push the table!
- [All Chattering]
[Jimmy] Where's that light button?
- Where's the Turk?
- Where's my pop?
Now wait a minute. People can't vanish into thin air. Come on! We've gotta find them.
[Pete] That door's still locked.
Now wait a minute. Wait a minute. Shh! Look.
Gentlemen, what are you doing in my house?
Wh-What have you done to my pop?
You have search warrant?
Come on, Zodiac. Open up and talk fast.
[Charlie's Voice] Thank you so much. Appreciate bravery.
- [Rhadini] Why, it's Charlie!
- [Jimmy] Pop!
- Pop, don't ever do that again.
- What have you got there?
Face rubber. Beard false.
Massive body an illusion.
Elaborate disguise indicate
Dr. Zodiac two other people.
Wait a minute. Do you mean to say that wire framework... is used to make a person appear taller?
- Exactly.
- Then Zodiac could be a woman.
- Or the Turk.
- Anything possible.
But where is the Turk?
Make disappearance like ghost.
Ran into closet. Found blank wall but no Turk.
Zodiac disguise hang here.
One of these walls must be false.
[Rhadini] Ah-ha. That's it.
This is the office.
He certainly did a goodjob of concealing this place. Did you find something, Charlie?
Have found elusive manuscript of Paul Essex
- one taken by Gregory.
Oh, that. I brought that here.
I got it out of Gregory's room at the hotel and left it here when I broke in tonight.
- You brought it here?
- Yeah. You didn't give me a chance to tell you before.
If befriend donkey, expect to be kicked.
How you get in here?
Through here.
I couldn't find my way out of this place, so...
I went back out through here
- same way I came in.
Then I saw you from the window and let you in.
Get a look at the size of this safe.
I wonder what a fortune-teller's doing with a safe this big.
[Pete] I wish we could open it.
Suggest you start zero.
- Are you kidding?
- [Charlie] No.
Make two turn to left to five.
- One turn to right to 18.
- [Dial Clicking]
Two turn back to left to... 21.
- Back to zero.
- [Dial Clicking]
- [Door Bangs]
- [Pete] It works.
- How did you get the combination?
- Found same among possessions ofTurkish gentleman.
[Pete] Boy, it's dark in here.
There must be a switch someplace.
[Rhadini] Here's one.
Boy, what a setup.
It's a fireproof room.
What kind of a business is Zodiac in anyway?
Reason for presence here.
[Whistles] All kinds of dope about all kinds of people.
Please, do not touch.
Suspicion confirmed.
Unfortunate and illegal experiences of many people hidden in these boxes- information collected from false psychics in many cities.
- Organized blackmail.
- We'll get Kilvaine to seize that stuff.
Gee, Pop, here's one on Honolulu
- people who live there.
Here's something on somebody named Bessie Sibley.
Mrs. Sibley doubtless supply information on many others...
to buy Dr. Zodiac's silence.
I'll bet he had plenty on her.
What have you got there, Charlie?
Envelope on Paul Essex.
This letter written by
Paul Essex positive proof...
Dr. Zodiac demand money under threat of exposing past misdeeds.
- Now we can nail him!
- Must punish Dr. Zodiac... without betraying Paul
Essex secret... to widow.
- Uh, suggest thorough search of office first- Dr. Zodiac desk. - Okay.
- What a yarn. This dynamite'll blow the whole town wide open.
- We oughta phone Kilvaine.
- I'll yell if I find anything, Pop.
- Mmm.
How to Tell Fortunes by Cards.
Maybe that's how he got his start.
Almanacs, horoscopes, astrological charts
- Ah, what a lot of trash.
- Say, we better get outta here before the Turk comes back.
- We are about ready to leave.
[Rhadini] Hey! Something's burning!
Am asking flames to keep secrets of many unfortunate people.
- But, Charlie, the evidence- - It is best.
We are destroying web of spider. Now let us find spider.
[Yawns] Oh, good morning, Pop.
Hey, your bed's still made up. Didn't you turn in at all?
- Have just read most interesting story.
- Paul's book?
- Yeah.
- Any clues in it?
Possible truth disguised as fiction.
Secret of Pygmy Arrow is story of fake psychic who blackmail clients.
- Swell. How does that help us?
- No help.
Last page containing crime solution missing.
Yet we know Paul finished same.
- Then Gregory must have it.
- [Phone Rings]
Say, I can't understand why you don't arrest that guy.
- [Rings]
- Please, do not ignore telephone.
Hello. Who?
Gregory wants to see ya.
Well, what you wait for?
Here is man ready for arrest.
Please come up, Mr. Gregory.
- [Handset Settles In Cradle]
- Boy, am I gonna pin it on him.
Would favorite son like to make personal pinch?
Oh, you're kidding, Pop.
- Say, we'd better have a gun.
- [Knocking]
- Good morning, Mr. Chan.
- Good morning.
Say, didn't I see you yesterday at the Hotel
Walling wearing glasses and a false mustache?
- O-Oh, that. -
Good morning, sir.
- Please accept humble hospitality.
- Thank you very much.
- Have cup coffee?
- No, thanks.
- Mr. Chan, I've come to lay my cards on the table.
- Yes?
- First of all, I'm not an insurance actuary.
- Please continue.
I'm a private investigator for the Granville Insurance Company.
- A detective?
- That's right.
- Gee, Pop, he's one of us.
- If I were one of Mr. Chan, I shouldn't be so worried.
Modesty forbids acknowledgement.
- Mr. Chan, I need help.
- Cooperation possible, Mr. Gregory...
- if you will answer one question.
- With pleasure.
Why did you remove Paul
Essex briefcase from Clipper?
I thought it might furnish me with some leads.
I was unable to make head or tail of it.
Somebody took it from my room last night.
You follow Paul Essex to Honolulu?
- Yes.
- Why?
My company's already had three suicides down there.
I thought the islands might furnish the motives. It was a blind alley.
The only thing I discovered was... that Dr. Zodiac had told Mr.
Essex that he would die this month.
Dr. Zodiac predict Paul Essex death?
Certainly. You knew I read that radio that came to Mr. Essex.
- I've been trying to see Zodiac. I can't even get an appointment.
- Please, what can I do?
You get to Zodiac and make him talk, and my company will take care of you.
Always willing to cooperate with insurance company.
Will keep you informed of developments.
Well, that's fine. I'll let you know if anything turns up.
- And I'm awfully glad I came to see you.
- Thank you. Pleasure is mutual.
- Thank you very much. - Good-bye.
- Thank you.
- Oh, not at all.
- Gee, Pop, I certainly had him pegged wrong.
- You did?
Uh, the manuscript
- He's taken it again. Hey!
- Morning practice for track team?
- Young man imitate puppy dog chasing bumblebee.
Well, where do we stand? Did you read our mystery story? Get any leads?
- Crime never solved by books.
- I lost him. The chambermaid said he checked out this morning.
Gee, now that manuscript's gone again.
Gee, Pop, you're a magician.
What was in the briefcase?
Very comprehensive San
Francisco telephone directory.
Gee, nice goin', Pop.
- Hey, what's this all about?
- Say, I've got an idea.
Let's call up the Granville Insurance Company and find out if Gregory's on the level.
Telephone all insurance companies yesterday.
No one ever heard of Mr. Gregory.
I knew it. I knew he was a phony.
Say, he might even be Zodiac.
One'll get you 10 we'll never see
Zodiac with his whiskers on again- not after the way we went through his place last night.
It is possible.
But Dr. Zodiac not ordinary criminal.
He is man of great ego...
with disease known to science as pseudologia fantastica.
- [Whistles]
- Is it serious?
Listen: "Pathological liars and swindlers suffer from exaggerated fantasy...
"unleashed vanity and great ambition... which robs them of caution known to saner men."
Or, as Pop would put it, "Swell head gives owner more trouble than indigestion."
Correction, please. Swell head sometimes give police... more cooperation than criminal mistake.
Say, I'll buy that. We might trip Zodiac through his vanity.
Criminal egotist find pleasure in laughing at police.
If we give him a chance to laugh at us-
That might bring him out in the open, and then
- But how are we gonna work it?
Suggest artful flattery in form of special challenge from Rhadini... to demonstrate powers before men of science.
That's great, Charlie, and I know my paper will go for it.
- [Man] Say, my nose on Rhadini. Who do you like? - [Man #2] Well, I like Zodiac-
[Crowd Continues Chattering]
- That Dr. Zodiac certainly has his nerve with him.
- [Chattering Continues]
Charlie, you were right. It's happened.
Zodiac took it hook, line and sinker. Come on.
Please, folks, step aside.
Gee, that's a funny-lookin' knife.
Balance weapon used by knife throwers.
What is it, a P. S?
This is missing last page of Paul Essex manuscript. Note was written on back of it.
- What do you mean?
- Say, then Gregory must be Zodiac.
- Unless you drop same in Zodiac house last night.
- Gee, Pop, maybe I did.
Carelessness may prove blessing in disguise.
Hey, I betcha we'll have a full house tonight, I'll betcha.
- What does it say, Charlie? Does it help us?
- No.
Merely that murder was not caused by sword cane, as suspected... but by poisoned Pigmy arrow.
Pigmy arrow? We got a Pigmy arrow.
- Where?
- Over here. I'll show ya.
The bow and arrow's gone! I know it was here this mornin'...
- 'cause when I was sweepin' up, I went by and it stuck me.
- Some souvenir hunter took them.
[Jimmy] If Zodiac left the note, then he probably took the arrow.
- At least we know where to find it.
- ~~[Orchestra: Overture]
- ~~[Continues]
- Hello, Charlie. What a house.
I socked Zodiac's acceptance across the front page, and look at that sellout.
[No Audible Dialogue]
- We've got every door in the place covered.
- Good.
Now when Zodiac gets here, seal the place up.
Don't let anyone out till after the show is over. And be ready for trouble.
- If we don't see a show tonight, we'll never see one.
- What's your plan, Pop?
Expect to witness most interesting performance... if attention not distracted by too much conversation.
Well, we're all set, Charlie.
~~[Overture Continues]
- Well, is Dr. Zodiac here yet?
- No, I don't see him.
What a fine spot I'll be in if he doesn't show up.
- A fine spot if he does and you don't show him up.
- Aw, don't even think it.
- [Elmer] Places, everybody. All set, Mr. Rhadini?
- Yeah, okay.
All right, clear the stage, folks. Kill your houselights.
## [Overture Ends]
## [Fanfare]
Thank you. Ladies and gentlemen, as you all know... the famous Dr. Zodiac has accepted a challenge to meet me here tonight.
- Is Dr. Zodiac in the house?
- [Murmuring]
Not even the ghost of a whisper.
- Or the whisper of a ghost.
- [Crowd Chuckling]
So, while we're waiting for the renowned doctor of the occult to materialize...
I will endeavor to entertain you. Professor, please?
- ~~[Dramatic, Exotic] - Of course
I'm just an ordinary magician myself-
one of the old-fashioned kind whose hand is quicker than the eye.
Now watch very closely, ladies and gentlemen. Empty, empty.
- That's what you thought.
- [Laughter]
- Flowers for madame.
- [Applause]
~~[Continues]
Nothing in here...
- nothing in here.
- [Laughter]
Empty, empty.
What a fix for a sphinx.
Elmer, if you please, rotate.
Well, there's life in the old sphinx yet.
- ~~[Ends] - Miss Eve
Cairo, ladies and gentlemen-
a very charming and mysterious young lady who will assist me in deceiving you.
Excuse me, please. Now, ladies and gentlemen, for our first illusion...
I will require some witnesses here on the stage.
Are there a couple of good witnesses in the house- the kind to have when you bump into the other fella's car?
- How about you, sir?
- Oh, no, thank you.
Come on. Don't be bashful. Leave your watch and wallet with your wife.
- Oh, she's not your wife.
- [Crowd Chuckles]
Well! Spotlight. Charlie, stand up.
- Come on, Pop. Take a bow.
- [Pete] Go ahead, Charlie.
Ladies and gentlemen, I want you to meet Mr. Charlie Chan- the world's foremost whodunit celebrity.
I'm going to ask Mr. Chan... to honor my performance by acting as a witness of my illusions.
And if I can trick him, I'm good.
- This'll give you a chance to watch
Zodiac while he works. - Hey, Pop-
And you too, Jimmy. And Jimmy
Chan, ladies and gentlemen-
- a chip off the old chopstick.
- [Crowd Laughs]
And this gentleman completes our gold-panel jury:
Deputy Chief Kilvaine of the
San Francisco Police Department.
[Rhadini] Now stand wherever you wish.
Stubs, please.
[Gasps] Oh!
- ~~[Continues]
- [Crowd Murmuring]
Dr. Zodiac, I believe. Spotlight!
Would you care to come up on the stage, Doctor?
I was just about to toss off one of my best illusions.
I'll give you a chance to unmask me, Doctor, before I... unmask you.
- That would be a pleasure, Mr. Rhadini.
- That's the spirit.
[Rhadini] Stand wherever you wish, Doctor.
- Now, ladies and gentlemen, before I continue- - ~~[Ends]
I want to say in fairness to our distinguished guest... that I do not intend in any way to ridicule his faith in the supernatural.
But I will prove that I can duplicate anything he does...
with the same old bag of tricks that have been mystifying gullible humanity...
- since the first magician laid an egg.
- [Laughter]
My initial endeavor will be to nullify the law of gravity through levitation- an art practiced by the holy men ofTibet...
who are credited with being able to project their bodies through space.
- Thank you.
- ~~[Resumes]
Now watch Miss Cairo and particularly the table.
We are under observation by a supercritical jury of witnesses.
Nothing below, a beautiful lady above.
No wires connected to the table, no mechanical devices... yet, unless your eyes deceive you, the table and the young lady... are rising into the fourth dimension of space... supported by nothing but thin air!
Levitation was a religious rite of the ancient world, known to the priests of Chaldea-
a guarded secret in the temples of Babylon-
a fearsome ceremony of the pagan gods who cried for sacrifice... and before whom victims vanished and disappeared!
~~[Ends]
- [Applause]
- [Screams]
[Applause Fades, Crowd Murmuring]
[Pete] Eve!
[Kilvaine] An arrow!
Stuck directly in heart. Death instantaneous.
Boy, what a finish for
Dr. Zodiac. Who is he, Pop?
[Rhadini] It's the Turk!
[Kilvaine] Wait a minute. Houselights!
Everybody stay right where you are.
No one is to leave this theater.
[Whistle Tweeting]
Have everybody go back to their seats!
Please, remove body out there.
- Back to your seat, lady.
- You've no right to keep me here. Let me by.
Look! Somebody threw this bow in here.
Get bow, please.
This is what he was shot with, all right.
Gee, Pop, l-I didn't mean to do that.
No matter. Accident proves arrow not shot from bow.
Weather-beaten wood too old to put driving force behind bowstring.
Why, that's from my exhibit in the lobby. It's the Pygmy bow.
Problem number one then: How was arrow which killed Turkish gentleman... projected into his body?
- [Rhadini] Someone must've been close enough to stab him.
- It must've been from the stage.
Maybe, maybe not. The lights were out long enough... for anyone to come up on the stage and then gotten back to their seat.
Makes problem more difficult
- takes in entire audience.
Suggest confining selves to one who could have been within striking distance of victim.
- When did you leave stage, Mr. Rhadini?
- As soon as the lights changed.
I follow the table down the aisle. I'm at the back when Eve makes her entrance.
Rhadini must have been in the aisle. He dropped this wand... beside my seat in the second row.
- Hello, Stewart. What are you doing here?
- Kilvaine.
- Say, do you know him too?
- Sure. Charlie, I want you to meet Stewart Salsbury...
the investigator for the
Granville Insurance Company.
Then he is a detective?
But now his name's Salsbury.
That's why the insurance company didn't know anyone named Gregory.
May chalk up one error against blundering parent.
Mr. Salsbury, you were sitting in second row?
I was interested in watching you work. I knew you were on the stage for a purpose.
I wanted to be nearer to you and Dr. Zodiac.
Thank you so much. May see wand, please?
This is wand used in floating table illusion?
Yes. I guess I dropped it in the aisle as I ran back to the stage.
Silver-tipped wand more prolific than silkworm.
- You're stealing my act, Charlie.
- [Audience Laughs]
Perhaps have extra one handy? Up sleeve maybe?
Say, I shouldn't have let you watch me so closely.
- An orchid for you, Charlie.
- Thank you so much.
Miss Cairo, please, just when you cease to float on flying table?
I wasn't on the table, Mr. Chan. I was in the wings waiting for my entrance.
Not on table? Very mysterious.
Just a minute, Charlie. You don't mean to say that Eve had anything to do with this.
Please, I'm merely trying to place positions of people on stage... to get clear picture of crime.
Well, I don't quite get you, Charlie.
Let's place 'em in the positions they were in before the lights went out.
[Charlie] Very excellent suggestion.
Would request, Mr. Rhadini, you start act all over again... from point where Miss
Cairo is placed on table.
- Right.
- [Crowd Murmuring]
Now, you people in the audience please settle down and be patient.
- We're going to stage Rhadini's act again.
- [Exclaiming]
We want all the cooperation you can give us.
The person sitting next to you might be the murderer we're looking for.
Will need volunteer to take place of victim.
- You will oblige?
- What? Me be the murdered man?
- But I ain't a good subject, Mr. Chan, I ain't.
- Hmm. No.
Can request you assume humble position, Mr. Lewis?
- To break a story, I'd do anything, Charlie.
- Thank you so much.
Miss Cairo, it will be necessary for you again to take place on table.
- No, no, I can't do it.
- What's the matter, honey?
I wouldn't advise you to use Eve.
She's different from the rest of us- high-strung, nervous temperament, sensitive to things like this.
One moment, please. Have thought.
Will not be necessary to use young lady.
Uh, let everyone assume original positions.
You, Miss Cairo, were in wings.
Mr. Rhadini, you were on platform, please.
- Who's gonna ride on the table?
- Number two son.
He long have weakness for displaying histrionic ability.
Here is opportunity to disguise self as Sleeping Beauty.
Who, me? Take a ride on that table?
- Oh, but flying makes me seasick, Pop.
- Go.
All right, Jimmy. Come on. Come on. Hop up.
You're gonna get a lot of surprises. Okay, Charlie?
- Lights!
- ~~[Resumes]
[Rhadini] Watch Miss Cairo and particularly the table.
We are under observation by a supercritical jury of witnesses.
Nothing below-
No wires connected to the table, no mechanical devices.
Yet, unless your eyes deceive you, the table and the lady... are rising into the fourth dimension of space...
supported by nothing but thin air!
Levitation was a religious rite of the ancient world, known to the priests of Chaldea- a guarded secret of the ancient temples of the-
Mr. Chan, something's wrong.
Rhadini didn't finish his speech!
Lights! Lights! Turn on the lights! [Screams]
[Crowd Clamoring]
- How did that happen?
- Do something.
[Kilvaine] All right, folks. All right. Take your seats and be quiet.
[Man] Get him to his dressing room!
Why, he's wounded! Get him to his dressing room and call a doctor.
Now, keep calm, folks!
Joe, get everybody out of that aisle.
Lady! Lady! Sit down, lady. Be calm, be collected.
Don't get excited. That won't get you anything.
Take his coat off. He's bleeding.
Come on. Come on. Get him to his dressing room.
Well, if this don't send me back to Billy
Goat Hill pounding pavement, I'm an Eskimo.
Not necessary to take such icy view of situation.
- Matters progressing most interestingly.
- Interestingly? For who, Rhadini?
Fortunately, only wound in shoulder, induced by this knife.
- Where did you get that?
- On step.
It is brother to one used to pin
Dr. Zodiac's note to door of theater.
It's a cinch whoever threw that knife is the same one who knocked off the Turk.
We're through playing theater. If I can only figure the angle that knife was thrown from... it'll give me a clue to where the killer was standing.
Position of killer not so important to anxious parent... as position of number two son who took trip on mysterious flying table.
- He's in the cellar. All he has to do is come upstairs.
- Oh. Show way, please.
- Surely. Come on.
- [Kilvaine] I've got an idea.
I've been tryin' to figure out the angle this knife was thrown from. I figured-
Captain Kilvaine, will you tell your stupid cops that they must let me be with my husband?
Now just a minute, young lady. Nobody can talk to him until after I've questioned him.
And I have a few questions for you too.
You're a fine detective
- letting one man be murdered right under your eyes... and then setting the stage so they could try to kill my husband!
I've tried to be calm-
Come out of there! Come out of there!
[Charlie] Jimmy!
Did not know theater provided elevator service.
That comes from inside the sphinx.
Mr. Chan, I want to go to my husband.
The detectives won't let me see him.
Thought Rhadini's dressing room was on stage.
It is, but there's an entrance from down here too.
Son seems to have disappeared as completely as flying table.
Maybe he went up into the boss's dressin' room.
- Come with me, Mr. Chan. We'll see.
- Mmm. Yes.
I hope somebody sees somethin' around here pretty soon.
I wish I was back with my trained seals.
You could try a cross-stitch- the kind we use in appendix operations.
Please explain absence of pants and self.
Gee, Pop, l-I had an accident.
Get dressed quickly. Disappearance take one year off father's life.
Uh, you are doctor? Uh, how is Mr. Rhadini's shoulder?
Not too bad. It's only a flesh wound.
He's suffering from shock right now.
I fixed him up, and I think we'd better let him go home as quickly as possible.
Most fortunate escape. Can offer no solution as to who make attempt on life?
I haven't the slightest idea, Charlie.
I'd just reached the bottom of the steps, and I felt a blow.
And my shoulder seemed to be on fire. That's all I remember.
- It must've been thrown from the audience. And if it was, l- - Recommend we remove selves... from dressing room and allow
Mr. Rhadini needed rest.
Excuse, please.
Look here, young woman. You knew all about this before the lights came up- before anyone else knew that Rhadini had been clipped with a knife.
- How did you know it?
- I've told you before, I can sense things like that.
I had a mental vision of him lying there with a knife stuck in his shoulder.
Mental telepathy confirmed by scientific investigation.
Am convinced young lady's strange power can be... of utmost assistance to us in apprehending murderer.
Better to probe through penetrating mind of one girl... than try to sift contents of whole theater.
All right, then go ahead. I'm in this with ya. I might as well stick.
I'll tell the audience, Pop.
One moment.
Refrain from showing to audience seat of pants, please.
Oh. I'll take care of that.
I'll wear this coat.
Ladies and gentlemen...
my father has requested me to, uh-
[Audience Laughing]
- [Laughing Continues] - My father has requested that I call your atten-
My father has requested that I call your-
[Laughter, Applause]
[Laughter Continues]
[Laughter]
Oh, gee, Pop, this isn't my fault.
Recommend you imitate excellent example of sphinx and keep silent.
Ask you will please excuse amateur exhibition of magic... by ambitious offspring... and request you will again lend most necessary cooperation. and request you will again lend most necessary cooperation.
With assistance of Miss Cairo... will try to find solution of most perplexing crime.
Can assure you will witness most scientific and remarkable demonstration...
of mental telepathy.
Electrician, you will turn off all lights except one on mirror, please.
You will read thoughts in my mind until dominant thought of killer comes to you.
[Steady Ticking]
[Ticking Continues]
Concentrate.
Close eyes, please.
Am now your control.
You are my control.
You lips will speak my thoughts as they come to you.
I will speak your thoughts.
[Ticking Continues]
I get the impression of a strange, mysterious room.
There is a man. It is Dr. Zodiac.
He has learned secrets of people's lives...
and uses his information to blackmail them.
I see one of his victims.
He's in an airplane.
He commits suicide because Dr.
Zodiac threatens him with disgrace.
That man's wife is here in the theater.
Her heart is filled with bitterness.
There is another woman here who is helping Dr. Zodiac...
but she fears him.
Only his death can bring her freedom.
I see another man here
- a rival...
who has staked his reputation on unmasking Dr. Zodiac tonight.
There is another...
who fears the loss ofhis position and prestige...
because Dr. Zodiac has outwitted him.
And a young man who believes Dr.
Zodiac is interfering with his romance- trying to separate him from the girl he loves.
There's someone confusing our contact, Mr. Chan.
Go on, please.
Yes, I have your control again.
There is a woman who is filled with jealousy and hatred.
Dr. Zodiac is trying to influence her.
Mr. Chan, there's a mind here that is fighting me
- trying to keep your thoughts from me.
Continue, please.
He is frightened, desperate. It is-
It is Dr. Zodiac! He is not dead.
- He is here in this theater!
- [Murmuring]
Zodiac here? Then who was the Turk?
Will soon learn.
[Charlie] Concentrate, please.
The man who was murdered was Dr. Zodiac's servant...
who was impersonating him here tonight to throw the police off the trail.
What was motive for murder, please?
The servant was the only one who knew his master's secret.
Zodiac killed him to silence him... and make the world believe that Dr. Zodiac was dead.
Who is Dr. Zodiac?
It is-
It is-
Something is keeping it from me
- a control stronger than yours.
Killer is trying to prevent you from reading my thoughts. Make effort, please.
I'm trying. It's coming closer.
It's filled with evil, with thoughts of murder.
It's Dr. Zodiac!
He's ready to strike again! [Screams]
Lights! Lights!
- [Jimmy] It's Rhadini!
- Fred! - My boss!
Otherwise known as Dr. Zodiac.
Very clever to have Turk impersonate you at séance and thus avoid suspicion.
Nice work. But you'll never convict me of killing the Turk.
Contradiction, please. Will demonstrate.
Silver-tipped wand used in floating table illusion not same as this one... which you carry up sleeve, from which you produce orchid.
Mechanism make most potent murder weapon. Observe.
[Clicks]
Easy for magician to confuse picture of crime- even to inflicting wound in own shoulder to avert suspicion.
All right, men. Take him out.
- So sorry.
- I didn't know, Mr. Chan. I never even suspected.
Rhadini sure was covered up, but we nicked this case.
Appreciate valuable assistance. But please remember:
Obvious clues, like tricks in magic, usually prove deceptive.
You bet. From now on, I'll be just like you.
I'll keep both feet right on the ground.
~~[Orchestra: "San Francisco"]
THE BLUE LIGHT
Good day Mister.
Greetings.
Can we stay here tonight?.
Tomorrow we would like to go to Monte Christallo.
Who is this person Junta?.
Junta?.
Ernst, come in.
Bring the book here, it is about Junta.
Horst, it is now the right time to read about the Blue Light on the mountain.
Did Junta really live?.
Have we arrived?.
Does this road lead to
Santa Maria?.
Hey Sir...
Is he mute or doesn't he understand German?.
Bye.... bye...
I am the hotel manager of Santa Maria.
Oh thank God... finally somebody who speaks German.
Did you come to pick me up?.
Yes.
What are these strange sculptures?.
These are the boys of the village who fell off the mountain.
That's my son.
You are not very joyful here.
It's a full moon, a bad day for Santa Maria.
What does that have to do with the moon?.
A curse on our village since the big flow that came down from the Monte Christallo.
When it is full moon, there is a blue light shining on the rock.
Each time the young boys want to go up and each time... and each time one cross more.
I planted a cross for my youngest son.
Tonio!. Tonio!.
Why are you so against that girl?.
She is not normal
How can she climb towards the blue light... on the steep side of the mountain... while the young boys fall down every time?.
This Junta, she's the damned devil's witch.
Do not close the shutters, it's such nice weather
It's a full moon.
Ah yes, the blue light...
My son... six months ago... he was the fourth victim this year...
Silvio!.
Silvio!.... Silvio!.
There she is, the devil's witch. Damm you!
It's all her fault, it's her fault.
Stop!
Guzzi! Guzzi!
Guzzi! Guzzi!
Guzzi... Guzzi!
Junta!
I'm here... I'm here.
Hey... what's the matter?. have some... eat.
I was on the street, early this morning
All of a sudden I saw a crowd in front of Maria's house
I heard Maria, who shouted :
""Junta, Junta!!!".
I was afraid and ran away... then I saw the threatening crowd.
They ran after me with sticks... they threatened me with their fists and they shouted : ""Aaaa... aaaaa... "
They threw stones at me... I was running but they came nearer and nearer...
Then a man jumped from a window... he stood there with his arm like this and shouted : ""Stop!".
Junta, where are you?.
Junta... Junta...
Junta!
Junta!
Hi! Ah... Hello...
What do you have there?.
Is that milk?.
Hey...
It's very nice here. I'd like to stay here...
Now I must go.
I want to leave here before it gets dark... but I will come again.
Tomorrow, I will come again
For sure.
So...
See you again.
Junta
See you again.
I wanted to say something
Tomorrow, I'll go back to the mountains.
I might stay over there for a few days... so do not get worried.
Junta!
Junta...
Junta!
Good day Sir.
So Junta, here I am again.
And this is a small contribution for our life in common.
This is bread.
Bread. I know.
Cheese.
How nice, how nice...
But where shall I sleep?.
I guess you sleep there... and the little boy over there...
And me?.
Sleeping?.
To sleep?.
To sleep!
Ah... I understand,
I understand.
But where?.
There... you can sleep here.
You' ll sleep very well.
Junta, little witch... you make me behave like a fool...
If only we could speak with each other it would be perfect.
I have been here for many weeks now and...
I'm afraid... I'm afraid...
I'll not go back ever... back to the people....
Ju nta... Ju nta... what's happen ing with you?.
Junta...
Iittle Junta...
What?.
Junta... Junta... what's happening with you?.
Come and show me what you brought from the village.
Let's have a look.
Junta...
Junta...
Junta... my little Junta...
How can I explain it to you... you cannot understand me...
What's the matter?.
Those crystals... they are a danger for you... and for the whole village.
But they could be a blessing.
The peasants should be told about it. Let me go now
Don't go.
Stay.
Stay with me.
It's a real treasure... it must be found... and brought to the village.
You'll never have to run around in these rag clothes anymore.
I'll come back.
Very soon
I'll come back.
See you!
It's not here... that you should climb
But here, at this side... till those rocks.
And then, do not climb there, but here, and you will find the entrance to the grotto.
We understand.
Goodnight.
Junta.
Junta!
Junta!
That's how the poor Junta of
Santa Maria died
But her memory lives on in the village, the people who persecuted her so much they got rich with the stones of the Monte Christallo.
End of the story of Junta
[THEME MUSIC]
[TRAIN CHUGGING]
-No loving deck.
Hey, Jenny.
You have in.
I can't open it.
-Too right, though.
Oh, blimey.
-Call his name.
 -Mr. Partridge.
Hey, Mr. Partridge.
-Now what's the trouble?
-Can't open the blinking door.
-Come out.
You hear me?
This is Victoria Station.
-Some drunk sleeping it off.
-Young gents
 traveling first class.
-My word.
-Hi, Jim.
Let's have your ladder.
-Yes.
-Open that window.
 -Right.
I can't budge it, Mr. Partridge.
-Budge is the word.
You'll have to smash it, then.
 -Right.
Oh!
Mr. Partridge, there's--
-Hold it.
Run, [INAUDIBLE].
Fetch the police.
Don't stand there lollygagging.
-This must be the place.
-We made it.
-You'll have to wait here.
-I'm not going to let you go
 in a place like this alone.
-You must, really.
I'll be all right.
-This meeting is
 now called to order.
The unfortunate death in a
 train of one of our members, Mr.
James Murphy, who departed
this life by his own act while of unsound mind, has
 necessitated this meeting.
-That's what you
 say, Mr. Merrydew.
But how do you know?
-A verdict of death by
 suicide was returned tonight.
This is the second occasion that
we have been brought together by the mishaps to our members.
The first being the passing
away by natural causes of the late Colonel Forrester,
whose charming daughter so gracefully honors us with
 her presence here tonight.
It is agreed in the pact
drawn up and formally attested to by its founders that
should the grim reaper overtake one or more, the interests of
the deceased in the society will be divided equally
 among the surviving members.
It is also provided
for in the pact that Miss Forrester becomes
 a participating member.
Consequently, the interests
of the late James Murphy will be divided equally
 among the seven of us.
I move that my fee for the
necessary legal representation, funeral expenses, and a
modest urn for the ashes be defrayed by our organization.
I understand from
the widow that he expressed a preference
 for cremation.
-I second that.
-All those in favor will please
 signify by raising their hand.
Mr. Wilson.
Mr. Baker.
Mr. Dearing.
Mr. Pyke.
Ah Yet.
Good.
-Has any provision been
 made for the widow?
-No.
-I presume that we could
 stretch a point in her favor.
-Emphatically not.
Things are complicated
 enough as they are.
-Why did he want
 to kill himself?
-Have you ever met his wife?
-No.
 -No?
Well, I have.
A pest if there ever was one.
We can attribute
his death solely to the general deficiencies
 of one Annabelle Mary Murphy.
-What would you
 deduce from this?
-Obviously an attempt to
 convey secret information.
-Could you decipher it?
-I could not.
Nor could you.
-Would you like to bet?
-Certainly.
-How much?
-A shilling.
My time is too valuable.
-The answer will be
found in a large book because the numbers are large.
I'd suggest the Bible.
A client, Watson.
-Where?
-The widow standing
 under the streetlamp.
-A widow?
Would you like to bet on that?
-Of course.
-Well, I'm not going down
 the street to ask her.
-Ah.
Won't be necessary.
She's made up her mind.
-So you deduce at
 a distance, eh?
-Not in this case.
I recognized her features.
She's a Mrs. Murphy.
Her husband was
 murdered three days ago.
-Do you mean the man that
 was found dead in a train?
-Exactly.
[KNOCK ON DOOR]
-Come in.
-A Mrs. Murphy to see you, sir.
-Mr. Holmes, I'm in such a mess.
Such a mess.
My husband up and
died without leaving me as much as a threepenny bit.
I-- It's a crying shame, Mr.
 Holmes, that's what it is.
-Sit down and try
 to compose yourself.
-Cut off without a farthing by
 an ungrateful good-for-nothing.
Me!
 And my kind of life!
No dirty dog had a better wife.
I've waited on
him hand to mouth, stood by his side
morning, noon, and night, and what does the stinker do?
He ups and kills
himself and-- and leaves his money to a trust.
And Mr. Merrydew.
Yes.
And there's another stinker
 if I never saw another.
Won't even let me
 have a sixpence.
He won't even let me have
 an ha'penny, Mr. Holmes.
-Thaddeus Merrydew, the lawyer?
-Yes, the thieving hound,
 the dirty rat, the--
-One moment.
You were married how long?
-Five blessed long years.
-Previous to your marriage,
 your husband served in the army?
-You knew him?
-A bit.
He got his charge in China?
-Yes, that's right.
-Then you married.
-Yes, and I gave up
 everything, Mr. Holmes.
You ask the proprietor of the
 Black Sow, he'll tell you.
It was me that made
 that pub what it was.
-And your husband had money?
-Barrels of it.
And when he wanted more, he
used to come up to London and get it.
It was that that took him to
 London when he killed himself.
-How do you know?
-Well, Jim comes into my room.
I was in bed with a piece of
cucumber rind round my head, trying to cure an headache.
He had a letter in his hand.
"See, here, pig," he said.
That was his pet name
 for me when he was drunk.
"I'm going up to London."
-Did you read the
 contents of the letter?
-Oh, it wasn't no letter.
It was just a piece of doggerel.
-Watson, make a note of
 Mrs. Murphy's address.
-It's 232 King's Cross Road.
Then you'll have to
 take me, Mr. Holmes?
-I'll, ah, take up your case.
-Ah, mind you, it'll
 have to be for love.
-Love?
-For nix.
I've noticed how you
 like working for nothing.
-My interest is to bring
 the criminal to justice.
-Well, never mind about justice.
Never mind about the crime.
All I want is my
 husband's lawful money.
And I want you to slap that
thieving lawyer's face right across, between his
 greasy, fat chops.
Goodnight, Mr. Holmes.
I'll be seeing you,
 and thank you kindly.
-Good night, Mrs. Murphy.
Deep water, Watson.
-She needs some shady
 lawyer, not you.
-Think so?
-I'm amazed at your
wasting your energies on such a morbid trifle.
Who is this Merrydew?
-London's most dangerous crook.
The king of blackmailers.
A gliding, slidy,
 venomous snake.
Once in his power, he'll
squeeze and squeeze until he's drained
 his victims dry.
More than once I've
had my net around him, but so far he's managed
 to wriggle his way out.
The time has come, Watson.
The time has come for
 Mr. Thaddeus Merrydew.
-And now Miss Forrester
and gentlemen, this concludes the meeting.
I would like to have
 a word with you alone.
I sincerely trust
no further accident will happen to occasion
 another meeting?
-Never can tell.
-Are you going my way?
-Which way do you go?
I go the other.
-That leads to a dead end.
-That's the way I go.
-Good night, then.
-Good night.
-You must never mention anything
that transpired at this meeting tonight, or even that
 this meeting was held.
I saw a young man standing
 on the corner as I came in.
-Yes, my fiance.
He brought me here
 and is waiting for me.
-Oh.
Then you're thinking
 of being married?
-Yes.
-I wouldn't, if I were you.
That is, at least until
 you've consulted me.
-But why?
-I can't explain.
In a short time, the society
 will no longer exist.
Until its affairs
are winded up, it would be most unwise
 for you to marry.
Your father would
 not have wished it.
-What had my father to
 do with these people?
-Didn't he ever tell you?
-No.
-Then I must
 respect his silence.
Remember, not a word
 to a living soul.
[KNOCK ON DOOR]
-He's after me.
He's after me!
-Captain Pyke!
 [GLASS BREAKING]
[SCREAMING]
Ah!
Ah!
 -Dead.
-Dead.
Shot through the heart.
You wait here.
[SCREAMING]
-What is it?
 What's happening?
Are you hurt?
-Someone-- Look!
He's disappeared!
What does it mean?
-The murderer must
have had an accomplice and removed the body.
-We must call the police.
-No, no, the police will
 be here soon enough.
You mustn't become involved.
 -But it's murder.
-As you respect your
father's memory, you must preserve
 a strict silence.
Not a word.
Come.
-The body was pulled
out of the Thames at 5:00 AM at the
 Lighthouse District.
The autopsy shows the death
was caused by a bullet through the heart.
The features that you
see are unrecognizable, caused possibly by the battering
of the head against the wall before the body was found.
We have identified the
 body by means of that ring.
-Ah.
A very rare and very
 beautiful ring, Lestrade.
-There isn't the slightest doubt
 the deceased is Captain Pyke.
The clothes were identified.
Initials were on the
 collar and on the shirt.
Further identifications are
contained in these letters that were found in the clothing.
-Where is the widow?
 -We asked her to wait.
She's in the adjoining room.
-Mrs. Pyke?
-Yes.
You are?
-My name is Sherlock Holmes.
When did you last see
 your husband alive?
-We dined together last
 night at the Savoy Grill.
He left me shortly
 after 9 o'clock.
I never saw him again.
-You are staying?
-At the Savoy.
-You've been in London how long?
-About a week.
-And you live where?
-At the Grange Sherbournes.
-When your husband
left you, did he inform you where he was going?
-No, but I fancied it was
 on a matter of business.
He was a man very
 precise in his habits.
When midnight came and
 there was no sign of him,
I became rather alarmed.
-Midnight should be
 a late hour for him?
-Very.
As the time went on, I
 became more and more worried.
At last I informed the police.
An hour ago, I
received a message to come here, where I identified
 the body of my poor husband.
-By the ring?
-Yes.
-Did he always wear a ring?
-That one, yes.
I gave it to him
 when we were married.
-That would be?
-About six years ago, in China.
It is an heirloom
belonging to my family and has been handed down
 through generations.
-I see.
Permit me to express my
 sympathy for your great loss.
-Thank you.
Is that all?
-By the way, should
it become necessary, shall I communicate with you
 at the Grange or the Savoy?
-Through my lawyer.
-His name?
-Mr. Thaddeus Merrydew.
Good morning, Mr. Holmes.
-Well, what do you make of it?
-Murder.
 Unquestionably.
-Is that all?
-That's all I have to say.
-What do you think?
-I think that the
 lady is a liar.
-You!
It's not possible!
What do you want with me?
[GUNSHOT]
-The papers are full of
 the Pyke murder mystery.
-Seemed to me particularly
 senseless and futile.
There was no motive.
-No motive?
Peer deep down in the black
heart of Thaddeus Merrydew and you'll find a motive.
-You don't mean to suggest that
he had anything to do with it, do you?
-I suggest nothing.
[KNOCK ON DOOR]
 -Come in.
-Inspector Lestrade
 to see you, sir.
-Mr. Holmes.
 Dr. Watson.
-Mr. Holmes.
 Dr. Watson. 
 Dr. Watson.
 -What's the matter?
Dr. Watson.
 -What's the matter?
You look worried.
 -Worried?
I'm up to my neck.
 -Again?
-Before I can begin
 to finish one case,
I'm plunged into another.
-That's the penalty
 of being smart.
You came to see
 me professionally?
-Well, unofficially.
 -I see.
Heads you win, tails I lose.
-There's been a bad
 business during the night.
An old gentleman.
You'll find it a
 bit of a puzzler.
-You mean you found
 it a bit of a puzzler?
-We've left everything
in status quo hoping you'll favor
 us with an opinion.
-Dead?
-Mm-hmm.
-Murder?
-Suicide.
-Come, Watson.
The game is afoot.
-He was well-known
 as a stamp collector.
-Hmm.
Very interesting.
-What is it, Holmes?
-That leads out to the garden?
-Seldom used, to judge
 by the rusty hinges.
-Good morning, sir.
 -Good morning.
-You can see that I've
 left everything untouched.
-If a herd of
buffaloes passed along, it couldn't be a greater mess.
You can take a smoke.
-Thank you, sir.
-What do you think?
-There's been murder done.
The murderer was a man.
He was in the prime of life, six
feet in height, has small feet, wears square-toed boots, limps
slightly on the left foot and smokes Trichinopoly cigars.
-Well, if it was murder,
 how was it committed?
-The assassin was in the house
 before his victim arrived.
He hid in the recess
 behind the window.
While there, he smoked a cigar.
He fired a shot which hit the
victim on the back of the head and then dragged the body
 to where you found it.
He left and returned
some while later to fire a second shot, this
 time through the mouth.
You'll find the mark
of a boot clearly imprinted on the
 congealed blood.
-What was his object?
-To obliterate the
effect of the first, hoping by so doing to transfer
the crime from that of murder to one of suicide.
Bullet number one you
will find in the wall on the farther side of the room.
The other will be found
embedded in the body of the murdered man.
 Come, Watson.
We mustn't keep Mr.
 Merrydew waiting.
-Mr. Holmes is
 still waiting, sir.
-Oh.
How long has it been, now?
-Fully two hours, sir.
-That's as it should be.
You may show him in now.
-Very good, sir.
-Mr. Holmes, this is
 the bigger pleasure.
I'm sorry to have
kept you waiting, but I had to digest my lunch.
-This is my friend and partner.
 Dr. Watson.
-How do you do?
Fancy a pour, gentlemen?
-Thank you, no.
-Hmm.
Cigar?
Thank you.
Ah, be seated, gentlemen.
I represent Annabelle
 Mary Murphy.
Charming lady.
-I'm empowered to
 act on her behalf.
-Congratulations.
-As you are doubtless
aware, her husband came to a premature
 and sudden end.
-Dear, dear.
-My client is
under an impression that certain monies
belonging to the deceased are being unlawfully
 withheld from her.
-By whom?
-By you.
-And you believe
 this delightful lady?
-I'm paid to find out.
An angry woman is
hard to pacify, so I thought an
amicable discussion with you would put me in
possession of certain facts with which I could
prove to my client the absurdity of her claim.
-I see.
Is that all?
-That is all.
-Dear, dear, you're
 not smoking my cigar.
-You refuse to assist me.
-My dear Mr. Holmes, I have
neither the information or the authority.
You see, until a few
days ago I was not aware that your distinguished
 client existed.
In my profession, I
deal with many cases impartially and legally without
coming into personal contact with my client.
-It won't do, Mr. Merrydew.
-Anything else?
-May I trouble you for
 a pencil and paper?
-Help yourself.
Mr. Busybody Holmes.
-By the way, I think you
should know that another client of yours met his
 death last night.
Mr. Malcolm Dearing.
Found murdered.
Good day, Mr. Merrydew.
Come, Watson.
Cold-blooded monster.
Well, I've given him
 something to think about.
-Did you see what I saw?
His feet.
-What about them?
-Well, they were small
 feet, and the boots--
-Well, well?
 -Were square-toed.
Square-toed!
 -Really?
-Yes, and-- and did you
 remark the brand of cigar?
-Cigar?
Trichinopoly.
It was stenciled in big
 letters on the top of the box.
-Is that all you observed?
-Was there anything else?
-100 things, among them
 the cipher to the code.
A large book, Watson.
-I saw no Bible.
-Would you call a "Whitaker's
 Almanac" a large book?
-Yes, indeed.
-In that book will be found
 the message of the numbers.
-Mr. Holmes.
-Mrs. Pyke.
-Holmes, what did you write
 on that sheet of paper?
-A long shot in
 the dark, Watson.
But it hit a bullseye.
-Miss Forrester lives
 here, I believe.
Tell her that Mr. Merrydew
 wishes to see her.
Mr. Thaddeus Merrydew.
And hurry.
-Mr. Merrydew calling
 to see you, Miss.
-Miss Forrester.
You're looking charming as ever.
I see you've
 received my flowers.
-Thank you.
-I sent them to soften the
 unexpectedness of my visit.
-You've come about the
 murder of Captain Pyke?
-No.
Have the police
 been pestering you?
-No.
-I was fortunate enough to
 keep your name out of it.
Have you seen today's papers?
Shocking, shocking.
Poor old gentlemen.
This is a very
wicked world we're living in, Miss Forrester.
Now, this will necessitate
 another meeting.
That's why I came
 myself to tell you.
Safer.
Too many eavesdroppers,
busybodies concerning themselves with other
 people's business.
[PHONE RINGING]
-The same time, the same place.
 Tomorrow night.
-Oh, please don't ask me to go
 to that dreadful place again.
-Well, unfortunately,
 in this case,
I'm a servant carrying
 out instructions.
You have nothing to worry about.
Not a thing.
Not a thing to worry about.
-Oh, hmm-- this-- this is my--
 Mr. Stanford, Mr. Merrydew.
-Remember.
I seem to see you everyplace.
-Who is that man?
-He's my lawyer.
-Hmm.
I remember seeing
 him the other night.
But what's he doing here?
-Oh, please don't begin
 that all over again.
-But Eileen, surely I
 have a right to know.
-Oh, John.
I'm so miserable.
It's something that
 concerns father.
Just before he died,
 he sent for me.
I remember his words.
On my death, you'll find
 yourself well provided for.
You'll be rich.
Remember this name.
He repeated it twice.
Merrydew.
Should he communicate with
you, follow his instructions, for through him will
 come this inheritance.
-And the meeting three days ago?
-Began the fulfillment
 of father's words.
-I think I'm beginning
 to understand.
[RAPPING ON DOOR]
-I thought I saw--
-John, John!
-He's a black-bearded
 man, ill-dressed.
Looked like a tramp.
-How tall?
-Oh, quite tall.
-Could you keep Miss
Forrester under observation without her knowing it?
-I don't understand.
Is Eileen in danger?
-In great danger.
You were wise in
 coming to see me.
Should anything unforeseen
 occur, get in touch with me.
Go to her.
Remember, get in touch with me.
[DOOR CLOSING]
-We are getting on, Watson.
-I'm glad to see you in
 a more cheerful mood.
-We've done remarkably well.
-I'm pleased.
I admit I could do with
 a little explanation.
I, too, feel a little curious.
-I considered the claims
 of "Whitaker's Almanac."
As I suspected, the
large number represented the page, the second, the
small number, the column, and the other
 figure's the message.
You'll find it
 decoded on the table.
[PLAYING VIOLIN]
-Meeting of scarlet ring.
Tuesday.
Limehouse.
M. Merrydew?
-Possibly.
Tomorrow will appear
in the personal column of the Daily Telegraph
 a second message.
A request for information.
 -Your message?
-My message.
-And the next step?
-The need of fresh air will
 take me in the country tomorrow.
In the meantime, relaxation.
Music.
I hope I won't bore you.
-Not if you make it soft.
-Ah, these is getting
 worser and worser.
-All you do is hope they
don't get more worser before they'll get less worser.
-Same as I say.
-That were a very bad
 business about Captain Pyke.
A very bad business.
-Same as I say.
I hear tell is
how the old Grange has gone under the hammer.
-Lock, stock and barrel.
-Same as I say.
-And I almost broke this
old back of mine weeding their old garden, and
to look at it now, you'd think I'd spent
 all my time in here.
-Morning, sir.
-Morning.
-Morning, morning.
How far is the Grange from here?
-Some will tell you four miles
 and some will tell you five.
But I say it's more than
 four and less than five.
-Is there any means of
 getting there besides walking?
-Bless your heart, yes, sir.
I've an hold trap.
I'll harness up old
Caesar and old Will here will drive you over.
-Will he take anything to drink?
-Wouldn't come amiss.
Scotch.
Scotch and splash.
-Put a bottle on the
table, some glasses, and a side for his soda.
-Coming, sir.
Coming.
Lord, love it if it was
 going to be busy again.
-You're a godsend to him, Sir.
He hasn't had a paying
 customer for a long time.
-I'll have a chit for
 you in a jiffy, sir.
Afore you can say Jack Robinson.
-Help yourself.
-Thank you, sir.
Just a little dropsy.
-Say when.
-When.
Well, here's to your
 very good health, sir.
Aww, feel like a new man, sir.
-Well, then I'll give
 the new man a drink.
-Right-o, sir.
Well, to your very
 good health again, sir.
-Good health.
Were you born in these parts?
-I've never seen none other.
Worked for the Pyke
family all my life until I got tired of working.
Got this old
backache from weeding their bloody old garden.
-Then you would remember
 the late Captain.
-And his father, and the old
 gentleman afore his father.
See that dent?
That belongs to Captain Pyke.
-A mark caused possibly
 by the imprint of a stone.
-And right you are, sir.
Many a good licking
young Master Robin got for chucking
 stones at me, sir!
-Sounds as though the
 young man was someone wild.
-Wild?
He was a holy terror.
-Ready and waiting, sir.
I've harnessed up old Caesar
 and he's raring to go.
-You must tell me some
 more on the way over.
Better bring the bottle.
-Right-o, sir.
Scotch is sure good
 for the backache.
Steady, Caesar.
 Steady.
He's hard to handle when
 he's raring to go, sir.
-You were saying?
-You can't make English gentry
out of the heathen Chinese, no how.
Not in these parts.
-Very difficult, I imagine.
When the captain was alive,
 did he stay here often?
-Until last Tuesday,
we ain't seen nothing on him to close
 nigh on two years.
-Hmm.
-Shall we, ah, have one, sir?
-You take two.
-Right-o, sir!
The old back feels
 better already, sir.
-Magic.
-There's the Grange now, sir.
-Any servants there now?
-Well, nothing what you might
 call real servants, sir.
There's Daffy
Dolly, and well, you might have to be
 to keep that place.
I kept it for 30 years.
-Stop a moment.
-Woah, Caesar.
-I'll walk the rest of the way.
I'm in a hurry.
Wait here for me.
-I won't budge an inch.
[BURP]
-I beg your pardon.
[BELL RINGING]
-Is your mistress in?
-No, sir.
-Where is she?
-London Town.
-I understand this
 house is for sale.
I may wish to buy it.
I'll look it over.
I'll look it over.
-That's the mistress.
Such a good looker.
Such eyes.
She walks like a cat.
Such a figure.
Such a fine bit of good.
-Buzz, buzz.
-Mistress sleeps here.
[PANTING]
-Aren't you feeling good?
-It's my heart.
Water.
 Quick!
-Just a minute.
Just a minute!
[KNOCKING ON WOOD]
-Drink this!
-I'm dying.
Do phone for a doctor!
 -Oh, dear!
We haven't got any
 phones in the house.
-Then go for one!
-Doctor's a good
 five miles away!
-Fetch him.
 Hurry!
Hurry!
Run!
-All right, I'll run, I'll run.
-It's so kind of you to come.
Knowing my late husband
 as intimately as you did,
I felt I could turn
to no better person to help me through
 this trying time.
-Well, you know,
 anything I can do.
-You are very nervous today.
-Well, I can't help it.
Look at my hands.
You know, I'm-- I'm
 trembling all over.
That'll stop the
 racket, at any rate.
-My late husband always spoke
of you in the warmest terms, and you know the high regard
 in which I've always held you.
-Oh, have you?
-Can you doubt it?
You are the only one who
 knows my husband's affairs.
Everything has been left in
 the most terrible disorder.
My house in the
 country will be sold.
I wonder, if you
 could spare the time--
-Yes?
-You could be my guest
 over the weekend.
And we could go through
 his papers together.
-Well, you know, with pleasure.
I could do with a
 bit of a change.
-We could drive down.
Would tonight be possible?
 -Tonight?
No.
You see, I've got an
 important meeting tonight.
-Then tomorrow?
-Tomorrow.
May-- may I make a
 little confession?
You know, Mrs. Pyke, I've
 always admired you tremendously.
-Who's there?
-Baker.
-Oh, it's you, is it?
-Who did you think it was?
Where are the others?
-I'm the first one here.
-There's a rat among us.
-Yes, and he's facing
 me, seated on a chair.
-Today someone has
 given away the code.
"Anyone supplying information
concerning the Scarlet Ring will be rewarded.
Apply Sherlock Holmes,
 221A Baker Street."
It's one of us.
 That's certain.
We can leave out [INAUDIBLE].
Can't be that dumb Chinaman.
There remains you,
 myself, and Merrydew.
-Well, it's not me.
 On my oath.
-Or me, I swear it.
-Menace.
-I thought that snake
 was double-crossing me.
-Well, it's getting
 on my nerves.
-It's now going
 to be a nightmare.
-First Murphy, then
 Pyke, then Dearing.
Who will be next?
Listen.
Suppose someone wants to supply
 information to Sherlock Holmes.
-Then it'll all come out.
-No, no.
Holmes is different
 from the police.
He protects clients.
-Holmes works with the police.
What's in the back of your mind?
-I want a fine carriage.
I want to leave.
The suspense is
 getting on my nerves.
It's killing me.
-What suspense?
Well, pray be seated, gentlemen.
I overheard your conversation.
It's most illuminating.
-We are not going on.
-No?
And why not, Frank?
-I don't want to
 die like Murphy.
-Or be found dead like Pyke.
 -No?
Perhaps you'd like to spend the
 rest of your lives in prison.
Hmm?
No, my friends.
Crime brought you
together, and by crime you will stick together.
Gentlemen, in a few more
days, the Scarlet Ring will cease to exist.
-We'll cease to exist, you mean?
-I have just received word
 from the agent of Antwerp.
The plunder has finally
 been disposed of.
This time next week, the
 principal will be in my hands.
A small, unimportant matter
of some 1 million pounds to be divided equally among us.
200,000 pounds apiece.
Ah.
200,000 pounds.
-And meanwhile?
-You've waited for five years.
What's a matter of a few days?
-Here, what guarantees that
 we'll be alive to receive it?
-None.
Of course, if it were a question
of your life without the money, it might be arranged.
-How?
-Letter in the form
of a deed of gift relinquishing your
right to any benefits accruing to the Society.
-And give up 200,000 pounds?
-It might ensure your life.
-I'll see you burn first.
[KNOCK ON DOOR]
-Shh.
Not a word.
Well, Miss Forrester.
 This is a pleasure.
Come in.
Would you sit down?
And now to business.
Miss Forrester and
gentlemen, again I have the pleasure of
 presiding at this meeting.
[PHONE RINGING]
-Hello?
One moment.
 A Mr. Standford.
-Yes?
 Where?
-Well, thank
 [INAUDIBLE] you've come.
I followed her here and
 phoned you immediately.
She went through the side door.
And there were four others.
A lawyer, two white men,
 strangers, and a Chinaman.
-When it comes, it
 won't come from the sky.
-Oh, shut up.
-Oh?
-I'm on fire.
Life's worth more
 to me than money.
-Yours may be.
Mine isn't.
Shall we walk to the
 station together?
-No, no.
 You go ahead.
-She's inside.
They've left her inside!
-Shh.
-Dash.
Check the door!
Eileen!
My darling!
-Get in the fresh air.
-God.
-You came in the nick of time.
Get her home.
Don't let her out of your sight.
 Go on.
-Arrest him, save me save me!
-Speaking as a medical man,
it is extremely dangerous to run at your age
 and with your weight.
-Could I-- could I have
 a glass of water please?
-Sit down.
-Oh, thank you.
I must apologize for bursting
 in like this, Mr. Holmes.
-I'm Dr. Watson.
I don't know when Mr.
 Holmes will be back.
Please wait.
-Thank you.
[KNOCK ON DOOR]
-Come in.
Sit down.
Cigarette?
Any luck?
Too bad.
I have here the securities.
Easily negotiable
 for a million pounds.
The Chinaman Ah Yet is
 devoted to his mistress.
Doubtless a generous
 purse will satisfy him.
On account of Holmes, I
cannot impress upon you too sufficiently the
 necessity for speed.
Everything must be finished
 tomorrow night at the Grange.
I will make all
 the arrangements.
-You've got to help me.
Mr. Holmes.
If you don't, I'm a doomed man.
Not 10 minutes ago, an
 attempt was made on my life.
You see, I live on Ebury Street.
I was on my way there.
I was about to
cross the road, and some instinct made me leap back.
As I did, a car, driven
with terrific speed and coming on the wrong side
 of the road, whizzed by me.
How I escaped was a miracle.
-Did you by any chance see
 the occupant of the car?
-Yes.
As it flashed by me, I caught
 a glimpse of the driver.
A black-bearded man.
-Is there anyone who would
 benefit by your death?
-Yes.
 Four persons.
You see, Mr. Holmes, there's
 an estate to be settled up.
And if I should go out,
 well, they get my share.
-Is any one of them capable
 of committing a crime?
-Yes.
Three of them.
-How much is your
 share of this estate?
-200,000 pounds.
-Naturally, you would
 wish to live to enjoy it.
When were you in China last?
-I was never in China.
-Come, come, sir.
Then the tattooing
 above the right wrist?
-Well, that-- that
 was done in England.
-You must be mistaken.
That particular yellow is
 to be found only in China.
What made you come to me?
-Well, you see, Mr.
 Holmes, I-- Well,
I'd heard of your reputation.
-How did you know my address?
Aren't you here in answer
 to my advertisement?
Were you not returning
 from Limehouse?
Are you not a member
 of the Scarlet Ring?
Is it not a fact that
three of your members have met with very
sudden ends and you're terrified lest their
 fate before you?
-Why, you must be
 the devil himself.
-Answer me.
-Yes, Mr. Holmes.
But I'm guiltless.
I'm up against some
power that no precaution can guard against.
-Go straight home and lock
 yourself in your house.
-But it's very old and
 easily broken into.
-Do you have a cellar?
-Bomb-proof.
-Hide there.
On second thought, we'll see
 what we've been [INAUDIBLE].
Take a revolver, Watson.
-So, do you think
 there's any hope?
-Obey my inspections
implicitly and I can promise you almost a chance.
Tomorrow, leave town.
-You see, Mr. Holmes,
 I get in pay today.
You see, I know it is
 a place in the country.
Very secluded.
Miles away from any place.
It belongs to the widow of
 an acquaintance of mine.
The lady is an
 Oriental, an Asiatic.
As a matter of
 fact, she's Chinese.
-Mrs. Pyke.
When you arrive at the
Grange near Sherbournes, you'll probably be given
 the room next to the lady.
You'll find a door
 connecting the two rooms.
Keep it locked.
Arrive there neither before
 nor later than 9 o'clock.
On your arrival,
 pretend a headache.
-Pretend one?
Oh, Mr. Holm.es
-Go straight to your room.
If you value your life,
 don't open the door.
-Baker!
They got him too.
 -Poison.
-Wait here, says he, for me!
And that's the last
 I've seen of him.
-A rake and a queer one.
Free with his money.
Same as I say.
-He must have been the
 picker when he was a lad.
Dolly ran all the way
to fetch Dr. Smallwood, and she and Smallwood
nigh burst a blood vessel trying to get to him.
And when they found
 him, he wasn't there.
And nary a one of them
 ever set eyes on him again.
-Same as I say.
Company!
Evening gentlemen, evening.
Up you get, Will, and
 make way for the gents.
Good evening, gentlemen.
 Good evening.
-Good evening.
 -Good evening.
-Take anything to drink?
-Wouldn't come amiss.
-Scotch and splash?
-Scotch and splash,
 how did you know, sir?
Thank you, sir.
-Give your order, gentlemen.
Put the bottle on the table,
 glasses, and [INAUDIBLE] soda.
-Right, sir.
 Bottle of whiskey.
Four glasses. [INAUDIBLE].
Gentlemen?
[CHATTERING]
-Four glasses.
-There you are, sir.
What brings you gentlemen
 round these here parts?
-This friend of mine belongs
 to the medical profession.
A patient of his has escaped.
An old gentleman of any
 dangerous character.
That's the reason for
 all these wardens.
-An old gentleman?
Wearing a cape?
Stoops a bit?
 Big in the belly?
-You've seen him?
-Have I seen him?
Yes, sir.
And Dolly at the Grange
seen him and Dr. Smallwood ought to have seen him but
 he never set eyes on him.
As sure as I'm
 standing here, sir.
He sat right there.
It was the day before yesterday.
-Doctor, we're on the right set.
 Say when.
-When.
Well, here's to your
 very good health, sir.
-Another beer?
Thank you very kindly, sir.
-Pay the bill, Watson.
And take care of this gentleman.
-Come along.
 What'll you have?
-Well, here's hoping
 that we get him.
-Who?
-Cash my buttons if I know.
My mind has never
 been in such a fog.
-It's time to leave.
-Gregson should be there by now.
We'll have the Grange so
well-surrounded a cat couldn't get through without being seen.
Come along, men.
-Mr. Holmes, something
 terrible has happened.
Miss Forrester has disappeared.
 -Disappeared?
But I told you to guard her.
-But I couldn't
 understand your telegram.
-Telegram?
 What telegram?
-Instructed me to
 meet you at Dover.
-Are you mad?
-I don't know, I'm
 almost insane with worry.
-Go on.
-When I arrived at Dover,
 I suspected it was a hoax.
I returned to
 London immediately.
Fortunately, I
 have a racing car.
Arriving there, I went
 straight to Eileen's house.
She'd gone.
A maid told me that she
left in the early afternoon with a strange woman.
-A Chinese woman?
-Yes.
I called you where you live.
When I gave my name
to your housekeeper, she told me where
 I could locate you.
Oh, Mr. Holmes, what
 could have happened?
Oh, where could she be?
-Come, Lestrade.
There's not a moment to lose.
-Mr. Holmes is late.
-Are you sure
 you're not mistaken?
-I have written instructions
 to bring you here.
You saw them.
-Perhaps the fog.
-I'm certain he'll be here.
If not tonight, then
 tomorrow morning.
[BELL RINGING]
 -Who's there?
-Strange.
I seldom--
-Stop!
You open that door, and I'll
 choke the life out of you.
-Mr. Wilson, have
 you lost your reason?
-Tell him if he opens
that door, he'll never live to open another. never live to open another.
 -Off you go.
-Off you go.
-Who is it?
 -Telegraph.
Telegraph for Miss Forrester.
-I'll give it to her.
 -All right.
-Good news?
Excuse me.
 -Here, what is it?
What is it?
-What does it mean?
-Dear, I'm going to bed.
Miss Forrester, when you go
 to your room, lock your door.
Shh-- And keep it locked.
-What's the matter?
-I'm rather chilly.
-Who's there?
-It's me, sir.
-Did you deliver the telegram?
-Yes, sir.
-To Miss Forrester herself?
-I gave it to one lady to
 give to the other, sir.
-Thank you.
 Good night.
-Good night, sir.
-Will you let me go to her?
-Wait.
-I'll never do it again.
-What?
-Stand about all
 night without a flask.
Look, Holmes.
Over there.
-Drop your gun.
Well, Inspector?
-I checked up on all points.
No one could have
 slipped through.
-Good night, my dear.
My bedroom is just
 across the corridor.
If you should want
me for anything, don't hesitate to call me.
-Thank you.
-Good night.
-Good night.
-Mr. Wilson, are you in bed?
-Yes, yes.
Sorry.
Good night.
-Good night.
-Who's that?
-Sir.
He's there.
Came by boat.
-When?
-15 minutes ago.
-Why didn't you
 let me know sooner?
-It's this fog.
Our men lost their bearings.
-At once to the
 front of the house.
Come, come.
-You stay here.
-Very good, sir.
-I thought you would never come.
-This cursed fog.
Where's the girl?
-At the end of the corridor.
-Good.
 Wilson?
-He's locked his door.
-Get him out.
Offer him any inducement.
-He's in the house.
[SCREAMING]
-Miss Eileen!
 That's Eileen!
-Mr. Wilson, quick.
Miss Forrester-- something
 terrible has happened.
-Eileen!
Eileen.
Eileen, my darling,
 are you all right?
WILSON: Help!
Murder!
Help!
-Break it down.
-I have--
-Halt!
Halt!
Halt!
-Are you all right?
 -Quite all right.
Thank you, Watson.
Take them downstairs.
-As I suspected.
 -Captain Pyke.
-You are charged with the
 murders of James Murphy,
Malcolm Dearing,
 and William Baker.
-And this woman?
-As an accomplice.
 Take them away.
-I saw him killed.
-You saw him pretend
 to be killed.
It was he who attacked you.
-He was shot.
-No shot broke that window.
He broke it himself.
-But the blood.
-Animal blood.
On a sponge.
Merrydew, of course,
 was in on it.
-Mr. Holmes, there's
 a second man outside.
Came by car.
I thought it my
 duty to detain him.
-Bring him in.
-Well, well, well, Mr. Holmes.
This is indeed a surprise.
-What are you doing here?
-Well, surely a man has a
 right to visit his own house.
I own the mortgage
 on this place.
I've invited some friends
down for the weekend to discuss some business.
-Won't do, Merrydew.
Arrest him.
-Well, this is rather a
 high-handed procedure.
What are the charges, Holmes?
-The gravest possible.
That of being accessory to
 the murders of James Murphy,
Malcolm Dearing,
and William Baker, and with the attempted
 murder of Javis
Wilson and Miss
 Eileen Forrester.
-Hmm.
Rather a tall indictment.
I think you'd better
 have the bracelets.
-May I help you?
-I've more than enough here.
-Then who can tell?
I say, who can tell?
-This will mean a
 promotion, Lestrade.
-I'm very grateful
 to you, Mr. Holmes.
But how you did it beats me.
-Simple enough.
Simple.
-Simple?
-By the examination of the
 footsteps in the garden of Mr.
Dearing's house, I was certain
 of the murderer's description.
You will remember the ring.
There was no mark to
indicate that it had remained on that finger for a
period of six years as stated by his mistress.
-His wife, you mean.
-Mistress, Watson.
Mistress.
-Well, you ought to know.
-And the Scarlet Ring?
-Perhaps you'll
remember the appearance of the Mandarin's gems
 in China some years ago.
-Perfectly.
-To realize on gems of
international repute to be a ticklish matte?
 -Very.
They'd have to be
broken up piece by piece and then disposed of
 carefully and slowly.
-Exactly.
The Scarlet Ring was
formed by the instigators of the original crime to
 protect the receiving end.
-And what was Pyke's motive?
-Greed.
The last survivor will
become the recipient of the entire booty.
I think it will
be found that Pyke was the original ringleader.
But Mr. Wilson could furnish
 us with an answer to that.
-Not one word.
-We shall never forget
 you, Mr. Holmes.
-Rather not, sir.
-You must invite
 me to the wedding.
-Perhaps you'll give me away.
-I appreciate the
compliment, but I never give a lady away,
 except professionally.
Come, Doctor.
They'll send for you
 when they need you.
[THEME MUSIC]
- Oh!
- Sorry!
This way.
Two of you, smash it down.
Get ready, boys.
See what you can find.
- See what there is in there, Sergeant.
- Yes, sir.
- Inspector.
- Yes?
- There's a body in here.
- A what?
Murder, eh?
Huh? Wh-What is it? What's the matter?
- Tell her I'll ring her back in five minutes.
- Come along.
I say, this is a bit thick.
This is a bit thick.
Prancing without a word of warning into a man's private bedroom.
Come along, now. This isn't a bedroom, and it certainly isn't yours.
The significance of that uniform doesn't escape me.
But to prance in on a man in his pajamas is...
Oh.
I see your point.
I shall have to take your particulars.
Name, please.
Certainly. My name's...
Ehrm... name's...
By Jove! It's gone.
- Come along, don't try that.
- Bad show, quite gone.
I'll give you one more chance.
Who are you?
I-I c-can't remember.
Am I Smith, am I Jones?
I couldn't be Goldberg.
- What's your business here?
- I'm not engaged in business.
I am not engaged in business.
Is it King? Kingfisher? Fish?
Foch?
How did you come to be in these offices?
- Hello?
- I beg your pardon.
- I came here to see a fellow.
- Can't recollect if you saw him?
I didn't see him... but I've an impression that he saw me.
- You're in a very compromising situation.
- I object to that adjective.
- You've been found on suspected premises...
- Quite.
- Can't explain why...
- Quite.
- Don't know who you are, why you came here.
- Quite.
Do you know where you're going?
- At a rough guess, Scotland Yard.
- Quite.
Come along.
- Oh, the paper.
- Search for missing plane abandoned.
You can't do that. You're under arrest.
If a man's lost his memory, has he lost the two o'clock?
Wait a minute!
- What won the two o'clock?
- Sir Eaglemore.
- And the two-thirty?
- Maiden's Kiss.
Give him the paper.
Thank you, Inspector. Er...
In!
Come in.
Inspector Davis, sir.
Yes, Inspector?
We found this man asleep at 15 Humphrey
Street, sir. He refused all information.
There were no identification marks but we found this bunch of skeleton keys on him.
Take him straight to Major Hammond,
Air Ministry DI5.
Magnificent, nabbed the lot.
- Come on.
- Good day.
Inspector Davis, sir.
Morning, Inspector. What's all this?
This man was arrested in the Humphrey Street operation.
He's to be handed over to Major Hammond for interrogation.
Oh, I see. Well, he's just come in.
- Get Major Hammond to sign for him.
- I'll sign for him.
- Keep an eye on him, won't you?
- Don't worry, Inspector, I know the type.
- This way, please.
- Oh, a second. My umbrella.
Thank you.
What do you mean, you know the type?
What's Major Hammond been doing to be brought to be questioned by him?
Getting hit on the head like a clumsy amateur.
- What's the time?
- A little after four.
Get me Portman 2323.
Have a look at that, will you?
- So they've abandoned the search.
- Yes. Can you beat it?
Hello?
Daphne, my darling, I'm sorry. I shan't be able to have tea with you this afternoon.
What?
But, Charles, I'm all ready to go.
Oh, I'm sure you look beautiful.
But I just can't make it.
We'll have dinner together tomorrow night.
And wear that new dress you told me about.
But, Charles, there's something very, very important I have to tell you.
Tell me tomorrow, my sweet. Must dash now.
I'll call for you at eight.
Why have they abandoned the search?
Because they think it's just another accident. Come here.
March 15th, a French Hirondelle on test off Toulon - lost, an accident.
4th April, a double day bomber lost off Los Angeles - accident.
May 19th.
From Kronstadt in Russia, the Radensky bomber disappears - another accident.
All these machines were carrying valuable experimental apparatus.
Last week, off the Firth of Forth, Barrett &
Ward test their Tornado Super X. Vanishes.
Accident.
September 20th, London.
Major Hammond makes an ass of himself trying to find out why.
- Another accident?
- Almost a catastrophe.
Yes, fools walk in where angels fear to tread.
The world's full of wise men and only three fools, three fools who don't think they were accidents -
Monsieur Gambetta from France,
Robert Hooker of the United
States Intelligence, and your humble servant.
Ask Marshal Gosport if he could see me, would you?
- He can't be disturbed, sir.
- Who's with him?
- Mr Barrett of Barrett & Ward.
- The plane manufacturer?
Yes, and I gather he rather resents our enquiries at his factory.
And I rather resent Mr Barrett.
- Where'll you be?
- Disturbing Gosport.
- Marshal Gosport's not to be disturbed.
- Right.
In my opinion, the only thing...
Sorry, Marshal,
I understood you were disengaged.
All right, Hammond, come in.
This is one of my ablest men.
Hammond was pressing for this investigation of your factory.
Just because a firm has a government subsidy, the slightest accident sees swarms of you Secret Service fellas nosing about, putting the wind up the workers - industry's becoming unworkable.
- The point is...
- I know the point. You can save your breath.
Service and civil airplanes crash every day, hundreds in a year.
But you don't spy on the Royal Air Force or liner companies.
We're engaged in dangerous experimental work.
One airplane hasn't come back and you're on us like a ton of bricks.
Out it all comes in the press - inefficiency, sabotage in aircraft factories. Monstrous!
- The press have to have a good story.
- It's not good for me.
Every operation in my factory is under my supervision.
I tell you, everything's absolutely OK!
- Have a cup of tea.
- I never touch the stuff.
- If you've got a spot of whisky...
- Certainly.
I appreciate your feelings and like your point about the whisky.
Sorry I got overheated, but we industrialists are splitting our shorts to help you official fellows out of the spot you got in over rearmament.
It's a bit hard if you come down on us like this.
A few months ago, there was a disappearance of a high-speed aircraft off the Isle of Wight.
Thank you. It went up, never returned, not a trace was found, and not even a fragment of wreckage washed up.
In the past year, machines on test flight have disappeared from Bordeaux, Toulon,
Los Angeles, Kronstadt - all these machines carrying valuable secret apparatus.
Is that coincidence?
There he goes, there he goes.
I sympathize with you fellas.
Your job's sensationalism, and you look at things like a melodrama.
- I forgive you.
- We hope you won't forget us.
Thank you, gentlemen, I'll keep you posted.
If I need you, I'll send for you.
Meanwhile, carry on.
So more machines are to disappear into the blue.
I think it would be a good idea for you to cast your eye over his plant. Unofficially, of course.
I'll give you every facility, but if he finds you out, you're acting against instructions.
- The Nelson touch.
- He's testing out the new QE97 tomorrow.
I've detailed Commander Robertson.
Accompany him.
After all, in my position, I've got to go slow with these industrial magnates.
The safety of the country depends on their goodwill.
Their goodwill extends about as far as their subsidies.
Viking off on another job, eh?
She's been commissioned to recover gold from the Panther.
Panther? I remember, she went down with all hands in 1922 in a fog.
Yes, and she went down deep.
This is a tough job.
Urgent message from the Viking, sir.
- Well, Carl?
- A wireless message from the Viking, sir.
They've located the Panther and start diving at once.
- You've notified Lloyd's?
- It's all clear.
But I haven't told them the Viking's in position.
Why not? You know the regulations.
It is difficult enough to do business here when one observes the regulations.
- When one does not...
- I'll let them know at once.
Please. This is the most important commission this company has had. Much depends on it.
Could I have a word with you, Mr Barrett?
Certainly, McVane. Come along. What is it?
- Shall I go, sir?
- No, Jenkins, stay here.
Get if off your chest, McVane.
- I'd very much like to take up the new ship.
- So would the other lads.
- But after what happened to Griggs...
- We won't discuss that.
- The crew will be chosen by lot.
- But I'm the only unmarried pilot here.
Time will cure that, no doubt.
We won't argue that, McVane.
He's a pig-headed old so-and-so.
- What?
- I know you're the best pilot we've got, McVane.
How do you manage that?
Have you ever been up in the air?
It's obvious. All the fellows say so.
Barrett's keeping you back cos you're not a yes man.
If you're thinking of changing your job,
I can easily get you fixed up.
- Well... thanks.
- Here's my card. Drop in and have a chat.
25 Elder Street.
Thanks.
Well, she's ready to go, sir.
She's a nice job, a beautiful job.
Ideal conditions. She should jump up the record several notches.
Jenkins, have you got those instructions?
Here they are, sir, sealed as you directed.
- What about the crew?
- I'll see to that.
We can't take too many precautions.
- Air Ministry plane arriving.
- Good.
We'll get off just after he lands.
Come along and meet him.
- How do you do, Commander?
- Mr Barrett.
- Our designer, Mr Pollock.
- How do you do?
The ship's just over here, if you'd come along, sir.
L 58)'-
- Will she be all right here?
- Yes, we'll move her up for you.
Thank you.
- Got a cigarette?
- Yes.
- Thanks.
- That's all right.
What would you like?
Whisky, but I shall have to have some of your rotten tea.
We have two kinds of rotten tea.
Indian or China?
Pretty fresh for a new girl.
- All new things should be fresh.
- Skip it, and bring me some coffee.
- They're having the test flight today, aren't they?
- It's only a rumour.
Who's to be pilot?
How do I know?
Suspense getting on your nerves, huh?
Keeping us standing around like this for hours on end. It's like going over the top.
You can hardly blame them for being cautious after losing poor Griggs and that crew.
That was before you came here, wasn't it?
Yes, I heard about it.
He must have been very popular.
Yeah.
Your best friend?
Yes.
What do you think happened?
If they'd give me that plane today, maybe I'd be able to answer.
Get at the real truth, huh?
- Two more cups of tea, beautiful.
- Coming up, handsome.
That's the first thing she's got right.
- Hello, McVane. Anything fresh?
- Yeah.
She'll learn. Well, what did the old man say?
"The crews will be chosen by lot."
It seems such a dumb way to go on.
Puts the wind up everybody.
I expect every clerk in Whitehall knows which of us is going up and in what.
I expect we'll read it in the papers.
They have no difficulty finding out.
Other people than the newspapers know what goes on.
- The black hand at work.
- Griggs knew when he went up.
Somebody else knew too.
That's why he didn't come back.
Are you suggesting Griggs sold out?
Aeroplanes don't just go into the air and stay there!
Now, now, boys, no tailspins in the canteen.
How are you, rat poison?
I'd like a packet of cigarettes, a box of matches... and a kiss.
Cigarettes, matches...
That'll be one shilling, please.
- You're a nice little bit, aren't you?
- I'm my mother's favourite child.
She'll have you back on her hands soon.
Shut up, Jenkins. She only started today.
And she finishes tonight.
- Who's that?
- That's Jenkins.
- Barrett's confidential clerk.
- Nice person.
Yes, charming. I'm sorry you got the sack.
It doesn't matter. I'm used to it.
Stand by, please. Stand by, please.
The following to report immediately to No.5 hangar on special duty.
Pilot, John Peters... Pilot, John Peters.
- Now we know.
- Well, good luck, John.
Observer, J Nicholl's...
- Observer, J Nicholls...
- Well, sorry, boys.
Navigation Officer, R Mackenzie.
- Navigation Officer, R Mackenzie.
- Thais me, boys.
- Let me have your book.
- Don't lose my place.
And Wireless Operator, C Scott.
- Well, here we go, boys.
- Best of luck, lads.
Wireless Operator, C Scott.
So the lot didn't fall on Elisha after all, eh?
Peters didn't seem keen on going.
He was mumbling about presentiments.
Why have they broken up the crews? Your sparks, my observer, Wilson's navigator.
They think each crew's in the pay of a different government.
If they mix us all up, we shan't be able to agree which foreign power to sell out to.
Here's the course, Peters.
Take things easy.
We don't know what you may run into.
- I understand.
- Get off and good luck.
Thank you.
QE97 calling... QE97 calling...
Visibility good.
Visibility good. Climbing for speed test.
Climbing for speed test.
Cloud level 5,000. Cloud level 5,000.
Airspeed 225.
Airspeed 225 miles per hour.
- 225 miles an hour.
- She's got the old type beat.
- Much the same.
- You're too modest by half.
Off Land's End and making for open sea.
Off Land's End. Making for open sea.
The plane should be along anytime now.
Hello, Ray Room. Let us know immediately you intercept the plane's wireless.
Report immediately you intercept the plane's wireless.
I've got them. Coming through now, sir.
Do not lose them. Bridge.
Ray Room's hearing their wireless reports now.
Good.
Stand by for speed test.
Stand by for speed test.
Airspeed 302 mites per hour.
Airspeed 302 mites per hour.
Speed now... 302 miles an hour.
Speed now... 302 mites an hour.
17,000 metres, south by southwest.
Make sure there are no other ships near us.
Airspeed 330 miles per hour.
- Speed now 330.
- She'll do it! She'll do it!
330 miles an hour.
Speed now 330 miles an hour.
330 miles an hour.
Aircraft approaching, bearing Green 27.
Aircraft approaching, bearing Green 27.
Aircraft approaching, Green '27.
Aircraft approaching, bearing Green '27.
Radio transmission received from aircraft E97.
Radio transmission received from aircraft E97.
E97 now coming through on screen of Control Tower.
E97 now coming through on screen of Control Tower.
Bridge.
The plane's in focus now.
Right.
Control Tower reports plane in focus, sir.
Turn on the ray.
Aircraft E97 coming into range on the ray.
Aircraft E97 coming into range on the ray.
- Three-five.
- Speed now 350.
Inform, please, ray is switched on.
All ready, sir.
Contact!
- We've got it!
- Good!
- Both engines cut. Report.
- The set's dead. Something's blown.
Contact with Peters is completely out sir.
We'll have to bail out.
Keep on trying, man.
It must be only a radio breakdown.
I hope so.
Dump as much petrol as you can.
- There's a ship below.
- What is it?
Looks like a dredger.
I hope he brings her down gently.
- We'll circle and pancake down to her.
- Good.
Hope she won't have to dredge for us.
- Clear away forward derrick.
- Boatswain!
Aye aye, sir.
Clear away the forward derrick and stand by!
Aye aye, sir.
Clear away the hatches and prepare the derricks!
- How was that, lads?
- A mother couldn't put a baby down gentler.
- They're coming.
- Any way to get aboard?
What happened to these engines?
We'll bring her alongside the plane.
Slow ahead both.
Slow ahead both.
' Stop! ' Stop.
- Swing out the derricks and bring her aboard.
- Swing out the derricks!
Aye aye, sir.
Make her fast and heave away.
Make her fast and heave away!
She's a beauty.
All right, get down.
- Looks like a proper rescue.
- Get down.
Boatswain! Take them below.
Aye aye, sir.
Absolutely no trace, sir.
I've drawn a blank everywhere.
Hello. We've lost contact with Peters.
Last reported ten miles out to sea off
Land's End. Send up every plane and search.
McVane, McVane, Peters has faded out, ten miles off Land's End!
- Did he radio any trouble?
- Not a word. They were doing 440 when the whole works cut out.
- If they're down, they're sure to be picked up.
- No, he's gone the same way as Griggs.
Stand by. AH pilots and mechanics to report outside the west hangar.
That's us, boys!
I'm glad it wasn't you, Mr McVane.
What does it matter who it was?
What about Peters?
- Was he married?
- Yes.
- Any children?
- A boy and a girl.
- Where do they live?
- In Highgate... Why do you want to know?
Just curious. Aren't you going to look for them?
Of course, we're all going!
But it's too late!
Let me know what happens.
You'll read it in the papers.
Spread over the course fanlike.
McVane, keep dead on it. The others will be five miles apart on either side.
Now get off.
Yes, it's one of our planes, all right.
It's A-B-T-D.
That's McVane, looking for us.
Wish he could find us.
The searching plane asks whether we've seen E97.
- Report we have seen nothing.
- We've seen nothing.
Oh, he's off.
I see. All right, thanks.
The Air Ministry have said they have a search patrol standing by.
- They won't act until your last pilot has reported.
- They have, except McVane.
What's he playing at?
The rest have been back an hour.
- Perhaps he's found something.
- Think so?
- Plane landing, Mr Barrett.
- That'll be McVane.
Well?
Come on, man, what did you find?
Didn't you find anything?
What the blazes have you been doing?
What do you think? Joyriding?
I've been over the course half a dozen times - not a trace.
The Savonia outward bound, a few trawlers and the Viking on a salvage job.
- None of them reported a thing.
- No sign of oil?
When you didn't come back, we thought you'd found something.
Your optimism is touching! That plane was lost when it left the ground.
What are you suggesting?
Let's get this thing straight.
You're criticizing the pilot.
I see your game!
No, that pilot was one of the best you had.
- He's trying to say the plane isn't airworthy.
- No, the plane was 100%.
- What are you insinuating?
- It's obvious to anyone but you.
You won't admit the fact that there's something very wrong with your factory.
Those planes didn't just disappear.
Enough, McVane! This is a very serious charge at a moment like this!
You've said this before in front of witnesses.
Lucky for you I don't take you to court.
Keep your eyes off the yellow press and your mouth shut!
You'd like everybody's mouth shut!
If you've anything more to say, say it off my payroll!
Do you want me any more tonight, sir?
Is there anything else I can do tonight?
Tell me what's happened to my plane.
As a matter of fact, sir, if you could excuse me,
I know the wives of the men pretty well and I thought I might prepare them for the bad news.
- It isn't certain. There's still hope.
- Yes, sir.
Even then, I thought it might be kinder...
Do what you like. Get out of here.
Well, what do you make of it, eh?
Losing two aeroplanes, one after the other.
It must be some defect. It must be!
There can't be anything in that nonsense about enemy agents.
- Perhaps it isn't nonsense.
- What if it is enemy agents, and they have got that new supercharger?
- What supercharger?
- The one we were trying out.
- It wasn't on the aeroplane.
- What are you talking about?
- You sent instructions to have it changed.
- Are you mad?
- Here's your note.
- I never sent any note.
- You signed it.
- I never signed anything.
- That isn't my signature.
- Then whose is it?
It's mine.
What the blazes are you doing here?
I shared your view as to the importance of the supercharger, so I removed it for this flight.
- Did you fellows know anything about this?
BOTH: No.
I resent your intrusion in my factory, Hammond.
I won't say any more, as you saved a valuable piece of apparatus.
But in view of your means of achieving your end...
In view of your attitude... l don't think I'll come in. Good night.
Well, are you going to sit here all night?
Have you any objection?
No. Are you all right?
Yes, thank you. Why wouldn't I be?
- I was worried about you.
- Why?
The others had been back for over an hour and I thought something had happened.
I see.
That was very kind of you.
- No news, I suppose?
- Nothing.
Vanished.
- Could they have drifted off their course?
- Not possible.
- Scott was reporting to the Control Tower till...
- Till what?
Look here, why do you ask so many infernal questions?
Just wanted to know.
- Do you mind if I ask just one more question?
- Well?
What are you going to do now?
I ought to go to Whitehall and create such a stink with the Air Ministry that Barrett and half the British
Intelligence department are liquidated!
What I'm going to do is to get drunk.
Mind if I join you?
No... l don't mind.
I don't mind who I'm with tonight.
- I'll change and meet you in the car park.
- Right.
Centre 6000.
News editor, please.
Kay Lawrence here.
Hello, Kay. All right, go ahead.
Continuation of plane disappearance story.
Radio cutout as plane attaining maximum speed.
Radio has questioned all ships in vicinity, but plane not sighted.
Factory squadron wide search fruitless.
Last search plane just returned, have questioned Chief Test Pilot McVane.
Won't talk but suspects sabotage.
Missing crew:
Pilot, John Peters...
Observer, J Nicholls...
Navigation, R Mackenzie. Radio, C Scott.
- Peters married. Two children.
- One girl, one boy.
I'm spending the evening with McVane.
Will ring later.
Good. Follow it up for all it's worth and I'll hold space.
OK.
So that's it.
Just a rotten little newspaper woman.
On the contrary, rather a good one.
Just a lying little sneak, playing the sympathetic girlfriend to a bunch of fellows half mad because their pals have cracked up doing a decent job.
I'm trying to do a decent job too.
Spying on people's private lives, so illiterate scribblers can serve up sensational trash with the morning bacon.
The public have a right to know the truth.
Who employs you? Who pays the bill for your smug flying-field superiority?
The public.
Sounds fine and dandy. Noble.
- Go ahead, justify your pay cheque.
- Do you think I like writing about Peters?
I knew them. Do you think they got a square deal? Do you?
Didn't you say you ought to go to the Air Ministry, if you had the nerve?
But you haven't. You'll get drunk, so I'm doing the only thing I can.
If you won't tell the authorities,
I can tell the public.
Their best pilots are sacrificed to obstinacy and somebody's pride.
Griggs, Peters, and maybe you tomorrow.
Yes, you tomorrow - what about that?
At least I wouldn't have to see you again.
Come in.
Just had a code message through from the Viking. They didn't get the plane.
They did - it is even in the newspapers.
They got a plane, but the new supercharger wasn't fitted to it.
- What is your explanation?
- Perhaps Jenkins can explain when he arrives.
Jenkins? You do not think he will walk out?
No... at least, not until he's paid.
Hm.
This is extremely serious, gentlemen.
Now we shall have to wait for another test flight.
To wait may mean the Tower of London.
But to go back without the supercharger would mean...
- Yes'?
- Jenkins.
Bring that chair. And you, let him in.
Sorry I'm late. I had difficulty getting away from the office.
- Everything went marvellously, didn't it?
- Marvellously.
Supposing we talk a bit of business, eh?
Certainly. Sit down.
Now, Jenkins, what exactly is your game?
Game? You got the plane, it's in the papers.
There were no newspapermen aboard the ship.
Salvage costs money.
Our salvage costs a great deal of money.
Besides, it is dangerous.
I do not like to sacrifice good lives on account of wrong information.
Wrong information?
The new supercharger was not on that plane.
What? But I... I don't understand.
No, neither do we.
Well, you don't think that l...?
- No, we don't think.
- We are sure.
Well, naturally,
I'll investigate, I'll make enquiries...
You will do nothing. You have already done enough. You are lying.
- I'm not, I swear.
- Shut up.
- What do you want me to do?
- Put yourself in a safe place, if you can.
Now, get out!
- There he is.
- Let him have it!
- No, no, not here.
- He's going round the corner.
Follow him.
You shouldn't do things like that.
You ought to be careful.
- But...
- Don't take it so much to heart.
A miss is as good as a mile.
But don't you see? They meant to get me.
Look here, let's calm down a bit.
Let's go for a little walk.
Who... Who meant to do what?
I had a row with those men. They followed me round in that car and tried to run me over.
It's my business. Let me go.
That's no way to treat a man who snatched you from the jaws of death.
You're a trifle rattled, but I think
I know a cure for that. Come inside.
Er... two double brandies, please, miss.
There's four beers and two ales in front of you.
- My friend isn't feeling very well.
- Oh... he does look a bit off.
- That should settle your complaint.
- What complaint?
I never saw anyone so petrified with fear in my life.
- Neat?
- Very neat.
Now, drink that down and have another.
You must admit we're doing our best to nurse you back to health.
I don't see why you want to bother about me.
My weakness - can't keep my nose out of other people's business.
- I'd advise you to keep yours out of mine.
- In a jam?
- Supposing I am?
- You were running away from something...
- or was it someone?
- What's your line of business?
I used to do a spot of flying.
Not that you'd know anything about that.
Oh? What are the odds?
Do you work for Barrett & Ward?
- Have you seen me before?
- I've seen a lot of you recently.
Been... following me?
No, I've been waiting for you to come home.
You live at 25 Elder
Street, across the road.
Are you a copper?
No, if I were, you'd be very glad to see me.
Or would you rather see some of those other friends of yours?
What do you mean?
If I were a copper, I'd lock you up for giving away your country's secrets.
As it is, I'm more interested in the people paying you.
They'll bump you off, Jenkins.
Then, of course, you know that, don't you?
What do you want me to do?
I'll do anything.
Supposing we go to your place and have a little chat.
Come along.
You'd never have got a word out of me if it hadn't been...
Come in.
- Sit down.
- Ah, comfortable.
You'd never have got a word out of me if it hadn't been for that dirty lot of rats.
How many rats?
Oh, plenty.
Was one of them... a lady rat?
As a matter of fact, there is a girl.
She's marvellous.
I can't get her out of my mind.
I can't do anything because of her.
I can't eat or sleep or... or think.
Hello, hello.
Daphne, my darling, sorry, I shan't be able to have dinner with you tonight.
But, darling, I'm all ready to go!
I'm sure you look beautiful but I can't make it.
We'll go riding tomorrow.
I'll call for you at eight.
There's something I must tell you.
Tell me tomorrow, I can't stop now.
I'll call for you at eight.
Oh. Ls Mr Jenkins here?
- Yes.
- Can I see him?
He's er... lying down at the moment.
- Oh.
- Are you a pal of his?
- Well, I know him.
- Good show, good show.
Why?
Got an appointment with him?
He asked me to come and see him.
He's a clerk where I work.
Barrett & Ward's. Good show.
You seem to be very well up in everything.
News gets round.
Look here, I want to see Mr Jenkins.
And so you shall.
Stop that. Dial 999.
Hello. Miss? The police, please.
Hello?
Hello, is that the police?
I'm at 25 Elder Street.
A man's been shot and I've got the fellow who did it. Send someone.
- And bring a van.
- And bring a van.
- Why a van?
- We don't want to walk, do we?
I suppose you realise the spot you're in?
I daresay I caught you at rather an awkward moment.
Yes, very. I was just trying to think.
You realise this man was shot by a bullet fired through that window?
Where do you come in?
I'm the bloke looking for the missing planes.
I have an official status but I don't carry a truncheon.
You just carry a gun.
If you'll examine that gun, you'll see it's not been fired.
Oh.
Well, why was he killed?
To account, rendered and fully paid, for one aeroplane and four lives.
You mean Jenkins gave the show away?
Exactly.
And now we know so much about each other, perhaps you'll let me have my gun back.
You know, old boy, to fire this gun, you must release the safety catch.
- Good night, Inspector.
- It's been charming.
Oh, a second!
Thanks.
Come and meet Blenkinsop.
He's a perfect swine.
- Good evening, Blenkinsop.
- Evening, sir.
Rather late, but we have your white tie laid out.
- We can lay it away again.
- Have we forgotten our engagement?
- We've cancelled it.
- We'll lose our young lady if we're not careful.
We'll lose our gentleman's gentleman if we don't mind our own business.
- Some whisky?
- Lots of it.
Pity about Jenkins getting bumped off, poor fellow.
It happened a moment too soon, that's the point.
He was about to talk.
We might have had something to go on.
- It's about time you did.
- Huh?
Look here. Barrett & Ward build the best aeroplanes in the world.
The best fellows in the world drive the guts out of them so we can build better ones, risking their necks for a few pounds a week.
Then eight of our boys and two machines disappear, and a bloke gets murdered.
You Secret Service chaps are waiting for something to go on - not very slick.
Working miracles is pan of our daily job. You're like the press and a lot of other people.
You say, "The Secret Service is lying down on us. Sack the lot of them." The...
- Good evening, miss.
- Major Hammond in?
- Yes, but he's busy at the moment.
- I'll wait.
But...
"Secret Service fooled by foreign agents. British espionage in the pay of foreign powers."
- Excuse me, sir.
- You're excused.
- I know the girl who wrote this trash.
- What?
Got herself taken on as a waitress at our place.
Got on with the fellows, pretending to sympathize, and she was a newspaper reporter ferreting out the inside dope.
- She was at your canteen posing as a waitress?
- Yeah, why not put a stop to that sort of thing?
I will. H! Put a stop to it this very night.
- Sir!
- Sir to you. Go away.
- I've stood enough from this young female.
- And she's not a bad-looking girl.
If she'd been on the level,
I might have fallen for her.
- She wants a darn good spanking!
- Spanking. If I had my way...
You there... Why didn't Blenkinsop tell me?
Yes, sir.
Did I or did I not tell you I wanted everything connected with this Q Plane case kept out of your wretched little news rag?
You did, darling.
Then kindly explain with what precise object you thought fit to go back on our understanding.
I didn't know there was one.
You can hardly call jumping up and down and telling me to be quiet every time I speak an understanding.
If so, I'm afraid it was a misunderstanding - on your pan.
Anything published about the case is a handicap to me in the prosecution of my profession.
And my profession as a journalist?
You can't compare the relative importance of our professions.
How dare you! A job's a job.
Just because I happen to do mine efficiently, and you don't, that's your affair.
Don't expect me to get a new job. You get one. Something you can do - a bartender.
Change my job! This is my sister.
Now, look here, Kay, this is serious.
- This is McVane, one of Barrett & Ward's pilots.
- We've met.
Yes, we've met. Your sister?
We all have our burdens to carry. Now...
I don't mind you entertaining crooks or drunks or people from your club, but I draw the line at ill-mannered prigs!
Yes, well, I'd have done anything to help you, Hammond, old man, but if it means coming into contact with this heartless, two-faced our Miss Fleet Street 1938, you can count me out.
I've met some queer specimens since I took up reporting, but never once...
We know all about them. We've read about their private lives, what they think...
- Stop, please.
- Go on. I'm on your side. I'd like to say...
- You'll find it all over the front page.
- You won't find that on the front page.
But you will find that it takes more than a thin pilot and a fat Secret Service agent to muzzle the press.
And if they lie down on their jobs and planes get pinched from under their noses, we'll see what a two-faced, female reporter can do about it! Good night!
There you are.
There's the modern woman for you.
She's a grand girl, isn't she?
Women. Women - what should we do without them?
I tell you, McVane,
I love everything about them.
Their touching loyalty, their astonishing self-sacrifice.
And their still more astonishing sacrifice of everybody else.
Their modesty, their conceit.
Their preposterous dress, their ridiculous hats.
Their silly little handbags with a pathetic little bunch of things they carry around inside them.
Little purses, mirrors... sticky lipsticks, nonsensical compacts.
Compacts.
- Blenkinsop!
- Sir.
- We're going out. A white tie and tails.
- But I've just laid them away.
- What? You knew I was going out.
- You told me you'd cancelled it.
How could I have cancelled it, when I've only just thought of it?
Excuse me, sir.
Is there anything I can do for you?
Yes, I've called to see Miss Sonia... erm... Miss Sonia...
- Do you mean Miss Sonia Blake, sir?
- Miss Blake, that's it. Miss Blake.
- Is she expecting you?
- Oh, yes.
- And your name is...?
- I'm her friend Mr Jenkins.
- Oh, no. You're not Mr Jenkins.
- Yes, I am.
- Oh, no, sir.
- Oh, yes. Really, look here.
Here's my card.
Well, maybe you are a bit like Mr Jenkins.
- Aha.
- I'll just ring, sir.
- Good show, good show.
- Yes, been running for six months.
- Oh, must be... a good show.
- Oh, it is a jolly good show.
Er... A Mr Jenkins is here.
What's that? Oh, coming right down, sir.
- Mind if I use your mirror?
- Help yourself.
Y'all wanna see me?
Er... Oh, er...
Are you Miss Sonia Blake?
- No. She's a little fat girl.
- Oh. Do you think I could see her?
- Does she wanna see you?
- It's a surprise.
- Miss Blake don't like surprises.
- I still hope she might like me.
Yes, sir. I think she's gonna like you all right. Come with me.
That's her, that's talking.
Miss Sonia's always talking.
A well-educated girl from one of the best families in Kansas.
Setting out in the world, full of lovely ideals and beautiful thoughts.
Working myself to the bone, giving my best to the public and my employers.
Struggling with a lot of dumb managers who are too stupid to recognise the talents of a real artist.
And then... along comes Cupid and steals into my tired heart.
And what happens? The silly dumb guy goes and gets himself bumped off.
It's cruel. It's heartless.
It's inconsiderate.
It's terrible.
Here was me, all lit up with love for the guy.
Why, I'd even decided to sacrifice my an and marry him.
- Why did he get bumped off?
- I don't know.
- I haven't any idea.
- Must've got mixed up in something crooked.
- If he did, he didn't tell me anything about it.
- What was his business?
Oh, he was a gold diver or something.
A gold diver?
He said something about going down and digging up gold from the bottom of the ocean.
What do you mean, digging up gold from the ocean?
- Don't ask me.
- Who do the police think did it?
They don't know.
They've asked me thousands of questions.
I don't know anything about it.
All I know is, I sure did love that guy. I don't know how I'm gonna face life without him.
- Did you see Miss Sonia?
- Yes, I did.
Would you give her that, please?
- Yes, sir. Sure.
- Thank you.
- 19 Dover Square.
- Did you see her?
Yes, I saw her. She's a perfect blank.
Right.
- Less enthusiasm, please. This is Britain.
- Well, a story's a story - and is this a story!
- If it's yours, it's all lies.
- Isn't that what you want?
- Jenkins was in Barrett & Ward's?
- Yes. He sacked me.
- And you murdered him.
- Yes.
- It wouldn't surprise me.
- I can take it across the street, it's a scoop.
Plane disappears. Secret Service man on the premises. Major Hammond baffled.
Scoop? It's a steam shovel!
Hey, hold that front page!
Follow it up. Get to the works.
Find out about Jenkins.
You're onto the biggest thing since that film star was bitten by an oyster.
- And I love you!
- Less enthusiasm, please.
This is Britain.
I cannot congratulate you. Not to get the supercharger was unfortunate.
But to court publicity by killing this little crook, it was criminal.
But I said no guns. Karl, did I not say no guns?
Why did you have to use a gun?
We had no choice.
He was in his flat with Major Hammond.
- Hammond? Who's he?
- Espionage.
- We will shoot Hammond.
- You will not shoot Hammond.
Shoot, shoot. All you say is shoot!
You have properly put the wind up them.
They'll probably cancel the test and we shall have the whole force after us. Unless...
Unless what, Baron?
Unless we can restore confidence.
I think I have a way to restore confidence.
The Baron always has a way.
Lucky for you, my friend.
Now... this is what you shall do...
Good morning, sir.
Have you read the paper?
Blenkinsop, how could I have read the paper?
- Shall I read it to you, sir?
- No, I can read, you fool.
- Miss Kay's been at it again, sir.
- Blah, blah... "Major Hammond baffled."
- Why don't you try corporal punishment?
- She ought to be hanged.
Oh, a message from Mr Barrett, sir.
Call the office immediately.
- Most urgent.
- Barrett... Barrett.
Urgent? What's up?
Why didn't you tell me?
- I have told you, sir.
- Get out of here, you fool. Pour me a cup of tea.
Hello, Daphne, my darling. I'm awfully sorry.
I can't come riding with you this morning.
But, Charles, I'm all ready to go.
I know. You look beautiful.
But I've ordered the horses.
I'm sure you can explain things to them, my dear.
Charles, there's something
I simply must talk to you about.
Can't stop now. We'll dine at Claridge's.
I'll call for you at eight.
- Mr Barrett, Major...
- ..Hammond, to see you.
- Do you mind my pipe?
- No, sit down.
- You want to discuss the Jenkins affair?
- Yes, it's a terrible business.
- It's beginning to make me think.
- Perhaps Jenkins didn't die in vain.
- Who could do such a cold-blooded thing?
- Some cold-blooded people.
- Don't tell me there wasn't a woman in it.
- She wasn't the cause of the crime.
Merely the recipient of the reward of treachery.
Keep it simple.
I can't cope with literary expressions.
Two of your aeroplanes have mysteriously disappeared.
Your confidential secretary has been mysteriously murdered.
Would it be too much to suggest that these three events are linked?
There may be something in what you say.
I believe Jenkins was linked to those responsible for the disappearance of your aircraft.
I believe they killed him because they thought he'd let them down.
- Let them down?
- Double-crossed them.
- When they didn't get the supercharger.
- I never thought I'd follow your way of thinking.
I'm beginning to say there must be...
Now what did I tell you. Foul play indeed.
I never heard such nonsense.
The wreckage of the E97's been found washed up in Cornwall.
Thank heaven it arrived before I made an ass of myself.
I always said it was an accident.
This proves I'm right.
We don't need to continue this interview.
You're going to dismiss the affair?
- It's all explained.
- Jenkins' murder?
The least said about him, the better.
Getting mixed up in a crime de passion.
It's horrible! Good morning.
Mr Barrett, you're wasted here.
With your genius for sitting on either side of the fence, you ought be in the Government, were it not for your resilience which denotes a remarkable career as a tennis ball.
Stroud, the wreckage of the E97's been found washed up in Cornwall.
Prepare the 131 for test tomorrow.
Morning, sir.
Marshal Gosport wishes to see you.
Mr Barrett has... been on the phone this morning.
And Marshal Gosport... has read the morning paper.
Well, Hammond,
I hope now you are satisfied.
- Are you satisfied?
- Not about this.
If I object to this publicity you're getting, you'll say it's part of an ingenious plan.
It is a plan, but not mine.
- Did you ever have a sister?
- Fortunately not.
Hammond, you'll have to check up this aeroplane business.
- It's not pleasant to be proved wrong...
- A man may be proved wrong and yet be right.
- That statement's a sophistry.
- And that's the word I want. Sophistry.
You behaved extremely rashly.
You persisted in your theories on the flimsiest grounds and now this balderdash in the newspapers!
- It's most damaging. It's not like you.
- I agree.
You'd be best out of the country until the ridicule dies down.
There's a nasty business needs investigating in Palestine.
- It's right down your street.
- And Jenkins' murder?
Jenkins was involved with some woman.
You told me so.
She had nothing to do with the case.
I explored that gold mine.
But Jenkins selling plane information?
What about that same plane found in Cornwall?
- What about the first aeroplane that was lost?
- It will be washed up somewhere else.
- So you insist that I am wrong?
- Yes.
What does that remind you of?
West African tribal murders.
Was I right when Blackwell of the
Colonial Office said I was crazy?
You were both right.
When did I send you that?
Yes, yes, you were right in the Burmese amber case... the Chilean nitrates, the Assam tea-poisoners, and The Times crossword last Friday.
All the same, you leave for Palestine on Saturday.
Saturday. Today's Wednesday.
What are my orders in the meantime?
Oh, finish your puzzle!
Yes, perhaps I will.
- Perhaps I will.
- Perhaps you what, sir?
Finish the puzzle.
Sophistry Uh-uh. You're wrong.
No...
I'm right.
I'm absolutely... right.
I couldn't be wrong. I'm right.
I'm absolutely, absolutely, absolutely right.
I'm right.
I'm right. I'm...
You're right.
Yes.
- Quite right.
- OK, guvnor.
Jenkins is murdered, planes vanish.
I know I'm right.
We're right. We're right.
I'm sure we're right.
- Here we are, sir.
- I'm right, Blenkinsop.
- Who said you were wrong, sir?
- Everybody.
- They're wrong.
- You're right.
- Have we any carrots? Parsnips?
- Yes, sir. Yes.
- Cabbages? Sausages?
- Yes. Yes.
- Onions?
- Yes.
- Garlic?
- No!
- McVane, you want to see me?
- No, you wanted to see me.
We'll settle that later.
We're testing the 131 at daybreak.
I was thinking who should pilot the ship.
Do you think you'd be up for it?
Cut the pompous condescension.
I know you're in a spot for a pilot.
I know you hate my guts, and would rather die than admit you need me.
If you want me to take that ship up, ask me decently or else explain to the Air Ministry why pilots won't fly your planes.
You don't believe that mystery nonsense?
Yes. I've shouted it to you for a week.
It's why I wanted to go.
All right! All right!
Will you, as a favour, take that plane up?
Well, of course I will, you pudding-minded myopic deadhead!
- And mind you bring it down again or...
- I know, I'll be off the payroll.
- Hello, sir.
- Major Hammond in?
Yes, he's in. In a stew.
- Something eating you?
- No, something we're going to eat.
- What are you talking about?
- He's got one of those there.
- What? Where?
- In there. See for yourself, sir.
Oh, no, old boy. You're wrong.
Ha-ha! It seems I've been wrong all the time.
- It does?
- Barrett says so.
- He does?
- Gosport says so.
- He does?
- The press say so.
They do? And now I say so.
- Ah, hold that, will you?
- Yes. Ooh! Ooh!
You see, it was obviously an accident.
- If you ask me, it was intentional.
- It was an accident in the first place.
- It was an accident in France.
- Naturellement.
- An accident in the States.
- You said it.
And so I'm wrong.
Completely, utterly, abysmally wrong.
Then... they take me off the case.
- That's wonderful. That's perfect.
- What's up?
They've taken you off the case and I take up the 131 tomorrow.
- You are?
- Yes.
That fool's sending you...
- Oh, la belle France.
- Oui, oui. La belle France.
Very unfunny and very bad French.
But it doesn't matter. I'm not a newspaper spy now. I got the sack.
- Why?
- I was wrong.
Wrong? Come inside, you're one of us.
- You know McVane?
- We've met.
- Have a carrot.
- Thank you.
When you were a little girl, you had a room upstairs, with red curtains.
- I'm already in it.
- No, you're here making a nuisance of yourself.
- Now, run along.
- Have you read the newspapers?
- We have.
- Well, in my opinion... the Cornwall wreckage wasn't washed up.
Kay!
Send Blenkinsop down here.
- You go on your flight tomorrow morning?
- Yes.
- With the new supercharger?
- Yes.
- You know your route yet?
- Not yet.
- Do you know how to cook?
- Not yet.
- You can start now.
- You sent for me?
- Pack a bag, we're going away.
- Where to, sir?
- The sea shore.
- What about the stew?
Post it on to me.
Hey, Kay, come here a moment.
- Why the sudden dash to the sea?
- Why not?
- You've got me there. KAY: Yes?
Be a good girl and stay by the telephone.
I may need you.
- Right.
- Ooh, and Kay?
- Don't let that fella spoil the stew.
- I'll do my best.
- All ready, sir.
- Ah.
Ah. Come on. Quick.
- Seriously, why don't you get a husband?
- Where from?
Oh, anywhere.
- You'd have no difficulty.
- No?
- No, not if you put your mind to it.
- Oh, my mind.
Yes, good women are scarce.
You'd make a grand wife, honestly.
- Because I can cook?
- That is a selling point.
I suppose you don't want a nice plain cook?
Me? No.
Whatever made you think that?
- Pass me the pepper, please.
- Here.
Think of the advantages of marriage.
You wouldn't have to go off tramping round making an ass of yourself just to earn money.
I take that to be a description of newspaper reporting.
All that son of thing.
A married woman doesn't have to descend to vulgarities to keep herself going.
Of all the pompous, conceited snobs I have ever met, you are the most insufferable.
Do you know, for one appalling moment,
I thought you were going to propose to me.
I would have had the great pleasure of telling you that life with you would be my idea of purgatory.
I hope I never set eyes on you again.
Goodbye!
Oh, I erm... forgot. I'm living here.
As I can't bounce out of the house, would you mind removing yourself?
Goodbye, darling.
Any tampering or souvenir-hunting while this was on the beach?
The local copper sat on it until we arrived. That's his trademark.
This wreckage hasn't been in the sea 48 hours. No corrosion.
Look here. Look. Fresh as when it left the works.
She might have crashed on a rock and been dragged off during high tide.
I suppose the sea took a wrench and snapped this off.
And held it in a vice here to do the trick.
- Wonderful! Where's the engine?
- Probably sank when she broke up.
I suppose the sea undid this nut to get the engine off.
And then put the nut back again.
Unfortunately it forgot the split pin, very careless of the sea.
This plane never met with an accident.
She was broken up.
And whoever did it has kept the engine and the accessories.
- Who found the stuff?
- A fisherman named Mattie.
Probably be at the local pub.
Not a moment to lose.
- They open at six. Coming?
- Sorry.
So you went fishing for sand eels and found an aeroplane, eh?
I lost my breakfast, I reckon.
Another pint of breakfast for Mattie.
- Thank you, sir.
- What time of day was it?
Early morning. You have to catch the turn of the tide for sand eels.
And she turned about a quarter before six last Tuesday.
- And being the nips...
- Nips?
- He do mean the neap - low tide, sir.
- I mean the nips.
And not much wind a-blowing inshore, she did run out fast.
Yes, well, the wreckage came inshore.
Maybe she come over the bar and the bar kept her.
- The bar?
- He do mean the whale's back, out yonder.
I mean the bar!
How much water would there be at high tide over the bar during the hips?
On a calm night, not more than four or five feet.
Ah, looks as if that wreckage knew the channel, eh?
- That's right.
- How'd it be if it were towed into the harbour?
I reckon him as towed it would claim salvage.
- Salvage. That's the way to coin money.
- Aye.
Take the Viking out yonder.
There's salvage for you.
Right digging for gold and knowing it's there.
Digging for gold?
Aye. Raising the gold from the Panther.
Digging for gold.
Did a fellow called Jenkins ever come down here from London?
- No, sir.
- Who'll row me out to the Viking?
Be a long row.
She upped anchor the night afore last.
- What?
- Aye. I heard they said they couldn't do no more this season.
- Have you got a telephone here?
- Aye, sir. Right through here.
But you have to go round there.
- Who is that fellow?
- I don't know. I never seen him before.
He talks a lot, don't he?
Hello! Hello!
Hello, I want to speak to London.
Give me Portman 2323.
Hello.
Daphne, my darling, I'm dreadfully sorry, I can't possibly have dinner with you this evening.
But I'm all ready to go.
Oh, I'm sure you look beautiful, but I just can't make it. Look here.
I'll call at your flat on Saturday.
Now, listen, Charles. You must listen. I've something very important to say to you.
Tell me on Saturday, my sweet.
Must dash now.
Charles, will you be here tomorrow definitely?
Oh, definitely, Daphne.
- Hello?
- Hello, hello. Is that you, Kay?
Yes. Are you enjoying yourself?
How's the weather?
This is no time for asking silly questions. Listen.
Go to Lloyd's. You understand?
Lloyd's. Shipping register.
Find out the movements over the last two years of a salvage vessel called the Viking. Viking.
V, V-l, V-l-K... Vik... Viking.
- Ah, salvage vessel.
- That's the one.
February '38, off Toulon.
Off Toulon.
February '38.
April 20th, off Los Angeles.
Off Los Angeles?
April 20th.
July 9th, off Kronstadt.
Off Kronstadt. July 9th.
September 17th, off Cornish coast.
- Left October 10th.
- Where is she now?
- Last reported off the Welsh coast.
- Her destination?
- Bound for Merlin Bay.
- Merlin Bay. Thank you.
Yeah. What... what...
What's the new destination?
- Sailing up the Welsh coast towards Merlin Bay.
- Listen, Kay, this is desperately important.
There's a test flight tomorrow morning from Barrett & Ward's over Merlin Bay.
I'm going there now. Stop that flight.
See Barrett, see Gosport.
I'll have conclusive evidence.
Stop the flight? How?
If they won't listen to you, what can I do?
Stop that flight.
McVane's the pilot. Do everything you can.
McVane? But why didn't you...
I'll do something.
- Did you send for the car, sir?
- Yes, can you take me to Penzance station?
- The last time she did the job, she didn't like it.
- Oh, I wouldn't be surprised.
- Ha, it's a tidy trip.
- Well, step on it tidily.
- Here you are, McVane.
- Oh, thank you.
With this new supercharger, pressure is practically nil under 1,000 revs.
But she goes up in a much sharper curve than the old type.
- Teaching me how to fly a plane?
- You're impossible.
- Go over those stays.
- I've been over them.
Go over them again and do something with that.
Now, miss, what's your business?
- I must see Mr Barrett.
- That's impossible.
Use the house telephone.
Tell him I must see him.
Aren't you the newspaper lady that was in the canteen?
- Is Mr McVane in the hangar?
- You er... a friend of his?
I'm... I'm his fiancee. Don't you see,
I must see him before he goes up.
Well, er... strictly against orders, miss, but erm...
- John, tell Mr McVane his fiancee's here.
- Tell Mr McVane his fancy's here.
Tell Mr McVane his fancy's here.
McVane, let's get the ship out, so you can get off.
- Boys, warm her up and fill her up.
- Look, I'm worried about this.
We don't know how the pistons will take it, so don't give her the gun till you're over the sea.
- Go away. Put your head in a gas mask.
- I don't want to do that.
- McVane. Wanted at the main gate.
- Who by?
- Gentleman's fiancée, sir.
- He hasn't got one.
- Send the young lady away.
- What does she look like?
- Fairly dark. Pretty, pretty.
- I'd better see her.
You have got a fiancée? You never told me.
What's she doing here?
I suppose she's come to say goodbye.
You should have done that.
I'm taking no chances.
You're going up now and you're seeing nobody till you come down.
- Send the young lady away.
- Just a minute.
- Give her that.
- Any message?
- Say that he said, "Goodbye, darling."
- Yes, "Goodbye, darling."
Say he said, "Goodbye, darling."
- Say he said, "Goodbye, darling."
- Thank you.
Thompson, don't you know how to move a plane?
Here's your course. Well, goodbye.
I shan't forget your doing this, particularly in the circumstances.
See what she can do and you won't need to worry about the future while I'm charge.
That won't be for long. Is she loaded?
- Yes.
- Swing her round, boys.
- Isn't that the test plane?
- Well, er... might be.
They're getting ready to go up.
Please let me in.
- Calm yourself. That won't get you in.
- The plane will be wrecked.
He'll be killed. Sergeant, please!
Well, if she doesn't come back,
I'll turn the place into a toy factory.
- They've taken off. They'll be killed. Please!
- Now, miss. Just a minute.
- Here's the watchman, miss.
- Well?
Mr McVane asked me to give you this.
Any message?
He said, "Tell her l said,
'Goodbye, darling."'
Goodbye, darling.
Well, that's what he said.
Cruising at normal revs.
Cruising at normal revs. Zero boost.
Zero boost...
Off Welsh coast.
Ja, ja.
- Altitude 8,000 feet.
- Altitude 8,000 feet.
Airspeed 385 mites per hour.
Airspeed 385 mites per hour.
Airspeed 385 miles per hour.
Visibility very good.
- McVane is going to give her full boost now.
- McVane is going to give her full boost now.
She'll do it this time.
Aircraft E131 approaching 40 miles south.
Aircraft E 131 approaching approximately 40 mites south.
Aircraft E 131 coming fairly fast.
Aircraft E 131 coming fairly fast.
Ah. Got 'em.
Bridge.
- The plane's in focus now.
- Right.
Airspeed now 410 miles per hour.
Boost plus 5.
Inform, please, ray is switched on.
Contact.
They're cutting out.
- Tell Control both engines are cutting out.
- This set's dead. The whole thing's fused.
We've cut out our engines, sir.
She's coming down.
She's died on us, fellows.
History repeats itself.
Get ready to bail out.
- Ship below.
- Where?
There.
- We're in luck.
- In luck?
Well, we'll soon see.
Well, we got what we were after this time.
Put her down nice and neat, Mac.
I don't like bathing.
Keep your seats, gentlemen, please.
Here we are, lads. What do you think?
- We'll get on that ship if we're lucky.
- They're not lowering any boats.
I guess they'll take the plane aboard, and put us with Peters and Griggs.
- She's very much like the other one.
- With one exception.
Yes.
- Ah, Mr McVane, I believe.
- Yes.
I congratulate you on your handling of your machine.
- Thank you.
- You made a better landing than Mr Peters.
You have a better head in emergencies.
Yes, I have. Either you send out an SOS for a ship to take us off immediately, or I'll blow up the petrol tanks and we all go up in smoke.
Oh... l see.
- Take them away. Put them with the others.
- Pick him up.
- Full speed ahead.
- Full speed ahead.
How are you feeling?
As if I've been caressing the wrong end of a machine gun.
Same thing happened to you?
Engines cutout, radio shorted.
Yes, and we floated down like a swan, to be rescued by a gallant crew, headed by a sardonic foreign gentleman, complete with eyeglass and moustache.
- Wait till you meet the skipper.
- Yes, I'm looking forward to that.
- Have you found out anything?
- No, we've been confined to quarters.
- On a diet of silence.
- Ah.
They must have a gadget to bring us down.
I wish I could look around.
- What do you expect to find?
- Marconi was working on a ray when he died.
He could cut a car engine at 25 yards.
They must have perfected it for long distance.
- That's an idea.
- Let's lodge a complaint.
- A big one. I don't like it here. Come on.
- Hear, hear.
Make for the home port.
- Peters, up on the quarter deck.
- Right.
Nicholls and Mackenzie with me.
Let's go up to the bridge.
Come on!
Drop those guns!
Peters!
- Prisoners have escaped, sir.
- What?
Bring the machine guns.
Cover that machine gun.
He's yours, Mac.
All right. Come on. Put 'em up.
Lock that door.
- Hello, Marshal.
- I've got your destroyer.
But if you're making a fool of me, heaven help you.
- Commander Mason.
- We've got the Viking's position.
- When can we get off?
- Once you get on.
Sorry to interrupt your fishing but I hope to hook something big.
I hope so.
Up on the bridge!
- By Jove, she's quick off the mark.
- She's no ordinary salvage vessel.
- How about it, Commander?
- Yeoman?
Sir.
- Signal a heave to.
- Aye aye.
Captain!
Destroyer approaching, sir.
She's signalling us to heave to.
- Stop the engines.
- Don't stop, you fool!
Full speed ahead.
Tell the engineer to increase speed.
Any more speed will break up the engines.
Then break up the engines! More speed!
- They're coming round the other side.
- Swing her round. Quick!
So she really doesn't see the signal.
- Fore gun load, common shell.
- Fore gun load, common shell
I'll put a shot across her bows.
- Fore guns, stand by.
- Fore guns, stand by.
- Fire!
- Fire!
The prisoners have taken the ship.
Destroy the ray apparatus.
So you won't talk, eh?
- Now we'll have to put a shot aboard her.
- Hold on a bit. Our chaps are on board.
- And they're still alive.
- Sony, I have to open fire.
Give her one more chance.
Yeoman, signal for the last time to heave to or take the consequences.
Aye aye, sir.
We repeat:
"Heave to or take the consequences."
- Are they going to blow up their own men?
- They won't touch us.
I'm not so sure. Keep firing.
A destroyer is threatening to blow us out of the water if we don't heave to.
Take the gun. Come on, Scott.
- Fore gun load, high explosive.
- Fore gun load, high explosive.
Get over there. Quick!
Signaller. Outside. Outside!
Signal the destroyer not to fire.
Tell them we're heaving to.
They've signalled not to fire.
They're heaving to.
Now signal this.
You...
- They're signalling again.
- Can't make it out. Read it off, Yeoman.
You... were... right... Charles.
Aha!
- I... was... right.
- Good old Tony.
- Kay... was... right_
- What the blazes is all this?
And... the... whole... world... was... wrong.
That's right. Thank you, Commander.
Here they come.
Hammond and McVane - get them.
- Oi, look!
- Oi! Stop those cameras.
Oh, no, no!
Just a minute, if you don't mind.
- Kay, you can get this one.
- Smile, Charles. Wave your umbrella.
- Hammond, bravo.
- Bravo?
- Got it, Kay?
- Yes, darling.
All right, off we go. See you. Goodbye.
Bye, Charles!
- I congratulate you.
- Congratulate them. They're getting married.
- What's the time?
Great Scott!
See you in London.
Here I am, my darling. Dead on time.
Charles, I'm so sorry.
I just can't go out with you today.
- But I'm all ready to go.
- I know, my pet, but I can't make it.
- But you had something to tell me.
- I have. I want you to meet my husband.
- How do you do, old boy, old boy?
- Oh, good show, good show.
Good heavens, darling.
Look at the time. We must fly.
Goodbye, old boy. Goodbye.
Goodbye, darling. I know you wish us all the happiness in the world.
- Goodbye.
- Goodbye.
I was wrong.
Gee, Pop, you sure missed a wonderful luncheon.
Contradiction, please.
Not having eaten, have missed nothing.
I had turtle soup, chicken à la king and three cream puffs.
- Then I had some ice cream—
- Please stop.
Mention of food more painful... than surgeon's knife without anesthetic.
Shall I get you medicine, Pop?
- Good dose of land only effective medicine.
- [Chuckles]
The bulletin board says we'll dock at 4:00 this afternoon.
Only sight of dock can renew interest in life.
[ObjectJangling]
Steward! Steward!
Get me out of here!
- Help.! Somebody open this door.!
- [Pounding]
Help! Steward!
Help.! Help.!
Open this door.!
Help.! Steward.!
- Did you hear that?
- Yeah. It sounded like somebody calling for help.
Help! Somebody get me out of here!
- In there.
- Help.! Help.!
- [Pounding]
- Help.! Steward.!
Help.! Get me out ofhere.!
Help—
So sorry to intrude... but etiquette ignored when lady in distress.
I— I guess it must have locked accidentally.
Chair under doorknob indicate purpose... not accident.
Better check your belongings, miss.
It looks like a robbery to me.
Why, I can't imagine why anybody would want to... rob my stateroom.
After all, there's nothing of any value here.
Absolutely nothing.
Maybe you'd better take a look through that trunk anyway.
Something might be stolen.
I haven't lost anything.
I'm quite sure of that.
Evident thief not interested in diamonds.
Note. Jewelry untouched.
Oh, they're phonies.
The real ones are in my bank, I hope.
Well, thank you all for coming to my rescue, more or less.
No trouble at all.
Sorry I couldn't have done more.
Thanks.
Let us know if anything else happens.
We're in the next cabin.
This is my father, Mr. Chan.
My name's Lee.
- Thank you both.
- So happy.
Oh, by the way.
If you don't mind, I'd just as soon you didn't mention this to anyone.
Don't you think, if there's a thief on board, the purser ought to know about it?
I don't want to answer a lot of useless questions.
You see, I've been feeling perfectly miserable during this whole trip.
- But, Pop—
- Am in identical boat with fair lady.
- Will say nothing.
- Thanks a lot.
##[Lee Whistling Tune]
## [Whistling Continues]
Please put muffler on peanut whistle... and explain motive for appropriating towel.
You see, Pop, I've been sorta collecting souvenirs since I left Honolulu.
Some people pick up soap or ashtrays, but I like towels best.
Hmm.
What are you looking for?
Lifeboat... make fine souvenir also.
"Hotel Sheffield."
"Château Paris."
"Rhine Inn."
Too late now to make restitution.
But replace ship's property before detective father... assigned to case of light-fingered son.
Okay.
Say, Pop, speaking of cases, what do you think of that girl in the next cabin?
Very pretty girl.
She hasn't been out of her cabin on the whole trip.
The steward told me when I was asking him for some, uh, fresh towels a while ago.
I'll bet there's something funny going on there.
What's the matter, Pop?
One cabin too small for two detectives.
I'm awfully sorry to bother you... but all that excitement has my head beating like a bass drum in a Harlem band.
- Have you any aspirin?
- Come in.
- I'll get some for you. Please sit down.
- Oh, thanks.
Here you are.
- Thanks a lot.
- Not at all.
Do you intend staying in New York very long?
No, darn it. Pop's in a hurry to get home to Mom.
We leave for San Francisco in the morning.
Well, that's pretty fast traveling.
Too bad you're not gonna stick around and see the big town.
Yeah, but unless Pop takes a nap...
I'll never get past the hotel lobby.
Well, thanks again. Perhaps we'll see each other before we dock.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
[Ship Horn Blowing]
- ## [Up-tempo]
- [Sirens Wailing]
Well, she's dockin' now.
Between murders and suicides,
I ain't got enough to do... so the commissioner says,
"Go down to the dock and meet a detective."
Who's got a cigarette?
Hey, Smitty!
So I said to the commissioner,
"I have already met a detective once."
He says to me,
"You just think you have."
Thanks very much.
"Now go down and meet Charlie Chan."
Look, Smitty, have the band blast out something oriental.
Hey, what is the Chinese national anthem anyway?
I don't know. Why don't you give him
"Chinatown, My Chinatown"?
Okay, we'll play it.
Hiya, Nelson.
I knew there was somethin' fresh around here.
I thought it was the ocean air.
Looks like you got half of headquarters down here.
- What's up?
- I'm lookin' for the other half.
- Expect someone to steal the Atlantic?
- No. The boys are going wading.
Say, have you got a light?
Hmm. Here comes the number one bloodhound of journalism.
Your sarcasm isn't cutting into his salary much.
I guess you're down here to interview Mr. Chan.
- Always the copper, aren't you?
- It's nice work if you can get it.
Well, come on. We'll give you a police escort so you don't fall off the pier.
[Man]
Are you glad to get home again?
- There's the guy! Come on.
- Get to him before the boys crowd in.
Look, Pop.
They're gonna snap our pictures.
Is it true you intend racing Indian King at Saratoga?
- How do your horses win all the races?
- They run fast.
- How many wives have you?
- More than Ali Baba had thieves.
Do you think you're going to like New York?
If it's half as ridiculous as I've heard,
I shall love it.
How long do you expect to remain
in the United States?
Did you bring all of your stable with you?
Look out! Thanks.
Give me that camera!
No one's taking any pictures of me.
- Okay, sue me.
- [Man] Who's that?
Well, if it isn't little Billie.
What are you doin' back in town?
- Mr. Chan?
- That is humble name.
I'm Inspector Nelson, Mr. Chan.
Greetings from New York's finest.
The bigwigs expect you to tear a duck apart with 'em tonight.
So sorry.
Come again, please.
Excuse the inspector's broken English,
Mr. Chan. He's a Brooklyn immigrant.
He's trying to tell you the police department's
giving a banquet tonight in your honor.
Thank you so much.
Am unworthy of so great honor.
Will feel like sparrow perched on limb with peacocks.
- I don't get ya.
- He says he accepts.
- Your interpreter?
- In big city, yes.
Otherwise, number one son, Lee.
- Oh, yeah. Yeah.
- I've gotta mush on, Mr. Chan.
If there's anything you want the bigwigs can't rustle up for you, just toot your whistle.
Speed Patten of the Bulletin.
I wonder if that was a personal crack at me.
New York English too baffling for humble detective.
Oh, yeah. Those pencil pushers sure kick it around, don't they?
Come on, Mr. Chan.
We'll take care of your baggage.
- Is this all your baggage, Mr. Chan?
- All here.
Open luggage for gentleman's inspection.
That won't be necessary, Mr. Chan.
The commissioner has extended you
the freedom of the port.
Oh. Much honored.
Right this way, Mr. Chan.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
You know the little lady—
Miss Bronson?
- Quite casually.
- Why, Inspector?
Ayear ago, that dame was so hot in this town, she had to skip the country.
Grand jury wanted her as a key witness.
She had enough info to blow the lid right off this island.
Some of her boyfriends shipped her abroad till things cooled off.
What did I tell you, Pop?
A lot of funny things happened on the boat.
- Please keep eyes open and mouth shut.
- [Chuckles]
- Oh, porter.
- Yes, miss?
Please have my baggage sent to the Carlton Hotel also.
Certainly, miss.
Your name, please?
[Whistles]
## ["Chinatown, My Chinatown"]
[Sirens Wailing]
##[Continues]
Carlton Hotel.
Carlton Hotel.
Still the freshest guy on Broadway, aren't you?
Oh, no, Billie.
Just the smartest.
Sometimes you make it hard to tell where your brain ends and your nerve begins.
Maybe, but while every other newspaper guy on that dock follows an Indian maharaja... who can't make anything but the sport page...
I'm ridin' around with Billie Bronson— the gal who can make history.
Look, Speed, just forget you ever saw me.
I'm not here for publicity.
What are you here for, honey?
- I wanna see Grant's Tomb.
- You can get a swell view of it— from the river.
What do you mean by that crack?
I'm not hot anymore, and you know it.
Yeah, but does the D.A. Know it?
I didn't come back to see the D.A.
I've got a date with somebody else.
That wouldn't be a guy by the name of Burke... at the Hottentot Club, would it?
- You get around, don't you?
- Yeah, and it's a big circle.
So you're gonna have a showdown with Burke, huh?
If you print that, you'd better put on your diving suit.
I'll take that chance if it's okay with you.
Here's your hotel.
Listen, Speed, if you can keep quiet for a while...
I may slip you something you'll have to print on asbestos.
- What's the deal?
- Meet me here at midnight.
It's a date.
Drive me to the Bulletin.
- Don't get up, boys. I can make it.
- You just think you can make it.
Better lay off, Joan.
He's vicious.
- I just got tossed out.
- I've got the passkey.
- I want to see Murdock.
- Just a moment, Miss Wendall.
Save me an extra column on Sunday, will ya, chief?
I got a swell human interest yarn on the maharaja of Rodpur today.
Do you think the subscribers can stand the excitement?
[Buzzes]
- Yes?
- Miss Wendall would like to see you, sir.
- I can't see her now.
- You can if you look up.
Hello, Murdock. Hi, Speed.
- What do you want, Miss Wendall?
- A hundred bucks.
I think you'd better see a doctor.
You're delirious.
I'll drop in at the psychopathic ward and hold your hand later, sweetheart.
Okay, have your little joke, but would you like to take a peek... at this beautiful enlargement before I sell it to the Times?
I got a dozen pictures
of Charlie Chan.
Maybe, but if you look close, you'll see a girl, and it isn't Chan's daughter.
Billie Bronson, eh?
I got a dozen pictures ofher too.
And I've got a dozen editors who'd love to know that I took this picture today.
- I'll give you $50.
- It was awfully nice seeing you.
Wait a minute.
Give me that photo.
- [Flips Switch]
- Instruct the cashier to pay Miss Wendall $100.
I want you to forget that you ever took this picture.
My mind's a complete blank.
I suppose you remember the way to the cashier's office.
And how. Thanks, Murdock.
So long, Speed.
See you later.
[Door Closes]
You were down at that pier today, Speed.
Didn't you see Miss Bronson?
I thought I was the only one. I even jumped in her cab and had a little chat with her.
I don't want to pry into the affairs of this newspaper... but would you mind telling me why you kept it a secret?
She didn't spill anything. I'm gonna see her tonight and get the lowdown.
[Rings]
Yes?
Who?
Put her on.
Hello, Miss Bronson.
Yes, I heard you were back in town.
You remember that little deal we discussed about a year ago?
That's right. Well, we may be able to do business now... but it's gonna cost you twice what you offered last time.
That's insane.
How do I know it's on the level?
I haven't even read it. Fine.
I'll be over at your hotel at 11:30 tonight.
Good-bye.
You can call off your date for tonight, Speed.
I'm taking over the Bronson story.
Now look here, chief.
I started this thing.
Yes, and I'll finish it, and I'll make it hotter than the Chicago fire.
Okay, but look out you don't get burned.
- Nice scoop, kid.
- Scooping you is getting monotonous, Mr. Patten.
- Well, how about marrying me?
- And kill a beautiful friendship? Nothing doing.
I tell you what. You take me to the Hottentot Club tonight... and we'll blow some of this hush money.
- Why the Hottentot?
- Why not?
You got me. Anyway, I'd better stick with you, or I'll be scooped on my own love story.
[Knocking]
Be sure you keep your mouth shut.
Don't worry.
It'll cost me my job if I don't.
Pop. Hey, Pop.
Where are you?
Prostrated on floor.
What are you doing, Pop— hiding?
Collar button is one who hides.
[Chuckles]
Am searching for same.
I'd help you, Pop... but you said,
"One room too small for two detectives."
Assistance very welcome on present difficult case.
You'll find it if you go about it scientifically.
Logic very good.
Plainly saw fugitive sitting here.
Turn back on same while searching for trousers.
Number one son pass by trunk...
while parent descend body
into trousers.
Return here, and collar button absconded.
Also number one son.
Thank you so much.
One room still too small for two detectives.
Say, Pop, can I have a couple of weeks' allowance in advance?
I only have one buck to see the town on.
New York like mouth of great river.
Many reefs in channel... to wreck small sightseeing boat from Honolulu.
Oh, boy! Twenty bucks.
Thanks, Pop.
Don't worry.
I can take care of myself.
New York's no different from any other town.
It's just a little bigger.
- Sorry, buddy.
- Oh, that's all right.
- Cab, sir?
- Please.
Me too.
Pop! My money's gone.
I know. The man who just bumped into me, he must have taken it.
Save breath for lamentations.
- Your cab, sir.
- Thank you so much.
Suggest you return to room and lock self in... before dinner suit snatched from body.
- But, gee, Pop—
- Good night.
Astor Hotel, please.
Mr. Chan's room, please.
- [Woman] There's no answer.
- Thanks.
- Hello.
- Hello, Miss Bronson.
Well, I'm in trouble again.
I can't unlock my door.
But— But that's our room.
Oh. Well, how do you like that?
I've got the right location, but they let me off at the wrong floor.
- I'm in 413. [Chuckling]
- [Chuckling]
Well, you look like you're all dressed up to do the town tonight.
No, not exactly.
I-I'm waiting for Dad to get back from the banquet so I can show him the town.
Well, I hope you have a good time.
Good night.
Good night.
The Hottentot Club.
The young lady that just left, did you hear her say where she was going?
- She mentioned the Hottentot Club.
- Thanks.
The Hottentot Club.
##[Orchestra: Up-tempo]
Flashlights, bulbs, film.
- Give me a roll of film.
- Yes, sir.
- How much is a flashlight?
- Fifty cents.
Boy, what pictures I've got.
- Hello, Gloria.
- Gee, this is a surprise, Mr. Moran.
- You haven't been around for quite a while.
- Oh, I've been around.
Wait a minute.
- When did you get back in town?
- This afternoon.
- Burke send for you?
- Well, what if he did?
I just wanted to know.
Listen, Buzz, I've got a good reason for coming back.
You've got a better reason for staying away.
You get out of town before morning.
I mean that.
Okay. I will.
Sure, you will.
Sorry, boss.
You all can't go in there.
What's the idea?
There's someone inside I've got to see.
The rules of the house say no gentlemen allowed in without a lady friend.
You can't button that one.
It's a freckle.
My mistake, honey.
- Hello, Burke.
- Good evening, Mr. Mack.
Mr. Burke.
This guy signed his check.
- Is it okay?
- He's a phony. Get his dough.
- Hiya, Johnny.
- Hello.
- Evening, Johnny.
- Hiya, Speed.
- Hello, Miss Wendall.
- Hello, Mr. Burke.
- You got a lot of competition around here tonight, kid.
- I can't complain.
Their pictures make the family album.
Mine make the front page.
Did you ever figure on this "camera night" idea of yours causing a lot of beefs?
- About what?
- It's a known fact that somebody's wife... will go out with somebody else's husband.
- Where are they?
- [Chuckles]
I haven't seen you here in months.
Any special reason for tonight's visit?
- No. Just slumming.
- That's right.
You can be the perfect host by supplying me with a nice juicy story.
A murder, for instance.
That always goes good in a nightclub yarn.
- ##[Ends]
- I'll take your picture standing next to the body.
If they're good, I'll buy a dozen.
## [Latin, Up-tempo]
##[Continues, Muted]
[Yelps]
Don't yell like that.
I'm not gonna hurt you.
- Gosh, I'm sorry I scared you.
- What do you want?
I'm here on something awful important.
Maybe you can help me.
You see, I'm sort of a detective.
That is, my dad is Charlie Chan, and I work with him on big cases.
Charlie Chan?
Why, I know who he is.
- Then will you help me?
- What can I do?
- Get me in the club. I've got to see somebody.
- All right.
As soon as I get more film,
I'll take you down the back stairs.
Swell. Oh, let me help.
## [Latin Continues]
You kinda go for our ballerina, don't you, Mr. Burke?
I like her dancin'.
That dame could appear in a wheelchair, and he'd call it dancing.
[No Audible Dialogue]
Hello, Moran.
- What's the idea, Johnny?
- I don't get ya.
I told you to keep
Billie Bronson out of town.
- She's in Europe.
- She's upstairs in your office.
- I didn't know that.
- You know it now.
- She comes back when I say so.
- Sure, sure.
I'll take care of that dame.
- Waiter. Bring me some more milk.
- Yes, Mr. Moran.
## [Ends]
[Applause]
[Applause Continues]
- You do an encore, baby.
- Okay.
- Wait here, Joan.
- You're not holding anything out on me, are you?
Take it easy, honey.
I'll be right back.
##[Latin]
Hello, Johnny.
- What are you doin' in town?
- I got lonesome.
- Aren't you glad to see me?
- Sure, I am, but it's risky.
- You're still hot enough to blister.
- I'll take my chances.
- How's everything with you?
- Not so good.
Yeah, that's what you wrote me... but I saw an awful lot of cover charges when I came in tonight.
What's on your mind, Billie?
Why did you lie to me?
- I don't get you.
- Oh, yes, you do.
- You didn't want me back in New York.
- I told you it wasn't safe.
Oh, skip it. I walked through the whole police force today... and all they did was tip their hats.
No, Johnny.
You fooled me long enough— cutting down my dough so I didn't have enough money to buy a ticket back home... saying the club was failing, lying about everything.
- You talk too much, Billie.
- Yeah? Well, I haven't even started yet.
I don't think I would if I were you.
The boys wouldn't like it.
- You mean Marie wouldn't like it.
- Leave her out of this.
Why should I? You've been giving me the runaround because of her.
That's why I came back.
Things have been too perfect for you.
Okay, Johnny, you're a smart boy... and you bluffed a lot of people.
- ##[Ends]
- But you can't bluff your way out of what I'm gonna spill.
- You double-crosser. I'll slap you—
- Stay away from me!
- Where you goin', Marie?
- Charlie's office.
- He's busy right now. I think you'd better wait.
- Oh, yeah?
- Maybe you can order the busboys around, but not me.
- Now, listen—
Police of New York and Honolulu have one thing in common.
Both live on very small island.
But while we have big volcano... you have biggest shakeup.
[All Laughing]
Uh, someday, hope to greet honorable brothers in Hawaii...
where roar of surf
replace noise of subway...
and, uh, hot rhythm of Broadway...
- [No Audible Dialogue]
- Cooled by strains of"Aloha."
- [Applause Continues]
- There goes my fishin' trip... and I was all set to get away in the morning.
I've just been called on a little case uptown, Charlie.
- I think you'd better come along.
- What's the idea of taking our guest of honor away?
- Can't you handle it alone?
- Maybe not.
Billie Bronson was just murdered at the Hottentot Club... and Mr. Chan's son is being held as a suspect.
We go right away.
- Excuse, please. Excuse.
- Of course, Charlie.
- Where's the trouble?
- Upstairs.
- Have you got a cigarette?
- I don't smoke.
Metropolitan newspaper people more prompt than police and also more numerous.
Oh, those? Those ain't reporters.
They're worse— camera hounds.
This is candid-camera night.
They're all shootin' for prizes.
They've even got a darkroom for 'em... so they can develop and enlarge their pictures right here.
Very interesting.
Camera remember many things human eye forget.
Huh?
[Snaps Fingers] You're right.
Don't let anyone outta here with a camera.
- I want every roll of film in the place.
- Yes, sir.
[Coin Clatters]
I'll carry it.
- Good night, Mr. Moran.
- Good night.
- Hi, Nelson. Hello, Mr. Chan.
- You didn't waste any time getting here, did you?
Somebody has to protect the taxpayers.
All the policemen I know were at a banquet tonight.
When you gotta eat, you gotta eat.
Have you seen the body?
- Seen it? I found it.
- That makes you a suspect.
Flatterer.
Over there, Doc.
I knew I'd be seeing you on business sooner or later.
Pop! Tell him who I am.
What is charge against young man?
We found him hangin' around in the hall outside. He says he's your son.
Reluctantly confess he is portion of posterity.
Oh, yeah? Then what was he doin' peekin' through a keyhole?
Humbly suggest murderer not likely to go outside... and contemplate victim through keyhole.
But please explain embarrassing presence here.
She was trying to get into our room at the hotel, so I followed her.
The kid's okay.
Release him.
- Lay off that phone.
- I got a right to call my lawyer.
What makes you think you'll need one?
He'll need one with you handling the case.
- You and your funny ideas.
- I got an idea now. Believe me, it's far from funny.
- What'd you find, Doc?
- The bullet entered the back just below the left shoulder blade...
passed through the right ventricle...
and was probably stopped by a bone.
- We can't get the bullet until the autopsy.
- Yeah, okay.
Uh, excuse, please.
Can give approximate time of death?
- About half an hour ago.
- Thank you.
Half an hour ago,
I was thinkin'ofbass instead ofbullets.
- Anybody find the gun?
- I did, sir. It's a.25-caliber automatic.
The sergeant sent it down to headquarters to check the number and any fingerprints.
Good. I want this whole room gone over for fingerprints. Have headquarters send a man up.
- Yes, sir.
- May ask question, please?
- Sure. Go ahead.
- Understand you were first to discover body.
That's right. Well, go ahead, Nelson.
Give me the third degree.
But I warn you, if anybody slugs me across the Adam's apple with a rubber hose—
Ah, you talk too much as it is.
Body in same position now as when discovered?
Sure. I didn't touch it.
I had to leave something for him to do.
Thank you so much.
Position of body sometime give solution of murder.
So sorry to intrude, but like number one son... keep forgetting this not my affair.
Gee, Pop. I was only trying to find out what she was doing.
Obviously, she kept appointment with murderer.
- That brings us around to you.
- I ain't sayin' a thing without my lawyer.
Maybe we got different ideas about that.
Billie Bronson come up here to see you, didn't she?
- So do a lot of other people.
- But they don't all get murdered.
Stop me if I'm wrong.
She could come up to visit
Johnny without him killing her, couldn't she?
- You oughta know.
- What do you mean by that crack?
You and Billie were friends until she had to blow town.
Then like a good pal, you move in on her boyfriend to keep him from getting lonesome.
- After a year, he gets fed up with you and sends for Billie.
- Is that on the level?
- No, he's just fishin'.
- I wish I was.
Anyhow, Billie hits town, beats it up to see you, and you bump her off.
- That's a lie! She was all right when we left the room.
- Then you were with her!
- Tell him, Johnny.
- I ain't talkin'.
[Nelson] You see?
He could alibi you ifhe wanted, but he won't.
He'll let you take the rap.
That's what happens to his dames.
- Won't happen to me.
- Shut up.
- You killed her with his gun!
- You're crazy. He put me out of the room.
- Then he killed her.
- No, he didn't. I waited in the hall.
You couldn't drag me away. He only stayed
a minute. I saw her when he came out.
- She was still alive?
- I'll say she was, and mad.
Now wait a minute.
In other words, you both leave the room.
She's all alone. She gets so mad she shoots herself in the back and hides the gun.
- Don't tell me that!
- We ain't telling anything until we get a lawyer.
Interruption, please.
Perhaps keyhole observation made by number one son... can prove if lady speak truth.
No. She was dead when I looked in.
Say, how did you know she was up here?
I didn't. I was just looking in all the keyholes.
[Door Opens]
Say, what's the idea?
I can't get out of this joint.
You can after I've seen your pictures. Give.
I only enlarged one, but it's a honey.
- You see, I came up here and found the body.
- He says he did.
It was my turn to do the scooping, darling.
Well, as Mr. Chan would say,
"One picture worth 10,000 words."
Thank you so much.
Say, Mr. Chan, take a look at this.
That napkin isn't in the picture.
Also interesting to note... telephone jump back on hook since picture taken.
[Nelson, Snaps Fingers]
You're right.
Was that phone on or off the hook when you found the body?
It was off.
I put it back on.
Well, that's just ducky. You know, there might've been some fingerprints on there.
I'm sorry, Nelson.
When I saw it was off the hook...
I thought Billie might've been talking to someone.
When nobody answered,
I went ahead and phoned in my story.
[Nelson]
Do you use a napkin when you phone?
Why? Should I?
Don't evade the issue! When did you pick up that napkin and put it on the tray?
I never touched it.
If it isn't asking too much, can I have my picture so I can get out?
One moment, please.
Observe picture more closely.
- [Nelson] Watch that door!
- Look out, Pop!
[Women Screaming]
Let go of me, you little—
- [Screaming Continues]
- Mac, get that light.!
- I got him, chief!
- You got me, you dummy.!
- Where's Burke?
- I got him, Mr. Nelson.
[Scoffs]
- What happened to you?
- Someone slugged me, but I'm all right now, sir.
I'll have to take your word for it. Get headquarters.
Send out an alarm forJohnny Burke.
- I want him picked up before morning.
- Yes, sir.
I'm gonna get you 10 years for puttin' out those lights.
- Who, me?
- Yes, you!
- Did Burke get away clean?
- What do you think?
- Hey, come here!
- Stop yelling, will ya? I gotta phone that story in.
- It puts the finger on Burke.
- If you touch that phone...
I'm gonna put five fingers on you.
Get out of here and use the one downstairs.
And take that dame with you.
- And the picture?
- That's evidence. Beat it.
Come on, honey.
They want to be alone.
Speaking of pictures, Charlie, what were you gonna show me when Burke took a powder?
First must point to fact... that napkin on tray also take powder.
Well, I'll be.
Now why would Burke take that napkin?
Picture may hold answer to same riddle.
Observe carefully.
Contents of unfortunate lady's purse scattered on floor.
Yeah.
Compare articles now on floor with those shown in picture.
Say, wait a minute. There's no key there, but there's one in the picture.
Missing key may fit door to solution.
Looks like a hotel key.
There's a tag on it.
- Perhaps can decipher number?
- Yeah.
It says "Carlton Hotel 313."
Gee, Pop, that's our room!
- Yes.
- What?
Who's got a cigarette?
Never mind.
We'll get some at your hotel.
Come on.
Even if I knew where Burke went,
I wouldn't tell you.
- And you can't hold me.
- Pipe down. You stay out here with her.
Key, please.
Stabbed through the ribs, and not over a couple of minutes ago either.
Get the coroner.
Pop.! It's the man we met
this morning on the boat... when someone tried to rob
Miss Bronson's stateroom.
- You know this guy?
- Encountered him once only on board steamship.
Take him to the bed and search him.
I wonder where he fits in.
Hey, Mac.
Anything out there?
- Nothing, sir.
- Well, that's not good enough.
Climb out and take a look in every window as you go below.
And no matter what you see, remember— it's Burke you're lookin' for.
I wish the fishing season was as open as the one for murder.
Excuse, please.
Would suggest key undergo fingerprint examination.
Right, Charlie. That may be the one from Billie Bronson's purse.
- Anything on him?
- No, sir.
Maybe the steamship company would have his name.
Oh, chances are he'd be listed under a phony title, but we'll check that later.
Take this down to the Bureau of Identification.
Have 'em check any fingerprints againstJohnny Burke's. His are on file.
- Yes, sir.
- This whole thing is getting me a little bit screwy.
What would that mug want in your room?
Mud of bewilderment now beginning to clear from pool of thought.
This man follow
Miss Bronson on boat... to secure unknown object she possess.
To safeguard same... she use my baggage as hiding place.
I remember, Pop.
That's when she came in for the aspirin.
- Huh?
- Have hit tack on cranium.
Tonight Miss Bronson try to regain secret possession here.
But number one son prove stumbling block.
Then Burke gets your key when it drops from Billie's purse.
Comes up here... in time to catch that guy in the room.
The rest is easy. He stabs him and makes a getaway with whatever they were all after.
- Quite possible.
- But what were they after?
- [Policeman] You can't go in there.
- Nelson, let me out of here—
You know this man?
He's— He's my husband.
- Your husband, hey? What's his name?
- Tom Mitchell.
- Now we're getting somewhere.
Were you living with him?
- No.
- You left him for Burke, didn't you?
- I'm not talking.
You don't have to.
I get the whole setup.
- Well, why don't you deny it?
- Please.
Perhaps kinder to question lady later.
Oh, yeah, yeah. Okay, Charlie.
Take her down to headquarters.
Come on, lady.
Keep her in my office.
I'll see her later.
Now what I wanna know,
Char—
What have you got now?
Most interesting reading found on torn paper.
This is something.
So Billie kept a diary too.
Pop, that's what they were after.
No poison more deadly than ink.
I'd give up that fishing trip to see the rest of these pages.
Hey— Hey, Pop.!
Gee, I-I thought you were someone else.
Put that thing away.
Did you find anything?
No, sir, and I went all the way down to the bottom.
- Say, do you think he might have gone up?
- [Nelson] Why?
Well, I just remembered. Miss Bronson said her room was 413, and that's right above us.
- What?
- Regret slow progress of thought... but rejoice at final arrival.
Get out on that fire escape and keep your eye on the window above. Come on.
Hello, Nelson. This is a surprise.
I'll say it is.
What are you doin' here?
What would I be doing here?
I'm waiting for Miss Bronson, of course.
Then you got an awful long wait.
She's not comin' back.
- She's dead?
- Murdered.
I'm not surprised.
Wait a minute.
You've got some explainin' to do.
What about, may I ask?
Billie Bronson was shot an hour ago at the Hottentot Club.
The key to Room 313, which is directly below this one, was stolen from her purse.
We just went in down there and found a man stabbed to death.
- Go on.
- You go on.
That window there is open.
So is the one downstairs.
So, I could've killed that man down there, then come up the fire escape into this room.
- Right.
- Wrong. I didn't.
I had an appointment to meet
Miss Bronson here at 10:30. It's now...
20 minutes of 11:00.
Excuse, please.
Would object to revealing nature of appointment?
Not at all. I came up here to buy her diary.
Diary, eh? What were you gonna do with it?
I'd have to read it first to answer that question.
But no doubt can produce money intended for purchase of diary?
Gee, Pop.
Look at that.
There's enough dough here to buy the city hall.
And cheap at that. Miss Bronson's diary contains enough information... on rackets and politics to blow this whole city higher than a kite.
Well, well.
What's this— the payoff?
- Always a wise guy, aren't you?
- I have to be to keep up with you boys.
Why don't you light someplace where you can be found?
Hey, get a load of this.
- We scooped the others?
- Sure.
You oughta drop in at the office.
You were out when I phoned that story in.
- You knew I was coming here.
- Yeah, but you crossed me up.
You weren't due here till 11:30.
Just a minute.
You told us 10:30.
Please don't attempt any unwieldy deductions, Nelson.
The original appointment
was for 11:30.
- Miss Bronson telephoned and changed it.
- [Charlie] Most unfortunate.
Proof of alibi now locked behind dead lips of murdered girl.
Yeah, and I'm not so sure you didn't get that diary without paying for it.
You wouldn't mind being searched, would you, Murdock?
Am I under arrest?
No.
Then I'm afraid that technically you'll have to keep your hands in your own pockets.
- Am I right?
- [Phone Ringing]
Hello? Yeah.
Yeah, go ahead.
Come on. Let's have it.
Swell. Swell!
Now let Marie Collins go and trail her.
She'll lead you to Burke, all right.
The key didn't show anything, Charlie.
The gun we found in Burke's office was sold to Billie a year ago.
There were two sets of fingerprints on it— a woman's and Johnny Burke's.
We'll pick up Burke tonight, and I'll be fishing in the morning.
- Then I presume that my part in this case is closed.
- Perhaps.
But murder case like revolving door—
when one side close,
other side open.
Well, good luck, gentlemen.
Thank you... so much.
I wish you hadn't
moved us up here, Pop.
I bet there's some clue in our old room that would clinch the case.
What are you reading, Pop?
Murder case of Miss Billie Bronson.
Gee, I should think you know enough about it already.
Still much to learn.
Mr. Speed Patten very good reporter.
- Is my name in his write-up?
- As suspect, yes.
Good night.
[Grunts]
The whole case looks
perfectly clear to me, Pop.
They found Burke's fingerprints on the gun, didn't they?
Evidently forget disappearance of napkin.
You know, I've been thinking about that napkin too.
Burke probably stole it because
Marie Collins's fingerprints were on it.
- Have you thought of that angle?
- [Groans]
For the time being, only consider... which angle to arrange self on mattress.
[Sighs]
Now, please... turn out light and extinguish conversation.
[Sighs]
[Rings]
Hello? Hello, Meeker?
Did you get my message?
Yeah, yeah. I'm in a jam. I'll say it's bad.
Get up here quick as you can and see you're not tailed. What?
Yeah, I'm expecting Marie. She oughta be up here right away. Uh-huh.
Step on it.
Hello, hot fingers.
What do ya mean, "hot fingers"?
If you'd kept Billie out of town like I said, we'd have been okay.
Too bad it had to happen in your office, Johnny.
Oh, no, you don't.
They'll never burn me for that.
- I'll say they won't.
- You watch your step, Buzz.
I will.
[Groans]
[Gunshot]
"And though almost 24 hours have elapsed...
"since Billie Bronson and Thomas Mitchell were murdered, the police have discovered...
"nothing tangible enough to justify an arrest.
"All they have is a torn diary page found by Charlie Chan...
"which they consider an excellent clue.
"But in the opinion of this observer, it only indicates the work of a perfect criminal...
"so clever and daring that he has deliberately planted it...
"to obtain free publicity
for a terrific blackmailing scheme.
"This may be a subtle way of warning certain people in New York...
"that he has this dynamite diary
and is ready to light the fuse.
"I wonder ifJohnny Burke is the only racketeer whose blood pressure will remain high... as long as the Bronson diary and its unknown possessor are in circulation."
Well, how's that for a journalistic gem?
- Is that what you call it?
- Why not?
Uh, boy. And wait till you see tomorrow's story.
It'll top this one.
Take that to Mr. Murdock, will you?
Just stick around me, honey, and you'll get the latest lowdown.
You know old Speed never misses.
- Neither does Johnny Burke or Moran.
- Aw!
You're gonna crack wise once too often on that typewriter, and I'll be sending you posies.
- Now stand still and look healthy.
- How's this?
Fine. I wanna shoot you before somebody else does.
You're just sore because I scooped you on that Bronson murder.
I'm warning you right now. I'm gonna scoop you on the rest of the case too.
- Wanna bet?
- Sure. A week's pay.
Make it something worthwhile and you're on.
Here's one time you're both scooped.
Johnny Burke just walked into police headquarters and gave himself up.
Five'll get you 50 he's got a smart mouthpiece with him.
Wait a minute. You haven't a thing on Johnny except the fingerprints on the gun.
Oh, yeah. That's all. And the fact that Mitchell was rubbed out... a couple of minutes after Burke took it on the lam from the Hottentot.
I didn't shoot Billie or Mitchell either.
May I humbly remind
Mr. Mitchell stabbed, not shot.
Don't you try to trickJohnny into admitting one thing by suggesting another.
- I demand the right to—
- Have you got a cigarette?
Uh, yes. Here.
Thanks very much.
Now what were you saying?
- I wanna know what time Mitchell was rubbed out.
- Why don't you askJohnny?
If it was after 10:00, he was with me.
Now try and break that alibi!
Excuse, please. Perhaps paraffin test better alibi if prove negative.
You're right.
How about it, Johnny?
You're not afraid of a little scientific test, are you?
No. Let's go.
Wait. You can't get away with this!
My client is a respectable citizen.
- Let's go.
- Johnny, please, wait a minute.
Hey!
Uh, s-say, just what is this paraffin test?
Uh, new method... to reveal powder marks on hand that fires gun.
Why, that's silly.
He washes his hands, you know.
Undoubtedly. But even most vigorous scrubbing... will not remove powder stains for 72 hours.
Seventy-two hours? Nelson can't get away with this. It's a direct violation of—
Keep your hand under that water.
It's okay now.
The paraffin's hard enough.
Take it easy.
You're pulling the skin off my hand.
Skin isn't all this'll pull off.
If there's any gunpowder,
it'll be on the wax too.
Hey, what's that stuff?
Solution of diphenylamine and sulfuric acid which reacts instantly to nitrates.
Watch those chemicals, Burke.
If they turn blue, your goose is cooked.
It's negative.
- Then you didn't shoot her!
- I told you I didn't.
Get out of here and take that shyster with you!
Okay. Don't get excited.
Thanks a lot, Mr. Chan, for suggesting that test.
- Drop up to the club sometime.
- Thank you so much.
May accept generous invitation as case progress.
[Door Opens, Closes]
- Well, that lets Burke out.
- Maybe.
But this one case where murderer could have clean hands.
- Huh?
- Remember napkin that disappear at nightclub?
- Yeah.
- Possibly used to cover hand that fire murder gun.
- Hey, here they come.
- What happened, fellas?
- Hey, how about it, Burke?
- One at a time.
One at a time, please.
- Johnny, how did you clear yourself?
- By keepin' my hands clean.
- How about a picture, Mr. Burke?
- Why not? Make sure you get that sign.
I wanna prove I'm goin' out instead of comin' in.
- We'll get it in, all right. Thank you.
- Bye, boys.
- Where are you going?
- I want to sell this picture of Burke's release...
- before he's arrested again.
- Let's go see what the inspector's got.
Good idea.
- What happened, Inspector?
- Did you give Burke a clean bill?
- What's your next move?
- Come on, Nelson. Give us the lowdown.
I've got nothin' to say yet.
What about you, Mr. Chan?
Looks like Burke pulled a nifty on you.
Perhaps. But release of Mr. Burke suggest other nifty.
- What have you got up your sleeve?
- Give us the lowdown.
- Yeah!
- Just a minute, boys. If there is a new angle... we'll try it out before you reporters advertise it.
- [Chattering]
- Out! Get out.
Wait a minute, Nelson. I'm entitled to a break.
I've been on this case since it started.
- So long. Out.
- [Muttering]
Say, give us a chance here, will you?
Now what was on your mind, Charlie?
You have candid-camera photos taken last night at Hottentot Club?
Yeah. They're in the department files, but—
Uh, please to send for same right away.
Yeah, sure. Yeah.
Now let's see.
Burke and Miss Collins were standing there.
Pop was right back here.
I'm getting awfully tired, Lee.
We've been going over this for more than an hour.
But doesn't your intuition tell you anything?
Pop says, "One woman's intuition better than 10 scientists."
I don't know anything about intuition... but I've got a feeling we ought to get out of here.
Let's try it once again.
Put yourself in the place of the murderer.
Now, when the lights went out... he grabbed the napkin off the desk here and ran to the door.
- What are you doin' up here?
- Why—Why, nothing.
Beat it.
- Your old man sent you here, didn't he?
- No, sir. It was my own idea.
[Screams]
Throw him out.
Hey, let me go! Hey!
Hey! Hey, let me go!
- We're gettin' out of town, kid.
- What's the idea? You got nothin' to worry about now.
That's what you think. Remember the crack the Chinese dick made about seeing us later?
- Yeah.
- Now we catch his kid here monkeying around.
That's enough for me. We'll hop a plane for Chicago tonight and lay low till the heat's off.
But, Johnny, don't you think that—
There he is.
- Let's go.
- Not so fast, Burke.
- Leave me alone.
- Take it easy, sister.
- What's the idea?
- It ain't my idea. It's Inspector Nelson's.
Come on.
[Clears Throat]
- Special delivery, Mr. Murdock.
- Oh, thanks.
- [Man] Murdock?
- Who are you?
Central Bureau.
Inspector Nelson wants you.
I'm ready.
What do you think of them lettin' Burke go?
Says they couldn't prove anything on him.
Everybody but the cops knows he pulled the job.
That's right, Buzz.
[Door Opens]
Move over.
- Where do you think you're goin'?
- With you. This is a pinch.
Ahh.
- Lee.
- Yes, Pop?
Have already consumed own steak?
No. I-I've got it here on my eye.
Has the swelling gone down any?
Cannot see through gravy.
Puppy detective perhaps now realize snooping very dangerous business.
[Knocking]
- Hello, Mr. Patten.
- Hello.
- Hey, what did you run into?
- Mr. Burke.
That's what I came up to warn you about, Mr. Chan.
There's a rumor around town that certain people are out to get you.
And they wouldn't be as easy on you as they were on your son.
Uh, very good omen.
Prove suspects getting worried.
You got a lot of nerve. But just the same,
I'm stickin' with you tonight.
- Why, anything might happen.
- Swell idea, kid.
Excuse me for not knockin',
Charlie, but the door was open.
Well, Speed, here's your chance for another scoop.
We'll run down to the Hottentot Club.
Then, as you said, anything might happen.
- You mean it's a payoff?
- Maybe.
- Have you got a cigarette?
- Gosh, can I go too, Pop?
Unfortunately, yes.
Only way to save other eye.
Hello, everybody.
Well, Mr. Murdock.
Can I sell you a picture of yourself as a murder suspect?
Don't be ridiculous.
Where's Nelson?
I can't waste all night here.
I've got a newspaper to get out.
It can wait.
[Door Opens]
Now look here, Nelson.
You've gone too far with this.
All right. All right.
Keep quiet.
Now Mr. Chan has a few words to say to all of you, and I advise you to listen closely.
Thank you so much.
Excuse abrupt invitation here tonight.
But all present... seriously involved in death of Miss Billie Bronson and Thomas Mitchell.
Mr. Mitchell follow
Miss Bronson from Europe... to secure diary which contain much scandal.
Plan using same to ruin Mr. Burke...
who stole love of wife, Marie.
That's plain, downright collusion.
I'm a respectable girl.
Pardon, please.
Am not questioning respectability.
Uh, merely offer proof of intimacy.
Candid-camera photo
taken on night of crime.
Triangle very ancient motive
for murder.
But not only angle to present case.
Sudden appearance of late Miss Bronson...
cause perspiration on brow
of another gentleman.
Name— Buzz Moran.
Wait a minute.
I didn't even know she was in town.
Contradiction, please.
All right.
I admit I talked to her.
When I heard she was murdered, I didn't wanna get mixed up in it, so I kept my mouth shut.
Sure. They had Johnny on the spot, so you had nothing to worry about.
Shut up, Marie.
Go ahead, Charlie.
Miss Bronson came to this office last night.
Mr. Burke and then Miss Collins talk with her.
Testimony state both people leave her alone for a few minutes.
In same few minutes,
someone murder her...
with gun wrapped in napkin
to hide fingerprints.
Arrival of, uh,
inquisitive girl photographer... now create interruption.
Murderer hide while girl photograph body
with napkin off tray.
Girl then leave... and murderer return napkin to tray.
After which, Mr. Patten enter...
find body and telephone story
to Mr. Murdock.
By strange coincidence...
Mr. Murdock absent
on trail of diary.
Mr. Chan... may I ask if you have a picture of me in your invaluable collection?
Regret. Distinguished features only ones missing.
Under the circumstances, I believe that exonerates me from having murdered Miss Bronson.
Oh, yeah? How about Mitchell?
Now look here, Nelson.
I've been very tolerant with you.
- But unless I'm released from this room instantly—
- Excuse, please.
Before you remove honorable presence... would request letter received through mail tonight.
What letter?
- My mail is very heavy.
- We're wasting time.
You got a special delivery letter tonight.
We've had your mail watched since yesterday.
Hand it over.
Why, it— it's a page from Billie's diary.
[Murdock] I wouldn't have printed it
without your permission, Nelson.
After all, it just arrived when your man came to pick me up.
I haven't even read it through.
- Who sent it to you?
- How should I know?
- You know what I think, Murdock?
I think you sent it to yourself.
- Why, that's absolute—
You've got that diary! You've always been after it. I charge you with the—
Please.
Perhaps better to read contents of page before making arrest.
Oh, all right.
"May 7. Was up all night on a big partyJohnny swung... for Lieutenant R.
Of the Central Bureau when"—
You officers better wait outside.
[Door Closes]
"He's retiring from the force because the commissioner got wise to him.
"The big dummy showed everybody a diamond watch Buzz Moran gave him... for certain important tip-offs thatJohnny told me about."
Been shooting your mouth off again, huh?
I don't know how she found that out, Buzz.
I never told her anything.
All right. All right.
Take it easy.
"It was sure funny to see everybody kowtow toJohnny and Buzz.
"I guess they don't know that the double-crosser who uses his newspaper job...
"as a cover-up
for the blackmailing he pulls...
is Speed Patten,
the smoothest guy in the rackets"!!
Just a minute.
Let me see that.
- This is a phony.
- Can prove?
Certainly. Why, even the paper it's written on—
- Go ahead.
- Hey, what is this?
You are murderer of Billie Bronson and Thomas Mitchell.
- You're crazy!
- Beg to differ, Mr. Patten.
First suspicion arrive... after reading your newspaper story of Billie Bronson crime.
You state victim shot in back.
Quite true.
Yet photograph show body face upward.
Only murderer could know
location ofhidden wound.
Then, fearing discovery of own fingerprints on napkin... when attention called to it through photo taken by young lady...
you remove same as lights go out
and Mr. Burke escape.
You are indeed clever man.
But not smart enough to avoid ancient trap set tonight.
Inspector Nelson and humble self.'... plant bogus diary page on Mr. Murdock.
- You were the only one who swallowed the bait!
- You'll never convict me.
Contradiction, please.
To know forgery, one must have original.
Well? Come on.
Why don't you deny it?
All right. I did it.
I killed 'em both.
I overheard Billie tell Burke that she was going to the D.A. And blow the lid off this town.
Well, that would've meant me too.
I offered her plenty to keep quiet, but she wouldn't take it.
So I killed her.
You almost caught me, Joan, when you walked in and found Billie dead.
If you had, l—
I guess I'd have killed you too.
Just as I did Mitchell when I caught him in that hotel room.
He already found the diary, and I had to get it.
Well, that's the story.
Nelson wouldn't have caught me
in a million years.
I was sittin'pretty
until you got too smart for me, Mr. Chan.
You're the one I can thank for bein' in this spot... and here's how
I'm gonna show my gratitude!
[Screaming]
All right, boys.
Take him down to headquarters.
- You okay, son?
- I'm all right.
Charlie, Billie's diary is somewhere in Patten's apartment.
And that's all I need to put that guy on ice. Come on.
Well, thanks to you, Charlie, there's the baby... that's gonna sweep Broadway cleaner than it's been since the Indians sold it.
Uh, most happy to have placed new broom in hands of Father Knickerbocker.
Yeah. Say, I'm sorry you're going home, Charlie.
How about staying an extra week as guests of the commissioner and myself?
Gee, Pop. Let's do it.
I never did get to see Broadway.
[Laughing]
Ho-Ho-Holy mackerel! Look. Another mouse.
[Chuckling]
Perhaps better to return to Honolulu.
Evidently,
Broadway very hard on eyes.
I, uh, think you've got something there, Charlie.
[Music]
[Music]
[Applause]
[Music]
<font color="#CCCCCC">You sure about the address mister yes</font> this is the place<font color="#E5E5E5"> you'll be sure</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> wait</font> for me now<font color="#E5E5E5"> won't you sure</font> come on it's funny number please or I'm the<font color="#CCCCCC"> 122 Old Mill Road the tower</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">has</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> been occupied for</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 13 years and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yet</font> there's a telephone in it<font color="#E5E5E5"> can you tell</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">me who had it installed</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I wouldn't have</font> that information<font color="#E5E5E5"> madam</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I could connect</font> you with<font color="#CCCCCC"> an ID supervisor but you'd have</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to wait until</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> business office opens</font> in the<font color="#E5E5E5"> morning</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I'm sorry</font> all the modern<font color="#CCCCCC"> improvements</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I'm</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> gonna</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> clean the place up a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> bit</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh yes</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of course</font> dad's up there.
<font color="#E5E5E5">I sat next to him</font> mr. Barksdale sat next to<font color="#E5E5E5"> me aunt</font>
Lucille Uncle John
Harold mother for.
<font color="#E5E5E5">Marjorie</font> uncle dick<font color="#CCCCCC"> and Joan</font> uncle Wayne mr.<font color="#E5E5E5"> Barksdale</font> mr.<font color="#CCCCCC"> Bartel</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> is that you</font> mr.<font color="#E5E5E5"> Barksdale mr. Barksdale</font>
[Music]
Police station<font color="#E5E5E5"> captain</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Ryan speaking</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">yeah the old Morgan place</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he says he</font> drove a youngster<font color="#E5E5E5"> out there about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 30</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">minutes ago</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">hold the driver I'll be right over okay</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">wake up your</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dumb ass</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and let</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> home get</font> going before<font color="#CCCCCC"> we go</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hold up</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> get on a</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">macro</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> alright</font> and they divert some<font color="#E5E5E5"> nine 600 you can go</font> leave your<font color="#CCCCCC"> address but wants you later</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">yes</font> what<font color="#E5E5E5"> well keep ringing them hello hello.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Phil this is Ryan listen we've got a</font> swell<font color="#E5E5E5"> case down</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> here</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm not interested</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">give me Stuyvesant 9600 when you hear</font> the tone of the<font color="#CCCCCC"> gong it will be exactly</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">12</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> o'clock and 63</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> seconds</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ring that</font> number again<font color="#E5E5E5"> hello hello you say what's</font> the<font color="#CCCCCC"> idea putting</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that Dame on the phone</font>
I<font color="#E5E5E5"> know what time it is what time is it</font> shut up<font color="#E5E5E5"> no no no I I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> don't mean you</font> don't hang up
I<font color="#E5E5E5"> want you get over here right away</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">there's been a murder I know</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> but this is</font> a good murder listen 13 years<font color="#CCCCCC"> ago</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a guy invited all</font> his relatives<font color="#E5E5E5"> to dinner the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> SAP deserved</font> to die well<font color="#E5E5E5"> arrest the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> mother-in-law and don't</font> bother<font color="#E5E5E5"> me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> anymore oh all right but make</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">it snappy</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">all right there was 12 people there the</font> table was set<font color="#E5E5E5"> for 13 the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 13th</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> guests</font> never got there that was 13<font color="#CCCCCC"> years ago</font> and now tonight we find a<font color="#E5E5E5"> dame murdered</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">and she's sitting at the table in the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">13th chair huh I counted them</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she was</font> sitting in<font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> thirteenth chair</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you dumb</font> flatfoot<font color="#CCCCCC"> who told you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> where to start</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">counting well go back and count the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">girl's chair first and let me know how</font> you come<font color="#CCCCCC"> out and give my love to Aunt</font>
Sarah bring that number<font color="#E5E5E5"> again and keep</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ringing</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it and then tell the night supervisor I</font> want to know<font color="#CCCCCC"> had a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> couple of phones</font> installed at<font color="#CCCCCC"> 1:22 Old Mill Road if you</font> happen to get the whole<font color="#E5E5E5"> Bell family out</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of bed.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I am a Winston the private investigator</font> captain<font color="#E5E5E5"> Ryan sent for me yes sir go</font> right<font color="#E5E5E5"> in and have fun</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> huh call up</font> headquarters and tell Clarence I'm sending<font color="#E5E5E5"> those prints yes Oh what's a</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">number central fuck you dumb</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> idiot don't</font> even<font color="#E5E5E5"> know that get out and look it up</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> so</font> just let me<font color="#CCCCCC"> know</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you're good yes we got</font> a<font color="#CCCCCC"> 12 murder here good and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the number you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">want is central firepower</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well you</font> certainly took your<font color="#CCCCCC"> time</font>
I was busy<font color="#CCCCCC"> yeah sure</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> when you hear the</font> gong the time will be<font color="#CCCCCC"> twelve o'clock and</font> six<font color="#E5E5E5"> split seconds yeah have a look at</font> this and then<font color="#CCCCCC"> I've introduced you to the</font> lady<font color="#E5E5E5"> this house has been unoccupied for</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">thirteen years yet the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> phone's installed</font> and the<font color="#E5E5E5"> electricity turned on I'm</font> tracing that<font color="#E5E5E5"> those books are on the</font> floor that's all in here now come<font color="#E5E5E5"> on</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and have</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">a look at the banquet</font> the kids<font color="#CCCCCC"> you're</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> home still a little like</font> same old joke<font color="#CCCCCC"> the habit day off I think</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">up a new one you can</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have her now God</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">just a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> minute I want Winston to have a</font> look.
<font color="#CCCCCC">Oh would you take</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> care</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of that Jerri</font> please<font color="#E5E5E5"> okay so</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> bad pretty</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> girl</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">wouldn't notice</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that sitting up yeah</font> okay<font color="#CCCCCC"> dot</font> say how did<font color="#E5E5E5"> you know about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that dinner</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">party 13 years ago</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> every man the dog</font> knows that story<font color="#E5E5E5"> around here.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Morgan's senior drop dead just Apple</font> they all sat<font color="#CCCCCC"> down to the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> table the old</font> lady<font color="#CCCCCC"> she was young man</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> must have been a</font> little<font color="#CCCCCC"> bit cracked herself</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she wouldn't</font> allow<font color="#E5E5E5"> a thing to be touched just closed</font> up<font color="#E5E5E5"> the house and moved up and that step</font> and<font color="#E5E5E5"> all these guys have</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> been waiting for</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the dinner ever since mom give</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> me the</font> willies every time I think<font color="#E5E5E5"> of it well</font> don't<font color="#E5E5E5"> think then</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you know who the girl</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">is.</font>
Sure<font color="#CCCCCC"> daughter Marie Morgan had her whole</font> life's history<font color="#E5E5E5"> in her handbag but no</font> address<font color="#E5E5E5"> the driver that brought her out</font> here<font color="#E5E5E5"> said he picked her up on the corner</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of 59th and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Park Department house no on</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the corner we've been checking up on the</font> apartment<font color="#CCCCCC"> I was around there now how was</font> she killed
<font color="#E5E5E5">hang widely here the doc hasn't said for</font> sure<font color="#E5E5E5"> yet but it looks</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> like she</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> was</font> electrocuted<font color="#E5E5E5"> electrocuted</font> now I thought of that<font color="#CCCCCC"> too</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> not a wire on</font> it that was it<font color="#E5E5E5"> electricity enough to</font> kill her but<font color="#E5E5E5"> not</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to burn the body I</font> wonder where she got<font color="#CCCCCC"> it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">hey that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> lect in the living room I'll</font> get it well what about<font color="#CCCCCC"> that light in the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">living room</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hey Don I tried</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> open</font> every socket in the room that don't work
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> maybe the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Globes burned out never</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">charged with that okay anyway I don't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">think</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I'd go around</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> trying light sockets</font> if I were you why didn't it occur<font color="#CCCCCC"> to you that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a young</font> lady<font color="#CCCCCC"> was electrocuted here tonight</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font> that she<font color="#E5E5E5"> might have been trying light</font> sockets hello operator<font color="#CCCCCC"> see if it and trace that</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">call and ring me back</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> make</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it snappy yes</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">darling there's been a murder</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you've</font> read all about it from<font color="#E5E5E5"> the morning</font> papers she listened in on all the other calls<font color="#CCCCCC"> why the devil didn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> listening</font> on<font color="#E5E5E5"> that one what was it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I don't know I</font> just<font color="#CCCCCC"> heard the receiver going</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> up after I</font> answered hello
<font color="#E5E5E5">captain Ryan speaking sound</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Hotel</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> thank</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> sister.</font>
Oh beat it over the sound<font color="#E5E5E5"> hotel and see</font> if we can trace<font color="#E5E5E5"> that call</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> get a list of</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">all the guests and all the telephone</font> calls<font color="#E5E5E5"> after midnight and don't Muppet</font> and don't go to sleep<font color="#E5E5E5"> oh well how am I</font> going to get there you can drive a car
<font color="#E5E5E5">can't you sweetheart take mine and feed</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh that guy's uncle don't die</font> soon I'll be<font color="#E5E5E5"> a nervous wreck who's the</font> uncle just<font color="#CCCCCC"> a big boss in the city that's</font> all
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh-ho so that's why he's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on the force</font> you don't suppose because<font color="#CCCCCC"> you got any</font> brains what's the<font color="#E5E5E5"> matter now</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well</font> obvious<font color="#CCCCCC"> what are you laughing at</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> nothing</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I just think it's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> funny</font>
I'm glad you invited me down.
<font color="#E5E5E5">I'm invited</font> yeah<font color="#CCCCCC"> okay</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sit down I'll see you in a few</font> minutes do they identify<font color="#E5E5E5"> the body</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> yes sir</font> there's one of<font color="#E5E5E5"> you as the brother I am</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">friend of yours yes and of my sister</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">all right boys I won't keep</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you long</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">either</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> know a man named Barksdale</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">yes</font> we both do he was my father's lawyer is he still handling the estate<font color="#E5E5E5"> yes why</font> we'll ask the<font color="#CCCCCC"> questions if you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">mind son wasn't your father's</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well a</font> little<font color="#E5E5E5"> unusual it was quite unusual</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he</font> provided for<font color="#E5E5E5"> my mother for Marie and me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">left the bulk of the estate to the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 13th</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">guest who was that we don't know the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">13th</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> guests</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> never arrived</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">screwie</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> anything else about this guest</font> no accepted we always<font color="#E5E5E5"> supposed that he'd</font> come forward and<font color="#E5E5E5"> be named when we became</font> of<font color="#E5E5E5"> age or what'll that be well why do</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you suppose</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that might have had</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">something to do with it.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Marie was 21 yesterday what yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Boxtel</font> call it<font color="#E5E5E5"> the other day and told you I'm</font> not<font color="#CCCCCC"> interested in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font> well I am<font color="#CCCCCC"> all right be interested wait a</font> minute where you going<font color="#E5E5E5"> out I'll see you</font> later<font color="#CCCCCC"> hey but</font>
I suppose you were at that<font color="#E5E5E5"> dinner part</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">of your poly</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> game</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> how'd</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> your</font> sisters hit that night<font color="#E5E5E5"> right beside my</font> father<font color="#CCCCCC"> she always had that which side</font> one is right will you draw me a diagram with that table<font color="#E5E5E5"> name the people in the seating</font> arrangement<font color="#E5E5E5"> and if any of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> them have died</font> since make a note<font color="#CCCCCC"> of it</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> have you kept in</font> touch<font color="#CCCCCC"> with the family when</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> we couldn't</font> avoid it well put down their addresses and<font color="#E5E5E5"> leave it with a captain here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Thanks</font> do you remember<font color="#E5E5E5"> how we set that night</font> yes I think<font color="#CCCCCC"> so</font> were you there<font color="#E5E5E5"> well</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I was visiting there</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">we were just kids</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> then but it isn't easy</font> to<font color="#E5E5E5"> forget a thing like that dinner</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> party</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I suppose not</font>
I've got a hunch I'll be thinking<font color="#CCCCCC"> about</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it for some</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> time</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> myself</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> let's hear</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">about that phone</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> call from</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Barksdale and</font>
I'll let you go well there there isn't
<font color="#E5E5E5">much to it except that Barksdale called</font> her a<font color="#CCCCCC"> few days ago and gave</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> us an</font> instructions something she was supposed to do on a 21st birthday<font color="#CCCCCC"> and you don't</font> remember what<font color="#E5E5E5"> they were</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I know</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she</font> wouldn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> tell me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and we're supposed to</font> find<font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> answer</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> does anybody know</font> anything what's the matter with the old
<font color="#E5E5E5">man besides being nuts are you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sure this</font> dinner wasn't held in an insane<font color="#E5E5E5"> asylum</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> try and calm down</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> take these voices</font> of the next office<font color="#CCCCCC"> and give him some</font> paper and pencils<font color="#E5E5E5"> and send Carter a yes</font> you boys better stick around<font color="#E5E5E5"> we might</font> want you that's too bad son take care<font color="#E5E5E5"> of yourself</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what do you mean nothing much</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you mean</font> they might go after<font color="#E5E5E5"> me</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">all right no I</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> think I'd care if</font> they did well we would the cost<font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> department a lot of dough to investigate a<font color="#E5E5E5"> murder well in that case I'll be</font> careful.
Thanks you've been<font color="#CCCCCC"> very considerate today</font> that's<font color="#E5E5E5"> all right son</font> well what do you<font color="#E5E5E5"> think</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I can't think I'm</font> numb<font color="#E5E5E5"> why the devil does a man have to go</font> through all<font color="#E5E5E5"> that hocus-pocus just to</font> leave a will<font color="#CCCCCC"> it burns me up well</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> stop</font> burning<font color="#CCCCCC"> Carl may happy yeah hey cutter</font> let's<font color="#E5E5E5"> see what you got</font> yes sir here the deposit slips<font color="#CCCCCC"> in the</font> telephones lights<font color="#E5E5E5"> parted but</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ones</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on.</font>
Barksdale<font color="#E5E5E5"> Barksdale</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> so that's where</font> you've<font color="#CCCCCC"> got of that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah feel better now</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I'm safe</font> wait'll I<font color="#CCCCCC"> lay my hands on this guy also</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">a man answering to Barksdale description</font> registered at<font color="#CCCCCC"> the sound hotel last night</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">about 9:30 under the name of Perry</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font> at<font color="#CCCCCC"> 122 put in a call to Douglas</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> nine</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">six eight then checked out of his hotel</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">immediately after</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hasn't been home</font> since<font color="#E5E5E5"> sandy has</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> been shown up these are</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">bitchin</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and these folks</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> were getting</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">worry</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> now</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> isn't that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> killed bad</font> tell them they<font color="#CCCCCC"> can see him</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on visitors</font> day<font color="#E5E5E5"> let's go the pod research</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I managed</font> to<font color="#E5E5E5"> dig this up out of them</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> The Daily.</font>
Herald files
<font color="#CCCCCC">what's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Butterfield</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 12</font> let's send it out at once<font color="#E5E5E5"> okay put a</font> couple<font color="#E5E5E5"> of the boys on those two kids in</font> there they may be<font color="#CCCCCC"> alright and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> again they</font> may not yes sir anything else<font color="#CCCCCC"> releasing</font> no but stick<font color="#CCCCCC"> around</font> calling all<font color="#E5E5E5"> cars</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> calling all cars</font> stand by for description of one John.
Barksdale<font color="#E5E5E5"> wanted for questioning on the.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Morgan murder case last seen on Long.</font>
Island driving a Packard<font color="#E5E5E5"> touring license</font> unknown description<font color="#CCCCCC"> fifty years</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> six feet</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">grey hair</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> eyes brown that is all</font>
[Applause]
[Music]
Hello
<font color="#E5E5E5">hello</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">ah.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I don't care you call me all the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> name</font> here<font color="#E5E5E5"> warden</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> brought out on names to</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">call you</font>
I don't care<font color="#E5E5E5"> mr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Whitson if you to hurt</font> it good<font color="#CCCCCC"> what does</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it sound like room</font> like<font color="#E5E5E5"> harsh</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> fire and the devil</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and a</font> couple of a nice<font color="#E5E5E5"> throat in that could</font> you give me an<font color="#CCCCCC"> idea of what</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it sounded</font> like<font color="#E5E5E5"> kinda retarded kind of up like it's</font> kind of<font color="#E5E5E5"> like it perhaps if you tried it</font> again<font color="#E5E5E5"> bro yeah well don't you know</font> they're being rugby shut up
I was only trying<font color="#CCCCCC"> shot up get out</font> that
<font color="#CCCCCC">so who put all them books there</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> so what</font>
I did you go to sleep<font color="#CCCCCC"> today I don't</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">think</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> so</font> you<font color="#CCCCCC"> don't think so</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> get out of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> my</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sight</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">before I kill you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah</font> hey<font color="#CCCCCC"> so</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Clint</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you come here where are you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">is he dead</font> it's Barksdale<font color="#CCCCCC"> can you beat that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> certain</font> house upstairs<font color="#E5E5E5"> and down yes sir nothing</font> that'll do much good<font color="#E5E5E5"> well what's the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">answer it's got me worried plenty me too</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">but I'm beginning to be glad</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that I</font> wasn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> invited to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that dinner party</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">years ago yeah here's the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> diagram</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> young</font>
Morgan<font color="#E5E5E5"> true today take a look at the</font> seating arrangement first we find the
<font color="#E5E5E5">girl's body in the chair</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that she sat in</font> that<font color="#E5E5E5"> night and now this are you</font> beginning to get the<font color="#E5E5E5"> idea</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">gee</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes ye gods Phil are they gonna</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">blind this table with stiffs that's the</font> way it looks unless we do<font color="#E5E5E5"> something but but that's</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">crazy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it very nearly confirms one thing</font> though the<font color="#E5E5E5"> person doing it was at the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">table that night</font>
I've<font color="#CCCCCC"> gotta talk</font>
[Applause]
<font color="#CCCCCC">No</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how'd</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you get out</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the market</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> haven't<font color="#E5E5E5"> been in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> any more</font> take your hands off<font color="#CCCCCC"> me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> be nice I won't</font> let me alone do you want me to spank you<font color="#E5E5E5"> hold still</font> that's a good<font color="#E5E5E5"> little girl what's your</font> name<font color="#CCCCCC"> Marie Morgan yes</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> what did you say</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> asked this child here if she<font color="#CCCCCC"> would Marie</font>
Morgan I<font color="#E5E5E5"> know child will you shut up and</font> she said yes and<font color="#E5E5E5"> she said yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I don't</font> know<font color="#E5E5E5"> maybe it's something I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hate</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> this is</font> the<font color="#CCCCCC"> nightmare where</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> did you pick her up</font> riding<font color="#CCCCCC"> around in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> your car</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in market I</font> was<font color="#CCCCCC"> on</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> my way to the police</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> station yes</font> and<font color="#CCCCCC"> baby you're still on your way to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> police<font color="#CCCCCC"> station take it out</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and lock her</font> up I've got some things I want<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> ask</font> her about<font color="#CCCCCC"> you can't arrest me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Oh can't I</font> that's what they all<font color="#CCCCCC"> say</font> maybe it's all a mistake and maybe you can<font color="#E5E5E5"> explain everything out but you won't</font> say a word<font color="#E5E5E5"> until you see your lawyer</font> well I won't<font color="#CCCCCC"> all right baby</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> come</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and see</font> your lawyer<font color="#CCCCCC"> talk</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to a good look</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">marjory</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that's right you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> know</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> anything</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">about it no what can this mean that's</font> what we're gonna find<font color="#E5E5E5"> out take our luck</font> in the library<font color="#E5E5E5"> did we get through here</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what she headed for police station</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">was going in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that direction</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">call up</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> city</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> headquarters and report</font> this call a coroner and stick<font color="#E5E5E5"> around</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">outside</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes sir no why did you ask that</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">girl if she was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Marie Morgan I think she</font> is what<font color="#CCCCCC"> about the other Dame there are</font> no twins no but the other<font color="#CCCCCC"> girl had</font> several<font color="#E5E5E5"> small scars around her face</font> didn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> you notice them yes but I didn't</font> think anything<font color="#CCCCCC"> about</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I did</font>
I thought she'd had<font color="#CCCCCC"> her face lifted</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well</font> what a blasted idiot I have been that's why you were<font color="#E5E5E5"> so surprised when her</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">brother told you she was 21</font> certainly<font color="#E5E5E5"> no kid that age is going to</font> have<font color="#E5E5E5"> her face lifted and you beat it</font> back to the morgue to have another<font color="#E5E5E5"> look</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">right and took</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a good</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> plastic surgeon</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">with me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she hadn't had her face lifted</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">she'd had it completely made over</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well</font>
I'll be now that<font color="#CCCCCC"> commenced to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> make sense.</font>
Barksdale<font color="#E5E5E5"> made an appointment with</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font> real<font color="#E5E5E5"> Marie Morgan to meet him here they</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">planned to kill</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> her and stuff</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she took</font> the<font color="#E5E5E5"> other girl who planned to kill her</font> huh Barksdale made the appointment<font color="#CCCCCC"> yes</font> but if<font color="#CCCCCC"> Barksdale was</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in on it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> but she</font> may have been<font color="#E5E5E5"> who killed the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> gentlemen</font> on your<font color="#E5E5E5"> right</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">little bo-peep</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">operating</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I wouldn't do that if I were you</font> police might not like it I was only trying to call my brother<font color="#CCCCCC"> we'll</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> call him</font> later<font color="#CCCCCC"> you're going to take a ride with</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">me where to my apartment</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> she'd be safer</font> in jail<font color="#E5E5E5"> don't worry she won't get away</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> didn't mean that<font color="#E5E5E5"> I said she'd be safer</font> in<font color="#CCCCCC"> jail</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> humane go to the devil</font> mr. Adams<font color="#CCCCCC"> two bits</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in why my dear child</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">why I'm almost afraid to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> touch you what</font> is the meaning of all<font color="#E5E5E5"> this why I'll have</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to send back</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> cutaway I ordered for</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">your funeral</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you wear those</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to wedding</font> is not funerals this is<font color="#E5E5E5"> uncle Adams the worst old</font> reprobate who ever lived<font color="#CCCCCC"> my dear you're</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">covering quite a lot</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of territory</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> how do</font> you do mr. Winston I'm delighted how do you do<font color="#E5E5E5"> if you give</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> him a drink guy think</font> he make you still one of the<font color="#CCCCCC"> beat scotch</font> and Soda Springs<font color="#E5E5E5"> and thanks easy on the</font> soda.
[Applause]
<font color="#CCCCCC">Hey if you want my</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> opinion it's uncle</font>
Adams who's been committing all the murders<font color="#E5E5E5"> all the murders mr. Barksdale</font> was murdered today<font color="#E5E5E5"> in the old</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> house.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Boxster my word whatever you understand</font> but but murders
<font color="#E5E5E5">what's the meaning of it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> mr. Winston</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you're investigating the case I suppose</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">unofficially</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I'm a friend of Captain.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Ryan yes yes of course I've heard of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">well have you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> any accused don't you</font> cover<font color="#E5E5E5"> many ideas no but he has a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> laugh</font> for you<font color="#E5E5E5"> really</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well let's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> have</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it</font> you're next what according to mr.
Winston's<font color="#E5E5E5"> theory</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you're next</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on the list</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">unless</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of course you've been</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> doing the</font> murders yourself<font color="#CCCCCC"> you've</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> always had the</font> most<font color="#CCCCCC"> acute sense of humor must be some</font> more of the<font color="#E5E5E5"> family I'm doing the</font> resurrection egg and enjoying a<font color="#E5E5E5"> fairy if</font>
I know<font color="#CCCCCC"> your you certainly startled me</font> if you explain<font color="#E5E5E5"> your reasons well for</font> heaven's sake<font color="#CCCCCC"> I thought you were dead</font> disappointed<font color="#E5E5E5"> well why be a hypocrite you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">know</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I've always hated your module if</font> you say that word<font color="#CCCCCC"> again out</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it's only</font> what our laws is this for private<font color="#CCCCCC"> use only I suppose</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">your</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Winston at your service</font>
I may take you<font color="#CCCCCC"> up on that if</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> this is</font> another<font color="#E5E5E5"> one of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> your jokes Murray I must</font> say it's in bad taste
I've been simply frustrated all day I'll bet you have<font color="#CCCCCC"> bridge always tires</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> mother</font>
Marjorie<font color="#CCCCCC"> they tried to kill</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me are you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">glad I'm alive</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> am I glad I think you are</font> but what does it mean since<font color="#E5E5E5"> they made us</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">get down to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> look at that that other girl</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">was you did you cry well to tell you the</font> truth money<font color="#CCCCCC"> week</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> we both went home</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> we've</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">got</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> potted</font> that's just as good mr. Winston has<font color="#E5E5E5"> a</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">whole family here he says one</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of them is</font> the murderer<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm getting odds on uncle.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Adams Adams he's too lazy to commit a</font> murder but<font color="#CCCCCC"> tell</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me darling what happened to you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well here we are just one big</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> happy</font> family oh hello<font color="#CCCCCC"> Thor</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> who was that blonde I saw</font> you with<font color="#E5E5E5"> the other night there was no</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">blonde and you know it dear Marjorie</font> your soul must<font color="#E5E5E5"> look</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> like the inside of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a</font> vinegar bottle<font color="#E5E5E5"> hi Jove it's a good idea</font>
I wish I had thought of<font color="#CCCCCC"> it yourself</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">what's that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> killing</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> off</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> her family</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font> must be some poor soul that<font color="#E5E5E5"> had the</font> misfortune to dine with<font color="#CCCCCC"> us when we</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> were</font> all together I think<font color="#CCCCCC"> you're right</font> someone who dined with you 13 years<font color="#CCCCCC"> ago.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Oh.</font>
You mean the night that<font color="#E5E5E5"> John read that</font> stupid<font color="#E5E5E5"> will and then died</font> well mercy<font color="#E5E5E5"> don't over me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I didn't kill</font> him no one killed him as far<font color="#E5E5E5"> as we know does</font> anyone here know the present whereabouts of<font color="#CCCCCC"> wayne seymour</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the last time I saw him</font>
I got an impression<font color="#CCCCCC"> that he was</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> going to</font> spend<font color="#E5E5E5"> the rest of his days at number</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 9</font>
Yokohama<font color="#CCCCCC"> I see you know</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> your Yokohama</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">mr.</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Winston I've traveled a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> bit with the</font> exception of<font color="#E5E5E5"> Wayne Seymour you people</font> were the<font color="#E5E5E5"> only guests at that dinner who</font> are still<font color="#E5E5E5"> alive</font> well we're dead from the neck up speak to<font color="#CCCCCC"> yourself John I'll speak if</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you don't</font> mind<font color="#E5E5E5"> go ahead</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> but a few snappy jokes</font> injected<font color="#E5E5E5"> here and there would make a</font> world of difference<font color="#CCCCCC"> you see we're</font> accustomed to public speaking<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm afraid</font> this isn't a joking matter<font color="#CCCCCC"> it looks as</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">if someone is determined to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> kill every</font> person<font color="#CCCCCC"> who attended</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that dinner 13 years</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">ago they've already killed two people</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">too</font> yes a girl mistaken for<font color="#E5E5E5"> Miss Morgan and</font>
John Barksdale<font color="#CCCCCC"> Boxtel murdered</font> very much so<font color="#CCCCCC"> and in both cases</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> bodies were found<font color="#E5E5E5"> in the chairs occupied</font> by that person at the dinner<font color="#E5E5E5"> and as.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Captain Ryan so elegantly describes it</font> the murderer intends to line the table with<font color="#CCCCCC"> stiffs</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how vulgar</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well thank goodness I was</font> under<font color="#CCCCCC"> the table most of the time yes</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">pinching me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh I was a cute youngster</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">always full of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> fun</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">someday</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll look at your baby pictures</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">but just now we're discussing</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> murder</font> which automatically makes<font color="#E5E5E5"> one think of</font> the<font color="#CCCCCC"> Margaery</font> speak for yourself John shall<font color="#CCCCCC"> we go on</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">with this or just turn it into a family</font> reunion<font color="#CCCCCC"> well why not have a blind</font> protest<font color="#CCCCCC"> couldn't matter which one you</font> picked<font color="#E5E5E5"> we'd all cut each other's throats</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a dime why a dime</font>
I cut yours for fun give me<font color="#CCCCCC"> police</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> headquarters detective</font> bureau captain<font color="#CCCCCC"> Brown's office well it</font> isn't every<font color="#CCCCCC"> day you get</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a chance to see</font> a<font color="#CCCCCC"> mastermind at work.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Oh who's this speaking oh well this is.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Winston send the wagon to my apartment</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">and issue for John Doe and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> three Jane</font>
Doe warrants material witnesses<font color="#E5E5E5"> in the</font>
Morgan case right I've got them here really<font color="#E5E5E5"> you're quite amusing mr. Winston</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">thank you</font> you'll like the matron in the city jail
<font color="#E5E5E5">too</font> she's one of the Philadelphia Smith perhaps<font color="#CCCCCC"> by this</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> time you're beginning to</font> see that<font color="#E5E5E5"> I mean</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> business now then you</font> want to stop trying<font color="#E5E5E5"> to be clever or do</font> you want to spend the<font color="#E5E5E5"> night in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> jail do</font> the men have separate<font color="#CCCCCC"> boards from the</font> women<font color="#E5E5E5"> I think you settled it then young</font> lady<font color="#E5E5E5"> night in jail may make you people</font> see that murder<font color="#E5E5E5"> isn't amusing this is an</font> outrage it's always murder
<font color="#E5E5E5">oh you can't do this</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> wait and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> see I</font> break<font color="#E5E5E5"> you for this the governor is a</font> personal<font color="#CCCCCC"> friend of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> mine and of mine and</font>
I happen to know<font color="#CCCCCC"> that he's a little</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">funny when it comes to murder</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he doesn't</font> like<font color="#E5E5E5"> it don't be a lot of fools he</font> doesn't intend<font color="#CCCCCC"> ascenders syc good</font> evening sergeant<font color="#E5E5E5"> de vivir sir</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the warrants desert</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> yes yes all signed</font> and in order<font color="#E5E5E5"> all right take these people</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">down and lock them up yes sir all right</font> step lively<font color="#CCCCCC"> I demand to see my lawyer</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">miss Morgan saw her lawyer today and I</font> don't<font color="#E5E5E5"> think</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> she enjoyed it you'll be</font> sorry for this good night when<font color="#CCCCCC"> a deer</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">winces</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> good night my dear</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and the</font> sweet dream.
[Applause]
<font color="#CCCCCC">Turn</font>
[Applause]
Oh come on<font color="#E5E5E5"> down</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Derry</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> we've got another</font> corpse<font color="#E5E5E5"> that what what what the family's</font> all locked up yeah sure you're a smart guy
I don't know<font color="#CCCCCC"> I'm over it</font> you're coming down<font color="#CCCCCC"> okay get me the</font> police station Oh<font color="#CCCCCC"> give me the desk</font> sergeant the<font color="#CCCCCC"> City Jail yeah hello</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> this</font> is<font color="#E5E5E5"> Winston private investigator on the</font>
Morgan case<font color="#E5E5E5"> I sent down seven of the</font> upper crust<font color="#CCCCCC"> for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you will you send</font> somebody in and see if they're all<font color="#E5E5E5"> there</font> yes hey Mike take a look at the<font color="#CCCCCC"> 400 and</font> see if they're all<font color="#E5E5E5"> there okay sergeant</font> don't touch her magic<font color="#E5E5E5"> hey what's the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">matter what</font> what she says you remind her of her mother.
[Laughter]
Yes I know you're<font color="#E5E5E5"> gonna write a letter</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">to the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Commissioner say what are you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">trying to do rip me Jimmy no say if you</font> guys don't tell me up there's gonna be a murder well that's what we're here<font color="#CCCCCC"> for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> two</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">murders he did them what</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hey pipe down</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">yeah hide among oh go read your ticker I</font> want to know what<font color="#E5E5E5"> Steel's doing all</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">there sergeant</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">okay all</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I mr. Winston</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> okay thanks oh</font> wait<font color="#E5E5E5"> a minute</font> turn them all loose<font color="#CCCCCC"> but I put a man on</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">each one of them</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> now</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll be responsible</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">why</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> runs over here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> men don't know place</font> at all<font color="#E5E5E5"> I've scoured the whole house now</font> the only answer<font color="#CCCCCC"> is there</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> must be a</font> closet<font color="#E5E5E5"> or a room somewhere that we don't</font> know<font color="#E5E5E5"> anything about I don't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> want to know</font> anything<font color="#E5E5E5"> about it all right bill</font> make it snappy<font color="#E5E5E5"> cut it right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> there</font> what do you make<font color="#E5E5E5"> of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that huh I wonder</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">steal great guns</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> nothing rubber about</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">that come on let's get out of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> here</font>
I've seen<font color="#E5E5E5"> sights</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">but that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> one rather</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a neat way</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of doing</font> it though huh they don't think<font color="#E5E5E5"> it's neat fiendish is</font> the devil<font color="#E5E5E5"> do you realize that the</font> murderer<font color="#E5E5E5"> left that switch all not</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">carrying who got killed and while he's</font> asleep<font color="#E5E5E5"> in the county jail</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he commits</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">another murder but he</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> wasn't here to</font> turn<font color="#E5E5E5"> off the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> switch and bring the body</font> in here<font color="#CCCCCC"> I think that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> cinches it but</font> which one<font color="#E5E5E5"> well you saw him which is the</font> most likely<font color="#E5E5E5"> well the odds are about even</font> there's a cousin<font color="#CCCCCC"> Marjorie who'd commit</font> murder just<font color="#E5E5E5"> for the fun of it and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> her</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">mother to kill anything</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that stood</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">her way but</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I think it stands between</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the two uncles</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Addams is a smooth and</font> old devil as I've ever<font color="#E5E5E5"> seen but.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Thornton's deep</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you know the big</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">businessman would stop at nothing what</font> about<font color="#E5E5E5"> the brother and his boyfriend well</font>
I think<font color="#E5E5E5"> they're all right Jensen's in</font> love with the girl<font color="#E5E5E5"> and her brother seems</font> genuinely fond of her what's the<font color="#E5E5E5"> girl's</font> story<font color="#CCCCCC"> oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she said someone</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> shot her in</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the dark</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> she ran upstairs and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hid and by</font> the way<font color="#E5E5E5"> she heard that same cry that</font> grump<font color="#E5E5E5"> heard and according to her</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it</font> wasn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> particularly pleasant just the</font> same I'd like to hear<font color="#E5E5E5"> it then what else</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">did she do besides steal my car</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well she</font> said<font color="#E5E5E5"> she came back down was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> about to be</font> towed out the front door when she<font color="#E5E5E5"> heard</font> a car<font color="#CCCCCC"> and motorcycle driver</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> said by</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font> time<font color="#CCCCCC"> she didn't know where to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> turn</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font> when she came in here and saw her double sitting cold and stiff at the table<font color="#CCCCCC"> she</font> did go nuts<font color="#E5E5E5"> got scared of the police as</font> well<font color="#E5E5E5"> as</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the rest</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hidden the cellar and</font> then stole the car she hid out all the next<font color="#E5E5E5"> day</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> thought better of it and was on</font> her<font color="#CCCCCC"> way to the station when they picked</font> her up it's logical<font color="#CCCCCC"> Barksdale asked her</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">out here</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and what they were all</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">after I think was a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> snip of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> paper that</font> she'd got that day at<font color="#E5E5E5"> the bank</font> which doesn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> make much sense of course</font> unless<font color="#E5E5E5"> it's a safe combination what was</font> it 13131313<font color="#CCCCCC"> I'd like to get old man</font>
Morgan alone for<font color="#E5E5E5"> about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 10 minutes</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'd</font> teach the old<font color="#CCCCCC"> Buzzard how to write a</font> will well we<font color="#E5E5E5"> get the family</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> down here and try</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">and sweat it out of them</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> actually put a</font> close watch on them and see who comes
<font color="#E5E5E5">down here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm in favor of the last</font> now our friend may get<font color="#E5E5E5"> curious and come</font> down<font color="#E5E5E5"> to see if he's had another killing</font> then we keep this last one<font color="#E5E5E5"> quiet</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> huh</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">that's right I've got a hunch it's the</font> missing uncle<font color="#CCCCCC"> look I'm gonna</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> call miss</font>
Morgan<font color="#E5E5E5"> call a car or two with you I'm</font> kind<font color="#CCCCCC"> of ashamed Ripper cuz I've bothered</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">him so much lately thank you well this</font> is<font color="#E5E5E5"> the kind of serious I'm gonna get I'm</font> gonna get<font color="#E5E5E5"> killed every</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> day hello there's</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">a good apartment</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> how'd you like our city</font> jail listen child<font color="#CCCCCC"> I want you to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> destroy</font> that strip<font color="#CCCCCC"> of paper at once and don't</font> tell<font color="#E5E5E5"> anyone what was written on it not</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">even your brother but</font> no one's accusing your<font color="#E5E5E5"> brother they</font> listen<font color="#E5E5E5"> don't you get too smart</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you know</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">there's a distinct prejudice in the</font> police department against little girls who go around stealing<font color="#E5E5E5"> police cards</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh ho you're not well 21 is a mere drop</font> in the bucket
<font color="#CCCCCC">what say</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> will you shut up and let me</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">talk now listen</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't tell anyone those</font> numbers and if anyone tries<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> get them</font> out of<font color="#E5E5E5"> you let me know</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> immediately</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> will</font> you do that<font color="#E5E5E5"> like a sweet little</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> girl</font> that was a great win<font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah what did he</font> want<font color="#CCCCCC"> he told me not to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> tell anybody the</font> numbers on<font color="#E5E5E5"> that slip</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of paper 131313</font>
[Laughter]
<font color="#CCCCCC">We're</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> gonna say don't tell him I told</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">you</font> shame on you<font color="#E5E5E5"> looking at those things</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ah</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">why don't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you have luncheon with me</font> it'll<font color="#CCCCCC"> be</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> more comfortable than standing</font> out<font color="#CCCCCC"> here</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how'd</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you know how to fall on you have</font> you ever<font color="#E5E5E5"> been</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to the zoo sure did you</font> see the elephant<font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well that's how I</font> know.
<font color="#CCCCCC">Fred you're not very bright but</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you may</font> come in<font color="#E5E5E5"> handy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I'm about to go calling</font> would you like to come<font color="#E5E5E5"> along</font>
I gotta go wherever<font color="#E5E5E5"> you go is that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a</font> theme song<font color="#CCCCCC"> or</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> just your</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> plain way of</font> saying things oh well I<font color="#E5E5E5"> you would better ride with me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">no I'm getting a pain in the neck from</font> looking back at you<font color="#CCCCCC"> mug</font> of course just<font color="#E5E5E5"> looking at you may give</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">me a pain in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> neck</font> get in
<font color="#E5E5E5">okay stay there</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> until you relieved that</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">was</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> bet</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> late detail to watch Adams</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he</font> says<font color="#CCCCCC"> that hasn't met the house all day</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">but something</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> just came up</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in a</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">limousine with grump grump</font> he's<font color="#CCCCCC"> telling the Thornton girl</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> tailing</font> her<font color="#E5E5E5"> he's riding in the limousine</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> withers</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I give a hundred bucks to see that come</font> in there's a dr. Sherwood outside so<font color="#CCCCCC"> he</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">has</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> some</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> information on the Morgan</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> case</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">dr. Sherwood</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> yes sir</font> send<font color="#E5E5E5"> him in I hope he's our man okay</font> captain<font color="#E5E5E5"> Brown how do you do</font> won't you sit<font color="#E5E5E5"> down yeah thank you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I hope</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you're a plastic</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> surgeon I see you're</font> ahead<font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I am as a matter of fact and</font>
I operated on<font color="#E5E5E5"> the young lady who was</font> killed
<font color="#CCCCCC">I only saw your notice in the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> paper this</font> morning<font color="#CCCCCC"> yeah well we didn't know until</font> last<font color="#E5E5E5"> night the wrong girl had</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> been</font> killed<font color="#E5E5E5"> but when did you operate on her</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">several months ago three</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> as a matter of</font> fact she and her brother came to<font color="#E5E5E5"> warrant</font> well she said he was<font color="#E5E5E5"> her brother</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> what</font> name did they give Morgan Morgan may I take dr. Sherwood over to<font color="#CCCCCC"> mrs. Morgan's</font> apartment<font color="#CCCCCC"> okay</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you could identify</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> either</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">brother couldn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> certainly he</font> came to me twice<font color="#CCCCCC"> fine</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> let's go well</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">goodbye captain Brown</font> goodbye doctor and thank you thank you hello tell me about this that's<font color="#E5E5E5"> your man</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">no</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> say why aren't you down at the old</font> house<font color="#CCCCCC"> well hi</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> rather tired of being</font> there<font color="#CCCCCC"> so</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> much you a picture</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of your</font> friend<font color="#CCCCCC"> Jenson around yes I think</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> so</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">but look here mr. Winston</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Murray's gone</font> down to<font color="#E5E5E5"> the old house to meet you</font> what<font color="#E5E5E5"> can you call her well no you didn't</font> call<font color="#CCCCCC"> no I tell you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> what's it all about</font>
I just got in she left this was it<font color="#CCCCCC"> though well</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I get picture of.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Jetson</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> short to the back wait</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> please</font> it'll operate it<font color="#E5E5E5"> get me done with some</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 9</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">68</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hurry</font> that's the one<font color="#E5E5E5"> or even that call</font> hello hello<font color="#CCCCCC"> oh yeah</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> listen child don't get in</font> the panic<font color="#E5E5E5"> but get out of the house as</font> quick as you can
<font color="#E5E5E5">is there an officer guarding it yeah</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> man</font> when I told him you sister<font color="#E5E5E5"> infants</font> didn't you call me now don't get<font color="#E5E5E5"> in a penny just get the</font> officer to drive you to the<font color="#E5E5E5"> Douglas and</font> police station<font color="#E5E5E5"> and wait for me there</font> now beat it where's<font color="#CCCCCC"> Miss Morgan hasn't</font> she been here no no one's been here<font color="#E5E5E5"> you come with me I</font> may need<font color="#CCCCCC"> you do it</font> see ya tell Ryan<font color="#E5E5E5"> appeal it over to the</font>
Morgan house as soon as<font color="#E5E5E5"> he gets here yes</font> sir isn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> she dad</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">you'll come</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> around all</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> right come on</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what you doing my sister</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah I don't</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">know come on get</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> up.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Nolan</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> are you done with Miss Morgan come</font> on<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll make</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it snappy</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">miss Morgan I don't know where is he</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">just</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a swell species of skunk</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sounds</font> more tummy<font color="#CCCCCC"> what are you done with her</font>
I tell you I did you call her and<font color="#E5E5E5"> tell</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">her to meet</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> me here</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> no I swear I didn't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">we know all about sure wouldn't the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">other girls</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> so you may as well tell us</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the rest who was in on this with you.</font>
Barksdale so you killed her and<font color="#E5E5E5"> then</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">backed out</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> so you wouldn't have</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to split</font> that<font color="#E5E5E5"> no I don't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> know who killed</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> him I</font> swear<font color="#E5E5E5"> it pick up</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> phone</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no no why</font> not because<font color="#E5E5E5"> that's the way Lila got it</font> you were there<font color="#CCCCCC"> that night and you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> kill</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">her no I saw her after after shooting</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">miss Morgan no no I didn't</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh you're a liar go on</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> take him down</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">we'll lock him up but Phil</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I tell you</font>
Ryan it doesn't make good sense<font color="#CCCCCC"> why go</font> to all the trouble<font color="#CCCCCC"> to impersonate</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">someone and then kill the impersonator.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Jensen tried</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to kill miss Morgan but</font> somebody<font color="#E5E5E5"> else killed the girl thinking</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it was miss Morgan Jensen knew the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">difference there have been two different</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">factions working in this against each</font> other when<font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font> but where's exactly get an<font color="#E5E5E5"> axe break</font> that<font color="#E5E5E5"> wall in and son you'd better go on</font> back to<font color="#CCCCCC"> the station why because I don't</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">think your sister is going</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to be alive</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">when</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> we find it</font>
[Applause]
Got a patent on<font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> little electrical</font> device of yours<font color="#CCCCCC"> Adams</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> no I'm sorry to</font> say<font color="#E5E5E5"> I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hadn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well I wouldn't worry about</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it if I were you</font> the<font color="#E5E5E5"> state's got something that works</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">along the same lines and we're going to</font> give<font color="#E5E5E5"> you an exclusive demonstration take</font> him out into<font color="#E5E5E5"> that safety deposit</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> box</font> sure<font color="#CCCCCC"> what did you find</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> only</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a million</font> dollars of securities for her<font color="#E5E5E5"> a million</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> disgusting</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I hope it</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> is in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> u.s.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">steel</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't worry if it isn't I left the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">securities</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> there of course but this</font> letter was on<font color="#E5E5E5"> top and I thought you'd</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">want it thank you.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">-</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Murray the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> thirteenth guess I can</font> imagine that<font color="#E5E5E5"> I was it all the time.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I.</font>
The poor lamb reading aloud<font color="#CCCCCC"> y-yes</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">my dear child</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I'm making a rather</font> melodramatic attempt to protect<font color="#E5E5E5"> your</font> fortune<font color="#E5E5E5"> but if I am right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> about</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> other<font color="#E5E5E5"> members of the family it is almost</font> certain to reveal them to<font color="#E5E5E5"> you in their</font> true light<font color="#E5E5E5"> so that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you will</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> not make the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">same mistake I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> made when</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I married into</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it.</font>
Bless you my dear<font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> may they</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have</font> killed each other<font color="#E5E5E5"> off by the time you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">receive this your father</font> it's<font color="#E5E5E5"> said but it's</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> also darn good advice</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">what they're not to marry into a screwy</font> family.
[Laughter]
Tell me where you've been<font color="#E5E5E5"> well first I</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">went</font> when<font color="#E5E5E5"> he</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> had told</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to tailor</font>
[Applause]
[Applause]
Hello hello<font color="#E5E5E5"> Phil this is Ryan listen</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I've got another swell I'm not</font> interested.
[Applause]
When you hear the tone of the<font color="#E5E5E5"> gong</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it</font> will be<font color="#E5E5E5"> exactly</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> twelve o'clock and six</font> split seconds hello<font color="#E5E5E5"> ring</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> stuyvesant</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> 9600 and keep</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">ringing it and when you've</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> done that</font> well well ring it some more.
[Applause]
[Music]
Conway!
We can't take more than seven.
All right. I'm sorry.
Another plane in a minute.
All right.
Wait, everybody.
Plenty of planes are coming.
Have patience, we'll be all right.
- It won't be long!
- Don't worry.
Leave everything to my brother.
- Yes, sir, 10 passengers aboard.
-10 passengers. Good.
Say, get me Shanghai.
- Is Colonel Marsh there?
- Right here, Conway. Go ahead.
I need more planes.
I've still about 30 people to get out.
- Where are the planes you promised?
- We sent all we could find.
They better get here, or I can't be responsible...
- I think I hear motors.
- Wait a minute, they may be here now.
George, get down on the field and guide those planes in.
Be sure none of the natives get in.
- Hello, Colonel?
- Hello, Conway.
- Thanks, and take care of your liver.
- My word!
Get ready, everyone. Planes are here.
One at a time. Children first.
Where are they? Come stand over here.
Where's the mother?
- They're orphans.
- I see. You come here, and you...
- What about us, Mr. Conway?
- Wait your turn. Come on, you.
Take some of those squealing men with you first.
They might faint on you. I'll wait.
Just as you say. You, madam.
Come through here. Wait on one side.
- Don't lose your heads!
- What was that explosion?
They've blown up the powerhouse!
The planes can't land without lights.
We'll burn the hangar.
That will make light for them.
There's going to be a big fire.
All right. Go ahead!
We go on the next plane.
Bring out any people that are left.
- Hello, Fenner.
- Hello, Conway. Having a little trouble?
Never mind me.
Get this gadget off the ground.
- Bob, these are all that are left.
- Quick.
You can't leave me here, you blighter!
I'm a British subject.
Look out, Bob!
All right, Fenner. Go ahead!
Down on the floor!
Go ahead, Fenner!
Let's go!
I guess we're out of range.
- Everybody all right?
- That was close.
I've never been in a situation like this in my life.
- Where do you come from?
- I'm Alexander P. Lovett.
- Why aren't you registered?
- It'd serve you right to be left behind.
How could I know a war was going to break out over my head?
Right over my head. My word!
Those Chinese were pouncing on me.
I had to get into these ridiculous clothes in order to escape.
- Where were you hiding?
- Hiding? No.
Hunting. I was in the interior hunting fossils.
- This morning I looked up suddenly...
- And a war broke out right over your head!
Next time you're in wild country like this, keep in touch with the British consul.
Very good, Freshie.
Put his name on the list and make out a report later.
I beg your pardon, brother.
- What did you say you were hunting?
- Fossils.
- Fossils?
- I'm a palaeontologist.
- A what?
- A palaeontologist.
I see.
I have here a discovery that will startle the world.
It's the vertebra from the lumbar of a Megatherium, found in Asia.
- What do you know about that?
- Found in Asia.
When I get home,
I'll probably be knighted for it.
You don't say!
- Do you mind if I take a look at it?
- Not at all.
Sorry.
This is the only thing I was able to save when those heathens surrounded me.
From this vertebra,
I'll be able to reconstruct...
...the entire skeleton...
You expect to be knighted for finding that soup bone?
This is the vertebra of a Megatherium found in Asia.
I remember. You said that before.
Sir Henry Derwent was knighted.
He never got beyond the Mesozoic era.
- Poor fellow!
- Yes, it just shows...
I don't know why I'm talking to you.
Who are you?
- Okay, brother.
- Don't call me "brother. "
Okay, sister.
No offence.
Cigarette?
- I say, will you have a cigarette?
- No.
You're an American, aren't you?
Go and annoy the rest of your playmates.
Let me alone.
Look what I found.
Just what I needed, too.
You.
Just this once, Bob. I feel like celebrating.
Think of it. A cruiser sent to Shanghai just to take you back to England.
You know what it means? Here you are.
Don't bother about those cables now.
I want you to drink with me.
Gentlemen, I give you Robert Conway,
England's new Foreign Secretary.
Hooray!
How I'm going to bask in reflected glory.
People will point to me and say:
"There goes George Conway, brother of the Foreign Secretary. "
- Don't talk nonsense. Give me the bottle.
- That's why they're sending for you.
With all these foreign entanglements, it was bound to happen.
You can laugh if you want to.
But whom else can they get?
Who else in England is half the fighter and half the diplomat...
...who has half your knowledge of the foreign situation?
They can't stop you now.
Hello, Freshie.
- Did you make that report out yet?
- Yes, Bob.
- Did you say we saved 90 white people?
- Yes.
Hooray for us.
Did you say that we left 10,000 natives down there to be annihilated?
No, you wouldn't say that.
They don't count.
You'd better try to get some sleep.
Just you wait until I'm foreign secretary.
Can't you just see me with all those other shrewd little foreign secretaries?
The trick is to see who can outtalk the other.
Everybody wants something for nothing.
If you can't get it with smooth talk, you send your army in.
I'm going to fool them.
I'm not going to have an army.
I am going to disband mine.
I'm going to sink my battleships.
I'm going to destroy every piece of warcraft.
When the enemy approaches, we'll say:
"Come in, gentlemen.
What can we do for you?"
So then the poor enemy soldiers will stop and think.
And what will they think?
They'll say, "Something's wrong here, we've been duped!
"This is not according to form.
"These people seem quite friendly.
Why should we shoot them?"
Then they'll lay down their arms.
You see how simple the whole thing is?
Centuries of tradition kicked right in the pants.
And I'll be slapped straight into the nearest insane asylum.
You'd better not drink anymore.
You're not talking sense.
Don't worry, George, nothing's going to happen.
I'll fall right into line.
I'll be the good little boy that everybody wants me to be.
I'll be the best little foreign secretary we've ever had.
Just because I haven't the nerve to be anything else.
- Do try to sleep, Bob.
- Yes. Good thing, sleep.
Ever notice the sunrise in China?
You should. It's beautiful.
Good morning, Lovey.
- I beg your pardon?
- I say, "Good morning, Lovey. "
Good morning. Look here, young man.
I didn't care for "sister" last night, and I don't like "Lovey" this morning.
- My name is Lovett, Alexander P.
- I see.
- It's a good morning, anyway.
- I'm never conversational before coffee.
Wait a minute.
Is it a good morning?
We're supposed to be travelling east, aren't we?
- Of course.
- It looks to me as if we're travelling west.
- That's ridiculous.
- Is it?
It certainly is.
Any child knows how to tell direction.
I don't care where the child is, in the air, on the earth, or in the sea.
If you face the rising sun, your right hand is north, your left hand is south.
I get it twisted because I'm left-handed.
- Really?
- Yes.
Just reverse it. Your left hand is...
What difference does it make?
The north is the north.
All I know is the sun rises in the east, and we're going away from it.
Now you're irritating and absurd.
Of course. Boy!
We're travelling in the wrong direction.
- We're going in the wrong direction.
- Couldn't you make less noise?
We're going west, and Shanghai is way east of here.
Quiet! Fenner's the best pilot in China.
- It's Fenner.
- He may have lost his way.
That's what I told him.
You can't expect him to sail in the dark.
Calm yourself. I'll speak to Fenner.
Fenner! I say...
- Bob, it isn't Fenner in the cockpit!
- Stop it.
The bloke up there looks Chinese or Mongolian.
We're nowhere near Shanghai.
We're going in the opposite direction.
We're over the desert. That's funny.
Charming chap.
Nice puss to meet in a dark alley.
- That's that.
- I wonder what happened to Fenner.
Who is he? How'd he get there?
Do you think we stopped last night and changed pilots?
That's not possible.
If we'd landed, we would've awakened.
We never left the air.
I didn't sleep the whole night long.
- That fellow got on at Baskul.
- Where's he taking us?
He may be a maniac for all we know.
What are you going to do?
- I'll make him tell us his game.
- What if he refuses?
- We'll smash his face in.
- Brilliant!
Can anyone here fly a plane?
That's no good.
- I guess we're in for it.
- In for what?
I don't know. He must have had some purpose in taking the plane.
- When he lands, we'll find out.
- You won't do anything till we land?
- What do you suggest?
- Why, you...
- He may dash us to pieces.
- It might afford you a great deal of relief.
I am going back to sleep.
I was having such a peaceful dream.
As soon as he lands, let me know.
We're heading down! We're going to land.
We're coming to a village.
- What are these people?
- I don't know. I can't get their dialect.
They're loading up with gasoline.
Imagine having that fuel there, waiting for us!
Something tells me our journey is just beginning.
Where are we going?
If you ask me, we're heading straight for those mountains.
Douglas plane from Baskul with Conway and four others aboard still missing.
Unreported between here and Baskul.
Make it very emphatic that His Majesty's government...
...will hold the Chinese government and all governors of Chinese provinces...
...responsible for the complete safety of Robert Conway.
Good morning, gentlemen.
- No news yet, sir?
- It's fantastic.
The plane couldn't disappear into thin air.
Cable Lord Gainsford at Shanghai.
Leave no stone unturned to find Conway.
- Robertson?
- Yes, sir.
Postpone the Far East conference.
We can't meet those nations...
...without Conway.
This can't be kidnapping.
They wouldn't be taking us so far on such a dangerous trip. No sense to it.
What do you make of it, Bob?
You must have some idea.
I give it up.
Not knowing where you're going is exciting anyway.
Mr. Conway, for a man who's supposed to be a leader...
...your do-nothing attitude is very disappointing.
- What do you want him to do?
- I don't know.
I'm a palaeontologist, not a foreign secretary.
- George, come on.
- It's not knowing that's so awful.
Not knowing where you're going, why, or what's waiting when you get there.
We got above that storm.
I can't stand it any longer! Take us down!
I can't stand the pain any longer.
Let me out of here!
I can't stand it any longer!
Let me out of here!
It's oxygen.
- Take this in your teeth.
- Let me alone.
Come on. That's right. Bite on that.
What's that?
- What's happening?
- He must have run out of fuel.
Look! Look down there!
George! Everybody!
Better get back towards the tail.
He may nose her over. Into the corner!
Quick, George! Cushions! Blankets!
Take that behind you.
- Everybody all right?
- Yeah.
- He's fainted?
- Looks like it. You smell those fumes?
Here, George, take the gun.
Hold the light.
I'll search him before he comes to.
We might find something interesting.
There's a map.
- He's dead.
- Dead?
It must have happened when he hit the ground.
Let's take a look at this map.
What is it?
- See that spot?
- Yes.
That's where we were this morning.
He had it marked.
Right on the border of Tibet.
Here's where civilisation ends.
We must be 1,000 miles beyond it.
Just a blank on the map.
- What does it mean?
- It means we're in unexplored country.
Country nobody ever reached.
Conway! What's happening?
Our chances of getting out of this are slim, but it's up to us.
We can't have three hysterical people on our hands.
- What do you say?
- Everything's all right.
The pilot won't trouble us anymore.
He's dead.
- Dead?
- Probably a heart attack.
What are we going to do?
Nothing until the morning. The storm will probably die down before then.
My suggestion is that we better all try and get a good night's rest.
Why not tell them the truth.
We're a million miles from civilisation...
...without a chance of getting out of here alive?
It's slow starvation.
It's slow horrible death.
That's perfect. Just perfect.
What a kick I'm going to get out of this.
A year ago, a doctor gave me six months to live. That was a year ago.
I'm already six months to the good.
I'm on velvet. I haven't got a thing to lose.
But, you, the noble animals of the human race...
...what a kick I'll get out of watching you squirm for a change.
What a kick!
They've been gone for hours.
Left us here to rot.
That's what they've done.
- Heroes of the newspapers.
- All right. Keep quiet.
Here they come.
Hello, everybody. We found some food.
No chance of starving now.
- What is that?
- Mountain grass. It's good. Have some.
I've read of people lasting 30 days on this stuff.
My brother and I have worked out a plan.
If we use our heads we'll keep alive for weeks, till he gets back.
- Gets back?
- Where's he gone?
He's starting out right away in the direction of India.
Sooner or later, he's bound to run into a tribe or something.
Here's the idea.
We found a cave over that small hill.
As soon as we bury the pilot, we'll move in. We can have a fire.
I shouldn't be surprised to see Bob back within a week.
You haven't a Chinaman's chance of getting out of here alive. You know it.
- Cave? Where?
- Over by that hill.
Hey, look! Look, Bob!
- Where are they? Do you see them?
- Yes.
Do you think they're cannibals?
I am from the nearby lamasery.
My name is Chang.
He's speaking English.
- And mine's Conway.
- How do you do?
You've no idea how unexpected and very welcome you are.
My friends and l, and the lady in the plane...
...left Baskul the night before last for Shanghai.
But we were travelling in the opposite direction.
At the mercy of a mad pilot.
- We'd be eternally grateful if you...
- Where is your "mad" pilot?
He must have had a heart attack, or perhaps the fumes.
When the plane landed he was dead.
We were going to bury him when you came along.
Pardon me.
If you will be good enough to direct us to your lamasery...
It is an honour to accompany you and your friends.
You'll need suitable clothes for the journey.
- It is not particularly far, but quite difficult.
- Thank you.
Welcome to Shangri-La.
You see we are sheltered by mountains on every side.
A strange phenomenon for which we are very grateful.
It's magical.
- I definitely do not like this place.
- Will you quit squawking?
- Look at what they gave me to wear.
- You never looked better.
As soon as our clothes are cleaned, they'll give them back to us, Lovey.
Something tells me this means food.
Come on.
I just feel as though I'm being made ready for the executioner.
If this be execution, lead me to it.
That's what they do with cattle just before the slaughter. Fatten them.
- You're a scream, Lovey.
- Please don't call me "Lovey. "
That was refreshing.
The food looks good.
Some layout they got here.
You see the rooms?
Couldn't do better at the Ritz.
All the conveniences for the condemned.
- Don't mind Lovey. He's got the misery.
- I don't like this place. It's too mysterious.
It's better than freezing to death down below, isn't it?
Is there something I can do for you?
- What do you want?
- I've ordered you some warm broth.
- I thought perhaps...
- Get out of here!
If any of you men think you can come busting in here...
Please.
Please calm yourself.
You'll soon be well if you do.
I don't need any advice from you.
Get me a doctor.
- I'm sorry, we have no doctors here.
- No doctors.
Well, that's just fine.
- Please let me help you.
- You can help me jump over that cliff.
I've been looking at the bottom of that mountain...
...but I haven't got the nerve to jump.
You shouldn't be looking at the bottom of the mountain.
Why don't you try looking up at the top sometime?
Don't preach that cheap, second-hand stuff to me.
Go on, beat it!
Beat it!
Peace be with you, my child.
Good evening, my friends.
Please sit down.
- I hope you found everything satisfactory.
- Swell.
Excellent.
- You shouldn't have waited for me.
- Where's the girl? Miss Stone.
She's remaining in her room.
She isn't feeling very well.
Please go on without me. I eat very little.
There's certainly nothing wrong with that meal.
Thank you.
- And the wine is excellent.
- I'm glad you like it.
It's made right here in the valley.
Now that dinner is over, we're very anxious...
...to discuss ways and means of getting back home.
First, we want to cable the Foreign Office.
England's waiting for news of my brother.
There's a cruiser at Shanghai to take him back.
Really?
As regards cabling, I'm afraid I can't help.
Unfortunately we have no wireless here.
As a matter of fact, we have no means of communication with the outside world.
- Not even a radio?
- It's been a source of deep regret...
...but the mountains surrounding us have made reception almost impossible.
We'd better make arrangements to get some porters immediately.
Some means to get us back to civilisation.
- Are you so certain you are away from it?
- As far away as I ever want to be.
The porters will be very well paid.
That is, within reason.
I'm afraid that wouldn't help.
We have no porters here.
No porters here?
What about those men we met this morning?
Those are our own people.
They never venture beyond where you were met this morning.
It's much too hazardous.
How do you account for all this?
Who brought it in?
There is a tribe of porters some 500 miles from here.
That is our only contact with the outside world.
Every now and again, depending upon favourable weather, they make the journey.
- How can we get in touch with them?
- In that respect you are very fortunate.
We are expecting a shipment from them almost any time now.
What do you mean by "almost any time now"?
We've been expecting this particular shipment for the past two years.
- Two years?
- Yes.
Well...
But I assure you, gentlemen, if there is a prolonged delay...
...Shangri-La will endeavour to make your stay as pleasant as possible.
And now, if you will excuse me, it is getting late.
I do hope you all sleep well.
Good night.
Good night, Mr. Conway.
Good night, sir.
That's what I mean, mysterious.
I don't like that man. He's too vague.
We didn't get much information out of him, did we?
It seems we should be grateful.
We were in a bad mess this morning.
After all, this is quite pleasant.
Why not make ourselves comfortable until the porters do arrive?
That's what I say.
What do you say to a rubber of bridge?
- I saw some cards in the other room.
- Not for me, thanks. I'm too weary.
How about you, Lovey? Come on.
Let's you and I play a game of honeymoon bridge.
- I'm thinking.
- Thinking?
- What about some double solitaire?
- In fact, I'm very good at it.
- No kidding?
- Yes.
Then I'm your man. Come on, Toots.
- Hello, George. Cigarette?
- Thanks.
I suppose all this comes under the heading of adventure.
There's been plenty of it in the last few days.
It's far from over from what I can see.
This place gives me the creeps.
Hidden away like this, no contact with civilisation.
You don't seem concerned at all.
I'm feeling far too peaceful to be concerned about anything.
I think I'm going to like it here.
You talk as if you intend on staying.
Something happened to me when we arrived here that...
Did you ever go to a strange place and feel sure you'd been there before?
- What are you talking about?
- I don't know.
You're a strange bird.
No wonder Gainsford calls you:
"The man who always wanted to see the other side of the hill. "
Do you ever want to see what's on the other side?
What else could there be, except another hill?
In any event, I'm not curious.
It seems to me we should be concerned about getting home.
- I'd give anything to be in London now.
- Of course you would.
If ever we get out of this place, you should take that job with Helen's father.
What do you mean, "lf"?
- Did I say, "lf"?
- That's what you said.
Well, I mean...
You talk as though we're going to have trouble getting out of here.
I've been putting things together.
Do you notice the resemblance between those natives and the pilot?
Why did those clothes materialise so conveniently when they met us?
Chang himself just said that they never venture beyond that point.
What brought them there, unless it was to meet us?
Chang's first question was about the pilot.
There must be some connection between the plane and this place.
They must have deliberately brought us here.
What reason could they have for doing a thing like that?
That's what's on the other side of the hill.
It's 3,000 feet practically straight down to the floor of the valley.
The Valley of the Blue Moon, as we call it.
There are over 2,000 people in the valley besides those here in Shangri-La.
Who and what is Shangri-La? You?
Goodness, no.
- So there are others?
- Yes.
- Who, for instance?
- In time you will meet them all.
For a man who talks a lot, it's amazing how unenlightening you can be.
There are some things, my dear Conway,
I deeply regret I may not discuss.
That's the fourth time you've said that.
You should record it.
Let's go inside.
I'd like to show you our rare treasures.
- Good afternoon.
- Excuse me, l...
Please, don't go.
Tea will be served any moment.
Won't you come in?
My name is Maria.
Won't you sit down?
By the way, what religion do you follow here?
To put it simply, I should say that our general belief was in moderation.
We preach the virtue of avoiding excesses of every kind.
Even including excess of virtue itself.
That's intelligent.
In the valley, it makes for better happiness among the natives.
We rule with moderate strictness...
...and in return, we are satisfied with moderate obedience.
As a result, our people are moderately honest, moderately chaste...
...and somewhat more than moderately happy.
How about law and order?
You have no soldiers or police?
Good heavens, no!
How do you deal with incorrigibles, criminals?
We have no crime here.
What makes a criminal?
Lack, usually. Avariciousness, envy.
The desire to possess something owned by another.
There can be no crime when there is a sufficiency of everything.
You have no disputes over women?
Only very rarely.
It wouldn't be considered good manners to take a woman that another man wanted.
Suppose he wanted her so badly that he didn't give a hang...
...if it was good manners or not.
In that event, it would be good manners on the part of the other man...
...to let him have her.
That's very convenient. I think I'd like that.
You'd be surprised how a little courtesy all around...
...helps to smooth out the most complicated problems.
At some time in the future you will have the pleasure of meeting her.
Some man had better get ready to be very courteous to me.
Mr. Chang, all these things, books, instruments, sculpture...
...were they all brought in over those mountains by porters?
They were.
- That must have taken...
- Centuries.
Centuries.
Where did you get the money to pay for all these treasures?
We have no money as you know it.
We do not buy or sell or seek personal fortunes...
...because there is no uncertain future here for which to accumulate it.
That would suit me perfectly.
I'm always broke.
How did you pay for them?
Our valley is very rich in a metal called gold...
...which, fortunately for us, is valued very highly in the outside world.
- So, we merely...
- Buy and sell.
Buy and sell...
Pardon me. Exchange.
I see. Gold for ideas.
There's something so simple and naive about all this...
...that I suspect there's been a shrewd guiding intelligence somewhere.
Whose idea was it? How did it all start?
That, my dear Conway, is the story of a remarkable man.
Who?
A Belgian priest by the name of Father Perrault.
The first European to find this place and a very great man indeed.
He is responsible for everything you see here.
He built Shangri-La, taught the natives...
...and began our collection of art.
In fact, Shangri-La is Father Perrault.
When was all this?
Way back in 1713, I think it was...
...that Father Perrault stumbled into the valley, half-frozen to death.
It was typical of the man that one leg being frozen...
...and there being no doctors here, he amputated the leg himself.
He amputated his own leg?
Oddly enough, when he had learned to understand their language...
...the natives told him he could have saved his leg.
It would've healed without amputation.
- They didn't actually mean that?
- Yes. They were very sincere about it, too.
You see, a perfect body in perfect health was the rule here.
They've never known anything different.
What was true for them, they thought would be true for anyone else living here.
Well, is it?
Rather astonishingly so, yes.
Particularly in the case of Father Perrault himself.
When he and the natives had finished building Shangri-La...
...he was 108 years old and still very active...
...in spite of having only one leg.
108 and still active?
You're startled.
No, I'm just a little bowled over, that's all.
Forgive me.
I should've told you it's quite common here to live to a very ripe old age.
Climate, diet, mountain water, you might say.
But we like to believe it is the absence of struggle in the way we live.
In your countries, on the other hand, how often do you hear the expression:
"He worried himself to death," or, "This thing or that killed him"?
- Very often.
- And very true.
Your lives are, therefore, as a rule, shorter.
Not so much by natural death, as by indirect suicide.
That's all very fine if it works out.
A little amazing, of course.
You surprise me.
I surprise you! Now, that's news.
I mean your amazement.
I could've understood it in any of your companions, but you...
...who have dreamed and written so much about better worlds.
Or is it that you fail to recognise one of your own dreams when you see it?
If you don't mind,
I think I'll go on being amazed...
- ... in moderation, of course.
- Then everything's quite all right?
It's terrific!
I just saw something that'd make your hair stand on end.
You see those hills over there? Gold.
Popping right out of them. Tons of it.
You keep this under your hat.
If the others hear about it, they'll declare themselves in.
But if I can mine that stuff,
I'll throw a bombshell into Wall Street.
Now look, I've got a plan and if l...
Say, honey...
...you ain't feeling so well, are you?
Don't pay attention to what those doctors tell you.
I've seen a lot of people fool 'em.
And I've got a hunch this place is gonna be good for you. Honest I have.
Come on, you be a good kid and snap out of it.
And I'll cut you in on the gold deal.
I'm going up and make a deal with Chang right now.
Oh, my!
- Good morning.
- Good morning, Mr. Conway.
- You speak English?
- Yes, sir.
- Would you like to take a ride?
- No, thanks. Not just now.
Well, I think I'll take that ride.
Fossils! Why? What for?
Running around digging up a lot of old bones.
You didn't dig yourself out of one of those holes by any chance?
You seem gay. Did you find out anything?
I heard that if you want a man's wife, she's yours if he's got any manners.
- Nothing about the porters yet?
- Porters?
We've been here two weeks and we haven't found out a thing.
Well, we haven't been murdered in our beds yet, have we?
I'm afraid the porters are just a myth.
Guess we'll never know why we're here or how long we'll be held prisoners.
Hurry up, you slowpokes. I'm starved.
"Please, do not wait for me.
"I eat so very little. "
- Good evening.
- Good evening.
I'm glad to see us all finally organised.
Okay, handsome.
Dish it out and make it snappy.
- What's happened to you?
- Nothing. Why?
You look beautiful.
That's unkind.
Miss Stone always looks beautiful.
I got it. It's your make-up.
You've got none on.
Honey, you look a million percent better.
Wholesome, kind of, and clean.
Take a tip from me, don't ever put that stuff on your face again.
It's like hiding behind a mask.
Who're you to talk about a mask?
What do you mean?
You've been wearing a mask ever since we met you.
Have I?
Strange, you've never told us anything about yourself.
Who are you, anyway?
Why not take your mask off for once?
Unbosom yourself, Mr. Hyde.
All right, I will.
I'll let my hair down.
Why not?
It can't make any real difference now.
Lovey...
- ... were you ever chased by the police?
- Certainly not!
Believe me, it's no fun.
When you picked me up at Baskul, they were on my tail for a year.
The police?
Did you ever hear of Chalmers Bryant?
Chalmers Bryant?
Bryant Utilities. That's me.
I knew it.
I knew I had a reason for hating you.
Sir, you're a thief!
He never stole from you, did he?
I have 500 shares of Bryant Utilities
I bought with money...
...l'd saved for 20 years, teaching school.
Now, I couldn't sell it for postage stamps.
That's too bad. I got a half million shares.
My whole foundation. Now look at me.
The nerve you have sitting there, talking about it so calmly.
The swindler of thousands of people.
That's what makes the whole thing so funny.
A guy like me, starts out in life as a plumber.
An ordinary, everyday slew-footed plumber.
And by the use of a little brains, he builds up a gigantic institution.
Employs thousands of people.
Becomes a great civic leader.
Then the crash comes.
Overnight, he's the biggest crook the country ever had.
You're a thief and a swindler...
...and I'll be glad to turn you over to the police when we get back.
"When we get back! "
What makes you think we'll ever get back?
You're all prisoners here.
We were kidnapped and brought here and nobody knows why.
I don't want to be a prisoner.
I'm finding out when we're leaving here.
I'll make that Chinese talk if it's the last thing I do.
Where's Chang?
Where's Chang or I'll blow your brains out?
- What do you think you're doing?
- Let me go.
Come here!
Come here, you!
You idiot!
Had to sock him?
- Let me up.
- You all right?
Sorry.
Is it true about us being kidnapped?
I say, is it true about us being kidnapped?
Mr. Chang!
Do you mind stepping in here for a moment?
Won't you sit down?
You have been very kind to us and we appreciate it.
But for some reason we're being held prisoners here...
...and we want to know why.
Personally, I don't mind at all.
I'm enjoying every minute of it.
But my brother is not of the same opinion, nor are the others.
It's time we were told what it's all about.
We want to know why we were kidnapped, why we're being kept here...
...but most important of all, do we get the porters and when?
Until we get this information...
...l'm very much afraid we cannot permit you to leave this room.
You know, it's very strange...
...but when you saw me in the corridor,
I was actually on my way to you.
I bring the most amazing news.
The High Lama wishes to see you.
- The High Lama? Who in blazes is he?
- I thought you ran this joint.
High lamas or low lamas, do we get the porters?
The High Lama is the only one from whom any information can come.
- Don't believe him.
- Sounds like a stall to me.
- Better have him talk...
- One moment.
You say the High Lama's the only one who can give us information?
The only one.
And he can arrange for the porters to take us back?
The High Lama arranges everything.
Then he's the man I want to see.
Will you come along?
Better wait here until I get back.
We'll soon know where we stand.
Good evening.
Please, come in.
Sit here, near me.
I'm an old man and can do no one any harm.
Are you the High Lama?
Yes.
I trust you've been comfortable at Shangri-La, since your arrival.
Personally, I've enjoyed your community very much.
But my friends do not care for this mystery.
They are determined to leave as soon as...
It's astonishing and incredible, but...
What is it, my son?
You're the man.
Chang told me. You're the first who...
Two hundred years ago.
You're still alive, Father Perrault.
Sit down, my son.
You may not know it, but I've been an admirer of yours...
...for a great many years.
Not of Conway, the empire builder and public hero.
I wanted to meet the Conway who in one of his books said:
"There are moments in every man's life when he glimpses the eternal. "
That Conway seemed to belong here.
In fact, it was suggested that someone be sent to bring him here.
That I be brought here?
Who had that brilliant idea?
Sondra Bizet.
The girl at the piano?
Yes. She has read your books and has a profound admiration for you.
As have we all.
Of course, I've suspected that our being here was no accident.
Furthermore, I have a feeling we're never supposed to leave.
But that, for the moment, doesn't concern me greatly.
I'll meet that when it comes.
What particularly interests me at present is why was I brought here?
What possible use can I be to an already thriving community?
We need men like you here...
...to be sure that our community will continue to thrive.
In return for which
Shangri-La has much to give you.
You are still, by the world's standards, a youngish man.
Yet in the normal course of existence...
...you can expect 20 or 30 years...
...of gradually diminishing activity.
Here, however, in Shangri-La...
...by our standards, your life has just begun.
And may go on and on.
To be candid, Father, a prolonged future doesn't excite me.
It would have to have a point.
I sometimes doubted whether life itself has any.
If that is so, then long life must be even more pointless.
I'd need a much more definite reason for going on and on.
We have reason.
It is the entire meaning and purpose of Shangri-La.
It came to me in a vision...
...long ago.
I saw all the nations strengthening...
...not in wisdom, but in the vulgar passions and the will to destroy.
I saw their machine power multiplying...
...until a single-weaponed man might match a whole army.
I foresaw a time when man, exulting in the technique of murder...
...would rage so hotly over the world...
...that every book, every treasure would be doomed to destruction.
This vision was so vivid and so moving...
...that I determined to gather together all things of beauty...
...and culture that I could and preserve them here...
...against the doom toward which the world is rushing.
Look at the world today.
Is there anything more pitiful?
What madness there is, what blindness, what unintelligent leadership.
A scurrying mass of bewildered humanity crashing headlong against each other...
...compelled by an orgy of greed and brutality.
The time must come, my friend...
...when this orgy will spend itself.
When brutality and the lust for power...
...must perish by its own sword.
Against that time is why I avoided death and am here...
...and why you were brought here.
For when that day comes, the world must begin to look for a new life.
And it is our hope that they may find it here.
For here, we shall be with their books...
...and their music and the way of life...
...based on one simple rule:
Be kind.
When that day comes...
...it is our hope that the brotherly love of Shangri-La...
...will spread throughout the world.
Yes, my son, when the strong have devoured each other...
...the Christian ethic may at last be fulfilled...
...and the meek shall inherit the earth.
I understand you, Father.
You must come again, my son.
Good night.
Well?
- What did you find out?
- We thought you were never coming back.
- When do we leave?
- What about the porters?
Porters?
- Didn't you find out about the porters?
- Why, I'm sorry, but l...
What were you doing all this time?
What's the matter with you?
You went there...
Do you mind?
I'm sorry, but I can't talk about it tonight.
Hello.
Good morning.
"Lay thee down now, and rest
"May thy slumber be blessed
"Lullaby, and good night
"Thy mother's delight
"Bright angels around
"My darling shall sound
"They will guard thee from harm"
Do you mind?
"They will guard thee from harm
"Thou shall wake in my arms"
This is Mr. Conway, children.
Good morning, Mr. Conway.
- How do you do?
- Very well, thank you.
Children, Teacher is going to be very busy this afternoon.
So, school's dismissed.
Please.
I hope you're not going to run away this time.
My name's Sondra.
I hope you'll forgive me for...
You know, each time I see you,
I hear that music.
What is it?
You mean my pigeons.
It's these little flutes that I attached to their tails. See?
Come along with me and I'll show you how I put them on.
This is how we tie them on.
By varying the size of the flutes,
I can get any notes I wish.
The wind does the rest.
Here's a little fellow who has lost his.
- Was this your idea?
- Yes.
Hold this pigeon.
You suggested my being brought here, didn't you?
What gave you the idea I'd fit in?
- That was easy. I'd read your books.
- You've read my books?
You do more things.
What have my books got to do with it?
I saw a man whose life was empty.
"A man whose life was empty. "
I know, it was full of this and full of that.
But you were accomplishing nothing.
You were going nowhere and you knew it.
As a matter of fact, all I saw was a little boy whistling in the dark.
"A little boy whistling... "
Do you realise that there was a British cruiser waiting at Shanghai...
...smoke pouring out of its funnels, tugging at its moorings...
...waiting to take Mr. Conway back to London.
Do you know right now there are headlines shrieking the news...
...that Conway's missing? Does that look like a man who's life was empty?
Yes.
You're absolutely right.
I had to come to a pigeon house in
Shangri-La to find the only other person...
...who knew it. May I congratulate you?
I only brought you here to show you my pigeons.
Don't worry about them.
Now you can put flutes on my tail and bells on my feet.
I've so many questions I'd like to ask,
I don't know where to begin.
I'll help you. To begin with, you'd like to know what I'm doing here.
- That I was born here.
- Thank you.
Well, I was almost born here.
It took place in that wild country beyond the pass.
My parents were in a party of explorers who got lost and wandered for a year.
When Chang found us only father and I were alive.
He was too weak to climb the pass.
He died on the way.
I was brought up by Father Perrault.
I envy you.
- I talked to him last night.
- I know.
I can't quite get used to this age thing.
I'm 30.
You're going to make life very simple.
It's inconceivable.
- What?
- All of it.
Father Perrault and his magnificent history.
This place, hidden away from the rest of the world...
...with its glorious concepts.
And now you come along and confuse me entirely.
I'm sorry. I thought I was to be the light.
Why do I confuse you? Am I so strange?
On the contrary, you're not strange.
And that in itself is confusing.
I had the same idea about Shangri-La.
The sense I've been here before, that I belonged here.
I'm so glad.
I can't quite explain it, but everything is somehow...
...familiar.
The very air that I breathe. The lamasery...
...with its feet rooted in the good earth of this fertile valley...
...while its head explores the eternal.
All the beautiful things I see, these cherry blossoms, you...
...all somehow are familiar.
I've been kidnapped and brought here against my will.
A crime, a great crime, yet I accept it amiably.
With the same amiability one tolerates only from a very dear and close friend.
Why? Can you tell me why?
Maybe 'cause you've always been part of Shangri-La without knowing it.
- I wonder.
- I'm sure of it.
Just as I am sure there's a wish for Shangri-La in everyone's heart.
I've never seen the outside world, but I understand there are many people...
...who are supposed to be mean and greedy.
I just know that secretly they are all hoping to find a garden spot...
...where there is peace and security.
Where there's beauty and comfort.
Where they wouldn't have to be mean and greedy.
I just wish the whole world might come to this valley.
Then it wouldn't be a garden spot for long.
I don't know why I associate with you,
Mr. Barnard or Mr. Chalmers Bryant...
...or Mr. Embezzler, or whatever your name may be.
- Just call me Barney.
- Barney? Why should I?
Never, we have nothing in common.
What effrontery!
Okay, Lovey.
And this trip to the valley.
Why did I allow you to drag me here?
You don't know anything about these people.
We're not even armed.
They're very nice people, except that they've got horns.
- Horns?
- You know.
Horns.
What kind of horns?
Come on. They won't hurt you.
All I want is a glass of wine.
- Thanks.
- Sit down.
Now this is fine. This is swell.
No, thanks, just a drink.
I've been walking and I'm a little thirsty.
That's all right.
I just don't happen to be very hungry.
All I asked for was a glass of wine.
Look here, I've got to have some help with this.
Where is Lovey?
Look!
Mr. Barnard!
Come here!
I asked for a glass of wine, look what I got.
Come on, sit down.
This is where you are.
I might have known.
- No wonder you couldn't hear me.
- Relax and have a glass of wine.
- Sit down!
- And be poisoned out here in the open?
- Won't you please have a glass of wine?
- I never drink wine, in the daytime.
- There you are.
- This doesn't obligate me in any way.
No.
The bears came right into the bedroom and the little baby bear said:
"Somebody's been sleeping in my bed. "
And then the mama bear said:
"Somebody's been sleeping in my bed. "
And then the big papa bear, he roared:
"And somebody's been sleeping in my bed. "
You have to admit, the poor little bears were in a quandary.
Well, I'm going to sleep in my bed.
Come on, Lovey.
- They were in a quandary.
- Come on, Lovey.
Why, "Come on" all the time?
What's the matter, you going to be a fuss-budget all your life?
Drink it up. Aren't you having any fun?
- Where was I?
- In a quandary.
I'm telling this story.
The poor little bears...
...they didn't know what to do.
Somebody had been sleeping in their beds.
Who slept in their beds?
Who was it, Lovey?
You called me "Lovey"?
Look at those eyes.
There's the devil in those eyes.
"Here we go gathering nuts in May
"Here we go gathering nuts in May
Early on Tuesday morning
"Here we go, Shangri-La, Shangri-La
"Here you are in Shangri-La"
Hello, Maria.
You promised to come for tea yesterday.
I waited for so long.
Sorry.
- I haven't got any cigarettes left.
- I'll make some for you.
You will come today?
Perhaps.
Please say you will.
The days are very long and lonely without you.
Please.
All right, I'll be there.
Thank you.
You'll tell me the things
I want to know, right?
Who's in charge? Why we were kidnapped and what will happen to us?
Chang's been lying about those porters, hasn't he?
Beautiful.
- I'm waiting for the bump.
- "Bump"?
When the plane lands at Shanghai and wakes us all up.
You see. It's not a dream.
I sometimes think that the other is the dream.
The outside world.
- Have you never wanted to go there?
- Goodness, no!
From what you tell me, it doesn't sound very attractive.
It's not so bad really.
Some phases of it are sordid, of course.
That's only to be expected.
Why?
Usual reasons.
- A world of people struggling for existence.
- Struggling? Why?
Everyone naturally wants to make a place for himself.
- Accumulate a nest egg and so on.
- Why?
If you keep on asking that, we're not going to get anywhere.
- And don't ask me why.
- I was just going to.
It's the most annoying word in the English language.
Ever hear a child torture his parent with it?
"Mother's darling mustn't stuff her fingers in the salad bowl. "
"Why?"
"Because it isn't ladylike to do that. "
"Why?"
"That's what forks are made for, darling. "
- "Why, Mother?"
- "Mother read it in a book somewhere.
"If Mother's little darling doesn't take her fingers...
"... out of the salad bowl this instant,
Mother's going to wring her little neck. "
- Would you like to wring my little neck?
- I'd love it.
Why?
I'm sorry.
I've thought about it for years.
I knew you'd come.
And I knew when you did, you'd never leave.
Am I forgiven for sending for you?
Forgiven.
When we were on that plane...
...I was fascinated by the way its shadow followed it.
That silly shadow...
...racing along over mountains and valleys...
...covering 10 times the distance of the plane.
Yet always there to greet us with outstretched arms when we landed.
I've been thinking that somehow you're that plane...
...and I'm that silly shadow.
That all my life,
I've been rushing up and down hills...
...leaping rivers, crashing over obstacles...
...never dreaming that one day, that beautiful thing in flight...
...could land on this earth and into my arms.
This place is amazing.
That marble quarry in the valley is simply magnificent.
I've looked around. I've seen everything.
Your woodworkers and your cloth weavers are all so happy.
You may not know it, but right here you have Utopia.
- You're very kind.
- I don't mean it in that sense.
I only give credit where credit is due.
I'm very anxious to have you realise that I never for a moment believed...
...that ridiculous kidnapping story.
- I'm so glad.
- Simply preposterous.
Do you know what I did last night?
I held a sort of a self inventory.
I said to myself last night,
"Lovey, Mr. Lovett... "
- I said, "You are an ungrateful fool. "
- No.
Those are my very words to myself last night.
"These people here are doing everything to make your stay comfortable...
"... and I haven't done one single thing to show my appreciation. "
What would you like to do?
I thought with your permission and while I'm waiting for these porters...
...l'd like to organise classes for the children in the valley...
...and teach them something practical and something useful. Geology.
- Splendid.
- Isn't it?
I was a professor for 20 years.
- And a very good one.
- I'm sure you were.
- When would you like to start?
- Immediately.
Then it's done.
Thank you.
You get the idea?
From this reservoir here,
I can pipe the whole works.
I'm going to get a kick out of this.
It's just to keep my hand in.
With the equipment we have here...
...I can put a plumbing system in the whole village. Rig it up in no time.
Do you realise those people are still going to the well for water?
- It's unbelievable.
- Think of it! In times like these!
What about that gold deal?
- Gold, you know...
- Oh, that.
That can wait.
Nobody's going to run off with it.
I've got to get busy.
I want to show this layout to Chang.
- Don't you take any wooden nickels.
- All right.
You're acting like a child.
You haven't talked for two weeks.
There's nothing to say.
- I'm afraid that does it.
- I'm afraid it does.
Shall we have another?
Not tonight, if you don't mind.
Come in, my dear.
Sorry, I didn't mean to interrupt.
I thought Mr. Conway's brother was here.
Excuse me.
Charming, isn't she?
Yes. Charming.
Your brother seems quite fascinated by her.
Why not?
She's an attractive young woman.
Young? She arrived here in 1888.
She was 20 at the time.
She was on her way to join her betrothed...
...when her carriers lost their way in the mountain.
The party would've perished, but for meeting some of our people.
Amazing. Still doesn't look over 20.
When is she likely to grow old in appearance?
Not for years. Shangri-La will keep her youthful indefinitely.
Suppose she should leave?
Leave Shangri-La?
That's not likely.
You couldn't drive her out.
I mean her appearance.
If she should leave the valley, what would happen?
She'd quickly revert in appearance to her actual age.
It's weird.
How old are you?
Age is a limit we impose upon ourselves.
Each time you Westerners...
...celebrate your birthday, you build another fence around your minds.
There you are! You're just the man
I'm looking for. A fine trick.
Smart, aren't you? What lies you told us about those porters!
The minute they arrive we can leave, if they'd take us.
- But you know you'd tell 'em not to.
- My dear boy...
You've been lying since we arrived.
It's worked for some people.
Because they lack the courage to do something. But not me.
You're up against the wrong man.
I'll leave, even if I have to blow this place into the valley.
I'll get out, porters or no porters!
You must prevail upon him not to attempt the journey.
He could never get through that country alive.
I can't let him go alone. It's suicide.
Yes, of course your brother is a problem.
It was to be expected.
I knew you'd understand.
That's why I came to you for help.
You must not look to me for help.
Your brother is no longer my problem.
He is now your problem.
Mine?
Because, my son,
I'm placing in your hands...
...the future and destiny of Shangri-La...
...for I am going to die.
I knew my work was done, when I first set eyes upon you.
I've waited for you, my son, for a long time.
I've sat in this room and seen the faces of newcomers.
I've looked into their eyes and heard their voices...
...always in hope that I might find you.
My friend, it is not an arduous task that I bequeath...
...for our order knows only silken bonds.
To be gentle and patient.
To care for the riches of the mind.
To preside in wisdom...
...while the storm rages without.
Do you think this will come in my time?
You, my son, will live through the storm.
You will preserve the fragrance of our history...
...and add to it a touch of your own mind.
Beyond that, my vision weakens.
But I see at a great distance...
...a new world stirring in the ruins...
...stirring clumsily...
...but in hopefulness...
...seeking its lost and legendary treasures...
...and they will all be here, my son.
Hidden behind the mountains...
...in the Valley of the Blue Moon...
...preserved as by a miracle.
We run the pipes through here and connect with the main waterline here.
Where are you going to get pipes?
That's a cinch. I'll show them how to cast pipes out of clay.
There you are. You'd better get your things together. We're leaving.
- Leaving?
- The porters are taking us back.
We've got clothing, food, everything.
When are you going to start?
This very minute.
They're waiting for us on the plateau.
That Chinaman thought he could stop me.
Come along.
I think I'll stick around.
I'll leave with the porters on the next trip.
You mean you don't want to go?
Well, I'm...
You're afraid of going to jail.
You see I've got this plumbing business.
If you insist being an idiot,
I won't coax you. How about you?
You don't want to go yet, honey.
She'll stick around, too. That right?
If you want me to.
Sure. Don't you worry.
I'll take care of you.
All right, suit yourself, but just remember you had your chance.
- How about you? Do you want to go?
- Where?
Home. I've got porters to take us back.
I'm sorry. That's impossible.
I have my classes.
I don't care what you've started.
Do you want to go?
No, I think I'd better wait.
- Yes, I'll wait.
- You'll wait until you rot!
- Hello, Gloria.
- Hello.
I've just finished translating an interesting old tablet.
It told me of the origin of the Masonic symbols...
- That's swell.
- What?
I want to show you something.
Isn't that pretty. What is it?
Plumbing. Everything modern.
I'm going to run pipes all through the village.
Hello, George.
You can stop worrying now.
I've made arrangements to leave.
If you let me close that window,
I can talk to you.
That noise is driving me crazy.
I said we're getting out of here.
Back to civilisation.
I made a deal with the porters.
They're leaving tomorrow at dawn.
They're waiting for us outside the valley.
Get your things together.
- Where's your topcoat?
- You can't leave.
What's going to stop me?
- You've got to stay here now.
- Stay here?
What's the matter with you?
You've acted strangely since we came.
I've never seen you like this.
What's stopping us from leaving?
Something grand and beautiful.
Something I've been searching for all my life.
The answer to the confusion and bewilderment of a lifetime.
I've found it and I can't leave it.
You mustn't either.
I don't know what you're talking about.
You're carrying around a secret that's eating you up.
- Tell me about it.
- I want to tell you.
I'll burst with it if I don't.
It's weird and fantastic and unbelievable...
...but so beautiful. As you know, we were kidnapped and brought here...
And that's the whole story.
He died, as peacefully as the passing of a cloud's shadow. His last words were:
"I place in your hands, my son...
"... the future and destiny of Shangri-La. "
Now you know why I can't leave.
I really don't know what to say.
- Except that you must be completely mad.
- You think I'm mad?
What else can I think after a tale like that?
Things like that don't happen today.
- We're living in the 20th century.
- You think it's nonsense?
You've been hypnotised by fanatics.
I wouldn't believe it in England.
Why should I swallow it here in Tibet?
How do you know these things are true?
- Did they show you proof?
- I don't need proof.
I knew there was a reason why I hated this place.
I'd love to fly over it with bombs for what they've done to you.
All this talk about lamas being hundreds of years old.
How do you know?
Did you see their birth certificates?
I can't believe it.
A bunch of old men sit around and dream about reforming the world...
...and you, two-feet-on-the-ground Conway, want to join them.
It's horrible.
Is that all my story meant to you?
What else could it mean to me?
It's obviously a lot of bunk.
Then you'd better go.
This is no place for you.
It's no place for you.
Think of what's waiting for you.
Do you want to stay here till you're half dead?
Till your mind starts corroding like the rest of them?
- I don't want to talk about it anymore.
- You've got to talk.
And me?
They stole the plane to bring you here.
I didn't want to come.
You owe me some responsibility.
I'm tired of owing you things.
You're free to go. Go ahead.
It's that girl.
- That girl has twisted and turned...
- That's enough. Never mind the girl.
Why don't you go?
Look here.
Ever since I can remember you've looked after me.
Now, you're the one that needs looking after.
I'm your brother.
If there's something wrong with you...
...let me help you.
I don't feel like making that trip alone.
You couldn't possibly stay here, could you?
I'd go mad.
I may be wrong. I may be a maniac...
...but I believe in this and I'm not going to lose it.
You know how much I want to help you...
...but this is bigger, stronger if you like, than brotherly love.
I'm sorry. I'm staying.
I can't think of anything more to say.
Goodbye.
Are you sure the porters will take care of you?
It's all set.
- Maria made the arrangements.
- Maria?
- The little Russian girl.
- How's she involved?
- She's going with me.
- You're crazy.
- You can't take her away from here.
- Why not?
You can't. Do you know what will happen if she leaves Shangri-La?
She's fragile and can only live where fragile things are loved.
Take her out of this valley and she'll fade away like an echo.
What do you mean,
"Fade away like an echo"?
She came here in 1888.
This'd be funny, if it weren't so pathetic.
She isn't a day over 20.
- You're wrong.
- I'm not wrong. She told me so.
Besides, she wouldn't have to tell me.
I'd know anyway.
I found out a lot of things last night.
I'm not ashamed of it.
It's one of the few decent things...
...that's ever happened in this hellish place.
Everyone is happy in Shangri-La.
Nobody would ever think of leaving.
It's all just rot!
She's pleaded with me since I came to take her away from this place.
She's cried in my arms, for fear I'd leave her here.
She's made two trips to the plateau to bribe the porters. For me!
I don't believe a word of it.
All right, I'll prove it to you.
You've believed everything they're told you without proof. I'll prove my story.
Come in a minute.
I've got some bad news for you.
My brother and I've decided we can't take you along.
You can't take me?
You promised to take me with you!
It's all your fault.
It was all arranged until he spoke to you.
Why can't you leave us alone?
- You want to leave Shangri-La?
- I'll die if I have to stay another minute.
I've waited a long time for this chance and you're not going to stop me now.
If I have to, I'll go alone.
I brought the porters.
If it weren't for me, you'd never get out.
The High Lama told them not to take anyone.
The High Lama!
Who pays any attention to him?
The porters laugh at the High Lama.
They only want to know how much gold he'll give.
I gave them more gold.
I've been stealing it for a year.
I'd do anything to leave this place.
To leave the High Lama, who calls himself Father Perrault.
He's been insane for years.
- Father Perrault is dead.
- He's dead! That's fine.
You won't see me shedding any tears over him.
You must take me with you.
Aren't you afraid to leave?
You don't want to look like an old woman, do you?
Old woman?
- Chang told you that, didn't he?
- Yes.
I thought so.
He tells everyone I'm old.
He wants them to stay away from me.
He gets mad when anyone comes near me.
He's punished me for every minute
I've spent with George.
If it weren't for him, I'd have left long ago.
But he always stops me.
Six months ago I tried to escape and he locked me in a dark room.
I nearly went crazy.
Look at me! Do I look like an old woman?
Is this the skin of an old woman?
Look into my eyes.
Are these the eyes of an old woman?
She was kidnapped and brought here two years ago just as we were.
I don't believe it. I can't believe it.
She's lying.
You're lying.
Every word you've been saying is a lie.
Say it! You're lying, aren't you?
No, I'm not lying.
What reason could I have for lying?
Chances are we'll never come out of that horrible trip alive.
But I'd rather die out there in a snowstorm, be buried alive...
...than to stay here one more minute.
- You say the porters are waiting for us?
- Yes.
- Clothes?
- Yes, everything.
What about the others?
I've asked them.
They're afraid to make the trip.
We'll have to send an expedition back after them.
Come on, we're wasting time.
- Are you taking me?
- Certainly. Come on.
It won't be long before we're in London.
Can't you just see everyone when we pop in out of the blue?
We'll have them breathless when we tell them our story.
You had me worried for a while.
I thought you were gone completely.
Lucky for me you snapped out of it.
You saved my life.
- I never could have made it alone.
- What was that?
- I was saying...
- Shut up! Must you go on babbling?
- What's happened? Where's Bob?
- He's going, my child.
- Going?
- But he will return.
No!
I can't stand it. I can't go on anymore.
I've got to rest.
How long is this going to go on?
I can't stand it.
Can't you get them to wait for us?
They're leaving us farther behind every day.
There's nothing that would suit 'em more than to lose us, but we must go on.
- Come on, darling.
- I can't. You've got to let me rest.
Target practice again.
One of these days they're going to hit us.
As long as they keep on aiming at us, we're safe. Come now.
Look at her face!
"Dropping from nowhere after a year! "
- Cable from Gainsford.
- Read it!
"Leaving today for London with Conway aboard S.S. Manchuria.
"Conway can tell nothing of his experiences.
"Is suffering from complete loss of memory. " Signed, Gainsford.
- "Loss of memory"?
- All right, give it to the press.
- All of it?
- Yes. Might as well all of it.
I'll dispatch a convoy to meet him.
Conway's gone again.
Listen to this, from Gainsford.
Let me have it.
"Aboard S.S. Manchuria.
"Last night Conway recovered his memory.
Talked about Shangri-La.
"Telling a fantastic story about a place in Tibet.
"Insisted upon returning there at once.
"Locked him in, but he escaped and jumped ship at Singapore.
"I'm leaving ship to overtake him, as fearful of his condition.
"Wrote down details of Conway's story about Shangri-La, which I am forwarding.
"Lord Gainsford. "
Here's Gainsford now.
- It's good to see you back.
- Glad to see you.
- It's good to see you again.
- Thought you would never come.
- Sit down. Have a drink.
- Scotch and soda. I'm parched.
Here you are. Ready and waiting.
- Any news of Conway?
- We're eager to know what you discovered.
Where is he?
Gentlemen, you see before you a very weary old man...
...who has just ended a chase that lasted nearly 10 months.
You never caught up with him?
Since that night he jumped off the ship, till two weeks ago...
- ... l've been missing him by inches.
- You don't mean it.
- Was he that determined to get back?
- Determined?
Gentlemen, in the whole course of my life,
I've never encountered anything so grim.
During those last 10 months, that man has done the most astounding things.
He learned how to fly, stole a plane, got caught, put in jail, escaped...
...in an amazingly short space of time.
This is only the beginning of his adventure.
He begged and fought, pushing forward to the Tibetan frontier.
Everywhere I heard these amazing stories of the man's adventures.
Positively astounding. Till eventually...
...I trailed him to the most extreme outpost in Tibet.
Of course, he had already gone.
But his memory...
His memory will live with those natives for the rest of their lives.
"The man who was not human," they called him.
They won't forget the stranger who tried six times...
...to climb a mountain pass that no other human being dared to travel.
And six times was forced back by the severest storms.
They won't forget the madman who stole their food and clothing.
Who they locked up in their barracks and who fought six guards to escape.
Their soldiers are still talking about their pursuit to overtake him...
...and shuddering at the memory.
He led them the wildest chase through their own country.
Finally, he disappeared over that very mountain pass...
...that they themselves dared not travel.
And that, gentlemen...
...was the last that any known human being saw of Robert Conway.
That's what I call fortitude.
- Think of it.
- Tell me something, Gainsford.
What do you think of his talk about Shangri-La? Do you believe it?
Yes. I believe it.
I believe it, because I want to believe it.
I give you a toast.
Here's my hope...
...that Robert Conway will find his Shangri-La.
Here's my hope...
...that we all find our Shangri-La.
 SABOTAGE
  Destruction of buildingf or machinery
  with the object of alarming
  a group of persons
  inspiring public uneasiness.
 SABOTAGE
  -Sand! 
  -Sabotage!
  -Bring! 
  -Deliberate!
  -What's behind this? 
  -Who did it?
  I know the law.  You have standards, 
  thereby breached the law.
  It happened everywhere. 
  Look at the street.
  -I may be in the dark in my house. 
  -Yes, but is free.
  It is a shame to
  rob the people.
  We want you to return the money.
  But this is the nature of providence, 
  as an earthquake or a thunderbolt.
  -Or a baby. 
  -It would be nice not to interfere?
  -We want our money. 
  -I'm sorry, arrived late.
  I just take my 
  dinner in the dark.
  I am half his ear.
  They want their money back.
  Hopefully, Mr. Verloc back.
  Not even saw the movie!
  -They are getting nasty. 
  -Nasty? Leave them to me.
  -Hey, you?  What's happening?
  Give me a flashlight.
  We blame the lack of light?
  If you hit a cop, the government
  asks that you return the money?
  -I paid for my seat ...
  -And that supported by the feet?
  -Carl, when you returned home? 
  -I haven't been out.
  It was not 20 minutes. 
  I call it low.
  Sleep.  that guides me 
  with that?  Light the lamp.
  -I can not! The light is over!
  -The fuse burned?
  No, it's a blackout. 
  The public wants the money.
  -They are disappointed.
  Good, return.
  -We can not do that.
  -Yes, yes we can.
  We will be without funds.
  When he says that does not cover the expenses.
  It is not worth fighting with the
  public.  I have got some money.
  If you are saying.
  If we were to be generous, be
  properly.  Give them an explanation.
  -No, you are accustomed to.
  Good, but I think you're crazy.
  -I tell you that is the work of God.
  -What do you mean by work of God?
  His face, and not to return
  the money for it.
  If a plane drop a bomb,
  this is the work of an enemy.
  When dry the juice alone,
  this is the work of providence.
  A work is any activity
  performed by a real action.
  Do not miss 
  that is outside the light ...
  It's a very debatable.
  -Discuss então.Que pay!
  - Yes! 
  -What we return the money!
  How?  Applying sanctions? 
  Know the details of the agreement?
  Article 257 line 6 section 24 
  clearly says "No". "
  Did not know? 
  Unable to nothing.
  Come on, if you send. 
  -What are you doing there?
  -Giving a hand. 
  , Who asked not to metesse.
  It was counter-attacking. 
  are withdrawing.
  Because they can come back. 
  Return the money.
  -There is no income.  Fight with you 
  -Keep your apples.
  I spoke with Mr. Verloc. 
  How are you clients and friends ...
  -... will return them the money. 
  -Don't return.
  Make no account.
  -You are crazy.  He had arranged everything.
  -Why is not dealing with their affairs?
  -Of all the people teimosas ...
  -Go or call the police.
  Renee, return the money to customers...
  Come, come.
  -Thank you for the inconvenience.
  -From nothing, I like them.
  -How many? 
  -Two, please.
  -How many? 
  -Three, please.
  Here are the change. 
  How many?
  -How many? 
  -No, thanks.
  The greens are prepared. 
  Tell Mrs. Verloc.
  Gotta go.  My husband 
  is not very well the kidney ...
  ... and I can not leave the 
  alone for long.
  His brother is watching.
  -The kidney? 
  -No, the greens.
 Steve!  What you have done?
  Come on, don't be modest.
  We have not had to return 
  the money, anyway.
  Ms. Jones has always been complicated
  to cook the cabbage ...
  I told you not like that.
  I will make a salad.
  -Va to bring a grocery lettuce.
  Large-or round?
  I like round
  What is more fresh.
  to put in the account.
  We could not buy it if
  had returned the money.
  Did not seem too worried 
  when you said that.
  -by who wanted to return him 
  Non-wanted.
  I just wanted to keep the peace. 
  I do not want that kind of advertising.
  good night, but these magnificent
  copies.  I did not know if wanted ...
  ... a lettuce, square or 
  oblong, so bring some samples.
  - Said round! 
  -Yes?  I thought you said great.
  He said round!
  Good night, Mr. Verloc. 
  He returned in time to see the excitement.
  -I?  I spent the afternoon here. 
  -Swear that I saw him enter.
  If wrong. 
  I do not interfere until they wake up.
  -He was up there, sleeping.
  I'm sorry, my mistake.
  Well ..
  -Believe were killing someone
  -And the killing are in the movie.
  Pull up a chair 
  and closes the vasculhante.
  Do not forget to pay.  good night.
  -Do you mind if I come sooner? 
  -OK, Ted.
  Thank you.
  good night.
  Comes and goes when he wants.
  Allright. someone to 
  working on it.
  Sergeant, saw what happened today?
  examined something?
  Swear I saw the Verloc
  return in the middle of the blackout.
  When commented, said no
  was gone.  His wife confirmed.
  Possibly also is involved.
  You better talk to her.
  Fears that might arise
  a little worse than that of today.
  But what we want?
  Create problems in the country so that
  do not think about what happens outside.
  Like when a man while you&#39;re going
  his accomplice to steal the wallet.
  -Who is behind all this?
  -Someone who never caught.
  They are men who use
  to pursue that.
  THURSDAY
  -Do not know that this is dangerous? 
  -What?
  Leaving the ground remains.
  We could break a leg.
  -glad you feel it.
  -It depends on if your leg or my.
  Like some oranges?
  Delicious.  Good for your feet.
  -Hello.  How is the movie?
  -They made one, the maximum.
  I hope there will be many murders.
  I love to make the patient.
  Women like.
  He is already going!
  -go now. 
  you say I did not come back later.
  No more late. 
  let&#39;s go.
  Back as soon as possible.
  Pineapples a penny.
  The one cent the pineapple.
  Pineapples a penny.
  The one cent the pineapple.
  Why do bubbles? 
  The fish have solutions?
  You would also have 
  it ate eggs for ant.
  -What are most curious aspect. 
  -Yes, it is true.
  Take three to make soup for
  the mayor&#39;s banquet on Saturday.
  They say it is easy to digest.
  Qaui someone has a mustache.
  I hope you are satisfied 
  with last night.  It was not easy.
  -I had some expenses, in addition. 
  -No doubt.
  A clean work. 
  To stay up.
  Will agree 
  I got my money.
  I hope you do not mind 
  that received in pounds.
  We did laugh the entire London.
  We wanted people to feel 
  fear, not that Risse.
  We are not clowns.
  -It is not my fault if they were crazy. 
  -They are not.
  The last night was funny. 
  They had reason to laugh this time.
  -What do you mean? 
  -Pay when you win.
  you have your money.  then.
  Do not understand.
  A sign in Piccadilly Circus 
  says it is "the center of the world."
  Leave a package 
  in line with the subway.
  -What kind of package?
  you do not even know?
  One-pumps.
  I can not do it.
  I do not want to have anything 
  to do with pain and death.
  Look for another. 
  I I will not.
  All right, Mr. Verloc. 
  If you leave the money ...
  -You know not.  You know my situation.
  -So, in agreement.
  You caught your money ..
  If you do have to fix it,
  true that some friend will help you.
  Do not be stupid.
  We will see this man ...
  It makes beautiful bombs.
  we see it
  Do not forget.  on Saturday.  Parade of 
  Mayor&#39;s Day.  A lot of people.
  -Want to come and report? 
  -Thanks, no.
  If you have to tell me is 
  very noisy, will not be necessary.
  Where is the exit?
  Thank you.
  ... the fertility is very high. 
  After putting a million eggs ...
  -... the oyster exchange of female sex. 
  -Don &#39;t blame.
  -Excuse me, can I help you? 
  -Thank you.
  Has the fat legs.
  You are fat, do not you?
  You would also be 
  is tired of corn and bread.
  -Look!  Stevie and Mrs. Verloc! 
  Hi-Ted!  Look!
  -Yes.  Whenever he is. 
  What-fat!  They should eat fruit.
  - Fruit!  It remains to be lunch. 
  -Is that it?  How about a steak?
  -I &#39;d love.  Stevie!
  -Where are we going?
  I would like to go to the Simpsons. 
  I know how to go.
  Come on to a bar. 
  -Mrs.  Verloc, go to the Simpsons.
  Come on.
  -was here before? 
  -Never.
  You are dragging the towel.
  I saw in a movie as 
  a man took a towel ...
  -... without toppling over nothing.
  -It should try this at home.
  I will do.
  -Everything is very expensive. 
  -You have to be good, right?
  -I have a pound, if it makes lacking. 
  -No, do not worry.
  Besides the steak, we have 
  oysters, caviar, smoked salmon ...
  -... sole fried, baked or boiled. 
  -I take ...
  Roast lamb, chicken pie, 
  roast veal, chuletas ...
  -... steak or roast duck. 
  One-boiled eggs for Stevie.
  And for me a salad.
  Here, you will see this and ...  The calf 
  move in the sauce!
  Three steaks baked. 
  And a cup of coffee.
  Once again, America?
  -It &#39;s been a year.  Not anything was going well.
  Curious!  We go there because they do not
  is right here.  How are you now?
  -Not quite. 
  -I &#39;ve seen more than auction.
  It is difficult to go ahead 
  with a family business ...
  ... unless it has another
  employment.  Mr. Verloc has?
  -No.  In reality we are satisfied.
  A small family-happy.
  A happy family.
  He is very kind 
  with my brother Steve.
  -And that means a lot to you? 
  -It means everything.
  -Here, we have! 
  -Good morning, sir.
  Without fat for you, as always. 
  I have not forgotten.
  It was not much that you saw.
  -I do not want to paint fat? 
  -What &#39;s going on here?
  -How? 
  -Do you see never been here ...
  ... and you can pay it 
  with his salary.
  Everybody ask me. Me 
  the mystery surrounding ...  like so many.
  -There &#39;s no secret horrible? 
  -No matter it is.
  That play-in movie theater? 
  -Action in the shade.
  Her husband makes mysterious trips?
  -Yes, with beard postiça. 
  -It is that there is another woman.
  -What&#39;s so funny? 
  -You should know.
  He is a man of more 
  relaxing and homely.
  -As with Mrs. Verloc? 
  -You know nothing.
  -why are you so sure? 
  -His answers were direct.
  It is beautiful?
  And that what matters?
  I even tend to be more 
  benevolent with women.
  And Verloc?
  If you are surrounded, 
  does not deliver.
  I&#39;m not so secure.
  -His assistant ... 
 -Hollingshead.
  Hollingshead followed him. 
  Give me these roles.
  This is his report. 
  Reported by telephone.
  "" Verloc went to the aquarium and met 
  with a foreign man ...
  ... he delivered a paper.  It was soon 
  to paragraph 165 of the Liverpool Rd, lslington.
  I hope to get off. 
  Continue informing. "
 -Islington? 
  -So little sense to me.
  Do not sing on entendo.todo 
  before you buy.
  -Maybe you need to adapt. 
  -Nothing will fit.
  Whistle, hit palms. 
  It made me look like a fool.
  -It is not the fault of the bird, lady. 
  -Oh, no?
  I want you to return the money. 
  Keep your bird.
  I want a canary-for company. 
  -and I can do that sing.
  -See, lady. 
  Sure, he did it?
  Listen again.
  I saw the open-peak. 
  -Of course.
  Give very watercress. 
  And you whistle.
  It should put me in jail 
  and he do domestic services
  Want something for my other department? 
  Drop by here.
  My daughter.
  It is better than a stranger. 
  They do a lot of questions.
  Where is my key?
  What sloppy!  It should not leave 
  the boys playing here.
  Without discipline there is no father. 
  What can you expect?
  -Died? 
  -I do not know.
  Maybe. 
  Nobody knows.
  My daughter would like to know it. 
  It is his cross, and must load it.
  All carry our own cross.
  -Everything seems harmless. 
  -You &#39;re right, my friend.
  But if juntássemos a bit of tomato 
  with a bit of jelly ...
  I was told that the day will be 
  on Saturday and time, to 1:45.
  How to do the work?
  leave it.  When the lead, 
  already be connected.
  Are you nervous?  Fear not. 
  Some people envy him.
  - I envy! 
  -I was a fighter until now.
  I am no longer at the forefront. 
  Now I am in charge of supplies ...
  ... but I would be 
  in its place.
  Darling!  Look at this!
  Has reason Possibly. 
  I have made it myself.
  Nothing happened.
  I believe that everything is clear.
  knock here! 
  Grandpa was unpleasant.
  - Look there!  What are you doing? 
  watching me.  why not?
  Very possibly know. 
  One day you will
  Let me give you a good warm welcome.
  I have not seen.
  on Saturday.  Two canaries in a 
  jail, with a double bottom.
  Do not forget.  Saturday, 1:45. 
  Goodbye.
  Again the girl ...
  -Yes, sir? 
  I&#39;d like a canary-good.
  A canary. 
  I have a way ...
  "I have a job for you. 
  Come and see me go. "
  Was aware that was not 
  an employee of quintanda.
  It has money.  I believe it is here 
  to learn the business ...
  soon, my love
  taking so much money ...
  Would you like to sell fruit?
  I wonder
  I believe that
  they are about to
  something
  Ted makes it seem fun. 
  It would be very good eating steak every day.
  -If tired. 
  It&#39;s better than boiled eggs.
  -What are the poor? 
  It&#39;s worse.
  Right-to Ted to eat. 
  Right-to think not.
  -Are below their category. 
  -Nor has so.
  It has a lot to eat eggs. 
  franzindo is!
  -It &#39;s nothing. 
  -I think Ted will prove it?
  Yes-seeking, maybe. 
  It&#39;s more certain you ask.
  Play with ships is fun, but he 
  know a lot of gangsters and thieves.
  -How can you know? 
  -Lee.  The gangsters are not afraid ...
  ... unless the ordinary people as 
  you, me or Mr. Verloc.
  This is true!
  Yes has appearance of gangster, 
  the police will ago.
  FRIDAY
  Mr. Verloc is it? 
  -The wait?
  -Yes. 
  -You know the way?
  -Yes. 
  you let go, Jack.
  -Can I see Mr. Verloc. 
  -You know the way?
  -No. 
  -On the other side of the room.
  you let go, Jack. 
  -Thank you.
  Meet the lady, Ted.
  I have to leave a moment.  Possibly
  not again after that night.
  -A, please. 
  you let go, Jack.
  -Ted, where are you going? 
  -Speaking with Mr. Verloc.
  -On the loud speakers? 
  -That &#39;s what we here?
  Only the screen and a few other things.
  Where is this?
  At the front-room. 
  -I will make a surprise to Mr. Verloc.
  I do not mind paying 
  what worth the work.
  I see nothing against it. 
  You call tomorrow at 11.
  And then ...
  Put the money where 
  do the job.
  If Arsenal lose on Saturday, 
  I would not like it.
  -Arsenal?  I do not understand. 
  -Yes, but it&#39;s a good bet.
  Believe in me
  forget that
  filled with 10 tickets
  I can earn 15 shillings.
  you know. 
  What was up there?
  -Who is? 
  Works-in quintanda alongside.
  What happened?  Ted was teaching the 
  Part of the behind the screen.
  Sounds bad?
  I hope we will not be done badly. 
  You never know.
  Not a scratch.  Is it better to return 
  the fresh shade of trees.
  Sorry.
  Good night to all. 
  good night.
  This is the Sergeant Spencer 
  of Scotland Yard.
  But the search-who? 
  -Are you making fun of people.
  -What do we do? 
  But, if you work on Thursday.
  I owe him my last sentence. 
  I am at liberty provisional.
  -What do we do? 
  Cancel the-job!
  - Exit out and disperse! 
  -And do not come back to see us!
  If you ask, you say you do not know where 
  we live.  We are abroad.
  Yesterday, the Simpsons, when it was 
  lunch with this guy ...
 Ted?
  Recalls if it has questions 
  about you or about me?
  None occurs to me now. 
  Why?
  It is an agent of Scotland Yard. 
  Me spying through you.
  Why? 
  What may interest you?
  From me, nothing.  But these types 
  who came last night ...
  -There is said to spy on you. 
  -No, not me, in this place.
  why do not you talk 
  clearly?  You help him.
  -I will talk to him. 
  -No, I will say
  Clean all that.
  -Where&#39;s Ted? 
  - I was.
  -was the Scotland Yard? 
  I&#39;m sorry.  I did not like the idea ...
  -but I could not deny. 
  -What happened?
  -He said what it? 
  -No, I do not say anything.
  You must have designed some
  movies stronger than usual.
  The match?
  The mail.
  "London should not laugh on Saturday" "
  DAY OF DESFILE the Mayor
  I tried to find him 
  the whole morning without success.
  No, it&#39;s too late to stop him. 
  came out with a request.
  An old man brought it. 
  Whether there should be mistaken.
  No, some birds are to Stevie. 
  I was calling the partnership.
  It&#39;s so good to him. 
  -And do not you?
  If you&#39;re good with it, 
  it is good to me.
  Yes, I know.
  -How it happened? 
  -Someone I suggested it.
  I call him.
  "" Do not forget.  The birds 
  1:45 to sing. "
 Stevie! 
  What are you doing up there?
  -There is a surprise for you. 
  -What?
  Come and see.
  There was nobody at the entrance. 
  Forgive who arrive soon.
  We are already accustomed. 
  There is no movie at this time.
  I&#39;m sorry.  I am here on business. 
  -How them the other night?
  -There is nothing personal about this. 
  -Oh, no?
  In tricked, made us believe 
  that was our friend.
  I believe fun? 
  I asked tirassem the case.
  You can imagine why.
  But it is not so easy. 
  I do what I ordered.
  What you ordered?
  These men.  My husband 
  has nothing to do with them.
  -They affairs movie. 
  -You have no idea either of their affairs.
  My husband has not done anything.
  I hope so.
  Why say that?
  -You can be involved in sabotage.
  -Sabot ...?
  recalls that he was at home 
  throughout the afternoon.
  My husband would not do sabotage
  He returned in the middle of the night
  Not true. 
  I saw him again.
  - No way! 
  -You are worse things.
  I have to ask you some questions. 
  These men ...
  I tell you that it is harmless. 
  It is unable to do ...
  These men came together?
  Recognized the one?
  Are you sure?
 Stevie!
  -How beautiful!  What is the female? 
  -Wait until you put an egg.
  And if the male by? 
  It would be fun.
  You are right.
  has led the film 
  the Canterbury?
  You still have time.
  Would you take it and move 
  make me another favor.
  So-kill two birds in one shot. 
  - Not mine!
  Will be here when I get back.
  That is the intrigue of the projector.
  Harris to get a good price, 
  but can not come get him.
  Leave it in the ordinance 
  of Piccadilly Circus ...
  -Harris to catch the 1:30. 
  How can the non-indigenous?
  This leaves the charge. Harris 
  you know, we had done before.
  -You better go now. 
  -There is no hurry.
  -But you have to go on foot. 
  A foot?  Why?
  You can not lead films 
  in public transport.
  Do not tell your sister 
  up to the Piccadilly.
  Always think 
  it will run down.
  We will not concerned about it.
  Man, I wash, crown, no.
  Crown!
  For the love of God, 
  why not go now?
  to get on or arrive late. 
  You have to be before 1:30.
  -Steve, what it takes? 
  A film-to Canterbury.
  "" Bartolomé, the strangler. " 
  Sounds interesting.  See?
  Fourteen-times. 
  -It must be painful if it separated.
  -See you later. 
  -Be careful at crossings.
  -I could take care of myself, or not? 
  -Steve.
  -Mr Verloc is? 
  -Yes, I have to leave.
  who abused his trust, 
  but could not say anything.
  Now put the cards 
  on the table.
  I came to ask for help, 
  nothing more.
  I understand.
  These men from the other night. 
  They ordered that I can ...
  ... some information about them. 
  Would you to help me.
  If you&#39;re in my power ...
  Speaking to you .. 
  When you come to England?
  -Can I offer you a cup? 
  -No, thanks.
  We will see, let me think ...
  Maybe I should write it. 
  Take pencil and paper.
  We could start 
  "" I, Carl Anton Verloc ...""
  I have a question.
  -What does the tooth fall? 
  - A punch in the jaw!
  The process of deterioration 
  of the teeth is inevitable.
  But you can be arrested immediately. 
  With what?
  With a penny.
  Exactly, with more than a poquito 
  a penny.  With a few.
  Hey here a tube of preparation, 
 Salvodont.  From two Greek words ...
  Except ..."" "," no more and "dont", "pain 
  of moles.  6 cents the small tube.
  The big one shilling. 
  I will do a demonstration.
  I see a young gentleman. 
  Insurance will want to help me.
  -No, I do not want. 
  -Yes, yes either.
  you feel here. 
  -But ...
  me let me deal with it. 
  -No ...
  Very well, does not change.
  We take the tube, 
  you take the lid.
  Grabbed a brush, 
  Salvodont place ...
  -The teeth of the young are dirty. 
  -Don &#39;are.
  Yes, they are.  Open your mouth. 
  Now we will use the brush.
  The toothpastes are very common 
  aggressive and take the enamel is ...
  ... or are not and do not remove anything. 
  Salvodont is at the midpoint.
  Not very strong, 
  nor too weak.
  Refreshes the mouth and removes 
  all trace of halitosis.
  -Fish stocks ...  what? 
  -For you, bad breath.
  -And for you 
  -Thank you.  Do not need.
  Here you go.
  He disheveled. 
  But it is easy solution.
  A bottle of Glosswell.  One shilling 
  this size.  The large, 18 cents.
  applies in the hair like this. 
  incredible product.
  Assure that gives 
  a gloss of varnish to the hair.
  Now you are ready for stardom. 
  Come on, if drop son.
  "" Do not forget. 
  The birds sing to 1:45. "
  Want something? Pass!
  Views of the Mayor&#39;s Parade!
  Where you going?  Go back to your place! 
  Come on!
  Come on, stay there.
  Here they come.
  We have arrived at Piccadilly Circus 
  before 1:30?
  Yes, 1:30 in the morning. 
  Hold your wedding?
  You can not travel with it. 
  They are movies, right?
  -Yes. 
  -San inflamáveis.Desce.
  I have to go to Piccadilly. 
  Can I leave the ramp?
  "" Bartolomé, the strangler "." 
  You can stay if they do not attack me ...
  it me or to any passenger. 
  -Thank you.
  Now everything is in order. 
  Want a drink now?
  No, thanks.
  Between.
  Forgive, could draw the 
  1212, Whitehall 1 21 2?
  Can I use your phone?
  I put the 
  Superintendent Talbot.
  Spencer speaking, sir.
  A bus jumped by 
  ares in the West End.
  -How terrible! 
  -What time?
  -that question? 
  -I can be in 2 places at once.
  I suppose not.
  Back later.
  -find something? 
  -I am not sure.
  Well, say 
  What is this?
  "" Bartolomé ...""?
  It is a can of a movie, right? 
  Verloc says you have not left.
  -No, not out. 
  -Whether the film is hers.
  Me looking for, sir? 
  -Meet with the Hollingshead.
  You are in petshop.  Do not enter. 
  Just keep your eyes open.
  Well, Spencer, go there.
  What we believe is that, sir? 
  "" Bartolomé, the strangler "."
  It&#39;s a can of a movie, right? 
  -No, of sardines.
 Extra!  Erupts a bomb!
  Will be fine.  You can take care of themselves 
  same.  There&#39;s no need to worry.
  Give me a penny.
  "Bartolomé, the strangler", 
  runway in the explosion of a bus ""
  - If you draw! 
  - Let her breathe!
  I want to see Mr. Verloc. 
  I want to see Mr. Verloc.
  I would not do harm to the boy.
  Come on, Sylvie, we have to think 
  No tomorrow.
  Need to hang out with eye 
  if they come for me.
  You have to calm down.
  Be reasonable. 
  What would you if I lose?
  That pig&#39;s aquarium, this cynical, 
  that gross dangerous, insane ...
  You do not know. 
  It is true.
  Did not want to worry about. 
  I am well.
  It was not his subject.
  to calm down. 
  The fact, is done.
  Go back to sleep.
  What we need is 
  a crying time.
  I know how you feel. 
  I do not believe that affects?
  Believes that died 
  by my fault?
  No, it was the fault of his friend 
  of Scotland Yard.  you blame him!
  I would have taken, but I 
  monitored.  I could not escape.
  Look ... now ... 
  You need to think in the future.
  Possibly ...  if we had a son.
  Stevie is slowing.
  Forgive.
  Gotta go now.
  You are more calm. 
  That&#39;s better.
  It could make peas? 
  You know that I love.
  I do not want more cabbage. 
  We could ask the grocery ...
  I do not think it has more
  what to do
  some things ...
 Stevie! Stevie!
  -Did you know? 
  -Yes.
  Sorry.
  I do not know what to say.
  -You know how I came. 
  -Yes.
  -I have to arrest him. 
  -Yes.
  If I could help. 
  For you, not for him.
  Do what is for you.
  It is very nice, Ted. 
  You can not do anything.
  Things are so terrible.
  We have evidence against him, 
  not anything happen to you.
  It is not good now. 
  There should tell you
  ... but before I take that 
  I want you to know ...
  ... how much it means to me.
  Did not mean 
  what we felt for you
  Is it better that I put my coat. 
  Do not I stop shaking.
  -What happened? 
  -I killed Steve.
  -I do not have cold.  Come on. 
  -Where?
  -TO police. 
  -No, wait.  Hold on!
  -It can not be so. 
  -Let me go.
  Not guilty. 
  I know it was an accident.
  -Please, let me go. 
  -I know and nobody else.
  What chance would ante 
  a judge and a jury?
  -Don &#39;t care. 
  -There &#39;s nothing to live for?
  Look at me. 
 -Ted!
  We&#39;ll leave it.
  -No.  It would be his ruin. 
  -When hell with it!
  We can go to the mainland without a passport 
  with tickets for the weekend.
  The train leaves at 9.
  Who can enter this 
  comfortable?  Only Mrs. Jones?
  Arrives at 8 in the morning.
  8 in point.  And he says he 
  there is no possibility.
  We have 12 hours 
  before that they find.
  Shut up! 
  Not a word more.
  Go to the movies and bring this cage 
  before that the police find.
  How can you be so stupid?
  - A cage with a bomb inside! 
  -I could not help it.
  Now you can. 
  Here, his coat.
  It&#39;s risky ... 
  -Who?  For you?
  And I and the girl? 
  Do not run risks?
  Get this cab! 
  And that brings cage!
  Bijou Cinema.  Penfork Rd
  Follow that taxi.
  Tell it to the Yard.
  Police-yan ...  that number? 
 -UDC4768.
  The suspect left the 
  petshop and is addressed to the movies Bijou.
  Then his taxi. 
  Some order?
  "He arrested along with the Verloc." 
  Chief inspector of the Yard.
  I&#39;m fine. 
  -There should be noted that cried.
  I&#39;m fine. 
  Come on.
 Ted.
  Whatever happens ...
  Mr. Verloc is?
  What is that?
  A police. 
  Come on.
  not so.
  -Are you in charge? 
  -I do not have time, madam.
  Ms. Verloc-Am! 
 -OH!  Where was, Spencer?
  -Did you know that we wanted to question it? 
  -Yes.  I want to make a statement.
  -Statement?  What kind? 
  -You can do it later.
  Okay. 
  It has to do with your husband?
  -reached his men, sir. 
  -I will now.
  Wait here in the car.
  Her husband will come with us.
  Mrs. Verloc!
  No time.  Stay in the car. 
  How many men were ...?
  Mr. Verloc?
  Come on.  Open.  Avoid
  a lot of problems.
  Open and I will skip 
  by air!
  -Maybe you have a bomb. 
  -Evacuate the cinema.  I monitored.
  I will stay. 
  You have wife.
  More reasons to stay. 
  Cut to the public.
  It has a bomb. 
  will blow.
  A-bomb?  Verloc is there? 
  -Maybe you did something.
  I ask them to leave the room ...
  -Your husband is in there? 
  -Do not know.
  -why do you respond? 
  -Yes, it is there.
  The old man has a bomb.  Believes 
  that her husband can control it?
  -No. 
  -You can not?
  Is dead!
  -Everything flew by air. 
  -Someone ...
  The public was gone. 
  Thank God.
  I saw some sutures in the war, 
  but ...
  -They can be identified? 
  -No way.
  Call someone for first 
  Aid to see the head.
  Take care of Mrs. Verloc.  Her husband 
  died.  flew into pieces.
  Tell him investigate. 
  It has nothing against it.
  We have to make some 
  investigations.  Nothing against her.
  Yes, sir.
  Curious.  You guess? 
  Verloc said it was ...
  Dead?  No need for power 
  in such cases.
  But she said this before.
  Or was it after?
  I can't remember.
#[Bugle]
[Man] The munitions used by the rebels
came up from Nammu to Dowgli Pass.
The revolt was quelled, but at the cost of 90 lives-
60 natives and 30 of our own lancers.
Ninety dead men.
And why are they dead?
They are dead because the lancers
guarding Dowgli Pass- the sole gate to an attack on Jerishtawbi- were ordered elsewhere by Colonel Loring Leigh.
I will call Captain Loveland.
Raise your right hand.
Repeat the oath.
I swear by Almighty God that the evidence which I shall give before this court...
shall be the truth, the whole truth
and nothing but the truth.
Captain Loveland, will you tell the court about any orders... received by you from Colonel Leigh on the night of the 18th.
I received written orders, delivered to me shortly after 9:00... to proceed immediately with my detachment to Tablis.
Orders in Colonel Leigh's writing.
Can you identify the writing?
Yes, it was his writing, but perhaps-
Perhaps what?
I was about to say the order may not have been as neatly written as usual.
Of course, this might have been due to haste.
- Could it have been due to intoxication?
- I cannot judge as to that.
That is all.
I believe you have known Colonel Leigh for several years.
Have you ever seen him intoxicated?
Not intoxicated.
Have you ever known him to issue a careless order?
I have not.
Captain Loveland... in view of all the very strange things which happened that night... has it ever occurred to you... that the order in question might have been forged?
The question is disallowed.
Unless you intend to offer proof.
That will be all.
I call Colonel Loring Leigh to the stand.
- [Man] Leigh!
- Yes?
This came to your digs.
Thought it might be important.
Thanks.
- Well rowed, Leigh.
- Thank you, sir.
[Man]... something more fundamental than
that referred to by the opposing counsel.
As he has so aptly stated,
under ordinary circumstances...
there might be doubt as to the validity
of a claim against the defendant company.
However, in this instance...
my clients have suffered
a loss which can be laid...
directly at the door
of the defendants.
- I have no doubt...
- Anything wrong, Leigh?
The learned counsel's opinions have been honestly expressed, but l-
May it please Your Lordship, I am called from the court on urgent private affairs.
By Your Lordship's permission?
- Certainly.
- Thank you.
Message for Flying Officer Leigh.
That's his ship coming in now.
Joan!
- Joan.
- You are late.
Oh, I'm sorry, darling, but it's such a lovely ship,
I hated to come down at all.
- How very flattering.
- But now I'm here, I'm awfully glad to see you...
- and did I ever tell you your eyes are mysterious-
- Pools of limpid twilight?
Heavens, is it Wednesday today?
Oh, did you know each-
Miss, uh- Miss-
- Cable for you, sir.
- Oh, thank you. Most timely.
[Clears Throat]
Well, I'll tell you what I'll do.
I'll take you both out to tea and I'll tell you all sorts of classic things... that I thought up in the air, all right?
Yes. Excuse me, darling- darlings.
Christopher, what is it?
I'm sorry.
I've got to go.
Hello.
- You again, Lynn.
- [Chuckles]
Look here, you dumbbell,
I might have shot you.
Oh, how divine to be killed at such loved hands.
The faithful attaché decoding messages of an empire on which the sun never sets.
- What does that say?
- Sorry.
Why, you know, those messages might shake the world.
Oh, it's so romantic.
It's about as romantic as reading the last census reports.
My, how you shatter my illusions.
And one illusion was that... you might have thought enough of me to come down to that tea fight.
- Good heavens, is it as late as that?
- Mm-hmm.
- I am sorry, Lynn.
- Well, you ought to be.
- We'd better go down now.
- No, you don't. I'm taking you out tonight.
- Those are orders from your boss.
- I'm sorry, Lynn. More work tonight.
Oh, no. You're not gonna work any more tonight. We're going out.
We're going slumming, dancing. We're gonna drink champagne and listen to Negro orchestras.
Ah, that's good medicine for your correct English soul, my son.
Woman's oldest instinct, eh?
Want to make me over?
Ah, and how you need it.
Come on. Let's go.
Look, I'll join you in the hall in, uh, two minutes. I must finish this work.
Well, I'll tell you what.
I'll stay and help you... and then you can finish it that much quicker, huh?
- Come on.
- Help me? No, this is one thing, Lynn...
- that you cannot interfere in.
- Oh, I see.
- Secrets of the empire, huh?
- Yes.
All right, but don't you keep me waiting.
- I won't. Two minutes.
- Two minutes.
- Oh, what's that?
- A cablegram for you, sir. Personal.
Thank you.
- That'll be all, Benson.
- Yes, sir.
[Birds Chirping]
- ## [Piano]
- Gad, what a homecoming.
A lifetime of distinguished service, and chucked out like this.
Never did a dishonorable thing in his life.
Must you do that?
- I've gotta do something.
- ## [Continues]
The trouble is, I've read the proceedings of the trial... and I don't see how they could have reached any other verdict.
What's that? Do you mean to say you actually believe the governor guilty?
- Don't be an ass.
- Now look here, Nosey, l-
Rod. I've known Dad a good many
more years than you have.
What do you think I believe?
Well, what are you all being so solemn about? It's like a funeral.
What I'd like to do is find out who's behind all this and wring his blasted neck.
Oh, chuck the heroics, kid. We all know there's something funny about this.
Quite. That's why the old man asked us to meet him here.
Now look here. We've all got to appear as though nothing had happened... as though this is a perfectly natural homecoming.
Do you remember how he used to come home on leave?
Full of beans, all sorts of plans?
- Mmm.
- Yes. You know how he'll take this, don't you?
You bet.
Head up and smiling.
- [Car Horn Honking]
- Here he comes.
Yes, that sounds like the governor.
Manders! Manders, the colonel's here.
The colonel? Oh!
Hello, Manders.
Back again, huh?
- Welcome home, sir.
- Thank you.
- Your case, sir?
- No, I'll keep that myself.
A bit of weather, sir.
A trifle cold perhaps.
- A trifle damp too, Manders, huh?
- Oh, yes, sir.
- Mr. Wyatt and the others are in the library, sir.
- Right.
Hello, boys.
Good of you to come.
- How are you, governor?
- Hello, Father.
- Hello, lads.
- Welcome home, Dad.
[Chuckles]
Let's have a look at you.
Squad! 'Shun!
Number!
- Beano, sir.
- Boson, sir.
- Nosey, sir.
- Rodney, sir.
Huh? I didn't quite get that last one.
Oh, all right then.
Snicklefritz.
- But I think it's a rotten name, sir.
- Well, you chose it yourself.
Remember? You were going to be a magician.
- Snicklefritz the Great.
- [All Chuckling]
Unlucky day for me, sir.
Dismissed!
Beano, what happened to the big oak by the gate?
Why, I had to have it cut down, sir.
It died.
Pity.
One hates to see staunch old friends go down.
Glad to see you're looking so fit, governor.
Hmm. You're taking it well, boys.
- I knew you would.
- There's nothing to take, sir.
- We knew there was something sticky about it.
- There was.
We all read the evidence.
What about that batman of yours- Mulcahay?
I'd as soon distrust one of you.
And Captain Loveland?
- So far as I know, an officer doing his duty.
- Drake, sir?
One of the best. He got special leave
to come home and help me.
- You're going to fight, of course.
- Naturally.
- Good.
- We knew you wouldn't take this lying down, sir.
And neither will we.
We're in this with you, if we can help.
You bet we are. We've always stuck together- all of us- through fire, flood and famine.
Famine, Snicklefritz?
When was that?
Well, the time that Nosey and I got lost in the woods and missed supper.
[All Laugh]
Sit down, sir.
You must be feeling tired.
I am a bit tired.
The nights on the boat were the worst... when I knew how all you fellows must be feeling.
Well, l- I think we'll all have a spot.
That's a sound idea.
Now, have you any idea-
Oh. Uh, have you any idea, sir, of the motive behind all this?
I have.
A very definite idea.
It was the work of a munitions syndicate.
- [Whistles]
- The tribe that revolted had
the very latest in modern guns.
Do you mean to say, sir, that someone sold guns to the natives... and then created an opportunity for the guns to be used?
I do. It all fits in.
Oh, that's- that's absolutely fictional.
Have you any proof?
I have.
It wasn't easy to collect.
After the court-martial, everybody seemed to disappear.
- Disappear?
- Well, scatter.
General Bryce was transferred to Egypt.
Captain Loveland inherited a fortune and retired to Buenos Aires.
- And the barman had already done a bunk.
- Yes.
- Why, that's extraordinary.
- Ah.
Just to see whether you really can take it, sir.
I can... if it isn't drugged.
[Chuckles]
Well, sir, here's confusion to your enemies and to ours.
And to your mother, boys.
I'm glad she's not here today.
Well, I've got an hour's work to do... so clear out for a bit, will you?
- See you at dinner, sir.
- At dinner, Father.
- See you at dinner, governor.
- See you at dinner, Dad.
After dinner I'll lay the case before you
and ask your advice.
Four brains are better than one.
- Yes, sir.
- Four brains? What about me?
Oh, have you found one?
Good. I hadn't heard.
[All Laugh]
Nosey, I'll have you for that!
Oh, Manders, will you see if the colonel is ready for us?
- Very good, sir.
- It's good port, this.
- I don't imagine you get very good port in America.
- Oh, yes, you do.
- How do you get it?
- Well, they send it over in boats.
- Oh.
- Oh, boats.
Nosey, are you growing a mustache?
I beg your pardon.
It's grown.
It jolly well isn't.
Geoff, do you realize that while you've been away... you've picked up the most appalling American accent?
Have I? Do you know, in the States nearly everybody takes me for a Yankee.
Yes, I can well understand that.
Oh, yeah. Yeah.
Let me hear you say "Okay, toots."
- Tell my sons I'm ready for them, Manders.
- Very good, sir.
[Rattling]
Who's that?
Your father is ready, Mr. Wyatt.
Oh, thanks.
Now for the story.
Come on, you chaps.
- [Gunshot]
- What was that?
It sounded like a gun.
- It's locked.
- Father!
- Father!
- Father!
Try this again.
Oh, Dad! Dad!
Oh, governor.
He's killed himself.
The disgrace.
- Manders.
- That isn't true. L- I won't believe it.
Beano, look.
The dispatch case!
- It's empty.
- [Wyatt] His papers are gone.
- Dad's evidence.
- Look, the window!
Somebody came through this way, all right.
This is murder.
What's the plan, Beano?
You're head of the family now.
Well, we've got four names to work on.
There's Drake, Mulcahay, that barman and Loveland.
These men must be found and talked to.
- Right.
- I shall go to India and start with Mulcahay.
- Drake's coming here.
Boson, you'd better wait for him.
- Right.
Loveland's in Buenos Aires.
- Nosey, that's your job.
- Good.
- Well, what about me? I'm in on this.
- You're going back to Oxford.
- Oh, no.
- You'll do as you're told.
But that isn't fair. This-This is a family cause.
It- It's Dad's and ours.
Well, Boson, you understand.
This is my cause too.
- He's right, Beano.
- Yeah, let him go.
- All right, Rodney goes with me.
- Thanks, Beano.
But this isn't going to be any tea party.
If Dad's evidence was so important that they had to murder him... we'll be running the same risk.
- Let it come.
- And the sooner the better.
Here's to you, Mother.
And to you, Dad.
[Together]
Mother, Dad.
Hello.
[Sighs]
Doesn't the diplomatic corps even allow you to look surprised?
- I'm not.
- You're not?
You're the world's champion popper-upper.
It amounts to genius.
Your butler thought I was working my way through college and wouldn't let me in.
- Sensible fellow.
- [Laughs]
What's the matter with your feet?
You're not starting a nudist pose?
No. Feet hurt and there wasn't a taxi... and I had to walk all the way from that adorable little place called SaintJohn-Cum-Leigh.
- [With Correct Pronunciation]
SaintJohn-Cum-Leigh.
- Yeah, and the man said that-
- Why?
- Hmm?
- "Sinjin Comely"?
- Well, that's the way it always has been.
Oh. [Chuckles] Well, however, the man said it would only be just a step.
I suppose that's the well-known
English sense of humor, huh?
- The village has never seen a taxi.
- Oh, really?
Well, now that you're here, shall I carry you across the threshold like a bride?
Oh, Geoff, I'd love it.
Oh, Lynn, l- I think you-
I think you'd better walk.
[Chuckles]
Scaredy-cat.
You're never going to get anyplace if you're always going to be a-
- You see, I got in, Meadows.
- Manders.
- I beg your pardon.
- I say, that's pretty close. How did you know?
- Oh, Meadows, Manders.
- That's all right. American, you know.
- Oh, yes.
- Tea in the library.
- Very good, sir. Madam, may I have your wrap?
- It's a dress.
- Oh, yes.
- Ah, Geoff, it's lovely.
Oh, it looks just like the tap room...
- at the Statler Hotel in Buffalo.
- Thanks.
Well, you needn't be so snooty about it.
It's a very nice tap room.
Oh, and so is this.
Ah, fire. It's cozy.
I love fires.
Well, it's nice to see you, Lynn, but what are you doing here?
I came to find out why you stood me up that night in Washington and then disappeared.
No, thank you.
The embassy wouldn't tell me a thing... and so I started on a world tour looking for you.
I happened to land in England first and heard you were here, so I came.
Do I hear an apology for that stand-up?
Geoff, what is it?
It's in all the papers, Lynn.
Two seconds after you left me that night...
I had a cablegram saying that my father had been court-martialed and broken in India.
He asked me to meet him here.
Oh. Was that- that
English colonel your father?
Yes.
Oh.
And I came barging in here like a-
Oh, Geoff, I'm sorry.
Forgive me.
Oh, it's all right, Lynn.
L- I realized you didn't know.
Of course, l- I read all about it in the paper, but I never dreamed-
London is calling, sir.
Captain Drake.
Oh, thanks.
Excuse me, Lynn.
Good afternoon, Captain Drake.
This is Geoffrey Leigh.
We've been waiting to hear from you, sir.
I'm so glad you got here.
I've seen the papers about your father's death, Leigh. Do you think it was suicide?
No, we don't.
We think it was murder.
So do I. I'm coming out to see you immediately.
No, don't send a car to the station for me. I'll manage.
We must be very careful.
I've been followed ever since I landed.
Good-bye.
[Train Whistle Blows]
That was a friend of the governor's.
He's just come to help him clear himself.
- But your father was killed. Why?
- I know.
That's what we've got to find out, if it takes the rest of our lives.
We've got four names to work on.
There's Trooper Mulcahay and a barman in India.
- Mm-hmm.
- There's Douglas Loveland-
- Douglas Loveland?
- A retired army officer now living in Buenos Aires.
- And Captain Drake.
- Geoffrey, I, uh-
Now be a good kid, will you? I've got loads of work to do before Captain Drake arrives.
There's a train leaving
SaintJohn-Cum-Leigh at 3:18.
I'll have them take you down there in the car.
Must I go now? I could be a lot of help to you.
It'll be sweet of you and you're a charming girl and I'm delighted to see you... but I don't need any help and I really am busy.
I have something to tell you that's very important-
Tea- I haven't had mine yet.
Manders, will you have Dover take this young lady down to the station in my car?
- Very good, sir.
- Okay. Take these things.
- Sorry, miss, but we haven't any chewing gum.
- That's quite all right. L-
- Hurry up. We're late.
- Geoffrey, what I had to tell you was really very important.
Well, I'll tell you what.
I'll be in town tomorrow. Tell me at lunch.
- At lunch tomorrow?
- Uh-huh.
- All right. I'm staying at the Savoy.
- Savoy, grill room, 1:00.
- All right. And, Geoffrey-
- Mm-hmm?
Don't disappoint me.
I won't.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye.
Where can I find a taxi?
Well, that's where you have me, sir.
- [Train Whistle Blows]
- Taxicab, sir?
Why, there's one now.
- Here. Leigh Hall, please.
- Yes, sir.
[Car Door Closes]
- Well, where'd that come from?
- [Engine Starts]
A taxi here?
- Manders.
- [Manders] Yes, sir.
Have dinner served as soon as Captain Drake turns up, will you?
Very good, sir.
- [Car Approaching]
- A car is coming now, sir.
Oh, good.
The car is there, sir, but, uh, there's something strange.
- No driver.
- No.
"Captain Drake."
Well! You're looking very well this morning, my friend.
Do you suppose he'll notice?
No, I guess you're right.
He probably won't.
Well, you can't blame a girl for trying anyway, can you?
It's just come.
Probably bad news.
Something wrong?
Decidedly wrong.
I'm stood up again.
You know, Piper, people are gonna decide one of three things about me.
Hello. Give me the travel desk, please.
Either that I'm a brazen hussy,
or I'm just a plain squaw... who has to tag along after her man no matter where he goes.
Even if he isn't her man yet.
Or that I'm unselfish enough to want to help a friend who's in a lot of trouble.
Perhaps the correct answer is I'm all three of those things, huh?
Say, Piper, what are you doing?
Packing for Buenos Aires.
- Buenos Aires?
- Isn't that our next stop?
- Yes. Yeah, but how did you know?
- I'm psychic.
Hello. Is this the travel desk?
Can you tell me please... what boat left for Buenos Aires this morning and when will it arrive there?
And can I beat that boat by sailing for New York immediately and then flying south?
And if so, by how many days can I beat it?
No, no, no. Call me back, will you please?
Yeah, thanks.
[Speaking Arabic]
Now look here, Mulcahay, there's something I want to ask you.
Did you know the barman that mixed that drink for my father at the club?
I did.
But there's a brown colleen here by the name of Ah-Ah-Nee.
Ah-Nee?
They say she knows him better.
The barman? Does this girl
Ah-Nee know where he went?
She did spit it out once in the state of her wrath.
'Twas in, uh, America.
- South America, I think.
- South America? Did she say what part of South America?
Now, she did so.
I'm just remembering.
Let's see now.
I have a- I have a sister... in, uh- in Cincinnati, in Ohio, married to a plumber.
Yes, a nice girl. No, it wasn't there.
It was an island, I think.
Get away!
English dog! You pushed me!
[Spits]
English dog?
English, to me! Eng-
- Oh, Barney!
- Yo!
- Feeney!
- Yo!
- [Shouts, Indistinct]
- [Man] Yo!
## [Piano]
Cock-a-doodle-doo!
#[Continues]
Cock-a-doodle-doo!
[All Shouting]
#[Continues]
Be with you in a minute, boys.
Gentlemen, I give you-
- Mulcahay, you're hurt!
- Ah, 'tis nothing. Nothing.
- Look, it's the police!
- Upstairs. Upstairs.
Come on.
- Boson!
- [Geoffrey] Nosey!
Oh, I am glad to see you.
Any news of Beano and Rodney?
Yes, a wire. They've struck the scene and the kid's been in a fight.
- Oh, trust Snicklefritz for that.
- What about you?
I'm with Loveland. And this calls for a drink.
Two B and B's, please.
I have met the most attractive-
The most beautiful, the most wonderful girl.
No, seriously, this time I've struck 10.
I think I'll marry her.
- [Chuckling]
- How do you do?
- What about the others?
- Well, it is hard on Joan... and I did have a kind of understanding with Betty, but...
- I think I'll keep this one.
- [Chuckling]
Now, Chris, we're out here on serious business.
We've got to clear our father's name.
Hold your hat on, Boson.
Everything's under control.
This girl introduced me to the whole bunch... and you're going to meet them all in a minute.
- And there's something going on, my boy.
- What?
Excuse us, please.
- Well, what's going on?
- Well, I don't know yet, but here's the picture.
Furnoy-American, rich, with a yacht, but not cruising about just for pleasure.
I'll stake my life on that. Then there's a General Torres who simply reeks of conspiracy.
And Loveland-very thick with them all and suddenly rolling in money.
- Looks like something pretty hot to me.
- Well, let's get on with it.
Wait a minute. Your name's Gordon.
Uh, Herkimer Gordon.
Her- Herkimer?
Why not Hezekiah?
Well, I'm sorry if you prefer it like that, but you're already heavily billed as Herkimer.
Captain Loveland, may I introduce my brother,
Herkimer? He's just landed from England.
- How do you do?
- It's a pleasure, Mr. Gordon. Won't you join us?
- Delighted.
- Thank you very much.
- General Torres.
- [Geoffrey] How do you do?
- Senora Aguilard.
- How do you do?
- Mr. Furnoy.
- How do you do, Mr. Gordon?
And Miss Cherrington.
How do you do, Mr. Gordon?
Uh, won't you sit down?
How do you do, Miss Cherrington?
- What is your politics?
- Oh, yes. Of course.
- What?
- Hmm?
- [Laughing]
- #[Orchestra Begins]
I, uh- I'd like to dance.
You understand, don't you?
[Chuckles]
[Laughing]
Geoffrey!
Well, then score one for me.
For once you did look surprised.
How in the world did you get here?
- By plane from New York.
- Why?
Why not? After all, I'm the traveling kid.
Remember me?
And besides, I adore intrigue.
Give me a couple of aliases and a plate of fudge, and I'm happy.
Well, I might have known you'd be here.
Well, you'll change your tune when you find out how much help I can be.
You see, I know Douglas Loveland.
That's what I was trying to tell you that day at..."Sinjin Comely."
Now, Lynn, I'm delighted to see you, and I know your intentions are excellent...
- but please keep out of this.
- Why-
Why, you ungrateful pup.
- I know, little Miss Fix-it.
- Mm-hmm.
You were going to fix a speeding ticket for me in Washington.
- It took the whole embassy to get me out of the, uh-
- Jug.
Well, in that case, I don't suppose you'd care to go up the river... on a little yachting trip tomorrow with Furnoy,
General Torres and Loveland.
- But I would.
- Well, of course, I could fix it for you, Geoffrey... but if you think
I'm such a nuisance-
Look here, Lynn, we must go with them.
- Well, are you grateful?
- Rather.
Say it properly then.
Geoffrey, Boson, Herkimer,
Herky, listen.
Loveland's going up the river on a yacht and-
- Were you two kissing then?
- No.
[Man Chanting In Arabic]
Here we have the village belles.
[Chanting Continues]
I don't like to have Rodney running about alone in the native quarter.
I wouldn't trouble about him.
- I'm sure he can box better than I can myself.
- [Gunshot]
- [Rodney] Stop that, you fool!
- Rodney!
Rodney, what's up?
This is the barman's girl- the barman at the club, you know.
She was just showing me how she'd like to welcome home her erring knight...
when the popgun went off.
- Give me a look at the cannon.
- I wish you wouldn't go barging off all alone like this.
We've got serious work to do.
Good afternoon.
I know that as well as you do.
Oh, don't flutter like an old hen, Beano.
- I can dig my own worms.
And make a note of that too.
- Look here, sir.
'Tis the same lethal weapon was in the hands of the natives that revolted against us. Look, sir.
The maker's name chiseled off and all.
That's splendid.
Now, can you tell me where you got that?
One day I steal from him.
He drunk.
Bad to Ah-Nee when he drunk.
[Wyatt] Where did your friend live
before he came here?
I do not understand.
'Tis strange, sir, how a little silver increases the understanding.
Oh, yes, of course. Here.
Perhaps this'll help clear the old bean.
He say Murros Island.
- Murros Island?
- In South America.
- We've got it, Beano.
- We'd better keep the gun for evidence.
Yes. Here, Ah-Nee.
Take this, but don't spend it all in one place.
Calcutta?
- Calcutta? I have ticket.
- Ready.
Mr. Wyatt Leigh calling Mr. Herkimer Gordon,
Hotel Royal, Buenos Aires.
This is Calcutta Central 0021.
Buenos Aires?
I have a ticket.
[Speaking Spanish]
Murros Island?
Where's that?
That's right. That's right.
Murros Island.
- M-U-R-R-
- Oh, shut up.
No, no, no. Young Rod.
Somewhere off the coast of South America.
Yes. South America.
Right. Are you sure about the gun? The gun.
Certain.
Mulcahay says it's identical with those used in the revolt.
Revolt.
Even to the maker's name being chiseled off.
Good.
Then we're getting warm.
We're getting warm.
We think we're on a trail here too.
A trail here too.
Keep up the good work, Beano, and take care of the kid.
Hello, Geoff.
Did you hear about the cricket final?
Thirty-eight pounds 10.
[Ship Horn Blowing]
Oh, look, Douglas, we're slowing down.
- Are we stopping?
- Mm-hmm.
- Oh.
- Squalid little place, but quite important for military reasons.
Controls the up-country.
Oh. Are we on a military expedition?
I didn't mean to suggest that.
Oh, Douglas, you don't have to be cautious with me.
You know that.
And after all, we, uh- we are on a military expedition, aren't we?
- Nice little hand.
- [Chuckles]
Nosey, we're slowing down.
I think we must be coming to-
Lynn is getting altogether too thick with that fellow Loveland.
- Oh, is she? L- I hadn't noticed.
- Take a good look.
You know, Douglas, you're such a natural as a soldier.
You must have had awfully good reasons for giving up the service.
- I did.
- Oh.
[With Squeaky Voice]
Hello.
- [Squeaky Voice] Hello.
- Hello.
Hello. Did you gentlemen order a bottle of scotch?
Aye. Aye.
Aye, that we did.
- Good-bye.
- Bye.
- Good-bye.
- Bye.
- Good-bye.
- [Squeaking]
[Normal Voice]
My good friend, Donald Mouse.
Fine type.
- You know, you are a good sort.
- [Chuckles]
- Mr. Furnoy is asking for you, sir.
- Oh, thank you.
Oh, Douglas, you're coming right back to me now, aren't you?
- Yes, of course I will.
- Oh, hurry now.
- Well, Lynn, I must say, you're marvelous.
- Really? Why?
Got Loveland all in a lather, haven't you?
- Well, that was the idea.
- Well, I don't like it.
- Oh, really? Why, Geoff?
- Because I asked you to keep out of this.
This is a serious mission.
Oh, I appreciate your interest and all that.
It was very kind of you.
You got us invited on this trip.
But for the rest, I wish
you'd let us go it alone.
Oh. So that's how it is with us, huh?
Yes, that's the way it is with us.
And besides, Loveland's no friend of ours.
He's in the enemy camp.
Now, just a moment.
- Am I, by any chance, being called a traitor?
- Oh, I didn't say that.
Well, you implied it. And you might just as well have said it as to imply it.
- You know, really, Geoffrey, you're awfully stupid.
- Oh, so I'm stupid, am I?
- Yes, you certainly are.
- Well, how do you explain your snuggling up to him?
- Was that part of your act too?
- Explain to you? I'd rather eat ground glass first.
I have my own reasons
for what I do and-
[Both Arguing, Indistinct]
I don't stand and deliver to anybody! Do you understand?
All the same, you did everything but kiss him.
I don't see why you stopped at that.
Well, supposing I did?
Now listen to me, young man.
Nobody tells me what I can't do or where I can't go.
And as far as I'm concerned, Mr. Geoffrey Leigh, you can go jump in the lake- river!
Oh, I'll admit that wasn't very good... but the next time I see you, and I hope I never do...
I'll have thought up something better!
[Sobbing]
[Bell Ringing]
- [Chime Ringing]
- If they have discovered the guns, I am ruined.
- Oh? What's up?
- Well, he has a message that suggests a leak.
I paid you dearly for those guns, senores.
One million gold pesos, the gift of poor people, the word-
You'll find them all there.
The last stuff was delivered yesterday.
If there should be treachery-
It will be from your men.
I can trust mine.
So General Torres has an interest in this little place, huh?
Well, why is Mr. Furnoy going with him?
Oh, take a look at the town, I expect.
Oh, really?
Oh, I think I'd like to do that, Douglas.
- Let's go.
- No, no, really.
- Furnoy doesn't want anyone else to go ashore.
- Well, why?
- Well, these little places can be dangerous.
- Oh.
- Bandits, you know.
- Bandits! Oh, how exciting!
- Now I know I want to go. Come on, Douglas.
- No, really. L-
- You know, I've got to obey.
- Obey?
- Yeah.
- Well, whom?
Well, I mean- I mean, you can't.
No, I must forbid it.
Forbid? Oh, Douglas, that was your biggest mistake.
Stand aside.
I'm on my way.
- Torres.
- Hmm?
I don't like the feel of this place.
It's- It's suspiciously quiet.
- Senor, it is I who give the command here.
- [Chuckles]
All right. Go ahead and give the command.
I'm going back to the yacht.
- You're afraid to go to the warehouse?
- Oh, no. Let fools be heroes.
It's their business.
Mine is selling arms.
You go to the warehouse.
Take a good look around.
You'll find everything in order.
[Scoffs]
Oh, that's lovely.
Oh, I like that.
Douglas, buy me that, huh?
There's General Torres.
Oh, I'll bet where the general is, there's excitement.
Come on, Douglas.
Let's go.
- Willful little thing, aren't you?
- [Chuckles]
Furnoy will give us beans for this, but I can't let you go alone.
No, no. I'll say you couldn't.
Come on.
- Atenciön!
- [All Shouting In Spanish]
[Shouting Continues]
[Both Speaking Spanish]
[Spanish]
[Spanish]
[Spanish]
[Laughing]
[Spanish]
[Banging On Door]
- Senor, you have no right-
- It's quite all right, General.
Miss Cherrington is a friend.
Oh.
Forgive me, senorita.
I did not know you were a friend.
Behold my so beautiful stores.
With these, I shall liberate
my unfortunate people.
They shall be happy
once more in liberty.
Please come.
Please, senorita, let me give you a little of this old, old-
Do I see you again, amigo?
A charming moment, my friend.
Oh, delightful, mi general.
It is a pleasure to introduce my friends.
Senorita Cherrington of New York...
Capitán Loveland of London... my distinguished compatriot...
General Adolfo Arturios
Gregario Sebastian.
Ah, senorita.
- What a moment I have.
- Thank you.
Capitán.
- I extend my most gracious welcome to our small city.
- [Lynn Chuckles]
There will be a little celebration tonight... in honor of our dear friend,
General Torres.
If the so beautiful senorita and capitán
will honor us.
Oh, I'd love to.
Do you think we can, Douglas?
- Well, I'm not quite sure, Lynn.
- I shall hope.
And now, with your pardon, I have important business with our friend, General Torres.
If you will be so good, my friend.
Oh, with pleasure, amigo.
- Forgive me for a moment.
- Of course.
Good-bye.
General.
- [Engines Rewing]
- Oh, I think he's charming.
- We'd better get out of here.
- Why?
- I don't like it.
- Oh, Douglas, don't be silly. It may be interesting.
- Besides, I want to stay and see the fun.
- Fun?
Uh-huh.
Well, you would come ashore.
[Rewing Continues]
- Gracias.
- [Engines Stop]
Shall we drink, my friend, to liberty?
With all my heart.
To liberty.
Forgive me, my friend, but you know I do not smoke.
- But, my friend, people are watching.
- Oh.
You are very thoughtful.
Gracias.
[Coughs]
No.
- Magnificent, my friend.
- Gracias.
Douglas, they're not going to-
[Man Gives Command In Spanish]
[Gunfire]
[Screams]
[Shouting In Spanish]
- [Women Screaming]
- [All Shouting]
[Shouting Continues]
[Shouting In Spanish]
[Spanish]
[Spanish]
- [Guns Clicking]
- [All Shouting]
[Shouting Continues]
[Laughs]
[Shouting In Spanish]
[All Laughing]
[Shouting Continues]
[Screams]
[Indistinct]
[Gunfire Continues]
[Gunfire Continues]
[Screams]
- Come on, Nosey.
- [Whistle Blowing]
[Gunfire In Distance]
[All Shouting]
[Gasps]
[Man Shouting In Spanish]
Oh, Douglas, poor Torres.
And those half-starved little people, mowed down like that without a chance.
- And women and kids too, Douglas!
- That's war, you know.
- It isn't war. It's a massacre.
- [Gunfire]
- It's all a surprise to me.
- [Woman Screams]
It's the men who sell them ammunition and encourage such things who ought to be shot...
- not those poor little devils!
- Lynn!
- Lynn!
- Geoffrey! Oh, Geoffrey!
- Are you all right?
- Yes, I'm all right.
- Say, help me out of this, will you, mister?
- [Speaking Spanish]
Come along, Lynn.
We'd better get back to the boat.
Say, guvnor, you remember me...
- from Murros Island?
- I never saw you before in my life.
Why, I been looking at your blinking face every day for a week.
They're going to shoot me, guvnor.
Help me, lady, will you?
Help me.
They're gonna shoot me.
- Douglas, you can't let them do that.
- It isn't wise to interfere.
[Shouting In Spanish]
Say, look here!
[Spanish]
[Spanish]
Geoffrey! Geoffrey!
Oh, of all the stupid, asinine things to do!
Don't worry, Lynn. He's got a plan.
He's getting information.
Information? Why, they'll stand him up against a wall and shoot him. Geoffrey!
They won't do that to him.
He's a British subject. He's been to Washington.
Now you listen to me, Chris.
You haven't seen what I have tonight.
They'll kill anybody in this town- anybody!
[Speaking Spanish]
[Gunfire In Distance]
[Speaking Spanish]
[Spanish]
You were employed by these munitions people. Is that right?
That's right. Say, mister, the firing squad'll be here any minute... and they don't bother about court-martials in this town.
My friends are at work.
They'll get us out.
Well, I hopes they look lively.
They'd as soon shoot you as look at you. Uh, sooner.
- What about Murros Island?
- That's where they keep the stuff, guvnor.
And they've got enough stuff there to blow up the whole world if you ask me.
- And you delivered the guns here to Torres and his rebels?
- [Gunfire In Distance]
Yes, sir.
And to the government too.
Atlas Arms was shooting on both sides in this little dust-up.
- Atlas Arms?
- [Gunfire]
What was that?
[Speaking Spanish]
[Gunfire]
- We'll be next, guvnor.
- Don't get a wind up, old chap.
My friends will manage somehow.
Well, they'd better shake a leg if they want to meet us this side of heaven.
I'm afraid you're right.
- [Gunfire]
- Look.
- [Spanish]
- They're coming for us now!
- Geoff!
- Lynn!
- Oh, Geoff, I was so worried.
- Oh, Lynn.
L- I've got a release order for you.
Douglas Loveland got it.
Let's get out of here.
[Speaking Spanish]
[Spanish]
- [Gunshots]
- [Man Screams]
[Spanish]
- Thank you, lady.
- Yeah.
Oh, Geoffrey, I'm so glad you're all right.
Lynn, darling, I'm sorry about those suspicions.
They were just plain jealousy.
- Geoff!
- And, darling, apart from the fact... that I'd like to box your ears...
- I'm afraid I'm hopelessly in love with you.
- Oh, Geoff, Geoff.
[Vehicles Approaching]
Darling!
[Backfires]
[Gunfire In Distance]
Look, I'm not a fussy man, but I thought you didn't like him.
Well, l-
I'm not quite sure that I do.
You see, Nosey... uh, Lynn and l-
Well, l- Look here.
It's an old story.
I mean, l- Well-
You mean you and Lynn are-
Uh, yes.
[Laughs]
- Then you don't love me?
- Oh, yes, Chris. I do love you.
Only Geoff saw me first.
It took a firing squad to make me realize it.
Oh, you'll be all right, Chris.
Remember, there's Joan and Elizabeth... and that little telephone operator in the Buenos Aires hotel.
Bernice and Penelope. There are thousands of beautiful creatures all panting for me...
- but I don't think I'll find one quite like you, Lynn.
- Thanks.
[Sighs]
Good luck, old man.
Oh, what about that cockney?
Listen. Marvelous, Nosey. It's a concern called Atlas Arms behind the whole thing...
- and their distributing point is Murros Island.
- Murros Island?
Hey! Don't mind me!
Murros Island!
Then the whole thing links up.
I think I've got the evidence to prove it.
Do you remember Beano said...
- the maker's name was chiseled off that gun?
- Yes.
This one I got off a dead soldier and the name's gone off that too.
- Oh! Even I get that.
That means Atlas Arms in both places.
- And Loveland in both places.
I think we've got the last nail in that chap's coffin.
Where is he?
He's in the street. He's getting rather nervous.
Let's go and get him.
[Gasps]
We'd better get aboard. Furnoy is extremely annoyed over the disturbance you've made.
Listen, Loveland, I don't usually go about hitting people on the chin... but this time I have a reason that might interest you.
Let's go inside and have a beer and talk it over.
No, we can't keep Furnoy waiting.
Oh, please, Douglas.
L-I'm thirsty.
Well, if it ain't my old pal from Murros Island!
- Get away, blast you!
- Oh, now how can I be in your way... when I'm invisible?
- What you can't see can't hinder.
- You come with me.
- You'd better come.
- Entertain the lady, will ya, mate?
Sit down.
[Sighs]
This is all very mock heroic, gentlemen.
May I ask the point?
Well, the first point is this-
Our name's not Gordon. It's Leigh.
Interesting as fact, but hardly significant.
You'll find it significant.
Our father's name was Colonel Loring Leigh.
You knew him, I believe.
Very well.
He was my commanding officer in India.
Quite, and you were a witness at his trial.
Reluctantly, I admit.
All the same, he was convicted on your perjured evidence.
- I'm not gonna stay here and be insulted.
- Speaking of mock heroics.
Sit down.
Is there anything familiar about that gun?
- No.
- Well, the barman in India left one behind... exactly like it when he skipped.
It wasn't clever of you, Loveland, to let that cockney down.
He told me the whole story in jail while you, no doubt, were hoping we'd both be shot.
I confess it would've saved me this rather boring interview.
Don't smile like that.
It annoys me.
You're gonna tell us now exactly what happened in India.
- And if I don't?
- Why, then, Loveland...
I promise you, on my word of honor, that I'll shoot you right now.
Just a stray bullet from the revolution.
I forged the order.
That's all.
- Go on.
- There isn't any more.
- I didn't kill you father.
- Then you do know that he was killed!
Well, we want the name of the man who killed him.
I'm probably signing my own death warrant.
[Chuckles]
- But since you insist, it was-
- [Gunshots]
Geoffrey! Geoffrey, what happened?
- A shot came from that window.
- But why?
The thing to do now is get out of here immediately.
[All Shouting]
[Horn Blowing]
[Furnoy]
Yes, poor fellow.
Very evidently a stray bullet from the revolution
finished him off. Come in.
Yes. Oh, you'll make
all the arrangements, eh?
Good. Well, I'm pulling out of here at once.
L- I don't want to risk my other guests.
I've just been talking over the wireless telephone to the British consul.
He's making all the arrangements about poor Loveland.
Peculiar chap, in some ways, Loveland... but always a delightful guest.
- Won't you sit down and have a drink?
- No, thanks.
We want to talk to you, Furnoy.
- First of all, you ought to know who we are.
- Oh, that's not necessary.
I do a lot of business through the British embassy in Washington.
In that case, you must've heard of our father, Colonel Loring Leigh.
Yes, I think I have.
Read something of him recently.
We came here to have a showdown with Loveland.
He was the chief witness against our father in India.
And tonight we got the evidence we wanted.
He confessed that he had been bribed to forge the order... on which our father was court-martialed and convicted.
Bribed? Who bribed him?
A munitions concern called Atlas Arms.
Atlas Arms?
Never heard of them.
Won't you boys sit down and have-
And Loveland wasn't killed by a stray bullet.
He was murdered.
Well, great scott, this all seems very mysterious.
It is. Loveland was just about to disclose the name of the official of Atlas Arms... who killed our father, when the shot was fired.
- Obviously, someone did not want us to hear that name.
- Certainly looks that way.
Furnoy, we were wondering if it could be anybody on this boat.
It seems to us that Loveland constantly took orders from you.
By the Lord Harry,
I believe you chaps think I'm in this.
[Laughs]
Why don't you take that gun out of your pocket?
You know, I've been accused of a lot of things in my time, but never murder.
You chaps are so serious.
I'll tell you what I'll do.
You can look me up in Bradstreet's.
[Chuckles]
Well, wait.
You've been in America.
- Have you never heard of Standard Rubber?
- I'm afraid not.
Oh! Well, that's me.
[Laughs] Of course, I don't pay much attention to it nowadays.
But while I was developing it, I was forced to travel a great deal, looking for rubber.
It gave me a sort of a passion for knocking about the world with adventure and excitement.
You know, knocking about the world in odd places and collecting curious people.
I knew a chap called
Traud Shaw once-
Now take, for instance, Loveland and Torres.
I looked them up too.
Loveland, I found, was an army officer who'd retired with a bit of money.
And Torres-
Well, Torres was obviously an old bandit.
Turned revolutionary and all that sort of thing.
[Laughs]
As a matter of fact,
Torres suggested this cruise.
And I thought it would be fun.
Now with Loveland gone-
[Sighs]
What I'm really interested in- uh, pardon me- is this.
- Ooh.
- Softer hands...
- for housewives.
- That's good.
As well as bigger and better teeth for dogs... and babies.
So you see, if you're trying to tie me up with your late friend...
- well, you're barking up the wrong tree.
- [Squeaking]
[Laughs]
Now if you boys will pardon me...
I think I'll turn in, and I think you should too.
- Uh, may I keep this one?
- Yes, if you like.
- And that too.
- Oh, thank you.
- Oh, look-
- Good night.
We didn't do that very well, did we?
You blasted idiot!
[Squeaks]
Which one of those mugs is in love with Lynn Cherrington?
Both, I should say.
Oh, good.
Ask Miss Cherrington to step in, will you?
[Horn Blowing]
- Good evening.
- Good evening, Miss Cherrington.
I hope you're feeling better.
- Thank you. I am.
- Sorry you got in all this mess.
- Well-
- Won't you sit down?
Thank you. After all, it was my first revolution, and I don't care to see another, thanks.
Well, you know, men will fight.
- Yeah.
- War is a pretty old institution.
Pretty horrible one too, isn't it?
Yes, it's terrible about Loveland.
Oh, I managed to get your father on the wireless telephone.
Finally located him in Alexandria, in Egypt.
Really? I thought he was in- in London.
No. I felt that he'd, naturally, want to know what was going on here.
Particularly about Loveland.
My father? But why?
Well, as president of the Atlas Arms, he'd naturally feel concerned.
President of Atlas Arms?
Yeah. Oh.
L- I thought you knew.
Why, uh-Why, no.
I didn't know. L-
Uh, I wonder if I may have a cigarette.
Yes. Surely.
Thank you.
As a matter of fact, that's how I first met Loveland.
He'd a letter of introduction from your father... whom he'd worked for sometime before in India.
Oh, and by the by, I didn't make any mention at all of your being aboard ship.
I was afraid it might worry your father.
Yes. Oh, yes, it might.
- Good night and thank you.
- Good night, my dear.
[Ship Horn Blowing]
You'll probably find
Miss Cherrington at the hotel.
I think she went ashore early to get a good night's rest.
Well, good-bye, Mr. Furnoy.
Very happy to have been aboard.
- Well, happy to have had you.
- And I'm- I'm terribly sorry about last night.
- Oh, forget it.
- Good-bye, sir. Happy to have been aboard.
- Thank you very much.
- Well, I enjoyed having you too.
And by the way, here's one of my latest little gadgets, all for you.
- Oh, thank you so much.
- [Laughs]
- Thank you.
- Good-bye, boys.
[Geoffrey]
Good-bye.
[Squeaks]
[Loud Squeaking]
[Laughs]
Beg your pardon, sir. Operator says please stand by for a call from India.
- India?
- Yes, sir.
- Right!
- Gracias, senor.
Nosey! Ready, Nosey.
India's calling!
Really, I wish you'd knock before you do this type of thing.
How did you know who was- Oh. India?
Hello? Ready here for the call.
India again?
You know, I can't understand why Lynn didn't wait for us this morning.
Typical of the breed.
Women don't give it a thought.
I suppose she was feeling pretty ill.
- No wonder after last night, poor kid.
- Yes.
- Should we phone her?
- Let's. I know the minute she hears my voice... her rooms will be bathed in brilliant sunlight... and birds will probably twitter from her ceiling.
Get her on the phone for me, will you?
Hello? Hello. Operator?
Put me through to
Miss Cherrington, will you?
She's gone?
She's gone!
- Hello, this is Gordon Herk-
- Herkimer Gordon!
Calling. Didn't she leave a message for me?
But she must've left a forwarding address.
- Thanks.
- Gone?
Bag and baggage, without a word.
But no note on the dressing table?
- I can't understand it.
- [Ringing]
Hello? It's Wyatt!
We've got on to something, Boson!
That barman's gun was manufactured by a company called Atlas Arms.
Atlas Arms!
We located the president of Atlas Arms in Alexandria, Egypt.
All the number-one boys of the munitions racket are there.
Now look here.
Take the first boat and meet us there.
What?
Oh, yes, yes!
What was that name again? Quick.
His name is Martin Cherrington.
That's right.
"Cherring-ton."
Now what's the matter?
Lynn's father's president of Atlas Arms.
What?
- I certainly don't like the look of this.
- What do you mean?
Lynn arrived at Leigh Hall the day that Drake was shot, right?
Then she arrived out here before you did, and I met her with Loveland.
It all looks most peculiar to me.
Don't be an ass.
Lynn's just an impulsive girl who reads too many detective stories.
- I hope you're right.
- I am! Lynn tried to help us, didn't she?
She arranged for us to go on this trip with Loveland.
Don't you realize that might all have been a very neat trick?
I wonder.
- It's utterly impossible, but-
- What do we do now?
- We pack for Alexandria at once.
- Oh.
[Prayer Horn Sounds]
[Speaking Arabic]
[Arabic]
His Highness agrees to the terms... and would pay partly in gold and partly in silver.
Okay. Now you tell your friend the shipment can be made secretly.
Mr. Furnoy, who's in charge of all operations... will be here in a couple of days and settle the details.
- [Speaking Arabic]
- The kid's here.
Landed at Imperial Airways a few minutes ago.
What? Here in Alexandria?
How the dickens did she track me?
- Well, tell her I'm busy!
- [Chuckles]
- You tell her.
- Hmm?
Well, all right.
Shoot her in.
If you gentlemen will wait in this room, please,
I won't be a minute.
- As-salaam alaikum.
- As-salaam alaikum.
Okay.
- Hello, Dad.
- Hello, Lynn. What are you doing in Egypt?
- I came to have a little talk with you.
- Well, well. What's up?
Engaged, married or broke?
How's about a daughterly peck?
No, thanks. I'm not very fond of you at the moment.
Well, well.
What have I done now?
Dad, is it true that you're president of Atlas Arms?
Where did you get track of that?
Now don't go answering a question with a question! Are you president of Atlas Arms?
As a matter of fact, I am, though it's not generally known.
But then I'm mixed up in a dozen companies.
Why pick on Atlas?
Oh, nothing.
That just makes you a murderer, that's all.
Here, here, here, here.
What's this?
I've just come back from South America where I've seen men, women and kids... killed with guns that you made and sold.
It was terrible. People were shot down on the street without a chance.
[Scoffs] What do you think war is like?
A marshmallow roast?
Don't be flippant.
It was horrible.
You came halfway around the world to tell me that?
Listen, Lynn. I know that war is agony, filth and horror.
It's mass stupidity and collective insanity.
You know all that and still you go on selling arms?
Well, if I don't do it, somebody else will.
Besides, you know, you're pretty expensive with your globe-trotting ideas.
- Right now, I hate every penny you ever spent on me.
- Oh, you do, eh?
Okay. I'm making a note to have your allowance stopped.
Can't you be serious for two seconds?
I'm more in earnest than I've ever been in my whole life... and you treat me as though
I were still in rompers.
- Are you really serious?
- Yes, of course I am.
All right.
War is all you say it is and more.
But I'm not responsible if fools want to cut each other's throats.
My factories turn out guns, among other things.
Now if men want to buy them and make hell on earth... they might just as well buy 'em from me.
But if they ever see reason...
I'd be delighted to shut down my plants.
Now you know where I stand.
Dad, you're talking about men as if they weren't even people.
I've seen them die, slaughtered like animals.
That's your fault for messing around such places.
I don't suppose it makes any difference to you either, the fact that you've cost me... the love and respect of the one man in the world I cared anything about.
I never heard of him either, so I can't be responsible.
All right, but get this clear.
From now on, I'm on the other side.
I'm fighting you.
Great! I love a good, stiff fight.
- You'll get it.
- In that case, I'll increase your allowance.
- You'll need a war chest.
- You can take your war chest and go to the devil!
[Clicks Tongue]
- [Laughs]
- Spunky kid, eh?
That's the way I like 'em.
Send in those snake charmers again.
[Chattering]
I say! There they are!
- Nosey, Boson!
- By George, it's good to see them!
[Laughs]
What have you got on your head?
[Laughs]
Come on!
[Laughs]
Oh!
[Laughing]
Rodney, wha-Whiskers?
- [Wyatt] A mustache!
- A beard!
- It comes off.
- But you have one, and Boson said-
It comes off!
- Up.
- [Laughing]
- [Laughing]
- I say.
Nosey! Come on.
Get out of here. Nosey!
- Come on.
- [Laughs] Oh!
[Lynn Laughs]
Geoffrey!
Chris! Chris, hello. Remember me?
The old popper-upper?
Um, Geoff, darling!
Darling, I'm so glad to see you.
I didn't know where we'd ever find each other again.
I wasn't even sure that you'd come, but I watched every steamer.
And, Geoff, remember there was something I had to explain to you?
Well, I wasn't clear about it until I got here, but now I am.
- You see-
- I think we're both quite clear.
Why, Geoffrey, what's the matter?
That sounds like a queer kind of question.
Queer question?
But why? What have I done?
When your father's president of Atlas Arms-
Oh, well, I wanted to be the first to tell you that and explain, Geoffrey-
- I don't think explanations are possible.
- Oh, but, Geoffrey...
- surely you can't just-
- Please, Lynn, my brothers are waiting for me.
Uh, Geoffrey-
The guns are identical. The maker's name
has been chiseled off on both in the same way.
We had an acid test made of ours, and the name Atlas Arms came out plain as day.
- So, at last, we're getting somewhere.
- I'm afraid we're not.
- What do you mean, Beano?
- Well, you see, Loveland is dead.
We have his confession, but that's only hearsay evidence.
And the rest is purely circumstantial.
No court would accept it for a moment.
[Geoffrey] Do you mean we haven't
accomplished anything?
[Christopher] What about Cherrington?
He's the man we've got to see.
- [Rodney]Just try.
- Dear fellow, it's easier to get an interview with the king.
Cherrington's guarded on all sides.
We couldn't even get past his third secretary.
If ever I wanted to poke anyone in the nose, it was that snooty secretary.
No, I'm afraid as far as seeing Cherrington is concerned, that's a very difficult assignment.
Well, in that case, you'll need me.
- [Geoffrey] Lynn!
- [Chris] Lynn!
- Oh, Lynn, we werejust talking about you-
- That's hardly necessary.
- I'm Lynn Cherrington.
- How do you do?
- How do you do? And how do you do?
- How do you do?
And believe it or not, you do need me.
- Uh, Lynn, we're very busy.
- Very busy indeed.
Yes. Yes, I know. I'm still messing in your affairs, and you don't like it.
Well, all the fun's gone out of it for me too... but I'm gonna stay and finish what I started.
We'd be grateful for any help,
Miss Cherrington.
- May I take your wrap?
- Thank you. Don't tell me I've met one member of this family...
- who really has brains.
- Oh, well.
- Or, perhaps, two members, huh?
- Oh, thank you.
Of course, those idiots over there think I can't be trusted.
- [Wyatt] No.
- But I do hope you'll believe me.
[Both Laugh]
- Please, Lynn-
- Look, Lynn, if you could-
And besides, I've had about enough of this
"Please, Lynn" stuff.
Do you think I've met every steamer just to flatter your vanity?
I was afraid my father'd get away before you arrived, if you ever did.
And when you did arrive, you wouldn't even listen to me!
Now, would you like to see my father?
Oh, would we?
I say, you are a trump.
- Thank you.
- We'd be very grateful, Miss Cherrington.
Oh, I knew I should've waited till I met the rest of the family... before I made my choice.
- You know, it's a very good thing that you came, uh, Beano.
- Yes?
- Because those two mutts would never have gotten anyplace.
- [Wyatt] No, no.
And it's a very good thing that you came too...
- uh, Snozzle.
- Uh, Snicklefritz.
[Laughs]
Well, shall we go?
Thank you.
[Laughs]
Uh, you two can tag along if you like, uh, Nosey and, uh, Stinky.
[Laughter]
Come, Stinky.
[Lynn]
Thank you.
[Knocking]
Oh, sorry, Lady Cherrington.
[Speaks French]
- Hi, Mike.
- Hello, Lynn.
No!
No!
Uh-huh. Nope.
- Oh.
- Well, Dad, I want you to meet some friends of mine.
Mr. Wyatt, Rodney,
Christopher and Geoffrey Leigh.
Oh, yes. Always glad to meet friends of Lynn's.
How do you do?
- Uh, now, Dad, I want you to listen to me-
- I'm sorry, Lynn.
I've got to attend a meeting.
Some other time, honey.
[Lock Rattles]
Hello. What's this?
Am I being kidnapped?
I'm sorry, sir, but this is a matter of life and death to us.
We've been trying to see you for days.
And I'm afraid you must listen.
[Clicks Tongue]
Well, well.
Serious as all that,
I suppose I can spare you five minutes.
Well, go ahead, Lynn.
You've evidently got a speech on your chest.
[Sighs]
Yes, as a matter of fact, I have.
Do you remember a couple of weeks ago when we were in England?
I went to a certain house where a British officer and his sons... had led happy and honorable lives.
I went out there happily too, but...
I found a tragic thing had happened.
A little while before, that officer had been disgraced and broken in India.
He'd come back home to prove to his sons that he wasn't guilty.
But before he could show them his evidence... he was murdered and all of his papers were stolen.
That officer was Colonel Loring Leigh and these are his four sons.
Are you sure he was murdered?
- Definitely.
- A few days later... another officer who had come from India... to help Colonel Leigh clear his name was also murdered.
- Now, someone was afraid, Dad, of what they knew.
- That's true, sir.
I see.
But what on earth makes you think that I was in on this?
Well, because Atlas Arms is responsible for everything that's occurred... and you are Atlas Arms.
So you think I'm the man, and you're ready to throw me to the wolves, eh?
Lynn, you must have a pretty big stake in this.
I have Dad. I'm in love with Geoffrey Leigh.
But he's not in love with me now, though he was for a little while.
Mr. Furnoy spoiled all that. You see, he told me you were president of Atlas Arms and-
Uh, wait a minute.
Wait a minute.
Lynn, did Furnoy know that these boys were Colonel Leigh's sons?
- Yes, he did.
- Well.
I'm beginning to see daylight.
Gentlemen, I hold the controlling shares of many companies, including Atlas... but I don't control its policy.
I want you to believe I didn't know that that policy included murder.
- Oh, Dad, can you prove that?
- Why, yes, if necessary.
I make plowshares, locomotives and tractors and even safety razors.
My stock in Atlas will be sold at once,
I promise you.
But you must know who does control the policy of Atlas Arms.
- And you've got to tell us, sir.
- Oh, no, sonny, I haven't.
- Oh, Dad, you do.
- May I suggest, sir, that if you protect him... you make yourself an accessory to those murders.
Well, I guess a man in my position could legally wriggle out of that.
But I don't hold with murder, and the man who's responsible knows that I don't.
That's why he's kept me in the dark.
- Guess you boys want him pretty badly, don't you?
- Naturally, sir.
Then you'll have to hustle.
He's sailing on his yacht tonight for Singapore.
His name is Furnoy.
- Furnoy?
- But I thought he made-
- Well, what are we waiting for? Come on!
- Thanks, Dad.
Geoffrey! Geoffrey!
Geoffrey, wait a minute!
- I'm going with you!
- Darling, you can't come too.
This is a job for men and guns and-
[Screams]
[Sighs]
Don't forget to touch second.
- Lynn, can you ever forgive me?
- Of course, Geoffrey.
Only not in a rush like this. Not until there's time for a thorough reconciliation.
And, darling, be careful!
There she is out there, the big white one.
- There's no dinghy. We'll have to swim for it.
- Yes, but quietly!
- No flat dives.
- No nonsense.
Captain, get up a head of steam.
We're gonna sneak outta here tonight.
No, sneak out.
Not Singapore.
Murros Island.
[Indistinct]
[Ship Bells Ringing]
[Whispers]
All right. Come ahead.
Hey! What are you people doing here?
Come on, Boson.
Hey! What are you guys doing?
All clear.
- Now which way?
- Follow it forward. Go to his cabin.
- Are you comfortable, Captain?
- Come on.
- What's this?
- Guest cabins here.
Come on now.
Take it easy.
That's Furnoy's cabin and the secretary.
[Rattling]
That door's locked.
That's Furnoy's cabin there.
- [Typing]
- There's someone in there.
- It's the secretary's room.
- It's locked.
- Let's crash it.
- Don't be silly.
[Squeaky Voice] Hello!
Did you want some more scotch and soda?
Snow White! Shh! Shh!
Donald Moose- Goose. Wait a minute.
Shh.
[With Squeaky Voice] Hello.
- [Squeaking]
- Oh. Yes, sir.
Good heavens.
Thank you. Thank you.
[Squeaking]
[Squeaking]
Oh. Right away.
[Men Grunting]
Captain. Captain!
Good evening, Mr. Furnoy.
This is my brother Wyatt Leigh.
He's head of our family now since you murdered our father.
This is my brother Rodney Leigh.
We've come to clear our father's name.
We want a full confession from you.
Confession?
Wh- Stay where you are.
I've got a bullet here for each of you!
- [Gunshot]
- [Groans]
And as for Loveland, well... he was done away with by friends of mine in the government.
And that's all.
That's a true confession.
[Chime Ringing]
And now all that's required is your signature, Mr. Furnoy.
- Sign it?
- Furnoy!
You murdered my father! Nothing would give me greater pleasure than to blow your-
Rod!
- Oh. Your father's?
- Yes.
His Majesty said he was proud and happy... that an honorable name had been restored.
I'm proud too.
Please! Please.
Save football tactics for gridiron.
Ancient ancestor once say...
"As mind is fed with silent thought, so should body absorb its food."
Gimme more fried rice!
- Want some fish!
- Wait a minute!
- Food not to liking, Jimmy?
- What? Oh, yes.
Say, Pop, I was thinking.
I wish you'd let me be a detective.
Please, do not imitate vacuum cleaner.
Uh, I could probably be the best in the islands with your help.
Am afraid you overestimate ability of parent.
No, I don't. Now that brother Lee is in the New York art school, I can take his place.
What about me?
I'm as good as you are any day.
Yeah? Well, I've been studying up a lot on crime.
And look, Pop.
I've even had cards printed.
"Bills Also Collected"?
Well, that's just in case
I don't get enough murders.
Bills sometimes more difficult to collect than murder clues.
Yeah, but I know where
I can get a swell office.
Good. Will donate one desk and one hat rack to same.
I'll give you a couple of my old blotters.
I have some nice rubber bands you can have too.
Please, please.
Do not ridicule good intentions of elder brother.
Uh, thanks, Pop.
Now, about that office again.
I don't need a hat rack, but I do need rent money.
As soon as I get a case,
I can start paying you back. And-
Honorable mother-in-law.
Most honorable father-in-law, greetings.
Honorable son-in-law, hello.
- Please partake of humble food?
- No, thank you.
Events of the day have killed all appetite.
I have just taken honorable wife to the maternity hospital.
Oh, my little Ling.
Please, please. Excitement most unnecessary.
Are certain Ling getting best attention?
- Doctor says she reposes most comfortably.
- Why didn't you telephone us?
Doctor says do not clutter hospital with relatives until summoned.
- Telephone will be used as means of signaling family.
- I'm going anyway.
Control self, Mama.
Maybe that's them now.
Hello? Hello?
No! Good-bye!
- What? What?
- Wrong number. They want fish market.
- Get Mama her coat.
- Look, Mama. You have same experience 13 times.
There is no cause to worry.
Then what's worrying you?
You've been a father 13 times too.
Admit same.
But this is first occasion as grandfather.
Uh-
Hello?
Oh.
Boyfriend calling number two daughter.
Wing, I think we go to hospital.
Just as you say, honorable father-in-law.
- Can I go too, Daddy?
- Say, Pop, can we go too?
Hospitals for sick, not playground for healthy.
Please, return to table.
- Aw, gee, Pop, we won't get in the way.
- Come on, Pop.
- Come on. Let's go. Come on, sis.
- Hey, wait till I get my coat.
Hello? Lieutenant Chan?
He just left, but I'll take the message.
This is the Homicide Bureau calling.
Tell him to go aboard the freighter
Susan B. Jennings off Kaena Point.
They just reported a murder.
M-M-Murder?
Yes. Yes, sir.
Jimmy, headquarters just called for Pop to go aboard the freighter Susan B. Jennings!
Somebody was killed by somebody else!
Gee, I'd better hurry and give him the message.
- Wait a minute.
You're lookin' for a case, aren't you?
- Why? What do you mean?
Supposin' we go aboard and handle this ourselves?
Oh, no. It's too risky. Besides, it's Pop's job, and he might get awful sore.
If you solved the case, he couldn't.
Hey, you're throwing over a chance of a lifetime.
Just think. It might be years before you get another murder.
Maybe you're right. Even Pop would have to admit I'm pretty good if I solve a homicide.
Sure! And then he'll have to get you that office.
- By golly, I'll do it.
- Let's go!
Oh, wait a minute.
You're not goin'. You're too young.
What? Say, who told you about this case anyway?
You stay here and answer the phone.
That's what all good assistants do.
I'll see you later.
I still can't believe that man was murdered right before my eyes.
And you're sure you don't know who he is?
I never saw him before he came aboard this ship a half hour ago.
Did you see the boat that brought him alongside, Mr. Randolph?
It was just an ordinary shore boat.
After he got aboard, it headed back to Honolulu.
- Where is the body now?
- I had it taken below, sir.
Well, that's all we can do until the police come aboard.
I don't see why this had to happen on my ship.
Now we may be tied up here for days.
That means we lose cargoes all along the line.
Small boat on the port side signaling to come aboard, sir.
That would be the police.
- All right. Take it easy, buddy.
- We got ya.
- There you are.
- Honolulu Police.
- My name's Chan.
- Not Charlie Chan?
- Well, uh-
- Why, I've heard about you from Singapore to Sweden.
I'm Captain Johnson.
Glad to meet you.
- Thanks. But you see-
- I know. You wanna get right to work, eh?
Funny thing about you.
I thought you'd be older.
- You've had a lot of experience for a young fella.
- Yeah.
Now I want to question the witnesses.
And then I'd like to see the corpus delicti.
- You know, for clues and things.
- Oh, yes, yes.
By the way, how many passengers do you carry?
Just six.
This is a freighter, you know.
There's one of our passengers now.
Dr. Cardigan, Mr. Chan.
A deep pleasure, Mr. Ham.
- Not Ham- Chan.
- Oh, Clam. So sorry.
- The doctor is a little deaf.
- Oh.
- The doctor is a little deaf.
- Oh.
Your pituitary glands are very prominent.
I shall have to talk with you later.
Good day, Mr. Clam.
I think the doc's also a little nuts.
This way.
How long do we have to wait, Pop?
Pop, where do storks find babies?
Mama, please. Be calm like me.
- There's the baby now.
- Let me see, Pop. Is it a boy?
Wrong flavor.
- Shh.
- Excuse please.
Can give approximate time of grandchild arrival?
Well, your guess is as good as mine,
Mr. Chan.
Might be five minutes from now, or it might be five hours.
Oh, uh, where is telephone?
- Down the hall to your right.
- Uh, thank you.
- Any report from Lieutenant Chan?
- No, sir.
But the freighter radioed in he boarded her a half hour ago.
I see.
Honolulu Police, Homicide Bureau.
Oh, hello, Charlie.
Hold on.
Lieutenant Chan now, Inspector.
This is Rawlins, Charlie.
How's everything going?
Very slow.
Will be detained longer than expected.
- Well, have you got any clues yet?
- Am not sure.
But intuition and five dollars say it will be boy.
Boy? What do you mean? Say, are you aboard the freighter Susan B. Jennings?
No, sir.
Am on board maternity hospital.
What, again? Listen, Charlie.
We called you an hour ago.
The ship radioed a murder case just as they rounded Kaena Point.
Have heard nothing of same!
What? Wh-Why, they reported you boarding them 30 minutes ago.
Would appear someone impersonating humble self.
You get out to that ship as soon as you can.
Pick up a couple of men at the harbor.
Yes, sir.
Mama! Mama!
Now, Miss Hayes, Captain Johnson says that you're the only witness to the actual murder.
- Is that true?
- Yes, as far as I know.
At least, I was the closest one.
Please tell me all you know.
Two weeks ago, the attorney I work for in Shanghai called me into his office... and told me I was to sail the following day on this boat for Honolulu.
He also gave me a package I was to deliver to a certain person when I arrived here.
- What was in the package?
Gosh!
I mean, uh, that's a lot of money.
That's the amount all right. Miss Hayes had me keep it in my safe until this afternoon.
What did you do with it then?
I waited on deck until this man came aboard from a small boat.
- I thought you said you didn't know him.
- I didn't.
When he gave me the ring,
I knew he was the man to give the money to.
- Wedding ring?
- Yes. Here it is.
- I was told he would give it to me as a receipt.
- What happened then?
Just as I was about to give him the package, l- I heard a shot.
He looked at me for a moment, you know, kind of surprised-like.
And then he fell to the deck.
I-
I don't know what I did then.
I guess I fainted. And that's all I know.
My chief officer, Mr. Randolph, was the first to reach the body.
I got there a few seconds later.
- Who has the money now?
- I have it. It's locked in my cabin.
- Would you like to see the body, Mr. Chan?
- Yes, please.
- But first take me to the spot where the shooting occurred.
- All right.
Follow me.
- What are you doing here?
- You'll have to talk a little louder.
You evidently had no trouble hearing what was going on in there.
I'm sorry.
I can't hear you, Mrs. Wayne.
But as a fellow passenger,
I feel I must give you a word of warning.
A murder has been committed aboard this ship.
And I should be very careful what I said.
Oh.
I don't know much more about Miss Hayes than you do... but her story sounds fishy to me.
I'll check on her after
I've seen the rest of the passengers.
There he is, cold as a mackerel.
Wh-What was that?
- Oh, nothing. Just Oscar. Nothing to worry about.
- J-J-Just Oscar?
- Yeah.
- Oh.
I wish you'd hurry up. I'd like to get this case washed up as quickly as possible.
I have to unload cargo and clear port before tomorrow.
Say, there's not a bit of identification on this man. Look.
Even the tailor's label's been torn out.
Why, that's funny. Somebody must've gotten in this cabin after he was brought here.
I think we'd better get up on deck.
Hogan, what's the matter with you?
There's a ghost in there scaring my poor animals to death.
- Ghost?
- Have you been hitting that bottle again?
This ghost never came out of a bottle.
Oscar saw it and roared like he was crazy... and I woke up-
- Just in time to see it go by-
- Just like that.
- What did it look like?
- You know.
Just like a- a ghost.
What have you got animals on the ship for?
I'm takin' them to a Frisco zoo.
It will be a great day when I get rid of them and you too.
Go in there now and quiet 'em down.
Not me. Not with a live ghost.
Wait a minute, Captain!
This ghost might be the murderer we're after.
Murderer?
Who-
Who's that?
That's the man who was murdered.
Listen to them poor, dumb beasts.
They can't reason like us. I tell you-
Aw, bilge water!
Let's find out about this thing. Go on.
Yes, sir. I'm goin'.
- Hogan!
- C-C-C-Coming.
Hogan! Now where is this ghost you're talking about?
Over in that vicinity.
What's the matter?
Nothing.
- I see nothing wrong here.
- You will.
What's the matter?
Oh, uh, nothing.
Help! Help!
Help! Help!
What's the matter?
- D-Did you see him?
- There's a lion loose!
- That's just Oscar.
- Oscar?
Oscar, what are you doing?
What's the matter with you?
Get up there on that bed.
Come on! Get a move on.
That's the stuff. Step on it.
Get a move on there.
Come on. A little pep there.
Get along. Get up on that bed.
That's the idea.
Why don't you put that lion in a cage where he belongs?
- If I do, I'll go in there with him.
- Oh, I've had enough of this.
- You've had enough?
- If you want me, I'll be up on the bridge.
That won't be necessary.
- A-Are you sure you saw a ghost?
- Unmistakably.
Don't you suppose I know-
Look!
Th-There it is n-n-now!
- Come on!
- Oh, no. Not me.
Whoever's in that locker, come out with your hands up.
- Uh, hello.
- Gosh!
I thought it was-
Say, what are you doin' here?
- Well, you see, l-
- Now you get off this ship before something happens to you.
- But, gee, I wanted to-
- Don't you realize there's a murderer at large?
- Sure! And I know who it is!
- Who?
- The guy with the thick glasses.
- Oh, you mean Dr. Cardigan.
- Yeah. He's been chasin' me all over the ship.
- He has?
What was that?
Oh, just Oscar.
He's a lion.
Lion? G-G-Gosh.
I wish Pop was here.
Yeah, so do I. Say, what's the matter?
Don't you think I can handle this case?
- Yes, but just the same, l-
- Chan?
- Hey, get in there quick. I got work to do.
- Can I help?
Of course not.
This is a man's job.
- I've got part of the crew on deck.
- Okay. Fine.
Say, pardon me for giving you any advice, but you better go easy on these boys.
- Why?
- They were off duty, and I had to wake 'em up for you.
They're not in a very good humor, and some of'em are pretty tough eggs.
- But I guess you know your business okay.
- Yeah.
I'll leave you here with the crew while I round up the passengers.
Thanks.
What's your name?
What's your name please?
Stanislaw Wzdkapopocusky.
Stanislaw W-
We'll skip that.
- Were you a witness to the murder this morning?
- Nay.
Oh.
What about you?
Can't any of you speak English?
Yeah, buddy.
/ can.
Swell.
What do you know about the murder?
Nothin'.
Doesn't anybody know anything?
Hey, pipe down, all of you.
This is one of our passengers, Detective Arnold of the San Francisco Police. Mr. Chan.
Glad to know you, Mr. Arnold.
- Yeah? What's your racket?
- Uh, why, uh-
- This guy's a phony.
- Wh-What do you mean?
I've seen plenty of pictures of Charlie Chan... and this chump don't look any more like him than I do.
- How about that?
- I-I-I can explain everything.
I oughta pinch you for impersonating an officer of the law.
- But, uh-
- Beat it before / change my mind.
Say the word, sir. We'll put him ashore.
- Go to it.
- Pop!
Pop! Pop! Pop! Let me down!
- One moment please!
- Hold it, men!
Pop!
Gee, I'm sure glad you came.
Honolulu Police frown on choking bay with bodies.
What in thunder is going on?
Come on, you men. Get down to your quarters.
- Mr. Randolph-
- Come on, men. Break it up.
- Who are you?
- Lieutenant Chan, Honolulu Police.
Lieutenant Chan?
Well, then who's this young squirt?
Young squirt merely chip masquerading as block.
Explain presence on board.
Well, headquarters called just after you left.
/ knew you were worried and had a lot on your mind.
So I thought I'd handle the case myself.
I was making headway too!
Hmm.
Making headway towards ship rail.
- Am most sorry for delay in investigation, Captain.
- So am I.
I suppose you want to start at the beginning and see the body too.
I've already examined it, Pop.
There's no identification on it.
Nevertheless, will make own examination.
- Meanwhile, you will question crew.
- Yes, sir.
Excuse please.
How many passengers on ship?
- I asked that question too, Pop. There are six.
- Oh, very clever.
There's one now.
Dr. Cardigan.
But you'll get nowhere questioning him, Pop.
He's deaf as a post.
- Deaf?
- Yes.
Thank you so much.
- When money talk, few are deaf.
- Yeah.
Ah, ah, ah, ah.
My buck.
- Pop!
- What's going on here?
I caught this youngster climbin' over the cages like a monkey... and scarin' my animals half to death.
- Who is he?
- Number five son.
- What? Another? Are there any more?
- Nine more.
At home, I hope.
Will explain unwelcome presence here?
- Uh, I came with Jimmy.
- Yeah, but l- I didn't know about it.
He stowed away.
Honest, Pop. I told him to stay home.
- Now, if you ask me-
- Nobody's askin' you.
Go below with your monkeys where you belong.
Just as I thought.
"Familiararity" breeds attempt.
You'll have to carry on alone.
- I've listened to enough of this tommyrot.
- Thank you so much.
Holokai.
- You will take fugitive from apron strings ashore.
- Yes, sir.
But I've got good news for you, Pop.
I know who the murderer is.
- Who?
- That man over there.
He's been chasing me all over the ship.
He's dangerous, Pop.
- Oh, don't worry. Will keep watchful eye on same.
- Okay.
Good-bye.
- Take me to murder victim.
- All right, Pop.
This is the man she was supposed to deliver the money to... and there's not a mark of identification on him.
- Except that he was married man.
- How do you figure that out?
Observe, please. Indentation on fourth finger most often indicate wedding ring.
Wedding ring?
Gosh, I almost forgot.
When he came aboard to get the money, he gave this to Miss Hayes as identification.
Engraving say, "E.H. To R.H."
Listen, Pop, I'll check those initials against the names on the passenger list and-
What's that?
Pardon me, gentlemen. I thought this cabin was occupied only by the corpse.
Sorry to disappoint.
One moment, please.
Will explain strange interest in corpse?
I am Dr. Cardigan, a specialist in psychiatry.
Have humble impression psychiatry of no value... when brain cease to function.
But who are we to know the line of separation?
The transition is often gradual and mysterious.
Sometimes the retina of the eye...
may even retain the image last seen before death.
Have already examined eyes of victim.
Really?
Stop!
Please, remove hand from table.
I'm afraid you're overly suspicious of me... since discovering my pretended deafness.
You see, I'm writing a book on psychology... and my little deception gave me an advantage in observing the people around me.
I compliment you on your alertness.
Most unnecessary.
A quality unfortunately not shared by your son.
Of course, he's strictly a glandular case, but an interesting one.
Young man suffer from overdeveloped impulses and underdeveloped control.
A very clear diagnosis.
We must visit again sometime and compare notes.
Regret not being present on your first visit here.
- What do you mean?
- Button found on floor.
Obviously divorced from coat.
Thank you.
Good night, gentlemen.
Say, Pop.
If he's been here before... maybe he's the one who removed everything from the body.
- Quite possible.
- Say, did you really look in the dead man's eyes?
- Yes.
- What did you see?
- Merely twin image of humble self.
- Oh.
And that's all there is, Mr. Chan.
It's just as I told it to your son.
What is name of attorney for whom you deliver money?
- Mr. John Emory of Shanghai.
- And name of client?
I'm sorry, but I can't tell you that.
Don't hold out on anything.
This is serious!
But I really don't know.
I'm just a secretary to Mr. Emory.
My job was only to deliver the money.
Miss Hayes seems rather upset.
Why don't you let her rest for a while?
She told me her whole story before you came aboard... and I think I can answer any further questions.
Dear Officer Randolph is always so interested in Miss Hayes.
It seems this tropical climate affects some people that way.
Of course, /'m not criticizing his romantic tendencies.
What right have you to say that?
Merely that I think your sympathies are misdirected... when they're placed with a woman suspected of murder.
One moment please.
Can explain own presence on ship?
Have I not the right to travel wherever I wish?
Quite true.
But most strange that lady of evident wealth choose humble freighter for same.
Well, if you must know, l- I wanted quiet and rest. I recently became a widow.
So sorry.
- Also regret marriage very unhappy.
- What do you mean?
Absence of wedding ring denote lack of affection for deceased husband.
Well, l- I was suing for divorce.
May I go now?
Can give no further testimony on murder case?
None at all. I was resting in my cabin when I heard the shot fired.
But that isn't true! Why, you were one of the first on deck after the murder.
If you're trying to imply that I know anything more than I've said... you're wasting your time.
You're wasting your time.
Mr. Randolph, you were first on scene of crime?
- Yes, sir.
- Then perhaps can settle present disagreement?
- Why, I, uh-
- Mr. Randolph, you're wanted on the bridge, sir.
- The ship is approaching her berth.
- Excuse me please.
May I be excused too?
For present.
Will continue investigation later.
Pop, these are the last two passengers.
Mr. McCoy and Detective Arnold of the San Francisco Police.
So happy to meet honorable colleague.
Hiya, Mr. Chan. Seems like I know you,
I've seen your picture so many times.
Not in rogue's gallery, I hope.
No, on the front pages.
Incidentally, I'm breaking into print myself.
Here's the baby who did it for me.
The chief sent me over to Shanghai to pick him up.
He broke out ofjail awaitin'sentence on a murder.
We got a tip he was in China, so / hopped over the extradition papers.
Gee, Pop, if this man's an escaped criminal-
Don't get any smart ideas, sonny-boy.
I got nothing to do with this job.
That's right.
Don't worry about him.
We were playing pinochle in our cabin when the guy was shot.
But don't you put handcuffs on him or something?
Listen, brother. I can't swim, and I ain't never tried to fly.
So how am / gonna lam off this tub?
Besides, this flatfoot hangs around me like ivy on a prison wall.
Always cracking jokes.
The boys'll love him back at the big house.
By the way, Charlie, what do you think of this killing?
Opinion like tea leaf in hot water.
Both need time for brewing.
He's terrific!
Yeah.
Mr. Chan! The money, it's gone.
I had it locked in my trunk.
Mr. Chan, it was $300,000.
I've got to get it back! What shall I do?
I hope you're about finished here,
Mr. Chan.
We've just docked, and a gang of stevedores will be on board any minute.
So sorry. Must request no one attempt to board or leave ship.
Now just a minute.
My company can't afford to have a shipload of freight tied up just because some fool was shot.
You take these people ashore and solve your mystery.
- I'm clearing out of this port tomorrow.
- Contradiction please.
After case cleared, ship do likewise.
- You can count on me for any help you need, Charlie.
- Thank you.
- Have officers posted on all gangways.
- Okay, Pop.
Please take me to cabin.
Get outta here.
Now remember. Stop anyone who tries to come aboard and make sure nobody gets off.
Say, what's the matter with you?
Those are Pop's orders, not mine.
- Yes, sir.
- Yes, sir.
- What's the idea, holdin' up work?
- Orders are orders.
Just move it.
- Is it connected now?
- Yes, sir.
Just a moment, Mrs. Wayne.
You can't go ashore.
I've got to get ashore.
I have a very important call to make.
- I'm sorry.
- We've just had a telephone line connected to the ship.
You'll find it in the captain's quarters.
Oh, Mr. Randolph.
- You men go ahead. I'll be right with you.
- Yes, sir.
- I've got to get ashore.
- You'll have to speak to Mr. Chan.
- He gave the orders.
- Yes, I know all about that.
But you can fix it for me.
Now, I'm afraid you're wrong,
Mrs. Wayne.
I can't interfere with the police, and I wouldn't if I could.
Just a moment.
Perhaps I can change your mind for you.
I saw you give a gun toJudy Hayes just before the murder.
You can't prove that.
No, maybe not.
But it'll be very interesting to try.
- Now will you help me get ashore?
- No!
Trunk bears no evidence of forced opening. Lock is intact.
Miss Hayes, you are certain money was in trunk?
Yes, and it was locked, and I had the keys with me. Say, you don't suspect me?
You had reason for not returning same to captain's custody?
Well, I suppose I should have, but after the murder, I thought it would be safer here.
After all, I'm responsible for it.
Oh, Mr. Chan, you must find it!
Also imperative for own reputation to do same.
Come in.
Well, here I am, Charlie.
Got McCoy all tucked away for the night, and I'm at your service.
So happy.
So this is the trunk they lifted the dough out of, eh?
Find any fingerprints?
Many, but all smudged.
Oh. How about her?
You think she's on the up-and-up?
Look here, Mr. Arnold.
/'ve met your kind before. You're not-
I'll bet you have. You wouldn't be the first dame in the world to fall for heavy sugar.
If you don't need me, I'll go on deck.
Have already been most helpful.
Thank you so much.
Attaboy. Just a little further now.
There we are.
Now there's the gangplank.
Now, just turn to the right. That a boy.
That's the stuff.
Just keep on goin', Oscar.
Hey, not so fast.
Where do you think you're goin'?
Stand aside, boys.
Oscar needs fresh air and-
Exercise.
Oscar?
Hey, nobody goes ashore,
Hogan, and that includes you.
Listen, Oscar's gotta have a lit-
Aah!
Here, puss, puss, puss, puss.
Here, puss, puss, puss, puss.
Here, puss.
Here, puss, puss.
Here, puss, puss, puss.
Oscar!
Come on. Come down!
Will you come down?
Come on, you son of a gun!
Oscar, will you come down out of there?
Oh, okay. Okay.
Hey, what's the idea?
Stop that girl! Stop that girl!
Say, what's going on?
Get a move on.
Attaboy.
Really, gentlemen, you'll find nothing more illegal here... than the two bars of soap
I purloined from a Shanghai hotel.
Did we ask you?
- Must search all rooms.
- What's in this thing?
- Let that alone!
- What are you so worried about, Doc?
Don't move it!
You'll ruin everything.
- Oh, yeah?
- I'll open it.
/f your clumsy snooping has disrupted my apparatus, /'ll-
No, it's all right.
It's still alive.
What's alive?
A human brain.
Excuse please.
You say brain now alive?
Yes. After years of work,
I alone have achieved the impossible.
It has lived in that liquid for six months.
Whose brain please?
That of Chang Ho Ping, the famous Chinese murderer.
You see, I experiment only with the criminal brain.
I have some beautiful specimens at home.
You mean to say you got more of'em?
That you live with them things?
Hey, how did you get a living brain?
That, my dear sir, is a secret... which will be fully revealed in the book I am now writing- a work that will revolutionize the entire present treatment of criminals.
The surgeon's knife rather than a prison cell is my solution of crime.
Someday, / shall build a magnificent laboratory... and call it the Crime Clinic, and then-
Excuse please.
Much money required... to make such dream become reality.
- I have already obtained all I need.
- So happy.
- Let's get out of here.
- Thank you so much.
Oh, pardon me.
Your friend, Mr. McCoy-
What sentence is he returning to?
A hundred and 10 years, countin' time off for good behavior.
Oh, what a pity.
I'd hoped for an execution.
That's too bad.
Good night, gentlemen.
Hey, you gonna let this guy run around loose?
Let's lock him up with McCoy.
Most inadvisable for Mr. McCoy's sake.
- Good night.
- Yeah.
- Well, what's next, Charlie?
- Interview Mr. McCoy.
McCoy? Say, you ain't suspicious of him, are ya?
Nah. That's a cold lead, Charlie.
Why, he even bunks with me.
Making bedfellow of serpent no guarantee against snakebite.
Huh?
Oh, yeah. Yeah.
- Hello.
- How do you do?
Say, Doc, do you mind lookin' me over?
I think I cracked my head open, what with one thing and another.
A pleasure.
- Take a seat, won't you?
- Thank you, sir.
- You say you're having trouble with your head?
- Yes, Doc.
Everything seems to be goin' dark all the time.
Not exactly a criminal formation.
- Oh, no, no.
- More the subnormal.
Uh, yes, that's what I thought.
How old are you?
I make it 37.
Yes, just as I thought.
A rare case of arrested development.
Say, Doc... that won't c-c-curl my hair, will it?
No, it's quite harmless.
Just relax.
M-M-Maybe-
Maybe there ain't nothing the matter with me at all.
Maybe all I need is a- a drink.
I'm afraid I have nothing here but pure alcohol... in which I prepare my brains.
You and me both, Doc.
W-W-W-W-What's that?
Oh.
Come here, and I'll show you.
That's my brain.
I can't understand it.
I locked him in just like always.
He must have slid out that porthole.
Contradiction please.
Porthole locked on inside.
Yeah. Wait'll I get my hands on that stir-bug.
I'll teach him he can't pull a sneak-out on me.
Wait.
Trying to take a powder on me, eh?
I was upstairs gettin' a little fresh air.
It's kind of stuffy in here.
Please explain possession of door key.
Why, uh, I lifted it out of Arnold's pocket.
Oh, no, you didn't.
Double-crossing me after the way I've treated ya!
Sorry, Charlie. They don't often get away from me. Now, where did you get that key?
Pop! Pop!
Gee, Pop, I've been lookin' all over for you.
- Judy Hayes is gone.
- You mean escaped?
Yeah. I was keepin' watch just like you said... when Hogan comes along with his lion-
Never mind lion.
How long ago lady escape?
I don't know just how long, Pop,
'cause I was almost unconscious!
Have suspected same since birth.
Say, maybe the dame took the dough ashore with her.
Will soon find out.
Hey, you gotta sock me that hard?
You loosened up my wisdom tooth.
Pull another boner like that,
I'll loosen up that thick skull of yours.
No one's gonna get wise.
You're acting just like a dick.
- Sometimes you got me believing it.
- Listen, this Chan guy is no sap.
And if he ever gets hip that I'm Mike Hannigan, they're gonna start looking for Arnold's body.
That's when I wind up in the hot seat... with you sittin' right in my lap.
- Police headquarters.
- Gosh, Pop, it wasn't my fault.
- I was on the job.
- Inspector Rawlins, please.
- You've gotta believe me, it was Oscar the lion that-
- Quiet. Quiet.
Hello.
Yes, Charlie.
Speaking.
She did?
How did that happen?
Unfortunate combination of Oscar the lion and number two son.
I don't get the connection, but I do know this is putting us on the spot.
The owners of that freighter are on my neck because we're keeping their ship tied up.
And now, you let a suspect get away!
Mr. Chan, I have an urgent call from the hospital. Will you take it?
Thank you.
Hold line, Inspector.
Hello?
Honorable father-in-law?
Yes.
- Say, who is this?
- Your son-in-law.
I haven't got any son-in-law!
Get off this line.
Ling is resting most peacefully, but has great desire for watermelon.
Why call me concerning melon?
You told me to report to you each hour.
I don't want any watermelon.
This is the police department. Hello!
Charlie, somebody's trying to cut in on us.
Now just give me the description and name of that fugitive.
We have chosen several names.
Lotus, Cherry, Lung if it's a boy-
Am hoping for boy, but-
I thought you said it was a girl?
We don't know yet.
Name is Judy Hayes.
Five feet 5 inches tall.
Please get watermelon and get off line.
- What?
- No, not you, Inspector.
Mr. Chan, they've just found Miss Hayes.
They're bringing her in here now.
This officer says you were looking for me, Mr. Chan.
Say, I can't hear anything!
Now, give me that description again.
So sorry.
Description unnecessary, Inspector.
Fugitive now present.
- Honest, Pop, she did leave the ship.
I saw her go.
- He's right.
I did go ashore. And when I came back, this officer picked me up at the gangway.
I guess that settles it. It's obvious to me she sneaked the money ashore with her.
You can think what you wish.
The money's stolen.
- Then why did you go ashore?
- I've got myself to protect.
I wanted to phone my employer,
Mr. Emory in Shanghai.
Did you tell Mr. Chan about the gun
Mr. Randolph gave you this afternoon?
- How did you know?
- Please.
Gosh, Pop! The same caliber gun that the murderer used.
One shell discharged.
- I never fired it.
- The gun's mine, Mr. Chan.
I fired it several days ago at a shark following the ship.
Please explain why young lady carry same.
Miss Hayes told me about an appointment she had...
- with a stranger whom she expected to come aboard.
- I asked for the gun.
That was a lot of money / was handing over, and / was pretty nervous.
Why didn't you tell Mr. Chan about the gun, if it's all so innocent?
It slipped my mind until you reminded me of it... and threatened to tell the police unless I got you ashore.
What was urgency of shore visit please?
That's my business.
So grateful for cooperation.
That is all for present.
But any further attempt to leave ship will cause immediate arrest.
- Oh, Captain?
- Yes.
You offered me a brandy right after lunch today. Might I have it now?
You certainly may.
I need one myself.
Have Ballistics check approximate time gun last fired.
Also, get report from telephone company on Miss Hayes' Shanghai call.
Yes, sir.
Gosh. Things are sure poppin' now.
What's our next move?
For you, towards home.
Oh, gee, Pop, don't be like that.
I've been on this case from the start, and I want to stay on it.
Please let me stay.
I've gotta make a reputation for myself... or I'll never get any clients.
Now, if you'll only let me explain my idea.
Make short and most snappy please.
Well, of course it's okay to check the gun and Miss Hayes' phone call... but we still don't know why
Mrs. Wayne wanted to go ashore.
Maybe she was trying to get away with the money.
Already contemplate search of lady's cabin.
Then I'm going with you, 'cause I thought of it too and a lot of other things.
You won't be sorry you let me stay, Pop.
You know, two heads are better than one?
Come on, Pop.
- Judy.
- Yes?
Why don't you come clean about this whole thing?
I mean, at least to me.
What are you talking about?
After you left the ship,
I searched your cabin because, well... l-I didn't want the police to find anything there that might hurt you.
- What could be there that would hurt me?
- This.
It was hidden in a torn life preserver.
There's $10,000 in it.
Why, that's part of the stolen money.
Where's the rest of it?
- How should I know?
- George.
- You don't think I stole my own money, do you?
- Everybody does.
- What's the use of kidding yourself?
- Oh, don't be ridiculous.
If I took the money ashore, you don't think
I'd be stupid enough to leave this behind?
- That's what I couldn't figure out.
- Well, I can.
This money was planted in my cabin after I left the ship.
It was a beautiful little piece of framing, and I think I know who did it.
- Oh.
- This is an unexpected pleasure, Mrs. Wayne.
Well, l- I must have made a mistake.
This is not my cabin.
There are no mistakes.
This is Miss Hayes' cabin, and you know it.
Miss Hayes?
Then what are you doing here?
- The same as you are.
- I don't like your insinuations, Doctor.
- Let me out of here.
- I didn't invite you here.
But since you've come, there are one or two questions you can answer.
We'd better hurry before
Mrs. Wayne walks in on us.
- Did you find anything yet, Pop?
- Much money.
- Huh?
- But all invested in underwear.
Oh.
"R.H. To E.H."
Gee, Pop. The same initials as on the dead man's ring.
Must compliment sparrow with eye of eagle.
- Mrs. Wayne said that-
- But she's not Mrs. Wayne!
This proves she was traveling under an assumed name.
Say, I'll bet she was the murdered man's sweetheart.
- Or wife.
- That's right.
She was getting a divorce.
- No, she said she was a widow.
- Lady was speaking truth.
She became widow today.
Boy, is she gonna have plenty to explain.
Let's go, Pop.
Pop!
It's Mrs. Wayne.
- Is she-
- Strangled by scarf.
Gosh, that's awful.
Now I don't know where we stand.
I figured Mrs. Wayne killed her husband, but now somebody goes and kills her.
- Look for pair scissors.
- Scissors?
- Is she stabbed too?
- No.
Only want to cut scarf from neck.
Say, Pop, this is Judy Hayes' cabin.
I wonder what Mrs. Wayne was doing here?
They didn't act very friendly.
I wonder what Mrs. Wayne was doing here?
They didn't act very friendly.
Gee, but I'd hate to think Miss Hayes killed her.
- What was that? Somebody was listening.
- Wait!
Caution very good life insurance.
I've been over this tub from stem to stern... and there ain't a sign of that dough anyplace.
- Did you find anything, Charlie?
- Yes.
Something concerning Mrs. Wayne.
Mrs. Wayne? I thought there was something phony about that woman.
And that Cardigan guy is another one.
Now, I ask you, Charlie... is it natural for the guy to travel around with a jug full of brains?
Most unusual.
You've had men aboard the Susan B. Jennings all night... and as far as I know, the only thing they've caught is a lion!
There is no time schedule for solving a crime, Mr. Peabody.
But there is for running cargo boats, Inspector.
As representative of the owners,
I'm giving you their final word.
If our ship is held up here another day, we're suing the city.
Get me the Susan B. Jennings.
I'll see what's going on out there.
- Yes?
- I want to speak to Lieutenant Chan.
I can't get him now.
My ship is on fire!
- What?
- What's the matter?
- The ship's on fire!
- It's on fire? Why, it can't be!
Hello. Hello!
Captain Johnson! Hello!
I'm disconnected. Hello! Hello-
Captain Johnson! Hello!
Bring your fire hose forward!
Cover your hatches aft!
Make fast to starboard port!
Stand by your stations, you men!
Get all the passengers on deck.
- Aye.
- And man that number two hose.
- Come on, men!
- Close all the fire doors!
- How bad is it?
- We don't know yet. Stay on deck.
This way, men!
- Where's Pop?
- I don't know. I gotta get McCoy out of here!
Mac!
He's gone!
McCoy! Mac!
- What have you got in here?
- Stay away from this case.
- You'll have to tell me what's in it.
- My living brain.
- Your living brain?
- Yes, and keep your hands off.
Come on, you men, with that hose!
It's down here in one of these starboard cabins. Bring your hose this way.
Come on, men!
Don't go in there, Captain.
It's a raging inferno!
Well, what do you think I'm looking for?
Get out of my way!
Come on, men!
Let her go.
Cut off your hose!
What kind of a gag is this?
- Unlike old adage, much smoke, but no fire.
- Smells like gasoline, sir.
If this is another one of your tricks-
Interruption please. Only connection with blaze was to extinguish same.
Then who did start it?
Have not yet identified culprit.
Well, if you can't find out, I will.
Quiet the passengers, and turn off the alarm.
- I'm gonna get to the bottom of this.
- Aye, sir.
Gee, Pop, now who'd wanna start a fire in a bathtub?
I-I must have dropped them.
Please explain reason for arson attempt.
Well, I started it to make the murderer think it was a real fire... so that he'd grab the money and try to leave the ship.
Then I'd nab him.
It was a trick you once tried, Pop.
- Remember?
- Idea excellent.
But bait only good if fish bite on same.
But somebody did.
I saw Dr. Cardigan dragging a big box out of his stateroom.
He said there was a living brain inside, and-
Look out!
Thank you so much.
Gee, Pop!
Let's get out of here!
Hey, what's the idea?
Ship's on fire!
Hey, what are you doin' there?
- Did you hear that shot?
- Shut up, all of you!
- I have enough trouble without all this yammering.
- Excuse please.
- We heard a shot. Sounded like it came from here.
- Captain-
Own ears detect sound of same gunshot.
Come on, come on, before you get hurt!
Go on, get down there.
- What is the meaning of this, Mr. Randolph?
- There's your man.
I caught him trying to go over the side with this.
Gee, Pop!
The stolen money!
Yes, it is, Captain Johnson.
It is my money.
Please explain possession of same.
- I just found it, that's all.
- Saw him take it out of a lifeboat.
He's probably had it hidden there ever since he took it from Miss Hayes' room.
You're all wet!
I just happened to find it.
And I'd like to know who wouldn't try to cop a sneak with his hooks on 300 grand.
There's no doubt about it.
He's our man.
- All right, Mr. Chan, make your arrest.
- You can't touch me.
- I'm in his custody.
- And that's where you're staying from now on!
- May examine key, please?
- Certainly.
- Thank you so much.
- Hey, give me that key. What's the idea?
Idea is both you and confederate are under arrest.
Hey, you can't arrest me.
I'm Detective Arnold!
Contradiction please.
You are Mike Hannigan...
for whom San Francisco Police search most diligently.
What are you talkin' about?
Where do you get that cockeyed dope?
Reward circular with photographic likeness... arrive by clipper plane from San Francisco yesterday.
Body of real Detective Arnold, murdered by these men... recovered from Yangtze River in China 10 days ago.
Pretty smart stuff pretending to have McCoy in your custody... so that the both of you could use my ship to make your getaway to the States.
Captain! Captain! Mr. Chan!
Say, there's somethin' funny going on on board this ship.
As if I hadn't enough trouble with ghosts... somebody drops this cannon down the ventilator.
Please. Gun fired in last five minutes.
Two shells discharged.
- Now you've got your evidence.
- Not so fast there, Captain.
That gun don't belong to me.
Here's mine.
- One moment.
- And that gun hasn't been fired.
Look at it.
Mr. Chan, will you take these men out of here and settle this case ashore?
You have your murderers and your evidence.
Now, I've gotta get this cargo unloaded.
So sorry.
Cargo must wait.
But why?
What more proof do you want?
Proof of fingerprints on discharged gun.
You will in 10 minutes, please... have all passengers assembled at your cabin.
- Well, all right.
- Thank you so much.
Dr. Cardigan.
As student of criminal psychology... would perhaps lend noted talents to final experiment?
I should be very happy to do so.
Please, run thread underneath blotter through hole.
Now, please remain where you are, Mr. Chan.
It would seem that a certain theory of mine was correct.
Detectives as well as murderers invariably make one fatal mistake.
You should not have let this gun remain on the desk behind your back.
Am aware of mistake.
We all make them.
I made one by turning around when you dropped that coin to test my deafness.
I found it annoying, but I feel better now.
Then prepare for relapse.
Took precaution to remove bullets.
So that explains your lack of nervous reaction.
Just another experiment that has produced nothing.
Contradiction please.
Has produced one high-class set of much desired fingerprints.
What's he bringing us up here now for?
- Let's get this over with in a hurry.
- Will do humble best.
- Sit down, Judy.
- Oh, thank you.
Please, will everybody make selves most comfortable?
Miss Hayes, entire amount of fortune intact... when recovered from light-fingered gentleman?
Why-Why, yes.
Are positive $10,000 not missing?
What do you mean?
Paper money band indicate theft.
Very clever questioning, Mr. Chan.
Then provide clever answer.
Found money band in your cabin.
- Explain please.
- I'm sorry. I can't explain that.
Somebody did take $10,000 of that money and hid it in Miss Hayes' cabin.
They were trying to frame her, and / think-
Say, where's Mrs. Wayne?
Sorry.
Must conduct inquiry without her.
What?
She's in it as much as the rest of us.
Let Mr. Chan handle this.
Mrs. Wayne had no connection with this case.
Excuse please.
You experience great friendship for absent lady?
Why, not especially, no.
Then please explain why you permit her to travel under assumed name.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Have reason to believe opposite.
May examine lady's passport?
Surely.
There you are.
I don't want you to misunderstand this... but she told me she was very nervous and very worried...
and she was just getting a divorce, and she wanted to travel quietly.
I saw no reason to refuse her request.
I-
Most understandable.
Passport give lady's real name as Hillman.
Passport give lady's real name as Hillman.
- Hillman? Why, that was-
- Name of murdered man?
Why, uh, yes.
Did not know Mrs. Wayne was wife of same?
No. All I know is I was supposed to bring the money to him.
Please explain complete nature of errand.
I can't.
It was confidential business.
You'd better talk, Miss Hayes.
It's bound to come out sooner or later.
They were getting a divorce.
He wanted the money out of China... to avoid a property settlement.
Leave her alone!
Get Mrs. Wayne or Hillman... whatever her name is, up here and make her explain!
Regret impossibility.
Unfortunate lady murdered.
- Murdered?
- Who killed her?
I told you there was somethin' funny going on.
An unusually interesting case,
Mr. Chan.
Two murders, and not a single witness.
Contradiction please.
Have one silent witness.
Murder gun with fingerprints of criminal reposing on handle...
most likely duplicate of same fingerprints now in this room.
Are you going to fingerprint all of us?
All except Dr. Cardigan... who already kindly donate own fingerprints.
- You have ink pad?
- Sure, Pop.
Hello. Who?
Who? Oh, we're busy.
Call back later.
Hello! What's that?
Wing Foo?
- I never heard of him. I don't know.
- No, please. For me.
- Hello?
- Honorable father-in-law?
- Yes.
- I wish to report that Ling is very restless.
So is prospective grandparent.
Stork evidently fly wrong course to Honolulu.
Ling has lost all desire for watermelon and now demands gumdrops.
- Wing Foo, Doctor says to come quick!
- Excuse me!
I'm about to become a father!
Good-bye!
Tell her to wait for me!
Be there in 15 minutes! Hello!
Hello!
Who-Who-Who did that?
- Turn on those lights!
- Hey, you guys!
- I got him, Pop! I got him!
- You got who?
- Come on! Get in there!
- Mr. Chan, the gun is gone!
Am aware of same.
- What a break for somebody.
- Now you never can prove who the murderer was.
Correction please.
Murderer identified self.
Is now safely imprisoned.
- Imprisoned?
- Where?
Inside camera.
Guilty one took own picture while removing gun from desk.
Dr. Cardigan... be so kind as to develop film with utmost speed?
Certainly.
Jimmy.
Keep watchful eye on doctor.
Okay, Pop.
- Turn that light off, please.
- Y-Yes, sir.
- It's coming up now.
- Good.
Wait a minute!
Pop, here it is!
Here is picture of guilty person,
Captain Johnson.
It's the captain!
Denial is useless.
Photograph does not lie.
Only you and Mrs. Wayne aware
Miss Hayes carry large sum to Honolulu.
Mrs. Wayne wanted to prevent husband from receiving same.
Money being entrusted to your safekeeping... you saw chance to obtain huge fortune for yourself.
Captain Johnson shot
Mrs. Wayne's husband... when he came aboard ship and hid money in lifeboat... where it was discovered by light-fingered gentleman.
He then tried to cover trail... by planting money wrapper on Dr. Cardigan... and portion of money in Miss Hayes' cabin.
Suddenly, Mrs. Wayne become overly suspicious.
So he strangled her with scarf... tied in sailor's knot.
Only positive clue... was gun used in attempt upon life of humble self.
But fingerprints on gun all smudged, and so useless... making necessary trick with camera...
Ioaned by strange but most helpful Dr. Cardigan.
So sorry, Captain Johnson.
- Well, I guess me and McCoy can go, huh?
- Yes, to jail with Captain.
What a wonderful contribution to science your brain would make, Mr. Chan.
Thank you so much, but for present... would prefer to keep same for own use.
What a pity.
Lieutenant Chan speaking.
Please exercise self-control.
It's a boy, Pop!
It's a boy!
- Who's he talking to?
- I get it. He's having a baby.
Can you hear 'im, Pop?
Congratulations, Mr. Chan.
Contradiction please.
In present case, am only innocent bystander.
Coochie, coochie, coochie, coochie, coochie!
A stall, please.
Ladies and gentlemen... with your kind attention and permission...
I have the honour of presenting to you... one of the most remarkable men in the world.
- How remarkable?
- He's sweating.
And can you be surprised at that, gentlemen?
Every day he commits to memory fifty new facts... and remembers every one of them.
Facts from history, from geography, from newspapers... from scientific books, millions and millions of them.
Think of the strain involved by his prodigious feat.
His feet ain't half as big as yours, Curly.
I'm referring to his feats of memory.
Test him please.
Ladies and gentlemen
Ask him your questions... and he will answer you fully and freely.
Mr. Memory.
I also add, ladies and gentlemen before retiring... that Mr Memory has left his brain to the British Museum.
A question please.
Ladies first.
Where's my old man been since last Saturday?
- On the booze!
- In quod...
Out with his bit!
A serious question, please.
What won the Derby in 1921?
Mr Jack Jools with Steve Donoghue up... won a length at the odds of six to one... second and third Craig and Aaron and Lemonora. Am I right sir?
- Right.
- What won in 1936?
You come back in 1937 and I'll tell you sir.
- How far is Winnipeg from Montreal?
- What won the cup in 1926?
- Cup? Waterloo. Football or tea sir?
- Football, silly.
- When did Chelsea win it?
- 63BC in presence of Emperor Nero.
- What causes pip in poultry?
- Don't make yourself so common.
Well our fowls have got it haven't they?
How many races did Nick the Miller win?
- How old is Mae West?
- When was Crippen hanged?
Who was the last British heavyweight champion of the world?
Henry the eighth.
My old woman...
Bob Fitzsimmons he defeated Jim Corbett... heavyweight champion of America at
Carson City, Nevada in October 1897.
He was then 34 years of age.
Am I right sir?
- How old is Mae West?
- I know, I never tell a lady's age.
- Next please.
- When did the Princess Alice go down?
What causes pip in poultry?
How far is
Winnipeg from Montreal?
- You sir.
- How far is Winnipeg from Montreal?
A gentleman from Canada.
You're welcome sir.
Winnipeg, the third city of Canada and capital of Manitoba... distance from Montreal,
1424 miles.
- Am I right sir?
- Quite right.
How old's Mae West?
How old's Mae West?
Gentlemen, gentlemen please, you're not at home.
What causes pip in poultry?
For God's sake play something man and stop this panic!
Well there we are.
- May I come home with you?
- What's the idea?
Well I'd like to...
Well it's your funeral, come on then, there's a bus.
- You don't stay here always?
- No, I've taken a furnished flat...
I'm only over here from Canada for a few months.
By the way, am I allowed to know your name?
- Smith.
- All right.
Do you want to know more about me?
What do you think I do for a living?
- Actress?
- Not in the way you mean.
- Chorus?
- No.
- Sorry.
- I'm a freelance.
Out for adventure, eh?
This way...
Sorry my sitting room's all upset
I've had the decorators in.
- Wait until I find the switch.
- Not yet.
Now.
Mr Hannay would you be so kind and turn that mirror face to the wall?
You'd be happier if there were curtains over those windows.
- Yes.
- I'm sorry.
Hello, there's the telephone.
Just a minute.
Mr Hannay don't answer the telephone.
Why not?
Because I think it's for me.
Please don't answer.
Just as you say.
Won't you sit down?
Thank you. Would you please kick that footstool over to me?
- You needed that.
- I did. Thank you.
- I owe you an explanation.
- Don't bother about me, I'm nobody.
We cannot talk here.
All right.
Just a minute.
OK?
- Cigarette?
- No, thank you.
- Your friend again.
- Take no notice.
Would you think me very troublesome if I asked for something to eat?
- I've had nothing all day.
- Sure.
- Do you like haddock?
- Yes please.
I suppose your name isn't really Smith.
It depends on where I am.
You may call me Annabella.
Annabella Smith, a clergyman's daughter I'd say.
Hello, nervy.
Upset by those shots tonight?
I fired those shots.
- You what?
- Yes. To create a diversion.
I had to get away from the theatre quickly.
There were two men there who wanted to kill me.
You should be more careful in choosing your friends.
- No you don't understand.
- You don't make it easy.
Beautiful mysterious woman pursued by gunmen... sounds like a spy story.
That's exactly what it is.
Only I prefer the word agent better.
- Agent? For what country?
- Any country that pays me.
- But what is your country.
- I have no country.
Born in a balloon.
Well, we'll let that go.
Now I suppose you're over here to dig up some big state secret.
No I'm here to save a secret from being dug up... a very important secret for this country... not because I love England but because it will pay me better.
You see a very brilliant agent of a certain foreign power... is on the point of obtaining a secret vital to your air defence.
I tracked 2 of his men to that music hall.
Unfortunately they recognised me.
That's why they're after me now.
That was too bad.
Have you ever heard of a thing called persecution mania?
- You don't believe me?
- Frankly, I don't.
Go and look down into the street.
You win.
- Are they there?
- Yes.
I hoped I'd shaken them off.
I'm going to tell you something... which is not very healthy to know, but now that they followed me here...
- you're in it as much as I am.
- What do you mean?
- Have you ever heard of the 39 Steps?
- No. What's that, a pub?
Never mind. But what you were laughing at just now is true.
These men will stick at nothing
I'm the only one who can stop them.
If they are not stopped, it's only a matter of days, perhaps hours... before the secret is out of the country.
Why don't you phone the police?
Because they wouldn't believe me any more than you did.
And if they did, how long would it take to get them going?
These men act quickly. You don't know how clever their chief is...
- clever and ruthless.
- Who is he? What's his name?
He has a dozen names and can look like a hundred people.
But one thing he can't disguise.
This part of his finger is missing.
So if ever you should meet a man with no top joint there...
- be very careful my friend.
- Thanks, I'll make a note of it.
- Meanwhile, what are you going to do?
- First, I'll eat my haddock. Then... if you don't turn me out into the street, have a good night's rest.
You're welcome to my bed
I'll get a shakedown on the couch.
Is there anything else
I can get you?
- A map of Scotland.
- Why Scotland?
There's a man in Scotland I must visit next if anything is to be done.
Are the 39 Steps in Scotland by any chance?
Perhaps I'll tell you tomorrow.
Clear out Hannay.
They'll get you next.
What you were laughing at right now is true.
These men will stop at nothing.
There's a man in Scotland I must visit next if anything is to be done.
It is only a matter of days.
Perhaps hours... before the secret is out of the country.
The police would not believe me any more than you did.
I tell you these men act quickly... quickly... quickly.
Good morning sir. You're up bright and early this morning.
- Could you use a pound note, brother?
- What's the catch?
- I want to borrow your cap and coat.
- What's the big idea?
- I want to make a getaway.
- Do a bunk?
- Yes.
- What have you been up to?
I'll have to trust you. There's been a murder on the first floor.
- By you?
- No. By those 2 men out there.
Now I suppose they're waiting for a copper to come and arrest them.
It's quite true. They're spies.
Foreigners.
They've murdered a woman in my flat and now they're waiting for me.
Come off it. Funny jokes at 5 in the morning.
All right, I'll tell you the truth.
- Are you married?
- Yes, but don't rub it in.
- What's the idea now?
- Well I'm not. I'm a bachelor.
- Are you?
- A married woman lives on 1st floor.
- Does she?
- Yes. I've been paying her a call... and now I want to go home.
- Well what's preventing you?
- One of those men is her husband.
- Now do you see?
- Why didn't you tell me before?
I only wanted to be told.
Trying to kid me with a load of tales about murders and foreigners...
Put this on, put on my little hat.
There you are.
- Take the pound.
- No sir, you're welcome to it...
You'll do the same for me one day.
Leave the pony round the corner.
- So long, old sport.
- Goodbye. Thank you.
The empties.
Papers, magazines, chocolates, cigarettes...
There he is.
For one thing. They're much prettier than they were twenty years ago.
- More free, free and easy.
- You're right there...
I can never understand how people used to put up with the old sort... all bones and no bends.
I will say for the old sort they did last longer.
I dunno, mine last about a year.
Here I'll show you.
Big demand for these now.
- The old fashioned sort.
- My wife.
Now take a look at these.
Our new streamlined model no.1
- What I've been talking about.
- Anything to go with it?
I should say so. This. Put a pretty girl inside those... and she needn't be ashamed anywhere.
- Bring it back to me when it's filled.
- I will.
Hello, what's this? Edinburgh,
Waverly. We're getting on.
I hope you'll pardon us for talking business sir.
Certainly, certainly.
- Good day, sir.
- Good day.
- Broadminded old geezer.
- Bet he's very good at charades.
I wonder what won the 2 o'clock at Windsor.
I don't know, let's get a paper.
Say, son, speeka da English?
Dispatch.
- Hello.
- Well, what won it?
There's been another woman murdered in a West End flat.
- What?
- Woman murdered in West End flat.
Oh these sex dramas don't appeal to me. What won?
- Batchelor's Button, 7 to four on.
- Oh, not so good.
Portland Mansions, Portland Place...
By the BBC. That's a nice place to put someone to sleep.
Goodnight everybody, goodnight.
That's a good one. What was she like?
One of the usual?
A well dressed woman of about 35 with a knife in her back...
- The Tenant Richard Hannay is missing.
- You surprise me.
At 7 o'clock this morning, the charwoman Elisabeth Briggs...
- Well if that isn't the blasted limit.
- What's the matter now?
Is there no honesty in this world?
I ask you. The new Bodyline
Rubber Panty Corset... on sale today. McHutchen Brothers,
Princess St... Price 17/9d...
Brassiere to match 4/11 d.
Do you get that?
The bodyline, 1/3d cheaper than our Streamline...
- no use going to Aberdeen now.
- Might I have a look at your paper?
Certainly.
- Thank you.
- That's all right.
There's enough evidence there to hang any man.
What can I do for you sir?
Can you tell me what station the train stops at next?
What do you think I am, a railway porter? Go and find out for yourself.
- I'll tell you a better one presently.
- You couldn't. That was very funny.
Have you heard the one about the young lady of Onga?
I can't remember them all.
There was a young lady of Onga...
- Taking tea, sir?
- Yes. Thank you.
Darling, how lovely to see you.
Someone having a free meal in there.
I'm terribly sorry, I had to do it.
My name's Hannay, they're after me.
I'm innocent. You must help me.
I must keep free for the next 2 days.
Have either of you seen a man passing in the last few minutes?
This is the man you want, I think.
- But when we passed just now...
- He forced me and told me he was.
- Is your name Hannay?
- Are you coming into tea, sir?
I'll be right along.
Pull that cord!
Go on man, down that end.
Get on with it.
- Why did you pull the cord?
- To stop the train you old fool.
It's against regulations to stop the train on the bridge.
- A man jumped off.
- A murderer, we've got to take him.
- Which way did he go?
- He must have jumped off here.
- I can't see him.
- I can't wait here any longer.
There he is getting on the train.
No that's a passenger.
- It's him I tell you.
- Come on then.
Extra, extra!
About 5 foot 10. small moustache.
Last seen wearing a dark suit... but he may have obtained a change of clothing.
- Good day.
- And to you.
- What'll your business be?
- I'm a mechanic looking for a job.
- You'll find no work about here.
- Are there no big houses round here?
Sir Andrews'. He won't want you. He's had the same chauffeur for 40 years.
- I didn't know there'd been cars that long.
- He was coachman when he was a boy.
Oh I see.
What's that?
That's the Manse but the minister hasn't got a motor car.
Are there no newcomers?
- Aye, there's an English professor.
- Professor?
He lives at Alt Na Shallach, the other side of the Loch.
Would that be anywhere near that village?
- It would.
- Thanks. I'll try there.
You won't try tonight, it's 14 miles.
Do you think I could get a lift in that van?
It's bound the other way.
I guess you're right. Could you put me up for the night somehow?
- Free?
- No, I'll pay.
- Aye. Can you eat a herring?
- I could eat half a dozen right now.
- Can you sleep in a box bed?
- I can try.
- Two and six.
- Take it now. Thank you.
Go in with the gentlemen. He'll stay with us until tomorrow morning.
Your daughter?
My wife.
- Will you not come in?
- Thank you.
Here's your bed.
I'll lift these things.
- Could you sleep there do you think?
- You try and stop me.
You'll be tired?
I'll say I am. Out on the tramp looking for a job.
Sit down please, while
I go on with our supper.
Thank you.
- Have you been in these parts long?
- No. I'm from Glasgow.
- Did you ever see it?
- No.
You should see Saughiehall street with all it's fine shops... and Argyle street on a Saturday night with the trams and the lights... and the cinema palaces and the crowds...
- And its Saturday night tonight.
- You don't get those things here.
No.
Do you miss them?
Sometimes.
I've never been to Glasgow, but I've been to Edinburgh, and London...
I'll tell you about
London at supper.
- John wouldn't approve of that.
- Why not?
He says it's best not to think of such places... and the wickedness that goes on there.
Listen now before he comes back.
What do you want to know?
Is it true that all the ladies paint their toenails?
- Some of them.
- Do London ladies look beautiful?
They do. But they wouldn't if you were beside them.
- You ought not to say that.
- What ought he not to say?
I was just telling your wife that
I prefer the town to the country.
God made the country.
Is the supper ready woman?
- May I look at your paper?
- I don't mind.
- You didn't tell me your name.
- Hammond.
Well Mr Hammond, if you'll put down that paper, I'll say a blessing.
Yes, of course.
Sanctify these bounteous mercies to us miserable sinners.
Oh lord make us truely thankful for all thy manifold blessings... and continuously turn our hearts from wickedness... and from worldly things unto thee...
Amen.
I mind I forgot to lock the barn.
There are police cars coming.
You best be going.
- I was so asleep.
- Don't let them catch you.
I'll never forget you for this.
Which way do I go?
I'll show you.
Aye, I might have known...
Making love behind my back...
Get out. And you too.
Get out of my house before I...
- Aye, go go.
- And leave you like this?
- It's your chance of liberty.
- You don't understand...
You're wrong.
She's only trying to help me.
- To bring shame upon the house.
- To help me to escape from the police.
- The police?
- They're after me for murder.
They're here. She came to warn me.
I told her about it last night.
Don't let them in. Say I'm not here.
I'll make it worth your while.
How much? Have you got that much? Give it to me.
After they've gone.
Get back into the bed.
Shut him in. Hide him.
- No not there. I don't trust him.
- But he took the money.
He couldn't resist it, here...
I was right, he's asking if there's a reward if you get catched.
He'll argue a moment before he lets them in. Now's your time.
Your jackets terrible light coloured
I'm afraid they'll see you.
- You best take this one.
- Is this your husband's coat?
His Sunday best one. But never mind. They mustn't see you.
- What about you?
- I'll say I couldn't stop you.
- He'll not ill treat you?
- He'll pray at me. But no more.
What's your name?
I'll never forget you for this.
There he goes.
Spread out in a line.
- Is the master in?
- What name shall I say sir?
He wouldn't know my name but ask if he knows Miss Annabella Smith.
- Would you wait here while I enquire?
- Yes all right.
We better make enquiries.
Somebody might have seen him.
There's been a couple of cars here.
Murderers don't pay calls in cars.
- Good day to you.
- Good day to you.
Have you seen any strangers about this morning?
There's a few callers upstairs now but they're not strangers.
You haven't seen any suspicious bodies outside the windows or at the house.
No sir. There hasn't been anybody near here for the last half hour.
- You're from Annabella Smith?
- Yes.
We're having a few drinks to celebrate my daughter Hilary's birthday.
Give me 5 minutes to get rid of these people and then we can talk.
Come along and meet my wife. Louisa, another guest. This is Mr...
- I forgot to ask your name.
- Hammond.
Mr Hammond. He's come to see me on business, all the way from London.
There's a police inspector at the door. He wants to speak to you.
The door?
All right, all right.
I'll deal with this.
- Take him in my dear will you please.
- Come on...
This is Patricia...
Mrs Bailley.
Hilary my dear this is Mr...
Hammond, just arrived from London.
How do you do. Forgive the orgy, we've all been to church... the sermon lasted 45 minutes.
This is Captain and Mrs Ogilvie.
Have a drink Mr Hammond?
This is Derek, Derek Stewart...
And this is Sheriff Watson.
You've got to be polite to him.
He's our Sheriff substitute.
Scotch for a local beat.
Give you 6 months hard as soon as look at you.
It's all right don't worry.
I've sent them away.
Come and look at the view from this window Mr Hammond.
We're rather proud of it.
Sheriff, when are you going to catch that murderer?
- What murderer?
- Haven't you heard?
The man who stuck a knife into that woman in Portland place.
- He's in the district.
- How exciting, where?
Somewhere about. On the moors, bridge of Orchy or somewhere.
Why don't you catch him?
You wouldn't like me to be stuck in the back with a knife.
It's not my business.
You catch him and I'll convict him.
- Is there a reward?
- Gracious, it's nearly 1 o'clock.
We must get out of here.
The Professor wants his lunch.
There's no hurry. But if you must go.
Pat, ring for Captain Ogilvie's car.
Whenever you catch him you'll find me at the court at 10 every morning... so bring him along.
Louisa, forgive us, Mr Hammond and
I want to have a chat before lunch.
Now Mr. Hannay. I suppose it's safe to call you by your real name now.
- What about our friend Annabella?
- She's been murdered.
Murdered?
The Portland Mansion affaire.
What are they looking for you for?
- I didn't do it.
- Of course you didn't.
But why come all this way to Scotland to tell me about it?
I believe she was coming to see you about some Air Ministry secret.
She was killed by a foreign agent who was interested too.
- Did she tell you what he was like?
- There wasn't time.
There was one thing, part of his little finger was missing.
- Which one?
- This one, I think.
Sure it wasn't this one?
- Lunch is ready dear.
- I'm coming right away.
Well, I'm afraid I'm guilty of leading you down the garden path... or should it be up?
I never can remember.
It seems to be the wrong garden all right.
- What are we going to do about it?
- That's just the point.
What are we going to do about it?
You see I live here as a respectable citizen and you must realise... that my whole existence would be jeopardised if it became known... that I am not, what shall we say, not what I seem.
Oh Mr Hannay, why have you come here?
Why have you forced me into this difficult position?
I can't lock you up in a room. I've my wife and daughters to think of...
I don't know what to think, really I don't...
What makes it doubly important that I shouldn't let you go is... that I'm just about to convey some vital information out of the country.
Oh yes, I've got it.
Poor Annabella would've been too late in any case.
- Well, that's that.
- Yes, well what about it?
- What about what?
- About yourself...
- It seems there's only one way out.
- And what's that?
Supposing I left you alone, with this revolver.
Tomorrow's newspapers could announce that the Portland Place murderer...
- had taken his own life.
- I thought you were coming to lunch...
We're all waiting.
Will Mr Hannay be staying?
I don't think so dear.
Well, what do you think Mr Hannay?
Well I'm afraid you leave me no alternative.
I can't find my hymn book.
Where did you leave it?
In the breast pocket of my overcoat it was hanging here.
John, I'm afraid I gave it to that gentleman who stayed here that night.
Cigarette cases yes, but I've never seen it happen to a hymn book.
This bullet stuck among the hymns.
Well I'm not surprised, Mr Hannay... some of these hymns are terribly hard to get through.
I'm not complaining Sheriff.
"Hymns that have helped me".
That's a good one, Mr Hannay.
That's fine.
And to think I was drinking his champagne only half an hour before.
It's a lesson to us all, not to mix with doubtful company on the Sabbath.
- How did you escape?
- Look out the window and you'll see.
They put... They body in the dressing room.
When I came to I borrowed this suit and pinched his car.
Sheriff, I don't want to hurry you, but oughtn't we to be taking steps?
This is serious you know. If not, you don't think I'd come to you...
- with a murder charge hanging over me.
- Never heed the murder Mr Hannay.
You'll convince Scotland Yard of your innocence like you convinced me.
All I'll need is a short statement I can forward to the proper authority.
I've someone coming over from the police station to take it down.
- Are you waiting to see me Sheriff?
- Indeed I am.
Do you think I enjoy playing for time with a murderer?
- Murderer?
- Certainly.
Hannay, you're under arrest for wilful murder... of a woman unknown in Portland
Mansions, London, last Tuesday.
Take him over to the jail.
You must believe my story, it's true every word.
We're not so daft in Scotland as some smart Londoners think.
Do you think I believed your story about the Professor?
He's my best friend.
Get me Professor Jordan.
Where did that bullet come from?
From one of your pursuers on the moor. Isn't that so?
I had a shot at him myself.
Let me phone the High Commissioner for Canada in London.
You better do that from London.
You'll be there soon enough.
It'll save you the cost of a trunk call.
That's the Professor's car all right.
Hannay must be inside spilling the beans.
- Stop him there!
- My God!
How do you do?
We're all waiting for you.
Pamela's gone to meet you at the station. This way, this way.
...From our respected leader and standard bearer himself...
I welcome this opportunity to discuss with you another question vital... to the import of our country at this critical and momentous hour.
But first of all, as a preliminary to this, I shall occupy your time for...
- You've occupied too much already.
- We've had enough of you!
Ladies and Gentlemen, I will now call upon the speaker of the evening...
Speak out!
There's no need for me to tell you who he is or speak of his record... as a soldier and statesman, a son of Scotland...
- Speak out!
- The border and conquered England... one of the foremost figures of the diplomatic world in London.
I'm therefore going to ask him to tell you something...
And about time too!
Important to this constituency that at this crucial by-election... our candidate should be returned by an adequate majority.
I now ask for Captain Fraser.
Ladies and Gentlemen, I apologise for my hesitation in rising... but to tell you the simple truth
I'd entirely failed... while listening to the chairman's flattering description... to realise he was talking about me.
For you, may I say from the bottom of my heart with the upmost sincerely... how delighted and relieved I am to find myself in your presence here.
Delighted because of your friendly reception, relieved because... as long, as I stand on this platform...
I'm delivered from the anxieties... which must always be the lot of a man in my position.
When I journeyed up to Scotland a few days ago on the Highland Express... over that magnificent structure, the Fourth Bridge... that monument to Scottish engineering and Scottish muscle... on that journey I had no idea that in a few days I would find myself... addressing an important political meeting, no idea...
I'd planned a very different programme for myself.
You'd be for the moors to shoot something.
Yes, or somebody,
I'm a rotten shot.
Anyhow I little thought that I should be speaking tonight in support of... that brilliant young statesman, that rising, the gentleman on my right.
Already known as one destined to make his mark in politics.
Your future Member of Parliament, your candidate, Mr...
- McCrocodile.
- He doesn't know the candidate's name.
I know your candidate will forgive my referring to him... by the friendly nickname by which he's already known in anticipation... in anticipation, mark you...
Westminster.
Now ladies and gentlemen, we'll discuss some topic. What shall it be?
- The herring fisheries.
- Unemployment.
- What about the idle rich?
- The idle rich?
That's an old fashioned topic, especially for me. I'm not rich... and I've never been idle.
I've been very busy all my life...
- and expect to be much busier soon.
- Have you ever worked with your hands?
Indeed I have, and I've known what it is to feel lonely and helpless... and to have the whole world against me... and those are things that no man or woman ought to feel.
I ask your candidate and all those who love their fellow men... to set themselves resolutely to make the world a happier place... a world where no nation plots against nation... no neighbour plots against neighbour... where there is no persecution or hunting down... where everyone gets a square deal and a sporting chance... and where people try to help and not to hinder... a world where suspicion and cruelty and fear have been forever banished!
That's the sort of world I want.
Is that the sort of world you want?
That's all I have to say, goodnight.
- I did what I could for you.
- You're a difficult man to follow.
- I guess you think you've been clever.
- Tell your prisoner not to insult me.
- You try and stop me.
- Come along.
Couldn't you realise I was telling the truth in that train?
You must've seen I was genuine.
Whether you believe me or not... put a telephone call through to the High Commissioner for Canada... and tell him that an enormously important secret...
An important secret is being taken out of the country by a foreign agent.
I can't do it myself because of this fool detective. Has that penetrated?
Right to the funny bone, now tell me another one.
Haven't you any sense at all?
Put that call through...
I beg you refer them to me.
Will you do this?
No. Goodnight.
I beg pardon Miss but we should like you to come too.
- Whatever for?
- To identify the prisoner formally.
Will you come to the police station?
It's only for a few minutes.
All right, if it's absolutely necessary, lets get it over.
Now you...
- Must I sit next to this man?
- It's just a moment.
Well, be as quick as you can.
Isn't that the police station?
You past it.
You must've misunderstood me.
We're going somewhere else.
- Where are we going?
- To Inverary.
- Inverary?
- Yes.
This man is to be questioned by the Sheriff Principal.
- We've orders to take him there.
- But not to take me.
I'm afraid you must go. You'll be sent back at the earliest moment.
- How far is it to Inverary?
- Forty miles.
Will you keep quiet?
We'll be there in less than 2 hours.
I'm not going to spend the night with you all.
Looks like it.
Isn't he going the wrong way?
That's the way to Inverary.
There's a bridge down on that road. We have to go round. He knows the way.
- Might I see your warrant?
- You shut your mouth.
You'll see it soon enough when we get to the station.
Like to have a small bet with me Pamela?
All right I'll have it with you
Sherlock. A hundred to one that... your Sheriff Principal has the top joint of his little finger missing.
What about it?
I win.
Hello. What are we stopping for?
Oh it's a whole flock of detectives.
They're all over the road, get out there and clear them away.
- What about him?
- I'll soon fix that.
There miss, now you're a special constable.
- What's the idea? What do you mean?
- As long as you stay, he stays.
Yes, and as long as I go, you go. Come on!
Stop them!
They've got away.
- Come on, we must run for it.
- I won't.
See if they've gone down that way.
Where the devil can they have gone?
Help!
Let me go, let me go!
Shut up or I'll shoot you first and myself after.
There's nobody down here I tell you.
Then come up here, don't waste any more time. Spread out and find them.
They must be a mile away by now.
Don't do that.
Oh do stop whistling.
Why are you doing this?
What chance have you got tied to me?
Keep that question for your husband.
I admit you're a white man's burden.
I know and I can't tell you what comfort that gives me.
What is the use? Those policemen will get you as soon as it's daylight.
- They're not policemen.
- When did you find out?
You did it yourself. I didn't known that was the wrong road to Inverary.
They were taking us to their boss,
God help us if they ever catch us.
I see, you're still sticking to your penny novelette spy story.
Of the 20 million women in this
Island I've got to be chained to you.
Listen, I'm telling you the truth.
I told you on the train... and after that election meeting. I'm telling you now for the third time.
There's a dangerous conspiracy and we're the only people who can stop it.
Think what you've seen happen right here under your very nose.
- The gallant knight to the rescue.
- All right.
Then I'm just a plain common murderer... who stabbed an innocent defenceless woman in the back... how do you come out of that? I don't know how innocent you may be... but you're a woman, defenceless and alone on a desolate moor in the dark.
Manacled to a murderer who'd stop at nothing to get you off his hands.
If that's the situation you prefer, have it my lovely, and welcome.
I'm not afraid of...
For all you know I may murder a woman a week.
So listen to a bit of advice.
From now on, do every single thing
I tell you to do, and do it quick.
- You big bully!
- I like your pluck. Come on.
We're going in there.
That's my business.
Now remember what I said, the civil tongue, or else...
We're going in there and you will back me up in everything I say or do.
- Has that penetrated the ivory dome?
- Only just.
Pull yourself together now.
Put your hand in my pocket... and look as if you're in a hurry.
Come along.
Come in man, come in sir.
Oh the young lady's terribly wet.
Yes, we had an accident with our car a few miles back.
- Oh, you'll be staying the night?
- Yes.
We've just the one room left with the one bed in it. You'll not mind that?
No, quite the reverse.
- You're man and wife I suppose?
- Oh yes.
- Yes.
- Have you any luggage?
No, we left that behind in the car.
Well maybe I could lend the young lady a nightgown.
Will you please register?
James, the book.
I'll away up and light a fire.
Will you be needing your supper?
No, thank you. Just send up a large whisky and soda and a few sandwiches.
Oh, and a glass of milk.
I can't write with my left hand my dear but I can shoot with it.
You can guess what's in this pocket.
You sign, the sooner you get used to writing your new name, the better.
Off we go, Mr and Mrs Henry Hopkinson
The Hollyhocks, Hammersmith.
Now dearie, off with that wet skirt,
I'll have it dried in the kitchen.
Oh don't bother. It'll dry in front of the fire just the same.
No doubt the gentleman will take care of you. Good night sir.
- Good night man.
- Good night.
Good night.
- Is he married to her do you think?
- I don't know and I don't care.
They're so terribly in love with each other.
I'm going to tell them the whole story.
You want to hang me for a murder I didn't commit?
So long as they hang you.
Let me go! I'm not going to spend the night here?
Of course you are, what else can you do?
Can I come in sir?
Come in.
We were just getting warm before the fire.
I can see that. I thought maybe you'd like this in your bed, sir.
Thank you. You'd like a hot water bottle my sweet?
- Say "Yes darling".
- Yes darling.
- Very well.
- Please don't go!
Why not?
Is anything wrong?
Of course not, she wants to tell you something that's all.
We're a runaway couple.
I knew it all the time, and they're after you?
You won't give us away will you?
Please.
Of course we will not give you up.
Good night to you both.
You'll not be disturbed.
Thank God for a bite to eat.
Come along. There you are.
- What's next on the programme?
- Get these things off.
Right. How are we going to set about it?
Anything in that bag of yours? A pair of scissors or hairpin or something?
A nail file if you think that'd help.
It'll take about 10 years but we can try.
Now let's make ourselves as comfortable as possible.
What about that skirt of yours?
It's still pretty damp you know.
Don't want to be tied to a pneumonia case on top of everything else.
- Take it off, I don't mind.
- I'll keep it on, thank you.
And that, is that.
My shoes and stockings are soaked.
I'll take them off.
That's the first sensible thing
I've heard you say.
- Can I be of any assistance?
- No, thank you.
Fine.
- Here hold this.
- Yes.
Half a minute.
- Thank you.
- Don't mention it.
- Would you like your milk now?
- No thank you. I'll wait a little.
That's better. Now are your feet quite warm again?
- Yes, thanks.
- Well come on.
Will you kindly place yourself on the operating table?
Nobody's going to hurt you.
This is Armistice day.
- Lets get some rest.
- I'm not going to lie on this bed.
You're chained to me, you'll lie wherever I lie...
- we're the Siamese twins.
- Don't gloat!
You think I'm looking forward to waking up and seeing your face?
Unwashed and shiny?
What a sight you'll be.
Give me that nail file.
Lets have a go at this.
Thank you.
I wish I could get that damned tune out of my head...
I wonder where I heard it.
- You sound very sleepy.
- Sleepy! I'll say so.
Do you know when
I last slept in a bed?
Saturday night. Then I only got a couple of hours.
- What made you wake? Dreams?
- What do you mean?
They say murderers have terrible dreams.
Only at first. Got over that a long time ago... when I first took to crime I was quite squeamish about it.
- I was a sensitive child.
- You surprise me.
Used to wake up in night screaming thinking the police were after me... but one gets hardened.
How did you start?
In quite a small way, pilfering from other children at school.
Then a little pocket picking, car pinching, smash and grab... and so on, to plain burglary.
Killed my first man when I was 19...
In years to come you can take your grandchildren to Madame Tussaud's...
- and point me out.
- Which section?
It's early to say, I'm still young.
I'll be in one department or another.
Yes, you'll point me out and say:
"Chicks, if I told you how matey...
I once was with that gentleman, you'd be surprised". What's the matter?
You're pinching my wrist with this handcuff.
Sorry. Talking about Madame
Tussaud's. That's how it all began.
- What began?
- My career of crime... all hereditary,
Great Uncle Penruddock.
Who was he?
Where were you brought up? Never heard of my great uncle Penruddock... the Cornish Bluebeard?
Got it all from him.
I thought your family came from Canada.
No that's where they went after the Penruddock incident.
Murdered 3 wives and got away with it but his third mother-in-law... got the goods on him and tried to have him arrested.
Did she succeed? No.
He was too quick for her.
Took her for a walk to Land's End and shoved her into the Atlantic Ocean.
He's in Madame Tussaud's and there's no doubt about his department.
You must go down to see him sometime.
Can't mistake him...
Third on the left as you go in, red whiskers and a hair lip.
And that lady, is the sad story of my life... poor orphan boy, who never had a chance... are you still set on giving me up to the police?
You're sure everything's going to be quite all right?
Bound to be. He can't have much time.
As soon as I've picked up...
You know what, I'll clear out of the country.
Be careful.
Wire to me.
- Good bye my dear.
- Good bye.
Is that Professor Jordan's house?
Can I speak to Mrs Jordan then?
Is that Mrs Jordan?
Oh, he's gone to London.
I'd like that whiskey hot.
I'll get the hot water.
He dodged down a side street.
The police took the wrong way.
The girl handed him over to us thinking we were detectives.
We had to take her as well because he told her everything.
Very good ma'am, I see.
Yes, ma'am.
- Well?
- The old man's got the wind up.
- He's cleared out already.
- Whatever for?
Thought it too dangerous with Hannay on the loose... he's warning the whole 39 steps.
Has he got the, you know?
Yes. He's picking up our friend at the London Palladium on the way out.
Here's your toddy.
That'll be half a crown.
- And the phone call.
- We'll say a shilling.
- Is this a hotel as well?
- Aye.
- Do you have people staying here?
- Aye.
I suppose you get a few odd people at this time of the year?
Oh, aye.
You didn't happen to have anyone in tonight, did you?
Aye.
They weren't by any chance a young couple, were they?
James!
Mercy me! What kind of a silly creature am I married to?
Want to get us all jailed?
How much did you take for these?
Half a crown.
Out the pair of you. Don't let on that you got a drink here after hours.
You old fool you. You wouldn't have given away a young couple.
Good morning.
What's the idea? How did we get out of these?
You didn't. I slipped out of mine last night... and camped out here.
- Why didn't you run away?
- I did, but as I was going...
I discovered you've been speaking the truth so I decided to stay.
What earthquake caused your brain to work at last?
I overheard those men telephoning.
- What did they say?
- A lot of stuff about the 39 steps.
Go on.
Someone's going to warn them.
How can you warn steps?
Go on.
There was another thing, someone's got scared and is clearing out and...
Oh yes, he's picking up someone at the London Palladium.
The London Palladium?
Is that the Professor? Our friend with the little finger missing.
What does he want to go there for?
I feel such a fool, not having believed you.
Oh that's all right.
We ought to get a move on.
What room are those 2 men in?
No room. They went as soon as they had telephoned.
They what?
- Didn't I tell you?
- You let them go?
- You little idiot!
- Don't talk to me like that.
4 or 5 precious hours wasted.
Why didn't you wake me up?
You should've realised what they said was important.
They've called these men off why not let well alone?
Let well alone? My good girl,
I'm accused of murder.
The only way I can clear myself is to expose these spies.
You still can. He's going to the London Palladium.
First or second house?
I'll get there 5 hours late.
- The show should just about suit you!
- What's that?
Crazy Month!
You're quite right madam.
The Air Ministry has a new thing lots of people are interested in... but they are positive that no papers are missing about it... that would be of any use to a spy.
I'm quite sure. There's a man leaving the country tonight with something.
Since you phoned from Scotland this morning we've made enquiries.
- It's obvious I'm wasting my time.
- Just a moment please.
There's one thing you haven't told us.
Where's Richard Hannay?
I haven't the faintest idea.
- Now look here, you can't...
- You're in the phone book, aren't you?
Well if anything crops up we'll give you a ring. That's all now. Thank you.
Tell Archer and Seagrave to get another taxi and follow that girl.
She'll lead us to Hannay alright.
Cover every exit and on no account let anyone leave the building.
You 2 go in the orchestra pit.
Ladies and gentlemen.
We shall now sing.
No one's allowed to leave the theatre.
Can't a man go out and get a drink?
My seat's in the stalls. I'm looking for someone. May I go through?
She's seen him. She's on her way down to the stalls now sir.
Can I borrow your opera glasses?
Can I take your place please?
What are you doing here?
Listen, he's in that box.
You can't do anything,
I've been to Scotland Yard.
Nothing's been stolen from the Air Ministry.
But you heard those men and there he is.
Shall we take him now sir, or wait until the interval?
What are you going to do?
Nothing's taken and that's the end.
Do you hear that tune? The damned tune I couldn't get out of my head.
Now I know where I heard it before.
That music hall, Annabella Smith.
Ladies and gentlemen... with your kind attention and permission...
I have now the honour to present to you... one of the most remarkable men in the world.
- The same little man.
- Every day... he commits to memory 50 new facts and remembers every one.
Facts from history, geography, from newspapers and scientific textbooks.
Millions and millions of them, down to the smallest detail.
Test him ladies and gentlemen.
Ask him any question...
I've got it. Of course there are no papers missing.
All the information is inside Memory's head.
Mr Memory.
- But I still don't understand.
- Don't you see?
The details of that Air Ministry secret were borrowed and memorised by... and then replaced before anyone could find out. That's why he's here tonight... to take Memory out of the country after the show.
Some gentlemen here would like to speak to you.
A question please, a question please.
- When did Florence Nightingale die?
- What is the height...
- There's something you must know.
- OK, Hannay. Come quietly.
You don't want to cause trouble and spoil people's entertainment.
What are the 39 Steps?
Come on, answer that.
What are the 39 Steps?
The 39 Steps is an organisation of Spies... collecting information for...
Keep your seats.
Keep your seats, please.
There's no need for alarm.
No cause for alarm.
I don't want a chair.
Let me rest here. I'm alright.
Take it easy.
Get the girls on straight away.
The girl's introduction right away.
What was the secret formula you were taking out of the country?
Will it be alright me telling you?
It was a big job to learn it.
The biggest job I ever tackled and
I don't want to throw it all away.
It will be quite all right.
The first feature of the new engine is its ratio of compression... represented by R minus one over R to the power of Gamma.
Gamma seen in end-elevation, axis of the 2 lines of cylinders... angle of 65 degrees.
Dimensions of cylinders as follows.
This device renders the engine completely silent.
- Am I right, sir?
- Quite right old chap.
Thank you sir.
Thank you.
I'm glad it's off my mind at last.
Records indicate most murders result from violence.
And murder without bloodstains like, uh, Amos without Andy-
Most unusual.
Therefore, study of bloodstain evidence... most helpful in reconstruction of crime.
Will demonstrate with eyedropper.
Number one-
Drop of blood falling in straight line from short distance... make round spot, so.
Number two-
Falling from greater distance... exhibit sunburst effect.
But observe.
Drop of blood thrown forward, as from knife held in hand...
make entirely different mark.
Hey, fellas! I got the inside dope!
Put your shirt on Avalanche's nose.
- Holy mackerel! We forgot the Melbourne Sweepstakes.
- Turn on the radio.
Excuse us, Charlie.
This is more important than murder.
But, gee, Pop.
- Sign on door say, "Please knock."
- Did I interrupt something?
Train of thought now need wrecking crew.
Gee, Pop, I'm sorry.
But this is a hot tip!
Hot tip does not explain mystery of shirt on nose of Avalanche.
Avalanche is a horse running in the sweepstakes.
What the kid means is to plank your dough on the nag's schnozola.
All very clear.
Thank you so much.
Any of you fellows gonna bet? I've got three minutes to get to the bookies.
- I'll take a chance. Ten smackers.
- Count me in for five.
- Hey, Mack, loan me two bits, and I'll owe you a dollar.
- Here.
- Want to get in the gravy, Pop?
- Smart fly keep out of gravy.
Aw, Pop, you ought to bet on Avalanche for old times' sake.
Correction, please.
Horse complete stranger.
But the horse's owner isn't.
He's your friend, Major Kent.
Major Kent?
Will become reckless gambler for sake of old friend.
Will bet tail of shirt-
50 cents on, uh, "schnozalola."
Attaboy, Pop!
Here they are.
Gathered to witness the greatest sporting event of the Australian turf... the Melbourne Cup.
There goes the bugle, calling the aristocracy of turfdom onto the field.
The entry list has never been equaled during all the years...
in which the cup has been this country's greatest race.
Number one, Gunsmith, two, Flying Scotchman, three, Stardust, four, Avalanche...
the great Australian four-year-old with Tip Collins in the saddle...
and owned by Mr. George Chester, the internationally-known sportsman from the U.S.A.
Well, there's justice for you.
Your father gives four of the best years of his life to raising that animal... and I grab all the honor.
Do you regret your generous impulse, Major?
Oh, I wasn't as generous as I was clever.
This way I keep everything in the family.
Truthfully, George, did you marry me for myself alone or for Dad's horse?
- Why for the horse, of course.
- Spoken like a gentleman.
- As a friend, I'd advise you to do something about that.
- What can I do?
- Divorce him. Marry me.
- What? Another racing man? No, thank you.
Dad, I barely got our bets down on time.
Did you get the rest of my money placed, Bruce?
- Yes, sir. Just before the odds fell again.
- Good work.
- Will that be all, sir?
- That'll be all until I collect.
If you collect. You seem pretty confident.
I am confident.
Still think your husband's entry will win, Mrs. Chester?
- I bet you a hundred he will.
- I'll take that bet.
- How about another thousand, Denny?
- I'll take that one too.
The horses are reaching the starting gate. Gunsmith has the rail.
Hello, hello, hello.
One of them's cutting up out there.
- Are they off?
- It's Avalanche.
He's certainly living up to his reputation as a bad actor.
- Hold on there. He nearly threw his rider.
- Hey, Avalanche, cut it out!
- And it looks as if he'll be off to a bad start.
- Good-bye, shirttail.
Now they're getting in line. Avalanche has quieted down, and it looks like a start.
It is a start! And they're off!
It's a beautiful start!
Go, Avalanche!
Come on, Avalanche!
Flying Scotchman takes the lead!
Gunsmith, a close second!
Avalanche coming up as they go into the first turn.
Gunsmith closing behind Scotchman.
Stardust, only a length away!
- Come on, Avalanche!
- Come on, Avalanche!
Ace is telling on Flying
Scotchman, Stardust gaining!
- Come on, Avalanche!
- He's gaining!
Flying Scotchman is failing!
Avalanche is coming up!
Come on, Collins!
Ride him! Ride him!
Avalanche is neck and neck with Stardust!
Avalanche has taken the lead!
He's cutting over on the rail!
- Avalanche fouled him.
- Avalanche fouled him!
- Collins must be insane.
- He deliberately threw that race.
Have that jockey report to the office.
Shirttail now bobtail.
Well, anyway, Pop, we were on the best horse.
The cards were just against us.
That's all.
When player cannot see man who deal cards, much wiser to stay out of game.
When he took the lead he fought for the rail.
Avalanche does it almost every time.
You trained the horse, Bagley.
What about it?
He has a slight pull to the left, but
Collins should've been able to handle him.
It wasn't my fault, I tell you.
Avalanche is good enough to win on his own.
You fouled Stardust, and you did it purposely.
- Why? Who paid you to do it?
- Nobody paid me!
Never mind, Major.
That's enough now.
I didn't throw the race!
I wouldn't do that.
You're suspended from further racing for two years.
I'm sorry, gentlemen.
This is no reflection on you, Mr. Chester.
We have no alternative but to disqualify Avalanche.
Well, of all the feather-brained fools
I ever saw, you're it.
A blind man could have seen you pull that foul.
You said to foul him, and I did.
I told you to make it look like an accident.
Here are your tickets on Stardust.
Hey, what is this? I thought my cut was gonna be five grand.
This stuff has to be split too many ways.
That's just fine. For a measly two grand
I get ruled off the track... and you stay here and stuff your own pockets.
I'm only following instructions.
You'll be taken care of.
- I'd better be.
- You will. Now, get out of here and lay low.
There's a gambling ring back of this.
I'm going to get to the bottom of it!
Major, there's nothing we can do about it. I lost. That's all there is to it.
There'll be other races this year.
Avalanche will clean up a fortune.
It's more than a question of money. We're taking our horse to America for the first time.
How do you think this scandal will reflect on us personally?
We've got to clear it up.
- Bruce!
- Yes, sir?
Bruce, cable Charlie Chan.
- Dad, please don't get mixed up in this.
- We're already mixed up in it.
Cable Mr. Chan all the details what's happened.
- Have him meet our boat when we dock at Honolulu.
- Yes, sir.
- Better luck next time, Bagley.
- Oh, thanks.
Of course, you may be right about the gambling ring.
I've been racing horses long enough to know about these things...
and I wouldn't press an investigation if I were you.
Fenton's right. You're playing with dynamite when you start monkeying with those fellows.
I couldn't expect a professional gambler to be in sympathy with my stand.
George, don't let him start anything.
He might make a bad situation worse.
Now, you know your father. Tomorrow we'll all be on the boat sailing for America.
He'll have plenty of time to cool off.
Very odd circumstance.
I don't think there's anything odd about it, Charlie.
It's just unfortunate that your friend met with this accident.
Had cable from Major Kent asking me to investigate gambling ring.
Accident seem most convenient.
Charlie, you've a very suspicious mind.
Suspicion often father of truth.
Well, at any rate, it's in your lap.
The Oceanic will be docking in a few minutes.
You better go down there, see what you can find out.
- Sorry about your friend, Charlie.
- Thank you so much.
- Who is it?
- Steward, sir.
- Were you going ashore, sir?
- No.
You've been cooped up here for 10 days, sir.
- You really should go ashore. It'll tone you up.
- I'm all right.
Maybe you'd like to see the doctor, sir?
I'll get him for you.
I don't want a doctor.
If I do, I'll send for him.
Right you are, sir.
Marks of violence quite evident, Doctor?
The hoof prints are deeply indented in the skull.
The body is still aboard, if you wish to examine it.
All in proper time.
So sorry. Not necessary for ladies to remain.
You and Alice go to the cabin, hmm?
I'll join you later.
Please, can't we get this over with?
- You, uh, major's secretary?
- I was. Yes. I'm with Mr. Chester now.
Excuse, please.
Uh, sometime memory very bad.
Who you say find body?
I said it was
Mr. Fenton's stable boy.
Thank you so much.
You also have horse on boat?
Yes, I'm taking back a new string of horses I bought in Australia.
You intend racing same?
Yes, but I don't see what that has to do with it.
You say you talk with major ten minutes before death?
- Your memory's improving, Mr. Chan.
- Thank you so much.
Can't we end this? Dr. Johnson has made a thorough examination and said it was an accident.
This unnecessary questioning is idiotic.
Easy to criticize, more difficult to be correct.
Will now inspect stall where major meet death.
- Permission, please?
- Certainly, Mr. Chan.
Very strange. Avalanche know major four years...
yet kick him to death.
- Well, he has a bad temper.
- Huh. Friendly now.
You wanted to see my stable boy, didn't you?
Please.
Streamline. Streamline!
Streamline?
Hey, you old Lollipop!
What you all doin'?
Streamline! Where are you?
Here I is, Mr. Fenton.
- Come along here.
- Yes, sir.
Quit that. What's the matter with you?
Now you all stay up there where you belong and mascot with Gallant Lad.
- Yes, sir?
- This gentleman wants to ask you about the accident.
He's a detective.
Is you a cop? My, oh, my!
You remember position of body in stall?
That's just what I'm trying to forget.
This is stall where honorable major meet death?
Oh, no, sir. It happened over yonder.
Yes, after the accident, we moved Avalanche to another stall.
Please.
Where is Mr. Streamline?
Yes, sir?
Here I is.
Where was body?
Body? Back yonder agin the wall lying on his face.
Uh, will, uh, kindly take same position on floor?
I was just-Who? Me?
No, do as he says now.
Would greatly appreciate cooperation.
Me on floor? Could I fix him up a bag of straw or something, Mr. Fenton?
- Do as he tells you!
- Yes, sir.
Somethin' gonna happen to me, I know.
Ain't no good come from playing dead on the floor.
Thank you so much.
Please to stay.
Yes, sir.
Horse in stall always face forward like others?
Yes.
Narrow width make impossible to turn around?
That's rather obvious, isn't it?
Then, Avalanche could only kick backward.
That's the way a horse always kicks.
Thank you.
- Something very strange here.
- You mean me?
Now, what's strange, Mr. Chan?
Animal kick backward, body lie there... yet bloodstains found here.
Observe, please.
Shape like exclamation marks lying down... with pointed ends toward rear of stall.
Is there anything unusual about that?
Yes, very poor attempt at deception.
- May borrow fountain pen?
- Certainly.
Thank you.
Will now demonstrate only manner in which bloodstains could have been made.
Note similarity?
And, uh, what does that get you, Mr. Chan?
Idea that maybe someone stand here... and while major pet Avalanche...
murderer crush skull with heavy weapon... then drag body to back of stall to put blame on noble animal.
This is fantastic and absurd!
There was blood on the horse's hoofs and my examination indicated the man was-
Why, that's Avalanche!
- It's that confounded monkey!
Get him off there! Streamline!
Yes, sir!
Get that monkey down from there before I throw him overboard!
Come here, you Lollipop.
Don't you all know better than to pester with Avalanche?
- Haven't I told you to keep that monkey away from Avalanche?
- It's all right.
I'll give instructions that he be kept tied up for the rest of the voyage.
I'm sorry about this interruption, Mr. Chan...
but you see, Lollipop was brought up with Gallant Lad.
And when I bought the horse, well, I had to take the monkey too.
Perhaps he senses our rivalry, George.
There's your answer.
That's what happened.
Major Kent was in the stall, and the monkey frightened Avalanche... and he kicked the major to death before he could get out.
Very excellent analysis.
Why, the whole thing is preposterous!
I can't have my ship held here for investigation.
That runs into thousands of dollars.
Charlie is usually right when he has a hunch.
Have more than hunch.
- Now, look here, Mr. Chan-
- Excuse, please.
Took liberty of borrowing small piece from boat.
Well, what's that?
Why, it's a part of the clutch control of the winch!
Yes, uh, twin to one missing from cargo deck outside horse stalls.
Observe.
Shape identical with horseshoe blows which crush skull of Major Kent.
Very excellent proof of murder.
That means the investigation will have to continue, Captain.
But can't Mr. Chan go with us, instead of holding the ship here?
What about it, Charlie?
Do you want a sea voyage?
Sea voyage good for health.
Boat sail at 6:00?
Your cabin'll be ready.
I'll pack our bags before you can say, "Jack Robinson," Pop.
Uh, correction, please.
You pack my bag.
- You stay home with Jack Robinson.
- Aw, gee, Pop.
Aloha and good luck.
Thank you so much.
See you later.
Here you are, Mr. Chan.
212. B Deck.
- Thank you so much.
- Yes, Father.
Hello, Mr. Chan.
Well, Mr. Chan, we've been looking for you.
I'm afraid we treated you rather badly this afternoon.
I- I owe you an apology, sir.
All forgotten- like last year's bird's nest.
Does it occur to you the guilty person may have left ship?
Uh, check on passengers at gangplank reveal everyone present.
Well, the idea that the first person we bump into may be the murderer...
sort of gives a fellow the creeps.
What'll be your next move, Mr. Chan?
Make effort to catch murderer.
- For you, sir.
- Well. Will you pardon me?
Listen to this! " Don't enter Avalanche in the Santa Juanita Handicap.
A dead horse can't win a race."
- May I see that?
- Where'd you get this, Bruce?
What? Oh, at the- at the desk.
Time of delivery stamped on back of envelope?
Yes, it seems to be blurred.
Four minutes past 6:00.
That's only 10 minutes ago.
- Uh, may examine, please?
- First they get the major. Now they're trying to scare me.
Look here, George.
Whoever wrote this means business... and Avalanche is too fine a horse to lose through your stubbornness.
I'll give you 20,000 for him and retire him for a year to my breeding farm.
No, this convinces me that the major was right.
I'm going to see it through to the finish.
I'll talk to Captain Blake and insist on an extra guard below.
Most excellent precaution.
Oh. So sorry. May have letter, please?
- Certainly.
- Thank you so much.
Oh, gee, Pop.
How'd you know it was me?
Frequent spanking when young make rear view very familiar.
Why you here?
Well, after you left, Mom decided to take the kids to visit Aunt Ling... at the other end of the island, and I thought-
Uh, you make suggestion about visit?
I- I sort of mentioned it. But, uh-
Cabin boy outfit- disguise?
Oh, no, Pop. This is on the level.
I signed for the trip.
Now look, Pop, if a gambling ring's back of this, it's dangerous... and, well, gee, I'd feel terrible if anything happened to you... and I wasn't along to protect you.
Confucius say, " No man is poor who have worthy son."
Thank you so much.
Then you'll let me help?
Examine, please.
Say!
The top edge is uneven, like it had been cut off with scissors.
Yes.
Writer take precaution to eliminate Oceanic trademark... but forget watermark in paper.
They're the same, all right.
Then whoever wrote this is on the boat.
And look, Pop. The E's are clogged up, and the R's a little above the line.
That means if we can find the machine this was written on, we'll have our man.
Why, it's a cinch!
I can search all the cabins.
One moment, please.
Search only in pursuit of duty as cabin boy.
Must remember obligation to ship.
Okay, Pop. I'll clean every room on the boat if I have to.
One thing more.
As, uh, humble cabin boy, must forget, "Okay, Pop."
Okay, Pop.
I'll never get anywhere as a secretary.
I'm gonna bet every dollar I have on Avalanche.
- Then we'll get married and-
- Bruce, please.
That isn't the kind of marriage I want.
I'd always hoped the man I'd marry would stay away from racing and betting.
- Why, Alice, I never thought that you-
- Don't you see, darling?
That's the sort of thing
I've had all my life.
Dad and I never had a real home.
It was always just one track after another.
But the thrill of racing- the gamble and then winning.
And losing. We never felt sure of anything.
One minute Dad would be on top of the world... and the next, we'd have to borrow money to pay the feed bill.
Bruce, dear, I'd hate to go through that with you.
All right, dear. Santa Juanita will be the last time. I promise.
Beg pardon, sir. The gentleman in 219 wishes to see you.
Oh, uh, thanks. Excuse me, darling.
I'll see you in the lounge.
- Oh! So "solly."
- Hear, hear. Not so fast.
- You're a new boy, aren't you?
- New now. "Velly" soon old.
Ah, smart, eh?
You don't belong up here.
- And what were you doing in that cabin?
- Finish downstair.
Think "velly" smart work hard.
By and by "catchee" more money.
Yeah? You'll catch more than that if I find you up here again. Now, scat!
Scat chop-chop.
- What are you doing here?
- Oh! Oh.
Excuse, please.
Write letter to girlfriend.
Hereafter, write your letters somewhere else.
So "solly" you mad.
Clean up now, chop-chop.
So "solly." So "solly."
So "solly."
- Oh, so "solly."
- Oh, so it's you!
I thought I told you to stay off this deck.
Oh, tell him
I went bottom side, Pop.
I'm awfully sorry, sir.
Did I hurt you?
Stoop to pick up pin.
Bring good luck.
Good luck to that moon-faced cabin boy.
He's a very suspicious character, he is.
And as soon as I get me hands on him, into the brig he goes.
Did you notice which way he went, sir?
Uh, make hasty exit to north.
Right you are, sir. I'll get him.
Psst! Pop!
I found the typewriter all right.
It belongs to Mr. Fenton.
See? The letters are exactly the same.
Most excellent progress.
Well, I guess that's that.
All we've got to do now is arrest him.
Hasty conclusion like toy balloon-
Easy blow up, easy pop.
Don't you think Fenton did it?
You find way to typing machine.
Maybe someone else do same.
Gee, I never thought of that.
Well, what you gonna do now, Pop?
Surprise attack often find enemy unprepared.
That extra guard ought to be on duty by now. I'll step down and check.
- I wish you wouldn't.
- Now, dear, will you please stop worrying?
I've done nothing but worry, George, ever since you received that note.
- I told you not to say anything about it.
- I know. I know.
You stay here with Warren.
I'll be gone only a few minutes.
Can't you persuade him to sell Avalanche to you?
Try and make him do it.
Any progress?
Long road sometime shortest way to end of journey.
- Uh, may borrow cigarette, please?
- Yes, certainly.
This wasn't in my pocket when we left the dining room.
It's another one of those notes.
"A dead horse isn't worth $20,000."
What does it all mean?
It means that someone knows an awful lot about our business.
- May keep?
- Yes, of course.
Thank you so much.
Will make immediate investigation.
Did you notice the way he looked at me?
Do you think he could have put that in your pocket?
No, he wasn't within a yard of me.
The best place for you is in your stateroom.
I'm going down to the stalls and see George right away.
- Left at the post?
- Bruce'll be back in a minute.
- Alone at last.
- Now, Denny, don't tell me I'm the only girl you ever loved.
If Bruce doesn't marry you pretty soon, I will tell you.
- What's holding things up?
- Money. He's so noble. He insists upon waiting... until he can support me in the manner to which I've been accustomed.
- Very foolish young man.
- You mean Bruce?
Foolish to seek fortune when real treasure hiding under nose.
Will you tell him that for me?
Will be most happy.
To show you I'm not the kind to let a pal down... you tell Bruce to consult me hereafter before he bets on a horse.
Oh, won't you sit down, Mr. Chan?
Thank you so much.
The same in these, and make mine Scotch.
- Yes, sir.
- What will you have?
- Uh, sarsaparilla.
- Sarsaparilla, sir?
- Please.
- Very good, sir.
That's dissipation for you.
You are lucky at, uh, horse betting?
I'll say he is.
With all the odds against him... he bet on Stardust at the Melbourne Cup.
- I have good hunches sometimes.
- Play hunch on Stardust?
I suppose you could call it that.
Look, Mr. Chan. Just as I was coming up the stairs, this fell at my feet.
"It's dangerous to know too much about other people's business. "
- Bruce.
- Don't get the jitters.
That sounds like the one George received.
When you see note to Mr. Chester?
Bruce told me about it.
Well, what do you make of it, Mr. Chan?
Make conclusion you talk too much.
- Well, this is for you, Mr. Barton.
- Hmm?
How it came to be on my tray
I don't know.
It was not there when I left the bar.
Well, I got one too.
- They certainly aren't playing any favorites.
"A smart gambler knows a dead horse can't win."
Very interesting.
May keep, please?
Will make immediate investigation.
I'd like to do a little investigating on my own hook, if you don't mind.
Cooperation greatly appreciated.
Excuse, please.
Well, hello, Mr. Chan.
Well, this seems to be for me.
Yes.
"Withdraw Avalanche from the Santa Juanita
Handicap. This is your last warning."
- Your secretary and Mr. Barton also receive mysterious notes.
- What?
Uh, writer seem very generous with threats.
Is that all you've got to say?
Why don't you do something about it?
Rabbit run very fast, but sometime turtle win race.
Well, they're after you too.
What does it say?
Most distressing.
Must give immediate attention.
Excuse, please.
Come back here, you!
Gee, Pop.
That steward nearly grabbed me dropping that last note to Mr. Chester.
Congratulations for most expert delivery of mysterious letters.
Did your scheme work all right?
Did you find anything?
Experiment result in most interesting discovery.
Trouble in the forward hold!
The forwards stalls.
That's where Avalanche is. Come on, Pop.
One moment, please.
You remain here.
Come on. Get these horses out of here.
- What started this, Captain?
- I'm sure I don't know, but it's under control.
It's okay.
It's a lucky thing the fire was discovered in time.
They must be very desperate to endanger an entire ship...
- just to carry out a threat against a horse.
- Contradiction, please.
Person who start fire intend no harm to noble animal.
How do you figure that out?
Fire made directly under automatic apparatus... so heat will set off alarm more quickly before much damage.
Their way of letting me know that they could have killed Avalanche if they'd wanted to.
- Where was the extra guard when this happened?
- He was on duty.
- May, uh, question him?
- Smithers!
- Yes, sir?
- You were where when alarm sounded?
On the cargo deck, sir.
You had instructions to stay in here.
Why did you leave?
One of the booms was squeaking, sir, and made Avalanche nervous.
When Mr. Chester came down, he spoke to Mr. Bagley about it...
- and he told me to fix it.
- That's right.
Smithers.
You also on cargo deck?
No. After Mr. Chester left,
I went to my room.
How long there before alarm?
About 10 minutes, maybe 15.
I don't know exactly.
- Horses alone then?
- Streamline was here.
I told him to keep an eye on them till Smithers got back.
Mr. Streamline?
Yes, sir?
- Yes, sir?
- You were present when alarm sounded?
Yes, sir, but- but I was asleep, sir.
You see, sir, I took me a drink of gin for the misery in my feet...
and, naturally, I go to sleep when I take a drink of gin.
I ought to discharge you!
Next move may be more than warning.
- Extreme precaution now necessary.
- You're absolutely right.
- From now on, you sleep here, Bagley. You understand?
- That's a good idea, I guess.
- You have your gun with you?
- It's in my room.
Well, what good is it doing there?
I thought with this going on, something might happen, so I was cleaning it.
It's on my table, Streamline.
Get it for me, will you?
- It ain't loaded, is it?
- Of course not. And bring the cartridges.
Yes, sir.
Excuse, please.
What did you find, Mr. Chan?
Ghost of matches.
Here are the gun and bullets,
Mr. Chester.
If you ever take another drink on duty, you're-
- What happened?
- Mr. Chan!
- What happened, Captain?
- Get a doctor. Hurry!
- Yes, sir.
- I'm sorry, Mr. Chan. I don't know what to say.
Happy bullet in leg rather than heart.
Thank you so much.
I thought you were cleaning the gun.
You said it wasn't loaded.
It wasn't when I left my room.
- Ten minutes so far.
- Hmm.
You got your gun, Pop?
Make excellent bedfellow.
May enter.
Hello.
I hear you ran into a bullet.
Contradiction, please.
Bullet ran into me.
I'm so sorry. Really, I am.
Sympathy reason for visit?
And to return the mysterious little note that you sent me.
Clever idea, Mr. Chan.
My compliments.
Pleasure to return compliment.
Clever deduction.
Good. And now that you've admitted my ability as a detective...
why not let me in on the secret?
- Whom did you expect to catch?
- Maybe you have answer.
I wish I had. I liked the old major a great deal.
If I can be of any service, just, uh, give me a buzz.
Thank you so much.
Do you think he did it, Pop?
Ocean have many fish.
There it goes.
Man who set fire have
12 minutes to cover trail.
That's right. Now look, Pop...
Bagley said he was in his room 10 minutes when he heard the alarm.
He could have done it, and so could Mr. Chester... because he was there while the guard was outside.
But wait a minute! It might have been that secretary of his too.
Because when I dropped his note, he was coming up from the cargo deck.
You know...
I still think that Fenton's the guy we want.
I could have sworn someone was at that window.
Lee, come back.
Gee, Pop, what are you always stopping me for?
Why don't you give me a chance to clean this case up?
Foolish rooster who stick head in lawn mower end in stew.
Look at you, laid up for the rest of the trip with a bullet in your leg.
I'm not gonna let them get away with that.
I'm gonna find the guy that loaded that gun!
Oh, so it's you, eh?
What's he doing here, sir?
Is he annoying you?
- Very desperate character.
- But, gee, Pop.
What did you say?
Confine to brig, please.
Eagle eye for rest of voyage bring reward.
Right you are, sir.
I'll stick to him like Scotch glue.
Thank you so much.
Move in there and get a close-up.
A little closer, Mr. Bagley.
Mind keeping his head up? Thanks a lot.
All right, hold it.
- Thanks a lot, Mr. Chester. Thanks, Mr. Chan.
- Okay.
- Hello, Mr. Chester.
- Hello, boy. How are you?
- Feeling pretty fine, sir. My leg's almost as good as new.
- Well, I'm glad to hear it.
Say, I'm sorry you lost that race in Melbourne.
I'll bet it never would have happened if I'd been riding him.
That's all part of the game, boy.
Oh, I'm sorry.
This is Eddie Brill, the boy that used to ride for me before I left America.
- This is Mr. Chan.
- Oh, I've heard a lot about you, Mr. Chan.
So pleased.
What about these threats you received on the boat, Mr. Chester?
Avalanche will be under guard day and night, and no one else will be allowed near him.
And I promise you that he will run in the handicap, won't you, boy?
- All right. Take him out to the trailer, Bagley.
- How about you, Mr. Fenton?
Any of those new horses you bought over there show any promise?
Yes, Gallant Lad. I plan on entering him in the handicap Saturday.
Well, what do you think of his chances?
Well, until the winner crosses the finish line... it's anybody's money, isn't that right, Chester?
That's what makes horse racing.
Get down from there!
Whoa! Whoa, Gallant Lad!
Whoa! Whoa! Whoa!
Whoa!
Whoa! Whoa!
Here, Lollipop!
Where you all goin'?
- Confound that monkey! Streamline!
- Yes, sir?
Get that monkey down from there before he gets Avalanche crazy too.
Here, Mr. Fenton.
- Hurry up. Get him off of there.
- Yes, sir.
Behave yourself. You're the "fickliest" fool I ever did see.
Why don't you like your friend
Gallant Lad no more?
Come on. Get going.
Get out of here.
Something very strange.
What, Pop?
Before fire, monkey dislike Avalanche.
Now dislike Gallant Lad.
Say, that is funny.
Not if horses switched.
By golly, I bet that's it.
They could get away with it too.
The horses look enough alike, and they're the same build.
What you gonna do?
Go to hotel, take nap.
Hiya, Bagley.
I thought you were in Australia.
- Yeah, I know you did. What's the new racket?
- I don't know what you mean.
That horse you just put in the trailer ain't Avalanche. That's Gallant Lad.
- Aw, you're crazy.
- Yeah?
You can fool Chester.
He's half blind anyway. But I ain't.
That fire was started on the boat to cover the switch.
Not so loud.
What's the idea puttin' an unknown palooka in Avalanche's place?
- I can't answer that here.
- Okay, where?
Come along with me. We couldn't make a dime betting on Avalanche.
He's the favorite.
The best we could get is even money.
Sure, and nobody's seen
Avalanche in America.
On the boat, the switch is made, and now Avalanche, in disguise... goes to the post a horse no one ever heard of.
Comes in a long shot with big odds.
Catch on?
We're plastering the country with bets from coast to coast at 20-to-1, and we'll clean up.
Boy, that's swell.
You guys can figure me in on that dough.
Aw, you're already in. Well, boys, we've got a lot of work to do.
Lefty, take Collins and get him planted somewhere where he can hide out and get a good rest.
Oh, sure. I know just the spot.
- Have a drink?
- Never touch it.
- Need any money?
- Well, yeah, I could use some.
Took almost all I had gettin' away from Melbourne.
Well, here's a couple of hundred for you.
Thanks, Bagley.
I guess I had you figured all wrong.
- That's all right.
- Let's go, Collins.
So long, fellas.
Good-bye, Collins.
Observe anything unusual during night?
Not a thing. There's no one around this track who doesn't belong here.
Avalanche is guarded so closely, no one could get within a mile of him.
Innocent grass may conceal snake.
Not when you go through it with a fine comb.
Avalanche?
No, Mr. Fenton is giving his horse a workout first.
Well, if I can be of any further service, Mr. Chan-
Grateful for all kindness, Captain Wade.
That's all right.
1:38 and four-fifths.
Not bad.
Well, he'll have to do better than that if he's going to beat my horse.
Mr. Chester, they're bringing
Avalanche out now. Can I ride him?
- I wouldn't take a chance, Eddie.
- Aw, but I can handle him, sir.
- Honest, I can. I've been able to ride for months now.
- Some other time.
Whoa, Avalanche! Whoa!
Steady, boy! Steady!
Hold him! Hold him!
What's the matter with that horse?
What's the matter with that boy?
Why doesn't he pull him up?
- Look out. Look out. Be careful there.
- Come on now, boy. Hold him up.
They're gettin' him all excited, Mr. Chester.
I think I'd better go over there.
Dad, our horse made better time than that yesterday. What do you suppose is wrong?
- I told the boy to hold him back.
- What for?
Because I don't want to advertise what we've got.
The odds will go down.
- That's a secret.
- Uh-oh.
Oh.
Interesting contraption, isn't it, Mr. Chan?
Excuse ignorance.
May inquire nature of strange device?
Oh, that's part of the latest system for timing the races.
Uh, may explain, please?
Well, there's a lamp in here.
This directs a beam of light across the track...
to that little box on the other side which contains a photoelectric cell.
The moment a horse passes through this beam, the cell operates... and a picture of the finish of the race is taken up there...
in the camera-eye booth.
Is possible to see, please?
Certainly. Come right along.
- Hello, Al.
- Hello, Barton.
Got a minute? I want you to meet Mr. Chan, Mr. Charlie Chan.
- Oh, uh, glad to know you.
- Thank you so much.
Have you got time to explain the system, Al?
Mr. Chan is interested.
Oh, sure, sure.
Now to begin with, uh... here's the diagram of the track.
At every quarter mile there's a photoelectric cell.
Mr. Barton already explained.
- Shoot beam of light across track to time horses.
- That's right.
- Say, Avalanche is just about to break.
- Good.
I'll turn this on and show you how it works.
Now, this light was automatically turned on when he went through the first beam.
It also started the timer across the track.
He's coming to the first quarter.
Now watch this light.
- Twenty-three flat at the first quarter.
- Avalanche is sure in form.
Now, if you stand there beside the cameras,
Mr. Chan, and look down toward the track... you'll see that they point directly over the finish line ready to take a picture.
This switch turns on the high-speed movie cameras... and we're now ready to take a picture of the finish.
Here he comes.
He's over. And now the film we just took is being developed in this high-speed developer.
In less than two minutes' time,
Mr. Chan... we have taken an actual picture of the finish and sent it down to the judges' stand.
That's all there is to it.
Perfection of mechanical brain make
Charlie Chan very humble. Thank you so much.
Avalanche appears strangely excited.
Excuse, please.
Pop, I've got it. I've got it!
One moment, please. You disobey instructions to remain here in room.
I wasn't helping any by staying here, so-
So you visit racetrack stables.
Gee, Pop, how'd you know?
Hay do not grow in hotel.
Man who flirt with dynamite sometime fly with angels.
Well, I'm not gonna let you take all the chances.
Look, I got in the stable, and when the guard stepped outside for a smoke...
I took some pieces of cotton and some cleaning solution too.
Reveal black dye on forehead of Gallant Lad... and then white dye on forehead of Avalanche?
Yeah, and there's the proof.
But if they've been switched, how did Gallant Lad... come within one second of Avalanche's fastest time this morning?
There's a screw loose somewhere.
Maybe loose screw here in test tube.
Did you find something, Pop?
Managed to secure foam from mouth of excited Avalanche... after practice race this morning.
Observe.
Bubbles prove foam contain very powerful stimulant for heart.
Today make masquerader run very fast to give appearance of champion.
I've got it, Pop. It's Chester and Fenton in cahoot to cheat the public.
Also possible gambling ring cahooting to cheat Chester and Fenton.
Yeah, but Pop, what are we doing chasing gamblers?
I thought we were after
Major Kent's murderer.
Roots of tree lead in many directions.
Aw, gee, Pop, when are we gonna arrest somebody?
Are you all right, Pop?
Quite all right.
Careful, now.
Man with gun like lightning... never strike twice in same place.
It's sure lucky that curtain went haywire.
Correction, please. Use string.
So.
Arranged simple device to give warning.
Observe.
When window raised, string trips shade and releases same.
- Safe now to sleep.
- Sleep? We've got to do something to stop those birds.
- Have idea to trap birds.
- Okay, Pop. Let's have it.
In morning, you rent
Chinese laundry wagon.
Disguise self as Chinese laundry boy.
Good night.
But that Chinese dick is wise to the whole thing.
Oh, don't get excited. I know every move
Chan's made since he left the track this afternoon.
Suppose he phones the cops, tries to pull something tomorrow?
That's been taken care of too.
The line to his room's been tapped, and Joe's listening to every call that goes in or out.
Suppose you let me handle Chan.
Did you get that timing head finished?
Yeah, and, boy, it works like a charm.
Come on. I wanna show you.
Now, just before the handicap, I replace the timing head at the three-quarter pole... with this phony and load it with this.
So if any other horse is ahead of Gallant Lad, we got nothing to worry about.
All right, here we go.
Lefty, you pull him through.
That ought to stop him.
Sure there won't be any slipup?
Nah, this isn't gonna be operated from any camera-eye booth.
I'm gonna handle it myself.
Well, what's happened, Mr. Chester?
Another threat left at my hotel.
Listen.
"This is your last chance. Withdraw
Avalanche before it's too late."
Lansing, they can't intimidate me.
I'm running my horse in this race...
- and I demand protection for him.
- And he'll get it.
The Association has something at stake too- the confidence of 80,000 people out there...
who depend on us to protect them from racketeers.
Wade, get hold of every available man.
Station them around the track and near the stables.
- Detail two to guard Mr. Chester.
- Yes, sir.
- Mr. Chan been around?
- I haven't seen him.
- Phone him. Tell him to get here fast as he can.
- Yes, sir.
Let's go to the stables.
Have assurance of immediate departure.
Thank you so much.
How do I look, Pop?
What's the matter?
Something happened?
Mr. Chester receive another threatening letter.
I've been thinking this over, Pop, and I'll bet you that Barton guy-
Useless talk like boat without oar.
Get no place.
- Have firecrackers?
- Oh, you'll be surprised.
Correction, please.
Hope someone else get surprise.
Come quick.
Keep moving and not a word out of either one of you. Get going.
Philadelphia can handle two grand on Gallant Lad at 18-to-1.
- Take it.
- Place two grand.
Hello, Chicago.
What are the odds on Gallant Lad?
Let me know when they're 20-to-1.
San Francisco reporting
Gallant Lad at 20-to-1.
- Grab it.
- Place 10 grand.
Hello, Cincinnati, how much can you handle? Five grand.
Oh, so you got him, huh?
- What'll we do with him?
- In there. We'll take care of him later.
Come on.
Better put 'em in there.
I'll take care of'em.
Clever Chinese, huh?
Stuck your snoot in the wrong racket this time, didn't you?
- Hey, what'd he say?
- He say you're right.
Sit down.
Chuck, turn on the radio.
Here's a news flash that has already swept the grandstand... and sent chills and thrills racing through the veins of 80,000 people.
We have just learned that another threat has been made against Avalanche.
But the owner of today's favorite...
in spite of the danger to himself and his horse, refuses to withdraw his entry.
And here's more news, ladies and gentlemen, just received.
The Chesterjockey backs out in the face of danger.
Avalanche is now without a rider.
I'm sorry, Mr. Chester, but I don't want to take the chance.
All right, if that's the way you feel about it.
- Any of you other boys game?
- Not me.
- No, sir.
- Not me.
- I don't want any part of him.
- Not today.
- Gilroy.
- Yes, sir.
If I put one of the other boys on Gallant Lad, will you ride Avalanche?
- No, thanks.
- That's very decent of you, Warren.
- Oh, forget it.
- I just heard about it on the radio, Mr. Chester.
I'll ride him for you. Please let me.
All right, Eddie.
You win this race for me... you'll find $10,000 in your pocket for that specialist you've been wanting to see.
Oh, gee, Mr. Chester, thanks!
It's the most exciting day this track has ever known.
There's mystery in the air, ladies and gentlemen, real mystery.
And here's some more news.
Eddie Brill-
And who doesn't remember Eddie...
when he won the handicap two years ago?
Eddie is going to ride the favorite.
- Uh, may have makings, please?
- Sure, why not?
Thousands are crowding the betting booths.
The odds on Avalanche are less than even money but no takers.
Golden Fleece is next at 3-to-1. Shrapnel follows at four and so on down the line.
Hold Away at 10-to-1,
Moneymaker at 10-to-1...
Court Jester at 12,
Honey Girl at 15-to-1... and, last but not least,
Gallant Lad at 17-to-1.
But I’ve just received word that the odds...
- are falling.
- Get gun.
It is estimated that over a quarter million dollars...
will change hands over the result of this handicap.
This money has been waiting for the feature race of the day.
If any horse should beat Avalanche, it'll be the biggest turf upset of this meeting.
- But who can tell? There may be a horse that can beat Avalanche.
- Lee.
And many are betting that way.
That's what makes horse racing, ladies and gentlemen. May the best horse win.
Ladies and gentlemen, it's almost time...
for the feature race, the Santa Juanita Handicap.
The entries are arriving at the receiving barn for the final inspection.
With Brill up, Avalanche's odds drop again.
Where are you goin'?
Oh, "bling laundly." So "solly," really late.
Make, uh, hurry up, very quick, please, huh?
Go on, but take it easy.
Need three small minutes at receiving barn alone.
When give signal with hat... laundry boy must become center of attention.
Okay, Pop. Be careful.
Just a moment.
Have most important business with honorable paddock judge.
You couldn't get in there now if you were first cousin to the favorite.
Do not claim relationship with noble animal.
Business most urgent.
Now listen, I just told you-
What's going on here?
- I don't know, sir.
- What's that idiot doing?
Very sorry.
Apologize later.
Hey, you!
Oh. Motor in back.
Maybe machine gun, huh?
Hey, you, come on here!
Come out of here!
The timing head at the three-quarter post isn't working.
I'll phone Al.
Hello.
I'll take care of it right away.
Remove dye from head of each horse.
Avalanche is Avalanche, and Gallant Lad, Gallant Lad.
Both horses now run under true colors.
Why, this will force the head of the gambling ring into the open.
It'll hit him in his most vital spot.
Like bumblebee in pants.
Suggest we go to saddling stall.
Out in front, Eddie, and keep him there.
- Yes, sir. I'll be ridin' him all the way.
- Okay, boy.
Valet, hold this horse.
Plan most successful.
Joe, somebody's double-crossed us.
The horses have been switched back again.
Oh, you're crazy. No one could do it but that Chinese dick, and he's here.
Hey, Frank, see if Chan's still in there.
- All right!
- Just a minute.
All right, boys, take it easy now.
You lose before race start.
Come on.
And, at last, the call to the track.
Terry on Number 1, Gringo.
Healey on Number 2, Wild Bill.
Cross on Number 3, Shrapnel,
Thomas on Number 4, Gallant Lad.
Richardson on Number 5, Golden Fleece.
Beaumont on Number 6, Elsie Lee...
And Eddie Brill on Number 7, Avalanche, the favorite, the mystery horse.
Better bring your party in here, Mr. Chester.
- Stand back, please. Stand back.
- Thank you, Wade.
- Hello, Denny.
- Hello, Alice.
They're almost to the starting gate.
I suppose you're certain
Avalanche is going to win.
Sure, we've got it all figured out.
Haven't we, Denny?
Oh, absolutely. The wrong horse wins, he loses all his money.
I get it, and you marry me.
- Yeah.
- Oh. It looks like a start.
They're off!
Avalanche is steadily moving up.
Elsie Lee is crowding him close to the rail.
Avalanche still keeps coming.
Brill is riding with the patience for which this boy is noted.
Richardson on Golden Fleece is using his whip.
He's set the pace, but the stamina of his horse...
is not equal to the terrific speed that Avalanche shows at the half.
Golden Fleece and Avalanche are out together with Golden Fleece tiring.
Avalanche is holding his own with that reserve for which he's famous.
Avalanche is forging ahead. He's every bit the horse they promised us-a real favorite.
Avalanche moves into the lead.
Nothing can stop him now.
It looks as if he’ll establish a track record for the distance.
We couldn't believe this horse Avalanche was as good as they promised, but he is.
He's better. Avalanche is now a length in front. He's got the race in the bag.
There's no doubt about it, ladies and gentlemen. The favorite is still favored.
At the three-quarter-
Something's happened!
He's lost his stride.
Wait a minute. Wait a minute.
He's recovered. He's back again.
He passes one horse after another.
He's almost the real defender again.
He's passed Shrapnel.
He's passing Hold Away.
He's taking the measure of Golden Fleece.
He's still got a chance.
You've never seen a race like this before.
This is the wonder horse of the age, the king of the turf. Here he comes.
He's a horse in 10 million.
Avalanche is giving everything he's got.
He's back with the leaders again.
Golden Fleece falters.
Avalanche is at his quarters.
He's even. They're fighting it out neck and neck. Here they come-
two magnificent animals tearing out their hearts in one last terrific struggle.
There's hardly an inch between them as they shoot down the stretch.
This is a finish that's going down in history. I've never seen another like it.
The final 50 yards. Avalanche literally hurls himself across the finish line.
He's over! Avalanche wins!
He's down!
Wait a minute!
Wait a minute!
Clear the track, everybody!
Everybody off the track!
Come on, Meers. Cough it up.
Who's the ringleader?
Who's been givin' you orders?
- Nobody's been giving us orders.
- You're lyin'.
Look here, I'll talk to the D.A.
We'll make it easy on you.
That wouldn't do any good.
They'd get me just like they got Tip Collins.
Tip Collins? That's the guy they fished out of the ocean at Santa Monica this morning!
Yes?
- The police are here now, sir.
- You can let them come in.
I'll take 'em down to headquarters, Mr. Lansing.
- Maybe we can get more out of'em there.
- Come on.
Look here, Lansing. I object to being held here like this for no apparent reason.
We were rushed off the track so fast I didn't even have time to collect any of my bets.
Won't you be seated, ladies? I'm sorry, but this is at Mr. Chan's request.
- Then where is Mr. Chan?
- Present.
- Oh, Mr. Chan.
- Thank you.
Uh, happy to report
Avalanche and jockey... as son Lee would say, hunky-dory.
Uh, please to sit down.
Warren, did you know that up to 20 minutes before the race...
Avalanche was in your stall disguised as Gallant Lad?
What? Why, such a thing is impossible.
The switch was first made on the boat by Bagley.
- Then why are we all herded up here like a lot of criminals?
- Mr. Chan will explain.
Have here enlarged picture.
Uh, show finish of race.
Observe, please.
Dart in shoulder of Avalanche.
But where did it come from?
Who could have fired it with so many people around?
Explanation here in timing head.
Also pleased to report... person who fire same now in custody.
But I still don't see what we've got to do with it, Mr. Chan.
Perhaps can help, uh, solving fresh mystery.
Dart very evident here... yet strangely absent one moment later... when doctor examine Avalanche.
All present were first to reach side of noble animal.
Someone use cover of excitement to remove dart.
- A polite way of telling us we're going to be searched?
- Have objection?
Not the slightest.
You won't find it on me, Mr. Chan.
Please. Also.
This is nonsense. Now wait a minute.
Dad, please.
We've nothing to worry about.
Here it is.
- Dad!
- Someone put that in my pocket.
I wasn't within six feet of Avalanche.
It was you. You were one of the first to reach him, because I remember-
Just a minute, Fenton.
I see this all very clearly now.
You wanted to buy Avalanche all along.
When I refused to sell, you stole him and substituted your horse.
- That's not true. Dad only made his offer to protect Avalanche.
- The whole thing's ridiculous.
The whole thing is obvious. You're the only one who would have profited by the exchange.
With Avalanche running for you as a ringer at 20-to-1, you'd have cleaned up a fortune.
I guess that settles it, Mr. Fenton.
You're under arrest.
- How dare you say that about my father!
- I'll say more than that.
Your father murdered Major Kent who raised Avalanche... because he would have seen through the switch at once.
He had to be gotten out of the way, so you struck him down...
with a winch shoe to make it appear that Avalanche kicked him to death.
- That's a lie!
- Alice!
Pardon, please.
How you know winch shoe kill honorable major?
- Why, everyone knew that.
- Contradiction, please.
Only three beside humble self knew name of death weapon.
Honorable chief of police... most honorable captain of boat...
and murderer.
You convict self.
Thank you so much.
It's all very amusing, but I think it's carrying a joke a little too far.
Cold-blooded murder no joke.
You and Major Kent frequently quarreled because of your gambling losses.
- Well, what of it?
- Fearing investigation of same... would reveal self as head of gambling ring... you kill honorable major on board ship.
It isn't true! My husband often quarreled with Dad, but he couldn't have done such a thing.
Truth sometimes like stab of cruel knife.
You very clever but make mistake.
On boat in Honolulu when you receive threatening letter... have no difficulty reading same without glasses... because contents familiar.
But glasses necessary to read very legible... time stamp on envelope.
Suspected hoax then, so get corroboration later... when you need glasses to read fake letter... sent by humble self.
Next mistake.
When Avalanche received cruel dart... you make haste to remove same... fearing evidence point to self.
Anticipating search on sudden call to appear here... you put dart in pocket of Mr. Fenton.
I think you'll have a little difficulty in proving that idiotic story.
Contradiction, please.
Proof already in evidence.
Blood of unfortunate
Avalanche.
Take away, please.
So sorry.
Mr. Chan, I have a confession to make.
Have already arranged for you to make same to honorable stewards of track.
- You knew?
- Too bad you did not expose plot... when you first discover switch of horses.
Temptation to cash in most unfortunate.
Mr. Lansing, I will remove my stable from the track at once.
I think that's very wise.
Wait for me, Dad. I just want to say good-bye to Mr. Chan.
I don't know how to thank you, Mr. Chan.
You've done so much for Dad.
Uh, young man win money on race?
Enough to furnish a four-room flat, I guess.
Good wife best household furniture.
Hey, Pop, I've got another hot clue.
Save for next case, please.
Nickie!
What are you doing?
Just practicing, dear.
Will you have a little slice of throat?
You'd better hurry, we're getting into San Francisco in five minutes.
Asta, my best Sunday-go-to-meeting hat!
Darling, don't you want to pack these?
How they can expect a woman to still have any mystery left for a man... after living in a place like this for three days, I don't know.
You don't need mystery. You've got something better and more alluring.
- What?
- Me.
You!
It's all right, we're married.
Darling, you've got to pack.
Yes, that's right. Pack. I must pack.
Are you packing, dear?
Yes, darling,
I'm just putting away this liquor.
If you break that, they can sue you.
Oh, baby, you know,
I'm going to miss this little room of ours.
- It's left some lasting impressions on me.
- Dear, will you pack this?
Yes, delighted.
- You know, I sort of hate to leave this.
- Don't leave anything.
Well, are you gonna wear this dress, dear?
- No, you can put that in.
- That's fine.
- Hey, is Nick Charles in this car?
- Two cars back.
Hello, Nick.
How long till you're detecting again?
That's what we want to know.
I'm through detecting for the rest of my natural life.
Will you keep on with your detective work?
I've retired.
I'll take care of my wife's money so I'll have something in my old age.
You said you'd retired, but you took that Thin Man case.
That was a beaut.
They're still talking about it.
Smile for the news, Nick.
Dig us up another Thin Man, will you, Nick?
That was a great case.
You'd take a case like that, wouldn't you, Nick?
I only took that to please my wife, she wanted excitement.
I guess she had it.
It was wonderful!
Two men tried to kill him.
But he's not going to take any more cases.
You can print that.
That's my darling.
Can you get a big story like that for us Nick?
How could I?
Welcome home, Mrs. Charles.
- Hello, Harold.
- Hiya, Nick.
Hiya, Harold. I'm glad to see you.
So long, Nick. See you around.
- Excuse me, lady.
- Hello, Fingers.
- Well, Nick, how are you?
- How's business?
I quit that racket.
- Nick, look, my purse is gone.
- Darling, isn't that too bad.
- Nora, I want you to know Fingers.
- How do you do?
- This is my wife.
- Your wife?
- I didn't know you were married.
- Yes, I'm married.
Nick, what'll I do? I know I had it.
Don't worry, darling.
It'll turn up, won't it, Fingers?
- Well, I certainly hope so.
- Yeah.
Nick, am I tickled to death to see you.
Good old Nick, and married, too.
- I didn't know you were married.
- Oh, yes.
I'm glad I bumped into you.
- Goodbye, Mrs. Charles.
- Goodbye.
Goodbye, Fingers.
- Come on, dear.
- But, darling, I can't just go off...
We don't want to embarrass him.
- What're you talking about?
- He's a purse snatcher.
- Think of his feelings.
- Then he must have taken it.
- So long, Fingers.
- So long, Nick.
Here you are, dear.
Dear, you do know the nicest people.
- Hello, Nick.
- Hello, Bill!
You can start delivering again.
No, the big kegs.
- Hello, Nick. Where you been?
- Hello. How are you, boys?
- Where have you been?
- Have I been away all my life.
- Have you seen The Kid?
- No, where is he?
- He's staging a comeback Friday night.
- Yeah?
Hey, Screwy. Here's Nick Charles.
- Hello, Mr. Charles.
- How are you? Glad to see you.
- Hello, Nick.
- Hi, Kid. How's it going?
Never better! Say, now I know I can't lose.
You coming to see me fight?
Mrs. Charles would never think of missing your fight.
Mrs. Charles? Did you ever see me fight?
You got a treat, then.
I'm gonna cut that guy up in ribbons.
- If he's not bleeding in the first round...
- You'll have him bleeding? Yeah!
Excuse me, Mrs. Charles.
If my legs will only hold out,
I'll kill the guy, I'll knock...
Attaboy, Bump. You'll get him, sure.
Give it to him hot, eh?
- Sure.
- Okay, Harold.
- Hello, Nora!
- Hello.
Who is that?
You wouldn't know them, darling.
They're respectable.
Isn't it lovely? Home.
So peaceful, so quiet.
If anybody wakes me up for a week,
I'm going to have the law on them!
New Year's Eve at home. Or would you know that this is New Year's?
- I know.
- I suppose you got ideas, huh?
- Very definite ideas.
- I was afraid so.
I'm going to lock the door, plug the bell, cut the telephone... and crawl into bed for a month.
Nora, you're my favorite woman!
Here. I'm going to be in bed at midnight, so Happy New Year.
Happy New Year!
Here. Come in. Give me your hat and coat.
Make yourself at home.
It's our house, all right.
Let's go in. That man said it was all right.
- The bar is right in here. Help yourself.
- Thanks.
- Okay!
- What's the celebration?
We're giving a surprise party for Nick and Nora.
- Nick and Nora?
- Don't you know Nick and Nora?
- No.
- Neither do I.
But that's not going to spoil my fun.
It's New Year's, so what's the odds?
- Go on in. Fake it. It's a cinch.
- Thanks.
Go on in and get some of that
Napoleon Brandy before it's all gone.
Let's get it together, this is supposed to be a surprise party.
- Well, I'm acting surprised.
- Look at that. Not bad, eh?
- Oh, no, not at all.
- How're you doing?
- Anyone wise to you yet?
- No.
- What did I tell you?
- May I have this dance?
If I was in a fire on the third floor, would you save me?
- It's too late for you to be saved.
- I mean it. How would you do it?
I'd just pick you up and carry you right down like this.
Now you save me.
You put her down and you save me.
I'm on the third floor, too.
I'll bet you can't do this.
Now watch me. Here I go.
Not bad.
So when I picked this big lug up, he didn't know a thing.
I taught him everything he knows.
Show them that new arm lock I taught you.
Okay.
Just show him that headlock.
This will kill you.
Say, look, show him how you throw them out in the aisle.
Hello, Nick. Hello, Nora. Welcome home.
We are tendering this little surprise party for the...
Will you keep out of the kitchen?
We are busy.
Where'll I put this ice?
- Lay it down and don't bother me.
- Put it in the sink and break it up.
- Where's the oil?
- There isn't any more.
- Where do you want these?
- Over here, son.
And after that, come back from the store with some olive oil.
- My toast!
- I'll take care of that.
Mr. Charles, what are you doing here?
All right!
Hello there, Mr. Charles.
I'm glad to see you back.
- How are you, Nick?
- Did you enjoy your trip to Los Angeles?
We saw your pictures in the paper.
It said you did a good job in New York.
I guess they'll be scared to death if there are more murders there.
I've been scared to go down in the cellar ever since.
Don't you worry, Rose, if anyone murders you, I'll catch them.
Mr. Charles, don't be talking that way.
What do you think of the party they're giving you?
Looks like we're giving it.
- It does that, now.
- Something's burning!
Excuse me, I'll answer the phone.
That's probably your Aunt Katherine.
She's phoned several times.
She wants you to come to dinner.
Goodbye, Mrs. Charles,
I'll see you next year.
- She expects you, too, Mr. Charles.
- Me?
There must be some mistake.
She wouldn't want you.
No.
What excuse will I make?
Tell her I lost a collar button in New York and we've got to go look for it.
It's your cousin, Mrs. Landis, madam.
Thank heavens it isn't Aunt Katherine.
- Go on, get out of it now.
- Don't worry.
I wouldn't go through that again if you had twice as much money.
Hello, Selma.
Nora, I just wanted to make sure you were coming tonight.
But you've just got to come,
I'm in terrible trouble, please.
No, I can't tell you now, but you must come. I'm desperate...
Selma!
- Whom are you calling?
- Nora.
- I told you...
- I can't help it. L...
There are pills in my bag, take them.
- No, really, I'm all right.
- Take them or I'll call Dr. Kammer.
How are you, Nora?
This is Aunt Katherine.
You ought to know Selma well enough not to pay any attention to that.
You see, it's New Year's Eve,
Aunt Katherine.
- The old battle-axe.
- Shut up!
Excuse me, Aunt Katherine,
I was talking to the dog.
- But, Aunt Katherine...
- Give me that phone.
Give it to me.
Yes. All right. We'll come.
Nickie, I'm sorry. But I had to do it.
Selma's in trouble.
You like Selma, don't you?
Well, not that much.
Family dinner, I suppose?
Aunt Katherine, Uncle Willie...
Cousin Emily.
Aunt Hattie, Cousin Lucius, Uncle Thomas.
Pour me one, too.
Thanks.
Well, Asta?
Why are you looking so down in the mouth?
Have you got family troubles, too?
For heaven's sake, do you want the servants to hear you?
I don't care. I'm going crazy.
I can't stand it any longer.
- I'll call the police.
- You'll do nothing of the sort.
We've paid enough to hush up his other scandals.
He never did anything like this before.
- How do we know whether he...
- I told you I'd handle this.
- I can't go on!
- Quiet!
Beg pardon, madam, but should I remove Mr. Robert's plate?
- Certainly not. Mr. Robert will be here.
- Very well.
- You know he won't be here.
- I know nothing of the sort.
Now go upstairs and make yourself presentable. Go on, hurry.
Hurry now, because everybody's waiting.
- Good evening, all.
- Good evening, Aunt Katherine.
I had a birthday last week, Katherine.
I'm 83 years old.
- What do you think of that?
- That's fine, Lucy.
- Next year I'll be 84.
- Splendid.
Now we're alone. I have something important to tell all of you.
What did she say?
Isn't that thing working, Hattie?
This works beautifully.
It's you, you mumble.
What is it, Katherine?
Nora and her husband are coming tonight.
- Katherine, after the last time?
- But, Katherine...
- Her husband?
- That person.
But you said yourself you wouldn't have him again.
I know I did.
And my opinion of him and what he represents hasn't changed a particle.
Then why did you ask him?
I have a very good reason for asking him, which you will know in time.
That must be they now. Understand, now,
I want you all to be pleasant to him.
- Of course, if you say so.
- It's going to be difficult.
Poor Nora, my heart bleeds for that child.
If that's Mr. And Mrs. Charles, show them right in.
Yes, madam.
What are you muttering to yourself?
I'm trying to get all the bad words out of my system.
Good evening, Henry.
Is this the wax-works?
- Sir?
- Nothing, Henry, nothing.
I'll leave my things down here.
Don't worry, it isn't catching.
Thank you, sir. Walk this way, sir.
Well, I'll try.
Nickie, pull yourself together.
One squint at Aunt Katherine would sober anybody up.
Mr. And Mrs. Charles, madam.
Hello. How do you do, my dear.
Hello, Aunt Katherine.
You remember Nick?
How are you, Nicholas?
- Hello, Cousin Helen.
- How are you, you poor child?
This is Nora's husband.
I think you know everybody.
Yes, I seem to remember the old faces.
Dear, I want you to meet Uncle Willie.
Poor Nora is so brave.
- Uncle Willie, my husband.
- Uncle.
And, dear, this is Aunt Hattie.
- How are you?
- Don't mumble, young man.
How are you?
- She's deaf.
- You're telling me.
What did she say?
When you hear the chime it will be exactly...
- Selma, how are you?
- It's so good to see you.
Hello, Nick. Thank heavens you came.
Selma, what's the trouble? Tell me.
We'll postpone any discussion until after dinner.
- Where's your husband?
- Yes, where's Robert?
Robert telephoned that he was unavoidably detained.
So we'll start without him. Are you ready?
We haven't quite men enough around, so,
Lucius, will you take Hattie and Charlotte?
Willie, will you take Helen and Emily?
Burton, will you take Nora?
Nicholas, you will take Aunt Lucy.
Come on, Selma.
What was it you were going to tell me?
Nora, come here!
Just a minute, Aunt Katherine.
What was it?
- Robert has disappeared.
- Disappeared?
Selma, go on playing.
I can't go on playing.
Nonsense, go on!
I can't! What are you trying to do, torture me?
How can you act like this when you know what she's going through?
- Get Nicholas.
- You bet I will.
No, really?
Well, you amaze me.
Will you explain that point a bit further?
Well, I wouldn't go as far as to say that.
What's that?
Just a moment.
Really?
Well, now, surely you're not going to let that pass unchallenged, are you?
You must have something to say to that.
That's the boy. I knew you had it in you.
Nick, come here.
- Oh, yes.
- Hurry!
If you gentlemen will excuse me.
I don't know when I've spent such a stimulating evening.
What is it?
- Aunt Katherine wants to speak to you.
- What have I done now?
Do you know why
Robert wasn't here tonight?
- Sure, because he's smart.
- I'm not fooling, darling, he's disappeared.
That's swell. Now if we could just get Aunt Katherine to disappear...
Here he is.
Nicholas, I'm sorry to take you away from the boys.
That's quite all right.
- How long has Robert been gone?
- Three days.
Three days without a word.
- Have you notified the police?
- Certainly not.
- And we're not going to.
- Oh, no.
Robert may have been kidnapped.
He may be lying dead somewhere.
But we mustn't do anything about it.
Our precious name might get into the papers.
Don't pay any attention to her.
She's exaggerating the whole affair.
However, to please her, I thought you might investigate the matter quietly.
- With your experience as a...
- Flatfoot.
I didn't mean to be blunt as that.
What's the difference? It's all in the family.
- Have you any idea where he might be?
- Yes.
- He's with some woman, I know that.
- Selma, you know nothing of the sort!
What about the vanity case they sent me from that Chinese restaurant?
That was a stupid mistake on their part.
Mistake? He's with some woman, you know it.
Selma, you know Robert worships you. He wouldn't...
How can you say such a thing when you know that he hates me?
He only married me for my money!
He never did love me.
Sometimes I wish he were dead!
I'm just a little confused.
Do you want him back or don't you?
- Nick!
- Why, of course she wants him back.
- Selma, don't, please don't.
- I'll leave this in your hands, Nicholas.
If you'll excuse me,
I'll go back to my guests.
Don't worry, darling.
It'll be all right. Nick will find him.
The one sure way to get him back is to cut off his money.
- I know.
- Well, if he doesn't show up before... tomorrow morning, I'll go down to the police and see what I can do.
- Thank you, Nick.
- Mr. Graham calling, madam.
- David, Happy New Year!
- David, how are you!
Nora, nice to see you.
Thank heaven you two are back.
Selma, how are you, dear? Any word yet?
- I'll tell you what.
- What?
Let's take David and sneak out. We'll go somewhere and celebrate the New Year.
Hey, that's a good idea!
How about it, Selma?
Come on, it'll be like old times, when we were all engaged.
Yes, before we made any mistakes.
What do you mean, "mistakes"?
- I was thinking of Selma.
- Come on, Selma.
Thanks, I want to stay near the telephone, you know, just in case... You go, David.
No, not on your life. I'll stay here with you.
Well, then good night, dear.
- Try to have a Happy New Year.
- Yes.
- Happy New Year.
- Very Happy New Year, Selma.
- Good night, David.
- Good night.
- Come, we'll say good-bye to the family.
- It will be a pleasure.
Look what I found.
- Iced and everything.
- Don't you stay here, David.
- You go out and have some fun.
- Don't be silly, we can have fun right here.
What's the matter with me, anyway?
Why haven't I any pride?
Why can't I face it?
Robert doesn't give a hang about me.
Can you indefinitely go on caring for someone who doesn't care for you?
Well, it's been done.
David, I'm so sorry. I've been such a fool.
You really ought to hate me for what I've done to you.
Don't talk like that. Look, you get the glasses and I'll try to open this thing...
No, we're going out. This is a new year, the time for resolutions.
I'm through with Robert, I mean it.
I'm going to get my things.
We're going to celebrate!
We'll start the New Year right.
- What is it, Henry? The telephone? Has it...
- No, madam, it's Mrs. Forrest.
She would like you to join her in the drawing room.
All right, Henry.
I guess it's no use.
- Please go, David.
- Now, Selma.
No, I'd rather you did, really. I'll go to bed.
Dr. Kammer's given me something to make me sleep.
All right, I'll go.
- Good night, Henry.
- Good night.
Darling, you will try to find Robert, won't you?
- I didn't lose him.
- It'll get you in right with Aunt Katherine.
- That's what I'm afraid of.
- Oh, Nick...
- David. What happened?
- Selma sent me away, wanted to be alone.
I could murder that Robert.
Wait till I tell you about the newest thing he pulled on me.
He called me several days ago... and told me if I gave him $25,000... he'd clear out and leave Selma for me.
- Lovely boy.
- What did you say?
Well, I didn't know exactly what to say.
I asked him to give me several days to think it over.
$25,000 is cheap if he'll really go.
Why don't you get up a collection?
I know a lot of people who would be glad to contribute.
Poor girl, it was bad enough with Aunt Katherine and Robert...
- now she's got that Dr. Kammer.
- Who's Dr. Kammer?
I don't know, he's some nut psychologist.
Sits around and talks about her dreams by the hour.
I get the creeps every time I look at him.
Harold, we want to go someplace and get the taste of respectability...
- out of our mouths.
- Okay, Nick.
- I don't think I can go.
- David, why not?
I've got too much on my mind, I guess.
I'm glad you're back, anyway.
- Happy New Year.
- Happy New Year, David.
Selma was a fool not to have married him instead of Robert.
Well, they all can't be as lucky as you are, darling.
What have you got to offer, Harold?
There's Tim McCrum's, and there's the Lichee... and there's the Tin Dipper.
- Is the Lichee a Chinese restaurant?
- Yes'm.
- Me no lookee for Robert.
- The Lichee.
The Lichee.
Not now, baby, I gotta make a change.
I'll be right back.
- Well, make it snappy.
- Waiter, bring Mr. Landis another drink.
Hello, Dancer.
Say, what's the idea?
You better not leave that guy.
- These shoes are murdering me.
- Don't be long. He might get restless.
Say, I'm getting pretty fed up with him.
You can turn him loose tomorrow.
Yeah? Tomorrow's a holiday, the banks will be closed.
Yeah, that's right.
Well, the day after, what's the difference?
Is it worth it?
Come on, make it snappy.
I'll keep an eye on him.
- Polly! Polly!
- Sorry, Sonny, I'm busy.
- I got a message for you.
- Well, what is it?
- Your brother's looking for you.
- Well, let him look.
- So that's the way it is, huh?
- Phil, don't try to start anything...
- I'm in a hurry.
- You've been in a hurry since I got back.
Can I help it if I gotta work?
That ain't what I'm kickin' about.
What's going on with this drunk?
- Nothing.
- What's this?
Give me that. What are you trying to do, drive me nuts?
Shut up, or I'll smack you right in the teeth.
- I'm in on that, you know.
- Now, Phil, after all...
- If you don't cut me in, the party's off.
- I can't cut you in.
- It's yours, ain't it?
- Yeah, but...
- But what?
- Now listen, Phil, don't spoil my makeup...
- I got another number to do.
- So that's the way it is, eh?
You big lug.
- Now, how am I gonna explain that?
- There are a lot of things... you'll have to explain before I'm through with you.
Phil!
What are you doing?
Shaking her down again?
- What's that to you?
- Why don't you lay off her for a while?
- She's busy.
- I know.
- What do you know?
- A few things that are going on here.
Smart boy, eh? You know things.
When are you going to start shaking me down?
When I want to shake you down...
I put up with you because you're Polly's brother, but don't... think you can ride too far on that ticket.
Now stay away for a couple of days.
My, what big confetti they throw here.
Get out of the way, you big clown.
- Well, that's more like it.
- Too bad we didn't bring Aunt Katherine.
- Oh, Mr. Charles. How are you?
- Hello, Dancer.
Neat way you have of tossing your customers out.
His sister works here.
I just get tired of him sometimes.
- I felt a gun under his left arm.
- Just breaking it in for a friend.
I want you to meet my partner.
This is Lum Kee, Mr. Charles.
- And Mrs. Charles.
- How do you do?
- I'm your friend, you bet you.
- You sent his brother up, remember?
- Lum Yung?
- Oh, yes.
He's the one who spread out some tong differences to include a bank stick-up.
You bet you. You catch my brother.
You play trick on him.
No play trick on him, no catch him.
You bet you. Is he still in?
You bet you. For five years more.
Excuse, please.
Is he a gunman, too?
No, but you never can tell how close brothers are.
- Thought you might like to know.
- Thanks.
He's a great guy to have liking you.
This way, Mrs. Charles.
- Many customers tonight?
- Oh, yes.
We always do a pretty good business, you know.
Follow me.
- Oh, Nickie, there's Robert!
- Yes, I know.
Why didn't you tell me?
- Why, Robert! Where have you been?
- Well, fancy meeting you here.
Why haven't you sent any word to Selma?
She's almost crazy with worry.
She ought to know better by now.
- Nicholas!
- How's it coming?
Fine, up till now.
Sorry I can't ask you to sit down.
That's all right. I'll ask her.
Nora, won't you sit down?
So, she sent the great big detective to find me.
I have a table for you across the room,
Mr. Charles.
I think you'll be more comfortable there.
I'm sure they would.
I'll be over in just a minute. Thanks.
Why don't you call Selma and tell her you're all right?
- Well, don't exaggerate, just call her.
- You can tell her... when you go back to report on me.
Tell her I'm having a swell time.
I'm not going back unless I have to.
And I don't think I'll have to.
I'll be delighted to tell her that.
Well, you'll forgive us... if we tear ourselves away?
Dancer seems a bit anxious.
Hello, Handsome.
Is he a friend of yours?
On the contrary, a relation.
He's been hanging around here for three days, drunk.
Got a case on our prima donna.
I wish you'd toss him out.
His wife's going crazy.
That's too bad. I'll speak to his girlfriend.
- Well, I've done my duty.
- I wonder what's up?
- Up where?
- Up there.
- Where?
- There, and it comes out here.
Scotch. Probably.
- His relatives just blew in.
- What'll we do?
Give the customers one more song and knock off for the night.
Take him to your place and keep him there.
Okay.
- Nickie, what time is it?
- It's 11:35.
- And our first New Year's alone.
- Hello, Nick.
Maybe I was wrong.
- Hello, Joe.
- Hello.
Excuse me, lady. Say, Nick,
Willie the Weeper's outside, see?
- When did he get out?
- He got out this morning. He's on parole.
According to rules and regulations he ought to be mingling... with some respectable people, see?
I thought you had a nice table here, see? Maybe...
- By all means.
- That's fine, you're a gent!
Hey, boys!
- Everything all right, Mrs. Charles?
- Everything's all something.
You needn't worry about Mr. Landis.
Polly's going to see he gets home all right.
- Thank you.
- Waiter, no check for this table.
- Anything they want is on the house.
- Yes, sir.
- I can't let you do that, see?
- But I insist. You're my guest.
Come on, boys.
This'll mean a lot to Willie, see?
- New Year's Eve and everything, see?
- All right, if you insist.
It's mighty white of you.
Meet the rest of my party.
- How are you?
- Gentlemen, be seated.
- This is Willie. You remember Willie.
- How are you? Glad to see you.
Likewise.
I am honored to be at your coming out party.
- Nora, this is Willie the Weeper.
- Delighted.
Likewise.
- And the boys.
- How are you?
How do you do?
- Do you boys know Dancer?
- I don't want to know him.
He's a crumb.
Don't say that, boys. He's giving the party.
- Everything's on the house.
- Yeah?
- That right?
- That's different. Why didn't you say so?
- Drinks and everything?
- Sure.
- Champagne, boys.
- Me, too.
Sure, champagne. Willie?
- Scotch, with a champagne chaser.
- Likewise.
Well, what do you say?
It wouldn't take much to make me leave this town for good.
We could have a lot of fun on $25,000.
What's the use talking about that?
You haven't got it.
Don't worry, I'll get it.
- When did he say he'd let you know?
- Tomorrow.
There's my number. I gotta go on.
Listen, go and call him now.
Don't let anybody hear you.
If he says he'll give it to you tonight...
I'll blow with you right away.
We got time for one more song, folks, before the New Year.
Miss Polly Byrnes will sing a new number for you, Smoke Dreams.
- Where's he going?
- Getting his hat and coat.
Say, get me mine, will you?
Boy, you can certainly pick them.
I never seen such a guy. Every time I meet him he's got another good-looking gal.
- We haven't met for years.
- Oh?
When he gives you the sack, let me know, will you?
I certainly will.
- She's hot looking, ain't she?
- Shut up, you lug. It's his wife.
See?
- Have you made up your mind?
- All right, I'll give you the money.
Tonight? I can't give it to you tonight.
I have some bonds that I was...
Of course they're negotiable.
Now, wait a minute. Just a minute.
That's a lot of money.
How do I know you'll keep your promise?
How do I know you'll really stay away?
And, even if...
Selma does decide to get a divorce, how do I know you won't fight it?
All right, forget about it. I'll go on home.
Selma will be tickled to death to see me.
I'm at the Lichee Club. All right,
I'll meet you there in a couple of minutes.
Don't keep me waiting, though.
I might change my mind.
You know, it's all to the good, them seeing him here plastered.
But we can't take a chance on them tipping off his wife and having her bang in.
- Make it snappy.
- Okay.
We want Polly! Where's Polly?
We want Polly.
We want Polly, see?
We come here and spend all this dough, and what does she do?
She sings one song and quits.
Now, boys, she had to run along.
- Thanks.
- Glad to be of service.
That's what you get for coming to a dapper joint like this.
Do you think she'll really take him home?
She'll take him somewhere, I'm sure.
What do you mean?
Did I ever tell you that you're the most fascinating woman... this side of the Rockies?
Wait till you see me on the other side.
I said to him, " You ain't gonna give me a ticket, you big flatfoot...
"and you know it," I said. " I got the right to turn there, you know it," I said.
"I ain't got all night to be sitting here gassing. Go polish your buttons...
"leave me be on my way, you fat palooka," I said.
I know, and then you busted our plan.
All right, thank you, Mr. Galahad.
You'll keep your promise?
You don't mind if I go home for 10 minutes?
- What for?
- Don't worry...
I won't see your precious Selma.
I just want to get some clothes.
Ten minutes shouldn't matter to a man who's waited as long as you have.
Well, ta-ta.
I'm worried.
I'm going to phone and see if Robert got home.
I don't care whose wife she is.
I don't like a dame that gets noisy after she's had a few snifters.
- Don't you think I'd better?
- All right. But hurry, it's almost 12:00.
I'll be right back.
Here, get on that phone and stay on it, hurry.
Well, that settles that.
Never mind, they don't answer.
I told her to take him straight to her place.
Mr. Landis?
Yeah.
I wanted her to get him in shape so he could go home.
Mr. Landis on phone.
I hear him say he go home.
He did? Good.
He's a relative of Mr. Charles.
I felt sort of responsible.
I think I'll go out and get some fresh air in one of my lungs.
Back in a minute.
Robert?
Hello, Selma.
- How are you?
- Where have you been?
Why do you do these things?
I've been going crazy.
- There, there, darling.
- No, I won't this time. I won't forgive you.
You're not going to make a fool of me again.
All right, darling. I only came for a moment to get some clothes.
- Where are you going?
- A little trip.
No, you're not.
I won't have it. I won't!
Want to kiss me goodbye, darling?
Thank you.
Selma, what's happened?
He was going away and I tried to stop him.
Now, Selma, listen to me. Now listen.
I want you to go back to the house.
You've never had a pistol, you understand? You hear me?
You've never been out of the house tonight.
You don't know anything about this.
Understand?
Now, come on, hurry.
Happy New Year, everybody!
Happy New Year's...
Oh, excuse me.
I guess there must be some mistake.
Oh, no.
In the dark, and my wife said that she'd be right back...
- and of course l...
- Oh, yeah?
Excuse me. Happy New Year.
Happy New Year to you, too.
Nora, darling, sugar. Happy New Year.
Nickie, you're bleeding.
Yes, a little accident.
I know, this New Year's traffic is terrible, isn't it?
Yes. Have you made any
New Year's resolutions?
Not yet. Any complaints or suggestions?
- A few.
- Which?
Complaints.
- All right, shoot.
- You don't scold, you don't nag.
- You look far too pretty in the mornings.
- All right, I'll remember.
Must scold, must nag, mustn't be too pretty in the mornings.
Happy New Year, baby.
Say, what are you doing here, anyway?
Still trying to call Selma.
Well, what is it?
Come on, I'll find you a phone.
Hello, Dancer. Come in.
Once a gumheel, always a gumheel.
Well, I don't like gumheels.
I thought you'd quit it when you married a pot of money.
Did he call me a pot?
You know I don't like to be critical,
Dancer, but... you know, it doesn't look quite right when you and your partner... and your prima donna and your best customer... all go out at the same time.
Gives the place a sort of vacant look.
Have you ever been thrown out of a place, Mr. Charles?
Let's see, how many was it up to yesterday, Mrs. Charles?
Well, how many places have you been in, Mr. Charles?
Hello, Aunt Katherine? This is Nick...
I mean, Nicholas.
What?
Oh, yes, I will.
Well, now, if you're through in here...
Polly, another of our travellers, has returned.
Now if only...
No sooner said than done.
Quite a gathering of the clans.
I wonder which one of you would be more surprised if Robert Landis... were to walk in here right now.
Of course, you know that couldn't happen, don't you, Dancer?
I don't know what you're talking about and I don't care. Now get out of here.
- What is it, Nick?
- Robert's been killed.
- Killed?
- Get out of here.
No, on the contrary.
We're going to have a lot more people in.
- Give me that phone.
- Certainly.
- See?
- You better go. Selma may need you.
Hello, this is Nick Charles speaking...
I want to get hold of Lt. Abrams of the Homicide Squad.
Why are you calling him?
It's a cinch none of us shot Landis.
Maybe to explain how you knew he was shot.
Hey, what are you doing there?
How did Mrs. Landis and her husband get on together? Any fights, any arguments?
- No, sir.
- Mr. Abrahams...
- how dare you question my servants?
- Lady, a man's been killed.
- I got to find out who did it.
- Surely, you don't think...
How do I know what to think if nobody will tell me anything?
Did you hear anyone leave the house after Mr. Landis left?
Certainly not.
- Will you please let him talk?
- Mr. Abrahams...
My name is Lt. Abrams. Well?
No, sir.
- All right, I'll see you all later.
- Obviously just a holdup.
A holdup?
With that bracelet and those bonds left on him?
Henry, will you show Lt. Abrahamson out?
Lady, I'm not going until I see Mrs. Landis.
Now look, I can't help it if you don't like me. I'm just doing my duty.
I tell you Mrs. Landis cannot see anyone.
- She's under the care of a doctor.
- What's the doctor's name?
Dr. Kammer.
- Dr. Adolph Kammer?
- Yes.
- So that's the way it is.
- Precisely.
I'm sorry to inconvenience you,
Lt. Abrams.
Okay, Doc.
You're willing to take the responsibility of not letting me talk to her?
Sir, it's not a question of responsibility.
Mrs. Landis has had a very great shock.
It was necessary to give her something to quiet her nerves.
- Can she talk to you in her sleep?
- When'll she be awake?
Not for some hours.
Do you often have to give
Mrs. Landis things to quiet her?
Okay, Doc. Check that off.
- Then is she crazy?
- You're insulting.
Lady, I've seen this guy three times in my life... and all three times he was on a witness stand testifying that someone was nuts.
First there was that Mrs. Jerris.
Then, the Darrow woman.
- By golly, she shot her husband, too.
- Too?
What right have you to say a thing like that?
In view of that very definite accusation,
I think that you should... insist that your attorney is present at any future interviews with the police.
Anybody's tongue is liable to slip.
Lt. Abrams, hurry...
Nick's waiting for you down at the Lichee Club. He's got them all there.
What's happened?
- He knows. He'll tell you everything.
- I hope somebody can tell me something.
- Where's Selma?
- She's sleeping. She's not to be disturbed.
I won't disturb her.
But I want to be there when she wakes up.
Well?
I don't think that as yet there is any reason for alarm.
Selma?
They're going to arrest me.
They're going to arrest me, aren't they?
- No. Of course they're not, dear.
- They all believe I did it.
Aunt Katherine, the doctor, all of them.
- No, Selma, they don't think that at all.
- I heard them. I know.
- Now, darling.
- But I didn't kill him. I didn't.
I'm sure I didn't.
- You'll help me, won't you, Nora?
- Why, of course, darling.
But you'd better lie down now and get some rest.
They gave me some pills, but I didn't take them.
- You should have, dear. You need to sleep.
- No, I can't. I can't.
- I've got to think. David.
- What about David?
He thinks so, too.
- He must think so or he wouldn't have...
- He wouldn't have what?
Oh, nothing. You tell him I didn't.
- Tell him I didn't do it.
- Darling, couldn't you telephone?
No. Someone might be listening.
No, you go to him.
- Tell him I didn't do it. Hurry!
- All right, I will.
This is your news reporter speaking.
The old year was hardly out when death...
struck savagely in the slaying of
Robert Landis, wealthy society playboy.
Mystery surrounds the shooting...
It's I, Nora.
Hello. This is a surprise. Is Nick with you?
What's the matter?
Just let me sit down.
Don't you know what's happened?
No, what?
Well, first, Robert was killed.
- He was killed?
- We saw him at the...
David, look!
That's the brother of the girl who was with Robert!
Don't let him get away, he might know something.
I'll get him as he comes out the alley.
Not so fast, buddy. Mr. Law speaking.
Get inside there.
Who you got in there with you?
Hey, you. Just a minute, get out of that window.
What are you trying to do, make a getaway?
- There was someone on the fire escape.
- Where is he?
- He's gone now.
- All right then, come on, let's get going.
- This lady is...
- I know all about this lady.
I've been trailing her ever since she left the Forrest house. Come on.
- Where are we going?
- We're going to headquarters.
There must be some mistake,
I'm Mrs. Nick Charles.
And I'm Mother Goose!
Step on it, girlie, let's go.
I've been trying to tell you for the last half hour none of us had anything...
Shut up, Dancer.
If I want more of your chatter,
I'll ask for it. Let her talk. Go on.
- I took him home like Dancer told me.
- Did you hear a shot?
Well, I heard something, like backfire from an automobile.
It was foggy and I was too far away to see anything.
I thought I'd better get out of the neighborhood... if I didn't want to get into trouble.
Why don't you ask her what she was too far away from?
From wherever it was it happened.
If I hadn't been too far away, I would have known what it was, would I?
Well, l...
- I give up.
- All right, Dancer. Where were you?
I went out to get some air.
What city ordinance does that break?
- I went with him.
- Where did you go for all this air?
Air pretty much same everywhere.
We go in my car. Ride around.
- Ask chauffeur.
- Riding around?
New Year's Eve, the place is jammed and you two are riding around.
Hey, where do you think...
Just a minute, do you know who I am?
I came here to see a client.
This is important business. Listen to me.
- You can't do this to me.
- Hey, lay him down.
Hello, Casper.
- He's our lawyer.
- I knew there'd be some shyster around.
- Well, what is this?
- Do I know?
So a guy comes in and buys a drink.
He goes out and somebody kills him.
What are we supposed to do?
Give customers insurance with the drinks?
Not a bad idea.
I didn't recognize you, Mr. Charles.
Remember me, Floyd Casper?
Yes, how are you?
Always kidding.
Why, Abrams, you don't think that these people would have anything... to do with a thing like that?
Why, I've known this lad since...
- Save that for the D.A. You got a gun?
- Sure. And a permit.
You?
If you want to take those, we'd like a receipt.
Tell that shyster to shut up or you'll go to the Hall of Justice.
- On what charges?
- Witnesses. They ask them questions.
Your clients spend nine-tenths of the time doing it.
Take these down and check them with the bullet that killed Landis.
- Hold it a minute. You. You got a gun?
- No.
What did you do with it?
I never had one.
Nobody has anything, nobody knows anything.
All right, go ahead.
Miss Byrnes has a brother who has a gun.
And my chauffeur tells me that he hung around outside... until just about the time she and Landis left.
If he was there, he was hanging around waiting for me.
He wouldn't kill Robert, Mr. Charles.
He wouldn't have no reason.
I'm not accusing anyone. I'm just talking.
I think you ought to find him.
At least he might give his version... as to why Dancer threw him out.
If that rat tries to hang anything on me, I'll...
- Leave my brother out of this.
- Take it easy.
They want to get you at each other's throats.
Answer what you wanna and don't let them get you.
- I can't stand that shyster.
- I was beginning to suspect that.
- Did you call me, Nick?
- No, not yet, Harold.
But you ought to stick around.
Outside. It's pretty close in here.
Where is this brother of yours that didn't kill anyone?
He lives in a hotel on Turk Street.
I don't know just where.
Don't know much of anything, do you?
I honestly don't know which hotel.
Phil is always moving.
Does he have to move every time he don't kill someone?
Don't be so funny! You got me in stitches.
Stay where you are, everybody.
Get that switch!
I'll get it, Nick.
Hello.
Hello. What?
Can't hear you, so much noise going on around here.
Headquarters?
This is Nick Charles speaking.
Take it easy, will you, fellas,
I can't hear a thing here.
Dancer just got away. Yeah.
Tell the boys to pick him up, will you?
It's all right, Nick, I got him.
Wait a minute, my chauffeur thinks he's got him.
The old Gotch toe hold.
Hello. No, it's Abrams he's got.
Harold, you better let him up, he may not like that.
Say, what's the idea?
- Take it easy, lady.
- Let go of me, will you?
What do you think you're doing?
Lights went out. You want me to stand out there while Nick might be in trouble?
- What was the shooting?
- I guess it was me.
Did you get him?
I thought it was him coming through the door. It was only me in that mirror.
And I want...
I want to have a description of that brother of yours.
What're you picking on Phil for?
What about Mrs. Landis killing him?
Maybe she found out we was going away together.
Maybe she found out about that Graham giving him the bonds.
- Don't talk till you get legal advice.
- You're their lawyer, not mine!
How do I know you won't leave me holding the bag.
We're getting somewhere.
Pick up Mrs. Landis, doctor or no doctor.
- We're going down to headquarters.
- You can't do that!
What's the idea, anyway?
No.
All it sounds like to me is they picked up my wife in a man's apartment.
- Say it again.
- That's it. That's what she says.
- I've never seen your wife myself.
- Let me talk to him.
Graham. David Graham. Hold him? Okay.
- Why, this is all crazy, that can't be Nick.
- It's him, all right.
- Tell him it's Nora.
- She says to say it's Nora, Mr. Charles.
Nora?
No, sounds like a phony to me.
Better throw her in the fish tank till I get down there.
- Right.
- Well?
- Throw her in the fish tank.
- What? Why...
- Throw her in the fish tank.
- Why of all the...
Will you open this door or will I kick it in?
What did I tell you about horning in on somebody else's game?
All right, Matron.
How do you do? I'd like to get this gal out of the woman's tank.
Oh, yes. Is this the one that was doing the fan dance?
- Fan dance?
- Yes.
- If it is, she's been holding out on me.
- Hi, there. Say, are you a lawyer?
Did Mr. Feinberg send you?
Keep quiet! Who are you looking for?
Bail us out of here.
- Do you see her?
- No, I guess she isn't here.
Nickie, here I am. Excuse me.
Wait a minute. Wait. Excuse me.
- What?
- Here I am.
Well, this is a fine way to start the New Year.
Get me out of here.
How long has this thing with David been going on?
Stop. Get me out of here.
I've something to tell you.
- About the case?
- Yes.
I'll get you out on one condition.
No more detecting, no more cases.
Promise?
But this is important.
- Never mind.
- Nick!
- Well?
- I promise.
- All right, let her out.
- Come on, miss.
- Are you Mrs. Charles?
- Yes.
Lt. Abrams wants you for questioning.
- Questioning?
- Yeah.
Don't worry, darling.
I'll write to you every day.
- Were you and Landis on good terms?
- Decidedly not.
- On bad terms?
- Very bad.
- You and Mrs. Landis were once engaged.
- That's right.
- Until Landis came along?
- Yes, sir.
Ever ask her to divorce him and marry you?
- I may have. But she never said she would.
- But you hoped she would... and you thought that with him out of the way she might.
- Now look, I didn't kill Robert.
- Did I say you did?
- But you did pay him to go away.
- Yes, I did.
Let them in.
Will you please sit down, Mrs. Charles.
I have to ask your wife a couple of questions, Mr. Charles. I'm sorry.
- That's quite all right.
- Now, Mrs. Charles... why did you go to
Mr. Graham's apartment?
- Why...
- Perhaps I'd better leave.
Why, Selma had a silly idea that David thought she killed Robert.
She wanted me to go and tell him that she didn't.
Now, wait a minute. I can't imagine her thinking a thing like that.
That's ridiculous,
I haven't seen her for two days.
- Will you come in, Mrs. Landis?
- Dear, sit down.
David, I didn't want you dragged into this.
Mrs. Landis, why did Mr. Graham think you killed...
I never said that and I never thought it for a minute.
It's all right, David.
You have every right to think I did it.
He's just trying to protect me.
He heard a shot, came running up to me and...
Just a minute.
What were you doing there?
I wanted to make sure that he kept his promise to go away.
Okay, go on.
He rushed to me and found me standing near Robert with a gun in my hand.
But the shot came from around the corner, from in front of me.
You mean you didn't...
No. Look at the gun, David, it hasn't been fired.
Selma, forgive me.
It's all right, David. Of course I forgive you.
Well, that's all settled. Come on, Nora.
Goodbye, Lieutenant. Goodbye, all.
Now, wait a minute.
Maybe, he believes you.
He's in love with you.
But I got to have something more than that. Where's the gun?
- I've got to see that gun, Mrs. Landis.
- I haven't got the gun.
I gave it to David. David, where's the...
- What is it, David?
- Selma, I thought you were guilty.
I thought I was doing the only thing...
I threw the gun away.
You threw the gun away?
This is the craziest case.
But they can find it.
I can tell them exactly where I threw it.
I'll send divers down for it and...
They've got to find it!
She don't want that gun back anymore than you do.
Swear out a warrant for the arrest of
Mrs. Landis on suspicion of murder.
- Get some whiskey.
- Yes, sir.
For both of us.
And that goes for you, too. Go on.
What did you say?
Did you say something about scrambled eggs?
No, darling, you must have been dreaming.
Are you hungry?
No, why?
You want some scrambled eggs, dear?
- I can fix them for you if you want them.
- No, darling, I don't care for any.
- Sure?
- Really.
- Good night, dear.
- Good night.
After all, if I want scrambled eggs
I can get them for myself.
Of course, I'm not as good a cook as you are.
Don't bother about me.
You go right on sleeping, darling.
I love to watch you sleep.
You look so cute.
Nickie, have you any pictures of yourself taken as a baby?
- No.
- That's a shame.
I want to see what you looked like.
I'll have some taken in the morning.
Poor Selma, poor David.
Nickie, can you reach the water?
Can you reach the water?
No, I just... I don't want it.
I just wanted to be sure you could reach it.
Come on. I'll scramble those eggs.
If you can manage the bread,
I'll whip you up some scrambled eggs... that'll be a poem.
- I'm so glad you're hungry, too.
- Here, chase this.
No, this. Go get it.
Eggs, milk, butter.
Now, what's the matter?
I'm thinking of poor Selma down in that jail.
Don't worry.
Tomorrow they'll find the gun... and it won't have been fired and Selma will be set free. A bowl.
- Then you don't really think she did it?
- No.
- Now, where's the salt?
- Over there.
You're not saying that just to make me happy, are you? You really mean it?
- No.
- No, what?
No pepper.
- It's there next to the salt.
- Thanks.
Then, what?
- Yes, I mean it.
- Of course you're right.
She didn't do it. She couldn't have done it.
I don't think I'd kill you if you ran off with another woman.
- Well, that's something to look forward to.
- I might, though.
Do you mind, sugar?
- Don't forget to shut the gate.
- Nick, what was it?
It was a stone.
Look, it's got a note tied to it.
Silly little woman.
I told her to stop writing me.
Asta, drop that.
Asta, drop that, that's a clue.
He thinks we're playing.
Nickie, come help me.
- Look at him.
- Where is he?
Over there.
- Has he got the N-O-T-E?
- Yes.
Don't pay any attention to him.
Just be nonchalant.
- Asta!
- Darling, let me, just a moment.
Asta.
Come here, this minute.
Do you hear me? This minute.
Never mind me. Get him!
Yes. Asta!
- Did you get it?
- Got the rock.
- Nick, he's eating it up!
- Asta.
Here, look! Pretty rock.
Get the pretty rock. Here, boy.
Asta, look. See the pretty rock.
When he runs after the rock, you grab the paper.
Get it, Asta. Get the pretty rock.
That's a good doggie.
I have it.
"Mr. Charles...
"Phil Byrnes, alias Ralph West...
"is a ex-con...
"and was married to Polly in Topeker...
"three years ago.
"He lives..."
What are we to do, send them an anniversary present?
Nickie, phone Abrams.
And have him here, keeping us up all night?
Don't you see? If Phil is her husband, then he shot Robert... because he found out about him and Polly.
Nickie, you must phone.
- Just as you say.
- Here, you.
Bad Asta. You swallowed that address.
How could you?
And I've been boasting about what a smart dog you were.
Just for that, you sleep outside.
Nickie?
I don't think Mr. Charles wishes to see anyone.
You just tell Mr. Charles I'm here, that's all.
Good morning, Peters.
Mrs. Charles couldn't sleep, so I'm up.
- Good morning, Peters.
- Good evening, madam.
Good evening? Why, it's only 6:30.
- Yes, sir.
- It's still dark.
It's dark again, sir.
You slept right through the day.
- Was it a nice day?
- A dreadful day, madam.
The reporters and the police were trying to get up here.
- I guess we didn't miss a thing.
- Quick, the morning papers.
- The morning paper's not out, madam.
- Not out yet?
- These are the evening papers.
- Oh.
Here you are.
It doesn't seem right, the evening papers with breakfast.
If you hadn't wakened me, we'd have slept right through till morning.
Mr. Charles, there's one of those policemen outside the door now.
- What shall I do about it?
- Show him in.
He probably wants to question
Mrs. Charles again.
It doesn't say whether they've found the gun.
Oh, I forgot. I'm mad at you.
Look at him prancing around with that clue in him!
Hello, Mr. Abrams.
- Good morning.
- Good evening.
Yes, good evening.
- Will you have some breakfast?
- Thanks. I just had dinner.
I give up.
- Have they found the gun?
- No.
Oh, Nick.
Will you convict her if you don't find it?
Maybe I do and maybe I don't.
It's what the D.A. Thinks.
What about the other guns?
Dancer's and Lum Kee's?
They're.38s, like he was killed with.
But the experts say they're not the guns that did it.
$50 will get you $250 that she didn't do it.
You'd have to say that, you're family.
But that Lichee gang has got the best out in the world.
They wouldn't have killed him until they cashed his check.
- His check?
- I forgot, you didn't hear about that.
No.
He gave Polly a check for $20,000 yesterday.
Robert never had $20,000 in his life.
Yes, he did. I went to the bank to see about it. Here it is.
His wife put this in his account... just a few days ago.
It looks all right.
Have you any of his checks?
- I got all of his and they're okay.
- I want the ones he gave to Polly.
Here's the first one for $75.
- $75, that's better.
- Here's the next one for $100.
$100. Going up, huh?
Perfect.
- Forgery.
- Let me have the big check.
Let me see. I've never seen a forged check.
There you are.
- How will you have your eggs?
- Where's your phone?
- It's on the table between the beds.
- I can't see anything!
- Where's the rest of this phone?
- It's in the drawer.
Hey, nice doggie. Will you tell him
I just want to use the phone?
Now behave yourself, will you? Look out.
I don't understand, the signatures look exactly alike to me.
- That's just it.
- That's just what?
Nobody writes this much the same, twice.
They traced these signatures from his first check.
Hello. Hello, Joe?
Go down and pick up that Polly Byrnes for me.
Okay.
Do you want this thing back in the drawer?
No, that's all right.
Will you call this bloodhound off, so I can get out?
Asta, come here.
Don't you know Mr. Abrams is on our side?
What's the matter with you on this case?
You're losing your grip.
Get Dancer yet?
He showed up as soon as it was light.
Had a story about not wanting to be around when the shooting started.
Him without his gun.
- What about Phil? Found him?
- No.
Somebody threw this through our window, last night.
- Where's the rest of it?
- Asta ate it.
- Polly said it was a hotel on Turk Street.
- That's right.
Say, do you want to give it a try with me?
Yes, if you'll give me a few minutes to dress.
Yes, you wait downstairs.
We'll be right down.
Hey, wait a minute.
- Where do you get that "we" stuff?
- I'm coming with you.
Not cured yet, huh?
Certainly not. Don't worry, darling.
I won't be in the way.
Why, of course you won't.
I just want to make sure.
Nick! You dog!
Let me out!
You stay here in case he tries to make a break.
- Is Phil Byrnes in?
- We ain't got no Phil Byrnes.
- Have you got a Ralph West?
- Yes.
- Is he in?
- I don't know.
Any way of finding out?
Walk upstairs if you want. Room 212.
Get on the back stairs.
Telegram for Mr. West.
After you, my dear Lieutenant.
Dead, all right. Strangled.
And beaten up some before the strangling set in.
Someone's hair in his hand.
Watch out.
A pair of spectacles.
I'll have the boys phone, we'll give this room a good casing.
Here's another.38 for your experts to match up.
I guess the heater is his, all right.
He's wearing an empty shoulder holster.
I guess this is the key to that Byrnes girl's apartment.
It's got her number stamped on it.
Another good guess would be that Selma Landis didn't do this.
Fair enough.
But he wasn't killed the way Landis was.
Tell me what your laboratory says about that hair and those cheaters.
- Okay. Anything else on your mind?
- Yes, that key.
- Could I borrow it for about an hour?
- Sure.
How about your skeleton key just for good measure?
All right. Say, what are you looking for?
I haven't the faintest idea. Just a hunch.
This is straight from the feed bag. They just found Phil's body strangled to death.
Say, that's tough.
Polly's gonna feel bad. Thanks.
- Polly in yet?
- No. Police here, looking for her.
Stall them. Keep them here.
I'm going up to her place. I'll be back soon.
Get out there.
Wait, brother.
Say, what is this? Bank Night?
Flash news bulletin.
A body believed to be that of the janitor
was found in a hamper...
in the basement of 346 White Street.
Police link this murder with
the Landis killing.
Read all about the big murder!
Sorry to have to ask you to come to a place like this, but...
Is it Nick? Where is he? Is he hurt?
No, he's all right. He's upstairs.
I called you here because... we found the janitor's body here.
Been dead about 24 hours.
Shot near the phone, there.
The telephone company tells us that about
7:30 last night, just before he was shot... someone here called up information and asked for Nick Charles' number.
Mr. Charles doesn't remember this Pedro Dominguez...
- and I thought perhaps you might be...
- Pedro Dominguez?
He was my father's gardener, about six years ago.
- A small man with a mustache?
- Yeah, that's the one.
Hello? Just a minute.
Call for you, Lieutenant.
Would you mind going down and taking a look, just to make sure?
Certainly not.
- Would you take Mrs. Charles...
- Right.
Hello.
Those glasses you found in Phil Byrnes' place are nothing but window pane.
The hair is false and the gun is not the one that was used on Landis.
You're a great help.
Did you find out about the fingerprints in his room?
Dancer's, eh?
Well, that helps a little. No others? Okay.
Get to work on this case. And take a look at the bullet that killed this guy.
Thanks.
Funny you didn't recognize this Pedro Dominguez.
Why, does Nora know him?
Yeah, he used to be her father's gardener.
Remember him now?
Who ever remembers a gardener unless he squirts a hose at you?
- Hold this a minute, will you?
- What is it?
You'll see in a minute.
Think Mrs. Landis might know this Pedro?
- She might.
- And that Aunt Katherine?
Possible.
What do you think you're doing?
There it is. Hold that, will you?
Well, what do you know about that?
A ladder.
Sure.
$50 will get you $250 that... it just reaches down to Polly's apartment below.
With this left over for good measure when he got there.
- Let's try it.
- Sure.
All right. This end first.
How about it?
- You're right.
- Yeah.
What did you find out about the person who was here?
Not a thing, not a fingerprint in the room, not a stitch of clothes, nothing.
Anything in Pedro's books?
Just that someone named Anderson took it a week ago, paid cash in advance.
That's all, huh?
There's a record of a new lock on the door.
Bought it yesterday.
Wait a minute, what does the card on the door say?
That won't help you much.
No, just Anderson. No front name.
No Mr., Mrs., or Miss.
Isn't that just dandy?
- If we found out who took this place...
- I took this.
- You took what?
- I took this picture.
I found it in Pedro's apartment.
I wanted to show it to you.
You see, he was our gardener.
These are the servants we had down at father's place.
There's Pedro, and Rose...
- and there's Annie...
- Yes, darling, that's just fine.
I'm sure that Lt. Abrams will be very grateful.
What do you think we ought to do?
Bring them all here.
Everyone mixed up in the case.
- Let's see what we can get.
- You're on.
Going to take him tonight?
We're going to try.
Let's get something to eat. I'm thirsty.
How are you going to do it?
I don't know. I'm going to look, listen, and pray that somebody makes a slip.
Just one slip.
- Did you get them all?
- They're coming.
- Selma.
- Take her upstairs.
What is it? What does this mean?
Darling, don't worry.
Nick will fix everything.
I wish I were as sure as she is.
Figured out anything about the setup here?
- A little.
- What's your plan?
Build up a case against each of them.
Throw everything we've got, hard enough to bounce.
I'll make it bounce, all right.
- Wait a minute.
- It's all right, let him in.
- Nick, have they found the gun?
- Not yet.
- Selma's upstairs.
- She is?
- No talking, now.
- It's all right, I'll go up with him.
- David.
- Now, none of that.
No, no siree.
What about a few more chairs.
I'll keep my eye on them.
Sure, Mr. Charles.
Busybody.
Thank you, Nick.
This is outrageous, bringing us to a place like this.
Break. That's fine.
- They're all here, Miss Forrest just came.
- Good.
You didn't ask Aunt Katherine?
I thought we'd return her hospitality.
We owe her something after last night.
I'm going to get myself a box seat.
Now don't get so fresh!
Take your hands off me!
All right, I just wanted to see if you had a gun.
That's a new name for it.
Just wait until you boys ask me to do another benefit for you.
All right, inside.
Say, is that Mrs. Landis?
Yes, would you like to meet her?
No, thanks, I've had enough of that family.
How are you, Lum?
I got restaurant to run, no time for this.
If you're worried about the place,
I'll have it closed up for you.
Dancer... we almost ran into each other earlier this evening.
That so? Too bad I missed you.
Then it was you. Thanks, I wasn't sure.
- Where's Casper?
- His phone's out of order.
Why don't you send a messenger?
What's wrong?
Shut up you. Cut out the chatter.
Well, Nicholas. I might have known that you were at the bottom of this.
Come right in, Aunt Katherine.
How much more of this nonsense have I got to endure?
We hope this'll be the last.
Aunt Katherine, sit over here.
Yes. This must be Dr. Kammer.
I've heard so much about you, from David.
Won't you come in?
Sit down, just find a chair.
I asked you all down here because... we found another murder had been committed here.
He's a man I think you all know.
Pedro Dominguez.
Pedro, killed?
- Yeah, don't you read the papers?
- I was in the jug.
- What do you know about him?
- Nothing.
I only saw him a few times when I went to pay my rent.
What about you? You're in and out of here, you must've known him.
Sure, I know him. So what?
And you?
I never been in this house before.
You?
I had nothing to do with it.
I'm here to attend Mrs. Landis.
You're here to answer questions.
Did you know him?
No.
- You knew him, Mrs. Landis?
- I knew him?
Yes, you remember him, Selma.
He used to be our gardener at Ross.
David, you remember him?
Was he the man with the long, white mustache?
- Yes, what did you know about him?
- Nothing.
That was six years ago.
I haven't seen him since.
What about you?
I can't see what possible connection this can have with us.
You don't? Well, I'll tell you.
Pedro and Robert Landis were both shot with the same gun.
Some monkey business was going on here that we want to find out about.
You tell her, Mr. Charles.
Yes, with pleasure.
It seems that one week ago...
Pedro rented this apartment to someone calling himself, or herself...
Anderson.
- Did you ever see this Anderson?
- No.
- Ever hear him up here above you?
- No.
I thought not.
He was rather clever and ingenious, this Anderson.
Always wore gloves, never left a fingerprint.
He intended, with the aid of this ladder... to crawl down into your place some night and polish Robert off with this.
Then he was going to climb back up here, unscrew the ladder... throw that out the window on a dump heap down below.
Then walk quietly out leaving you holding the bag for Robert's murder.
Do you know anyone who thinks enough of you to do that?
Why, no.
- You're Dancer's girl, aren't you?
- I work for him.
That's not what he asked you.
Well, we got an understanding.
Did Dancer know you were going away with Robert?
Why...
Go on, you told us before.
You promised you'd keep that a secret.
I'll never trust a cop again.
Now listen, if you've made a dicker with the cops, okay.
But that ladder stuff's a lot of malarkey.
No one did come down that ladder, and Landis wasn't killed in her place.
The only reason he wasn't killed in her place... was that Anderson was found out.
Pedro came in here yesterday to lay a new rug.
He didn't like the looks of things, so he changed the lock on the door.
When Anderson came in, he found that he was locked out.
Then he heard Pedro telephoning me downstairs.
- And he shot him.
- So what?
So, who is Anderson?
I'll bite, who?
- Polly, Phil had a key to your apartment.
- Yes.
- And so had Dancer.
- Yeah.
- What about Lum?
- No, of course not.
- Anybody else?
- Nobody.
What do you think I do, go around stuffing them under doors?
He's trying to hang this murder on us to protect his family.
If the janitor didn't think everything was okay, why didn't he call the cops?
Why does he call you?
Because it's a family affair.
She knocked her husband off.
Everyone knows that.
- I didn't.
- Yes, you did.
Then you got that lug to throw away your gun.
- It isn't true.
- That's a lie.
- Now, Mrs. Landis.
- Mrs. Landis.
You knew your husband and Polly were friends, didn't you?
- No.
- But you knew there was a woman.
- Yes.
- You knew this Pedro?
Lieutenant, suppose we take up this check business.
Wait a minute.
Who's doing this, you or me?
- It never has been my party.
- Maybe this guy is right. How do I know?
- Were you ever in this room before?
- No.
What about you?
Of course not.
- What do you think...
- I'll tell you what I think.
She had this room and you knew about it.
You knew she was going to kill her husband. You had Dr. Kammer... all ready for the nut alibi.
I attended Mrs. Landis just to make sure she didn't do anything desperate.
Mrs. Landis' mind is not balanced.
That isn't true!
There's nothing wrong with her.
You're trying to drive her crazy.
There's another mental case right there.
Break it up, boys, break it up!
Nickie!
Nickie!
Hey, what's the idea?
This way, darling.
Darling, you have the nicest relatives and friends.
- Mr. Charles!
- Yes?
Don't walk off and leave me with this bunch.
I wouldn't have said what I had if I hadn't been a bit punchy.
This gang has got me nuts.
- Go on, Nickie, it's just getting good.
- Attagirl.
All right, darling.
Let me know when you've had enough.
Now take it easy.
Well, suppose we all go about this thing quietly.
Dancer... there you are.
You know, that check of Robert's for $20,000 was a forgery.
- So, what's it to me?
- It was traced from another check.
I still say, so what's it to me?
Just a minute, Lieutenant.
We'll handle it differently.
Selma, did you deposit that check for
$20,000 to his account a few days ago?
- No.
- Yes, you did, Selma.
I remember your telling me.
Did you, Selma?
Yes, I think perhaps I did. I must have.
You think Robert forged her signature and you're trying to hush it up, aren't you?
- Aren't you?
- No.
For years you've paid to hush up his scandals.
Don't you see that's just what they're counting on?
Selma, is that the vanity case they sent you?
Yes.
And when you returned it, you sent a note along with it.
Yes.
You took a signature of that note... traced it on this check and deposited it to Robert's account.
Then you forged Robert's signature to the other checks... and had Polly keep him busy until you cashed them.
Then I suppose I knock him off and stir up all this fuss before I get the dough.
What kind of a stumblebum does that make me out to be?
You're the stumblebum that left your fingerprints... all over the room when you killed Phil Byrnes.
- Phil's dead?
- Yes, strangled.
- I didn't do it.
- Why did you go to his place?
Because I thought he'd gummed my game.
I figured he'd tried to hold up Landis and had to kill him.
I pushed him around a bit just to learn him manners.
Phooey!
When I left him he had a split lip and couple of dents in him... but he was just as much alive as you are.
If that means anything.
Just a minute, Lieutenant. Polly, who knew that Phil was your husband?
- What?
- You were married, weren't you?
Yeah.
- So Phil was your husband?
- As if you didn't know.
I didn't know it until now.
I wish I had, baby.
Didn't you ever tell anyone that you were married?
- No.
- Would Phil have told?
No. He knew if Dancer heard,
I'd lose my job.
- Did you and Phil ever talk about it?
- Yeah. One night last week.
But nobody could have heard.
We were alone, down in my room.
With these earphones...
Anderson could hear everything that went on in your place.
- Everything?
- Everything.
Holy smoke!
He knew more about all of you than you know yourselves.
Dancer, you went to Phil's room... right after you pulled the switch at the Lichee, didn't you?
- Yes.
- That was about 1:00.
- What time was Phil killed?
- About 4:00, near as we can figure.
At 4:30, Anderson threw this note through my window.
He was beginning to make use of the information he got while he was here.
Dancer, how do you spell married?
Get Casper on the phone.
We'll pass that.
Polly, how do you spell married?
M-A-R...
M-A-double-R-Y-E-D.
Thank you.
When it comes to words like that...
- an illiterate person...
- What do you mean illiterate?
My father and mother were married right here in the City Hall.
- Having a good time, Mrs. Charles?
- It couldn't be better.
This note is a poor attempt at illiteracy.
The easy words are spelled wrong, and the tough ones are spelled right.
Like to see it, Lum?
That was meant just to get me down to Phil's place, to find his body.
And your fingerprints, Dancer.
Somebody's framing you.
- You say you don't know this Pedro?
- No.
There's a picture of him over here.
Perhaps this will refresh your memory.
Were you in on this check business?
- I know nothing about it.
- You lie.
You were here with those earphones on listening to everything.
You were sore because they weren't cutting you in on it.
You followed Landis that night and tried to stick him up.
But something went wrong, and you had to kill him.
I do not kill Pedro.
I do not follow Mr. Landis.
Ask Dancer.
- I go with him to get air.
- So you're the one that's framing me?
You weren't with me.
You can't use me for an alibi. You dirty...
Wait!
Just a minute, please.
All this time I've been waiting for someone to make a slip.
Someone has made it.
We've been wrong.
This wasn't a killing for money.
It was a murder of hatred, of revenge.
Polly, what did Phil go to the pen for?
- Blackmail.
- Blackmail.
Did you and Phil talk about that, too, down below?
Yes.
Thank you.
David, when were you supposed to give
Robert the money to go away?
This morning.
- In cash?
- Yes.
When he decided to go last night, you had to give him bonds?
Yes, that's right, Nick.
But where did you expect to get cash on New Year's Day?
A bank holiday?
- I forgot about that.
- No, you didn't, David.
You never intended to give
Robert that money.
You didn't want him to go away, you wanted to kill him.
You wanted to get even because he took Selma away from you.
Nick, please. Nora, is he fooling?
Oh, no.
But you were fooling, David, when you said... that you hadn't seen Pedro in six years.
You said that he had a long, white mustache.
Well, he has a long, white mustache now, but look at that picture.
There he is six years ago, and his mustache is neither long nor white.
You didn't notice him six years ago, any more than I did.
You remember him as you saw him last night when you shot him.
You killed him and then you killed Robert.
Phil saw you do that... that's why he followed you, that's why he was on your fire escape.
He was going to blackmail you, so you killed him, too.
Then you threw that note in at my window hoping to throw me off your trail.
David, don't let him say those terrible things!
Tell him it isn't true.
Tell him it isn't true.
Ask him why he threw your gun away, Selma.
He knew that it hadn't been fired.
You'd only have to show it to prove your innocence.
Yet he threw it away. Ask him why.
David, say you didn't do it.
Wasn't it because you hated her as much as you did Robert?
Wasn't it because you wanted to get even with her, too?
Because you wanted to see her hang for Robert's murder?
Oh, David.
Tell her the truth now, David.
You don't have to pretend any more.
All right, it's true, every word of it.
I've hated her, hated them both ever since she threw me over for Robert.
I've been planning, waiting and watching for the time to come... when I could get even with them for ruining my life.
I killed Robert, but not the way I wanted.
It was too quick, too easy!
I wanted to see him suffer like he'd made me suffer.
I wanted to see you hang.
I wanted to see you go gradually madder and madder... until the day finally came when you were going to hang!
Well, I made a mess out of everything, all right!
I don't want a single move out of any one of you.
All right, Selma, I may not see you hang... but I'm gonna see you die.
Don't be a fool, David.
Get out of the way, Nora.
Nora, let me go. He will.
No jury will hold you responsible.
Dr. Kammer was right.
I got six bullets in this gun.
One for her, one for myself...
Yeah, one for myself.
And the rest of them for anybody that tries to stop me.
Get out of the way!
Give me that gun!
- Nickie!
- Get him out.
I'll kill her!
Good heavens, I was right.
The man is crazy.
I can't believe it! David!
Well, you certainly can pick them.
- Nice work, Abrams, nice work.
- Yeah? Come on, Dancer.
What for?
For about 10 years, for forgery.
Not counting that potshot you took at Mr. Charles.
- Come on, get out of here.
- You, too, sister.
- This wasn't my idea...
- You were in with him, weren't you?
- Yes, but...
- You're going to be in with him again.
Nickie, are you sure you're all right?
I'm afraid so. Nice work, Lum.
And you sent his brother up.
Sure, Mr. Charles sent him up.
Number one detective!
I no like my brother. I like his girl.
I'm your friend, you bet you!
Here's to a very pleasant trip abroad.
- Thanks.
- London, Paris, Vienna, and points east.
Splendid, Dudley, splendid.
You're getting better every trip.
The telegraph boy at the last station said... there's a lot of telegrams for Mr. Nick Charles.
Who's Nick Charles? I never heard of him.
- That's what I said.
- Fine!
- Your room is ready, Ma'am.
- Thanks.
Well, good night, dear.
- Good night, sweet. Sleep well.
- Don't worry, I shall.
Good night, Nick.
And thanks so much for everything.
I want to kiss you. May I?
Go right ahead. But I warn you, it's a hard habit to get out of.
Good night, Selma.
Nora.
What's the matter, Nick?
It isn't true.
What isn't true?
- Pinch me.
- Why?
Pinch me.
- It is true.
- What?
We're alone. No family, no friends... no reporters, no police, no nothing.
Good.
I suppose we ought to decide where we're going.
- Why? Do you care?
- No.
- But I haven't any clothes.
- What's the difference?
Saves you the trouble of packing.
And I don't need anything in the world, darling, but you and a toothbrush.
What's that?
Looks like a baby's sock.
And you call yourself a detective.
Why, Mrs. Charles.
Where the blazing desert meets the blue Mediterranean and modern Europe jostles ancient Africa
I'm not interested in hearing excuses about local conditions.
No doubt there are local conditions.
Here's a criminal whose exploits have made him notorious throughout Europe.
He escaped from France with a fortune in jewels. And for two years, he's been living here in Algiers, within a stone's throw of your headquarters.
As you say commissioner.
I'm here to settle this.
I want it done quickly.
We've been trying to settle the case of Pepe le Moko for two years.
In Paris, we handle more difficult cases every day.
Too bad you couldn't arrest him before he escaped from France.
Merely an oversight, no doubt.
Do you deal in riddles here?
Indeed we do.
Oriental riddles.
From my experience, there's no problem in surrounding a given area.
You close in, and you make a house-to-house investigation.
A house-to-house investigation?
You just arrived from Paris, commissioner.
You're not familiar with the Casbah.
Casbah? What's that?
Some kind of nut?
A very hard nut to crack.
You see. Pepe le Moko lives in the Casbah.
Why not go in and take him out of it?
You can't arrest a king in his own palace.
Pepe is well guarded.
Let me show you.
Fantastic.
As a civilized man, you don't like fantasy.
As a police officer, I don't believe in it.
But here it is.
The native quarter known as the Casbah.
As you look at it here, it's just a few lines on the map.
But the reality is something stranger than anything you could have dreamed.
It's only a step from the modern city, the Casbah.
But when you take that step, you enter another world.
A melting pot for all the sins of the earth.
Seen from a bird's eye view, the Casbah is a great staircase.
Each step is a terrace rising from the sea.
If you observe more closely, you'll see that those terraces and courtyards and twisted streets are like a crawling anthill, a jungle of houses, a labyrinth of narrow passages and winding alleys rotten with vermin and decay from the filth of centuries.
No one knows what mysteries are hidden behind those walls.
No one knows what crimes and hopes are buried in those secret courtyards.
Forty thousand inhabitants from all over the world.
Some have been settled here for generations.
There are Kabulis in their white robes,
Chinese faithful to Confucius,
Gypsies with their fortune telling and their songs, and there are many Czechos, and there are Slavs far from home, and Maltese,
Negroes from every corner of Africa,
Sicilians and Spaniards, hot-blooded and quick to hate, and women, women of every age and every shape, women caught in the neck of the Casbah.
And everywhere there are terraces, all connected together so that those who are accepted can move to any part of the Casbah without using the street.
The terraces are the domain of the native women and it would be dire for a foreigner to go there unless he was known and protected.
The Casbah rises like a fortress from the sea, colorful, sordid, dangerous.
There isn't just one Casbah.
There are hundreds, a thousand.
And in that labyrinth,
Pepe le Moko is at home, and he's safe as long as he stays there.
You mean to say that you don't go into this quarter?
It's easy to go in.
Sometimes, it's no so easy to come out.
You cross the dead line.
Suddenly, a bullet hits you feet.
It's just a friendly suggestion.
Don't take the next step.
From a roof up above, a voice speaks.
Hello, inspector.
How did he know you were there?
Don't ask us.
Ask Inspector Slimane.
The Casbah is his territory.
How does Pepe le Moko conceal himself?
Disguise, no doubt.
You don't know Pepe.
He'd laugh at a disguise.
Then why don't you find him?
Oh, but that is singularly easy.
I see him every day.
What?
Our distinguished colleague is disturbed.
The man is wanted in all the capitals of Europe, and you see him every day.
Another example of what you call the local condition.
Gross inefficiency. No effort to make an arrest.
To arrest him in the Casbah, distinguished colleague, would be simple.
To get him out would be impossible.
So, you do nothing.
I flatter myself that I do a great deal in my humble way.
I learn about Pepe. I know his habits. I study his weaknesses.
When one can't use guns, one must work with brains.
I prefer guns.
In your case, honored sir, such a preference is unavoidable.
By his looks, I'd say he was too lazy to make an arrest.
I'm merely careful.
Which means to say you're looking after your own skin.
It's the only skin I have.
So Pepe le Moko wouldn't amuse me.
We'll find out.
I want twelve men tonight, inspected and ready for work.
And you might prepare a special cell for Pepe le Moko.
You and I have the same feeling, Pepe, for beauty.
This pearl belongs on a very special kind of ear, like a pink shell with a little curl of gold hair, a special kind of gold.
I can see it.
No.
Pearls don't suit you at all, Carlos.
You're not the type.
He'd look better with rings in his ears.
Yes, and one in his nose.
He is definitely uncouth.
You took the words out of my mouth.
He's trying to cheat us, Pepe.
All his talk is so he can get a better price, so he can make fools of us.
Yes.
So he's here to make a fool of me.
Why don't you try it some time?
Grandpere dealt with us for two years.
We must have confidence in each other.
That's the way to get along.
That's the truth, Pepe.
Well, why don't we get our money and be done with it?
He doesn't speak our language.
Pretend he is not here.
Yes, but I am here.
He doesn't know he's not here.
One more thing he doesn't know will make it practically a perfect score.
He was talking about beauty.
The more he talks about beauty, the less he talks about money.
And I'm talking about how much.
Oh, you make me sick.
What?
Say that again.
You make me sick.
Since you make him sick...
Ok.
Look, but don't touch.
You know, this was once my trade.
I began life in a jewelry store.
And when you left you took the store with you.
Yeah, it became a habit.
You know, I dream about sitting down in Paris sometime.
I'd make a collection of things like this.
Not just for myself, for people to see in glass cases.
With you in a uniform taking care of them together.
And you, Max.
Me?
You, Pierrot.
Oh, you'd have a uniform like a general, and you'd be in charge of everything.
What about me?
What would he be?
Stuffed in a glass case?
What?
Say that again.
Stuffed in a glass case.
Like an Egyptian mummy.
Ok.
Hey.
Police !
Police !
Police !
Police !
Ah !
You.
Where's Pepe le Moko?
(speaks in arabic "moi...
I don't know him")
Cuff him.
Uh, uh.
Where's Pepe le Moko?
I don't know.
By the sword of the Great Prophet, I haven't set eyes on him in two weeks.
He hasn't let me look on his face in two weeks.
Let him go.
Grandpere?
Who is he?
Receiver of stolen goods.
Do you know where his place is?
We know it.
Pepe?
No.
It's Regis.
What's the matter?
The police.
They're looking for Pepe.
So soon?
Soon? Were you expecting them?
Always.
But especially tonight. Pepe said they sent someone all the way from Paris.
So he knew?
Of course. Pepe knows everything.
You're. You're going to him?
Tell him I've never seen so many.
He'll laugh.
That's what he expected.
Look. Look at my neck.
I thought they were going to wring it like a chicken.
But all the time I thought only if Pepe kill me. I thought so long as Pepe.
Why should you feel that way about Pepe?
Don't you?
I?
Everyone knows how I feel about Pepe.
Pepe doesn't like me. He ignores me. Humiliates me.
But I have my revenge. Sometime he'll be sorry he didn't notice me sooner.
Oh, I'm very humble.
I do my best to serve him in my own way.
That's nice of you, Regis.
That's how I am.
Sensitive. But no one appreciates me.
Promise me you'll tell him that I came to warn you.
I will.
I don't want any favors.
I only want him to know that where there's trouble, look for Regis.
Third door on the left.
Take three men. Cover the roof.
You men go 'round the back.
It's Ines. Quick.
The police on the roof, Pepe. They're coming.
They surrounded the house. They know you're here.
That's funny.
How did they know I was here?
Oh, one can't meditate in peace anymore. Always rush and bustle.
I'll take this one.
I rather like it.
You think that's a toy?
No.
When will you learn to obey orders?
See.
Don't take so many chances.
That's foolish.
I don't want a bullet to come between us, the way that one almost did.
Break it down.
Every few weeks, I have to get new doors.
Ines.
Did you tell anyone where I was?
No one, Pepe.
Are you sure?
Try to remember.
Why don't you believe me, Pepe?
All I want is to please you.
I couldn't lie to you.
Couldn't you?
What about all that time you kept telling me that you didn't like me?
But this is serious.
Ah, so, love is not serious?
Pepe, it's serious if someone told the police.
I didn't talk to anyone. I stayed at home until Regis came.
Who came?
Regis.
Ahhh.
As soon as he told me, I ran to you.
What did Regis tell you?
Oh, about the police.
He wanted me to warn you.
It was nice of him.
That's what I thought.
Was that all you thought?
Wsa there anything else for me to think?
That's what I like about you.
What?
Nevermind.
This seems to be all.
All for me.
Search the place.
Hold out your hand.
Don't grab.
It's unlucky.
You want to give it to me, Pepe?
No.
It's for some fat, old woman.
Let me have it, Pepe. Some time, I'll get fat.
You'll lose it before that.
I'll keep it for a charm.
Then you must keep your fingers crossed.
Alright.
So.
This ring will mean that I'm always yours, Pepe, with my fingers crossed.
Those baboons are turning my house upside down.
They'll be here next.
Let's get out.
No, you stay here.
When the police come, you know what to say.
No evidence?
Nothing.
Are you satisfied?
I'm never satisfied.
Take your men back to the roof.
The rest of you follow me.
There they go.
This way quickly.
Come in.
Make yourself comfortable.
What is this? What happened?
Oh, it's nothing.
You call this nothing?
Oh, you know how the police are.
They like to keep everything in an uproar.
A very profound observation.
The police have been trying to catch him for two years.
Police must be rather stupid.
As one of them, I consider that a triumph of understatement.
You're one of them?
I have that doubtful honor.
How does he do it?
Mademoiselle.
It's not his head that saves him. It's his heart.
A man with such a good heart could get around anywhere.
Sounds intriguing.
It's a matter of taste.
Oh, inspector.
Fix it up.
Permit me to hope that it's nothing serious.
Thanks.
A flea bite.
Why aren't you chasing the fox?
Oh, such a silly business.
I prefer to use my brains.
Well, your friends did a little better than usual tonight.
At least they found me. That's pretty good for them.
Shall we say a step in the right direction?
Excuse us madam if we talk shop.
Cigarette?
Please.
Let me help you.
So.
They surrounded the house?
Yes.
They thought I was at Grandpere's.
Poor old man.
He has no luck.
They won't even let him sleep in peace.
Sometimes, I feel sorry for them.
They'll never get me by this technique, you know.
I've tried to point that out to them.
For once we agree, the inspector and I.
I am the one who will get you Pepe, in the end.
I can hardly wait for the day.
And not only you, but the others,
Pierrot, Carlos, Grandpere, all of you.
And then what will you do?
Put us in the zoo?
You flatter yourself.
Oh, you mean you won't show me in a cage?
You're important now because you're free.
Once you're behind bars, people will forget all about you.
He is funny, my friend Slimane.
He looks normal, doesn't he?
But he has delusions of grandeur. He thinks he can arrest me.
That's exactly what I'm going to do Pepe.
Sure.
Sure. Sure. Sure. Sure.
How you make me laugh.
Do you know what I like about you?
No, but I'm humbly waiting for you to tell me.
Your face.
It's a perfect face for your job.
To look that false is almost the equivalent of being honest.
I'm honored that my appearance pleases you.
Don't mention it.
You'll excuse me?
I'm afraid I have to go.
Business.
Goodnight, Pepe.
It's a shame, isn't it?
What?
A waste of talent.
An unusual intelligence.
One hates to see him buried so young.
Buried?
It's the same thing.
What makes you so sure?
I've marked the date of his arrest on the wall of my room.
High.
Where it reads black in the rays of the setting sun.
Shall we go?
And although we narrowly missed capturing Pepe le Moko, he was evidently wounded while escaping.
In fact, his injuries may prove fatal.
In the event of his death, I shall inform you without delay.
Why don't you just declare him dead and be done with it?
You may rest assured that I have the situation well in hand and will take whatever steps I deem advisable.
Wire that to Paris immediately.
What does he mean by saying he has the situation well in hand?
He means he's going to sit here and write letters to Paris, while he waits for Pepe to die of old age.
That's better than going into the Casbah looking for him.
At least our friend from Paris has learned something about the Casbah.
We've all learned that there's only one way to arrest Pepe.
Oh, that's very intelligent of you.
As you know, my intelligence is at your service.
Well so far, it's hardly been enough.
Ah, but wait.
Suppose Pepe comes out of the Casbah.
Then it follows, his arrest is a matter of child's play.
Shall we send him an engraved invitation?
Pepe is too clever to fall into a trap, but some of his friends are not so clever.
Get to the point.
Suppose Pierrot comes down into the town,
Pepe would be worried about his absence, and he'll come down into the town to find him.
You've overlooked just one little point. How do you get Pierrot to come down?
Ah, that's my plan.
Magnificent plan.
I have here a letter.
I got it from Pierrot.
But he doesn't know that.
The letter is from his mother.
A letter of exquisite tenderness.
From France.
Can't see much value in that.
He's a bad boy but a good son.
So it isn't the good son that we'll lock up, but the bad boy.
Then, we keep the arrest a secret and Pepe will come down out of the Casbah to look for Pierrot.
Are we agreed?
Agreed.
And... as to the price?
You know the reward has been posted.
But a little bonus besides in view of the circumstances?
Agreed.
How do we know we can trust you not to make a better bargain with Pepe?
I'm an informer not a hypocrite.
What are you laughing at?
It amuses me to see you sell your friend at bargain prices.
You have a flair for business, Regis.
He says that because he's jealous. It doesn't upset me.
I ignore him.
Double him, dear. He'll never make it.
Good morning, Tanya.
Good morning, Inspector.
And how is Carlos?
How would he be?
Don't tell me your charming husband has been beating you again.
You know how it is with a man.
Well, I can't say I do.
Thay seem to take to it naturally.
Morning, pretty.
Good morning, Pepe.
Good morning, Pepe.
Hello.
Good morning, Pepe.
Good morning.
You better watch out, Pepe.
Women will be the death of you.
It's a happy death.
I'm just warning you.
Don't worry. I'll keep my head.
I may need it one of these days.
No doubt.
Coming my way?
With pleasure.
Good morning, Pepe.
Morning.
Good morning, Pepe.
Morning.
Did you get home safely last night?
Why not?
Morning, Pepe.
Morning.
Nothing unpleasant?
Yes, we had one rather unpleasant experience.
Yeah?
With you.
She didn't think so.
What makes you so sure?
What is she saying?
Well, you know women. They talk about nothing. I hardly listen.
Was there anything special about her?
Yes.
Pearls.
The corner I like.
Handcuffs I can appreciate.
Platinum and diamonds.
And she didn't buy that perfume in Algiers.
So all you noticed were the jewels and perfume.
Was there anything else?
What about the eyes?
They all have eyes, but all that shi shi and jingle, you don't see much of that in the Casbah.
But you do where she comes from.
Thank you.
She asked quite a few questions about you.
Yeah? What did you tell her?
What could I tell her?
Why? Did you think she might be afraid of my past?
No, but she might be a little appalled at your future.
I told her you might get off in 20 years with a good lawyer.
You wouldn't want me to get 20 years. You're too fond of me. What's her name?
So, you're thinking about her.
How could I be thinking about her when I don't know her name?
-Good morning, Pepe.
-Hello, Aicha.
Pierrot at home?
No, he's at Shinee's.
Let's go to Shinee.
What do you want?
I have a letter for Pierrot.
Give it to me.
Oh, no no no. I can't.
I swore by the ghosts of my ancestors to give it only to Pierrot.
Whose the letter from?
A woman.
What kind of a woman?
I didn't look.
Well, you tell the woman I took it away from you.
This vulgar game is hardly worth the compromise to ones dignity involved in playing it.
It's vulgar, but it's fast.
I don't know why I waste my time in such common pursuits with such mediocre companions.
My youth?
I intended to become a statesman.
Or?
Philosopher.
But a man's destiny is written in the stars.
We play the game.
But Fate controls the cards.
Who?
Fate.
If Fate goes on controlling the cards, he might find a knife between his ribs.
The moving finger writes.
Ans having writ moves on.
Stop that nonsense.
He has an ear but not for poetry.
I'm trying to think.
I would have played the ace.
Do you smell something?
I've been wondering.
Onions.
Cheese.
A mixture of cheese and onions.
I don't like it.
Would it be to much to ask you to take your nose out of my hand?
But you haven't got a hand.
Don't blow down my back.
You seem nervous.
My dear fellow, consider yourself blackballed by this club.
He means get out.
Oh.
What are you hanging around for? This is business.
Read this.
Bad news?
Pierrot.
Wait for me.
I would like it better if you didn't hang around so much with Regis.
Why?
Did you ever see a clock that pointed to two and struck four when it is really quarter past twelve?
Well, you will find Regis is like that.
He doesn't ring two.
That's what you say, but you can't prove it.
Well.
If I say so, that's enough.
Regis gets along alright with me.
That's why I'm telling you. I don't like it.
Well I do.
In business, I'll do anything you say, Pepe.
But outside business I'll do as I please.
Oh, so.
You'll do as you please?
It's a good thing I like you.
Now get out.
Nice kid.
What did she write you in her last letter?
She had a cold. She said she'd start as soon as she felt better.
Ah, then you knew she was coming.
I sent her a money order.
In that case, it isn't so strange.
And yet it's odd that she should arrive in Algiers like that without letting you know,
That's what I thought.
Ah.
Is this her handwriting?
Have you another letter?
Yes, I think so.
Good. We'll put them both together like a pair of Siamese twins.
Then we'll see if they're both from the same mama.
Well, what do you think?
Same mistakes in spelling.
Our poor dear mamas can never spell.
Same 'n'.
Same what?
Same 'n'.
And the crossing of the 't'.
Well, that settles it. You can always tell by the crossing of the 't'.
Then, you think it's alright?
Well, you can see with your own eyes.
Then, I don;t want her to be there worrying.
-After all, she's 62.
-Oh, my mother lived to 84.
She never felt better than the day she died.
Where's that?
If I know it well, half hour's walk.
I can take you there if you wish to go.
I've got to go. I've got to see her.
Fortunately, you can rely on me.
It's good of you to help me, Regis.
You're a real friend.
Well, that's how I am. Sensitive.
You ready, Gaby?
Andre just phoned. They're waiting on the terrace.
If I sat for five minutes, Andre phones.
Well, don't you like having him so attentive?
Love it.
I've just been sitting here, thinking that I'm the happiest girl in the world.
Well, you ought to be.
Marrying a man who adores you and can give you everything in the world you ever dreamed about.
That's my trouble.
I'm such a fool.
I go dreaming about the wrong things.
Well, that's a terrible mistake.
Marie, remember the time in the Baltoin Bargain Basement.
The two of behind a counter. Handkerchiefs. Gloves.
Hosiery.
And don't you forget it.
I won't.
After all, you don't marry for fun.
I didn't.
Hello, Inspector.
So you've already met.
I took the liberty of presenting myself.
As you see, I couldn't wait to take advantage of your invitation last night.
I'm glad.
Yes, we're all glad.
Inspector, will you tell my fiance where I was last night during the shooting?
But with me.
There you see?
And who did we meet?
Pepe le Moko.
Nice friends you have.
In prisoners, one can't choose.
You don't mean Pepe le Moko, the famous criminal?
The one they're all talking about?
He'd like to hear you say that.
Just a common law-breaker.
Have you seen him since?
This morning.
Did he say anything bout me?
Well, in a way.
Oh, I know.
My pearls.
A connoisseur can admire pearls without neglecting the wearer.
Oh, he means if he stole your pearls, he'd steal you with them.
Does that frighten you, Gaby?
Oh, it sounds marvelous to me.
I'd like to meet him.
It could easily be arranged if you wish to visit the Casbah again with a suitable guide.
How's that, Andre? An adventure.
Well, that's what we're here for.
Once is enough for me. I don't like natives.
Then, we'll go with Maxim. You'll protect us. Won't you, Maxim?
I'm at my best among natives.
Tonight, Inspector? If it's convenient.
Uh huh.
Pepe.
Yes.
What are you doing?
Nothing.
What are you looking at like that?
France.
You can't see France.
Well, there is no harm in trying.
Pepe, what are you looking at like that?
A ship.
Doesn't it make you seasick to look at boats?
Doesn't it give you a headache to ask so many questions?
No.
Why? Have you got a headache?
No. I'm thinking.
Well, that's sure to give you a headache.
I don't think with my head but with my heart.
Then, you'd better tell me.
It's nothing.
If it's nothing, you'd better tell me.
Oh, I'll get mad if you go on like this.
I want you to get mad.
Shout at me and hurt me, but don't treat me as if I'm not here.
Oh, I know you're here.
No you don't.
You're dreaming about something with your eyes wide open.
I wish you'd dream about me.
Look.
You've always lived in the Casbah.
For you, there is nothing outside.
The Casbah is big enough.
Not for me.
It's like being in a grave.
Pepe.
Can't stand much more of it.
If you want to go away, I'll go with you.
Thanks.
Won't you take me?
I wish I could.
Paris is a long way off.
I don't care.
It's different there.
Couldn't you be happy with me in Paris?
You think I'd look funny in Paris.
Answer me.
Oh, but it isn't you, Ines.
It's the Casbah.
You belong here.
You don't understand the way I feel.
I've stood it for two years.
The time comes when you can't stand anymore.
Morning, noon, and night.
The same things. The same people.
I'm fed up.
I've had enough.
You're tired of me.
It has nothing to do with you.
I want to get away.
That has nothing to do with me?
Do you know when you're going away? Never.
You'll see.
You can't do it.
Never.
I am the Casbah. I'll keep you.
Just try to get away and you will find out.
It's funny for the police to come in and try to arrest you.
You're in prison already. You're in the Casbah with the wall around you.
Stop it.
There's nothing else. You'll never have anything else.
Stop it I tell you.
I am glad. There is no France for you. No Paris. No boulevards.
Are you through?
No.
Who is it?
Pierrot?
It's me, Aicha
Pepe.
I don't know what to do.
Pierrot.
I can't find him.
Did you go to Shinee's?
Yes.
And I Mother Teche's and the Ali Baba and the Algerians.
Everywhere.
-He ought to be back by now.
-Back?
Why did he go into town?
To see his mother.
What do you mean to see his mother?
He got a letter from her.
L'Arbi brought it.
Then, he went down with Regis.
And then Regis came back, but Pierrot
I'm still waiting for him, that's all.
Where's Regis?
At the Algerians.
No need to go down.
See you later.
Hello, Regis.
What's your hurry?
Oh, I'm in no hurry.
Good. Then, come along with me.
I'm waiting for Pierrot. We can wait for him together.
But listen, Pepe. I've got to go down.
What's the matter? What makes you so nervous?
Me? Nervous?
Why should I be nervous?
That's just it. Why?
Well. It's only that usually you hardly say hello to me and when you do so I don't expect it when you don't.
I'm a little surprised when you do because you don't usually.
Well, you see. I haven't appreciated you at your real value.
That's the trouble.
So, I made a mistake.
Shall we go?
Where?
Oh, any quiet corner where we can talk.
I've been hearing great stories about your courage.
My courage?
You're surprised?
No.
I even hear you proved it.
Me?
Yes, you.
Well, it's possible. One can be brave without knowing it.
Of course.
How? How did I prove it?
Why by going down into town with Pierrot.
Ah, not everybody would have done that.
Oh, yes.
And after that you came back here.
That was a brave thing to do.
Yes. Wasn't it?
Now you see why I have completely changed my ideas about you.
You're right.
I was helping the boy out. Nothing more.
Of course.
Tell me.
Where did you leave Pierrot?
Somewhere. I don't quite remember.
That's it.
You don't mind if I refresh your memory, do you?
He went to see his poor old mother.
How is she?
I didn't see her.
Why not?
She was in bed sick. He didn't want to disturb her.
It must have been an awful shock for Pierrot.
He thought she was in France.
I think he got a letter.
Did you see it?
Just a glimpse.
So you left him?
And you came back alone.
He wanted to stay with her.
That's natural.
Yes, very natural.
Exactly.
Of course.
Want me?
No, we're just talking.
Sit down.
Regis did a fine thing today.
He went down into town with Pierrot.
Fine.
And now you're waiting for poor Pierrot.
Why poor Pierrot?
Because he went down with Regis.
What of it?
Nothing.
Maybe I should say and now you're waiting for Pierrot with poor Regis.
What's the matter? Huh?
I've gotta have air.
Just relax.
Take it easy.
We understand how anxious you are about Pierrot. Here.
Take this.
Go ahead. Drink.
Don't take a bite out of it.
I don't know what's the matter with me.
You'll get over it.
In an hour, you'll feel much better.
Let me go.
Let me go.
With a fever like that?
You musn't think of exerting yourself.
Cigarette?
Don't make such a fuss.
Go on and smoke.
It'll settle your nerves.
Say, Pepe.
His hair is getting a little long here on his neck.
Don't you think we ought to cut it for him?
You were fond of Pierrot, weren't you?
Oh, I was. I am fond of him.
Well, then.
You don't want to leave before he gets back.
You want to know why he has been detained.
-Don't you?
-Yes yes yes.
Must be the fever.
I'm worried about you.
He's burning up.
I'm afraid he'll sizzle before too long.
I don't know anything about Pierrot.
Pepe. Pepe. Let me go. You know me; you know I'm alright.
Tell me you do. Last night, I was the one who came to warn you.
Yes, you were the one.
Let me go.
He's delirious.
This is terrible.
He may not last the next round.
How about a little game to calm him down?
Alright.
It is really alarming.
If I may say so, he is not at his best.
He must stay right where he is.
We can't be too careful.
What are you doing?
Ines.
Try to find him, and bring him back. Quick.
He went down with Regis.
If you bring him back,
Regis may recover.
Alright.
Cut 'em, Regis.
The black spot.
Oh, that's bad.
Suppose you can't find him.
Don't worry.
This way.
The women look so mysterious.
No doubt they'd say the same about you.
Trump?
But you've got a heart.
What's the matter with me? I'm not myself.
What kind of a game is this?
Concentrate.
He's thinking of Pierrot.
Yes, of course.
Worry about a friend can cause unutterable anguish to a sensitive nature.
Do you mean it makes him sweat?
A certain exudation hyper-actuated by an emotional stimulation.
You don't mean him?
Deal me out.
Take care of Regis.
Never go back on a friend when he is in trouble.
Still waiting, little one?
You know what this reminds me of? A little place in New York on 42nd street.
That's the thing about travelling.
There's always something different.
One time, I was in Corsica and I thought I was in Turkey.
Remember the time we were on the Nile and I thought it was Venice?
Tell me. Do they have native music here?
On the phonograph.
Oh. Well.
What's that one?
Never heard of it.
Must be native music.
So you wanted to take another look at this strange, wild animal.
Strange but not so very wild.
How do you like my cage?
I don't know. Yet.
Do you like Algiers.
I don't like travelling; makes me homesick.
Does it?
I can't see Paris when I open my eyes in the morning.
I want to go right back to sleep.
Do you know Paris?
Do I know Paris?
Now is summertime.
Champs-脡lys茅es.
La Gare du Nord.
The Op茅ra, Boulevard des Capucines
La Chapelle
Rue Montmartre
Boulevard de Rochechouart
Rue Fontaine
La Place Blanche.
What a small world.
Cigarette?
Thanks.
Got a light?
We are a long way from home.
Excuse me.
Well?
He still thinks he's playing his last card.
Not bad.
I'll tell her you said so.
No no no. I mean the rock she's wearing.
Now if it was me, I'd get them first and then do the fancy stuff afterward.
Shut up
You can't talk to me like that.
You heard me. Shut up.
Okay.
He was talking about me.
He was worried about you.
About me?
All that stuff you're holding.
That's nice of him.
You're not worried yourself?
No.
Not while I'm with you.
Right.
This is something.
Isn't it? And it hardly weighs anything.
At least
20,000 francs.
Add a zero.
I mean what I would get for it.
Here.
Put it on again.
You put it on.
Want to dance?
Yes.
What's your name?
Gabrielle.
They call me Gabby.
Married?
No.
Widowed?
No.
Why not?
Who are you with?
My fiance.
What is he like?
Generous.
Stuck being at the hotel?
I let him.
What are you laughing at?
It's nothing.
-Too bad.
-Too bad?
Too bad I don't know you better.
Why?
Because I will slap your face.
When people laugh around me, I like to know why.
This all reminds me of when I was a kid.
We used to dance in the streets on holidays, New Years, first of May.
14th of July.
Why do you know?
What do you think I was doing?
Too bad you weren't in my
 neighbourhood, Rue de la Bruy猫re
Rue de la Bruy猫re?
That's where I lived.
I went to school on the hill.
That was almost next door to me.
No.
Let's go out.
Where to?
To the terrace.
Can you see the harbor?
You can see Montmartre.
And Les Champs-脡lys茅es.
And Place Blanche.
I love Place Blanche.
Oh, I can't.
I can't leave my friends.
But I'll come back.
When?
As soon as I can.
When?
Tomorrow.
How can I be sure?
I never break a promise.
Let me go.
Why should I?
'Cause I ask you.
Say please.
You're rude.
Am I?
I'll be expecting you.
Here.
It would be nice if we could meet at Place Blanche.
Well, what about Pierrot?
I don't know.
Didn't you go down to find him?
I didn't want to leave you alone.
I'm not alone. I'm with madame.
Do as I told you.
Pierrot.
Where is he?
Who?
Regis. Where is he?
Come on.
They got me, Pepe.
The police.
I didn't listen to you.
I'll help you.
No. No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
No.
Oh, no.
Pierrot?
There's no sense to it.
That's what they said.
They?
Those people.
They were frightened.
Said they'd never come back.
I was fond of Pierrot.
I regarded him almost as a son.
Well, he's closed his umbrella.
Pepe, there's no use in thinking about Pierrot.
Don't you tell me what to think.
This a sad thing.
Are you finished?
I beg your pardon.
You were fond of him. That's enough.
Can't a man talk?
Well?
Well.
It's finished.
I did everything you would have done, Pepe.
I was all alone at the cemetery.
I followed the custom of your people.
A handful of earth on the body.
And flowers to make him feel at home in such a strange place.
It's hard not to be able to go sown to say goodbye to your friend on his last journey.
I'm your friend, Pepe.
I lnow how you feel; you'er a prisoner in the Casbah.
But the day will come when they won't be able to prevent your leaving.
You'll go out of the Casbah in spite of them all.
I'll get out whenever I wish.
When you go, you'll go quietly the way Pierrot went.
Feet first.
Be patient.
When the time comes, they'll take off their hats and let you pass.
I'll go out alive.
I don't think you're as foolish as that.
Grandperre,
I've heard enough.
Music. Singing. Gibberish.
I'm sorry for you.
How is she?
She?
You know.
I'm afraid you won't see her again. The last visit was a little too much for her.
She got a bad impression of the Casbah.
It's a pity.
Why should it be a pity?
For your sake since it seems to mean so much to you.
To me?
So that's what you're so sorry about.
Why are you standing there staring at me?
Do as I tell you.
Go down.
And you too.
Get out.
I've had enough.
And you.
I'm sick of looking at you.
You seem to be sick of everything.
Right.
I'd bring her up to see you again if it were possible, but there's no chance.
So.
She's not coming back.
That's fine.
What?
All that swell jewelry, you had it right in the palm of your hand.
That's enough.
These people who look as if they can tear down everything and when a woman looks at them, they get as soft as butter.
Get out.
Well, I'm not made of butter. Not me.
Get out.
Ok.
Your friends have no tact, my dear Pepe.
They have no respect for the beauty of your anguish.
I know how it pains you to live among this cattle.
Let me assure you.
They can't keep me here.
I'm free.
Free to go.
I'm sick of it.
All of you.
I'm sick of listening to you.
And I'm sick of looking at you.
I'll get out when I feel like it.
None of you can stop me.
Listen to me, Pepe.
I don't need your advice.
None of you.
I'm free to do as I please.
Free. You hear that?
You're walking into a trap.
You know better.
They can't touch me. I'm going down. Get out of the way.
Let me. And when I please is now. Get out of my way.
He's gone mad. He's going down to the town.
He won't listen.
Hello.
Good.
I'll attend to it.
Inspector Slimane.
He says Pepe le Moko is coming out.
Pepe.
Pepe, don't go.
You're mad.
Pepe, don't go. Please don't go.
I didn't want to tell you this, but she's up there now at your old house waiting for you.
Where is she?
Where is she?
You lied to me, didn't you?
Answer me. Didn't you?
It was the only way I could keep you from going.
If I had asked you not to go for me, you wouldn't have listened to me.
So.
You ought to be fed up with a fellow like me.
I didn't know I could make such a fool of myself.
Ines, have something better than this.
It's not what you deserve.
It's what you want.
Why do you worry about me?
It's not good.
I have a sharp that brings me luck.
You brought us both luck this time.
All the while I went running,
I kept my hand so.
But you caught me.
I didn't know you could run so fast.
Don't forget; I've had practice.
But nobody ever caught me before.
Next time, give me a head start.
Next time?
Don't worry.
Not 'til I catch my breath.
I'm thirsty.
I'll get it.
No you won't.
Here I am.
I said I'd be here.
Well?
You look as though you've seen a ghost.
You're beautiful.
That's easy to say.
I know a lot of people have told you.
But what I'm telling you is different. See?
For me, you're more than that.
For two years, I've been lost.
Like walking in my sleep.
Slowly I wake up. That's you.
I don't know what I've been doing all that time, waiting for you without knowing it.
Do you know what you are to me?
Paris. That's you.
Paris.
With you, I escape.
Follow me?
The whole town is spring morning in Paris.
You're lovely.
You're marvelous.
And do you know what you remind me of?
The subway.
Close your eyes.
Listen.
Can you hear it?
That's my heart beating.
Dose it go like a subway train?
Faster.
You're all silk, and you jingle when you walk.
And with all that shi shi, you make me think of the subway.
Isn't that funny?
And potato chips and coffee on the boulevard.
What did you do before?
Before what?
Before the jewels.
I wanted them.
It's late.
I must go.
Suppose you don't come tomorrow.
Suppose I don't.
Can't you ever get away from the Casbah?
Why do you ask?
Can't you?
No.
I'm caught here like a bear in a hole, dogs barking, hunters all around, no way out of it.
Do you like that?
Maybe it's lucky for you.
I don't like it.
And it's not lucky.
You're right.
If you don't come back, I might do anything.
I might go down to the hotel to get you.
Tomorrow, Pepe.
Tomorrow?
I never break a promise.
You smell good.
The subway?
Streamlined.
Hey.
Anton.
Tomorrow.
5 o'clock.
Did you get them?
What?
The hardware.
What's the matter with you?
If you didn't get the jewels, you're simply wasting your time.
What were you doing in there?
Where?
There.
You're mistaken.
We were not there.
Say that again.
We were in Paris.
What?
Okay.
Life is simple if you try to enjoy before you die every bit of happiness along the way.
Take the joy that comes to you.
Suddenly the world is too with the song that keeps you dancing every day.
That's the life.
Fall in love and life is sunny.
That's the life you don't need money if you've got a little honey in your arms.
That's the life.
I'm in heaven and I know it.
Can I help it if I show it?
Life is sweet as can be for me.
Love is very necessary.
Fall in love and you'll be happy. That's the life.
You don't know just what you miss if you live without a kiss for a kiss can bring your winter into spring.
Everybody will agree. If you fall in love like me, you'll be happy, you will laugh, and you will sing.
That's the life.
That's the life we should be living.
Kiss morning, noon, and evening. That's the life that I'll be living.
That's the moon. That's the life.
There is nothing like that feeling.
Tell me what is more appealing than the feeling you're in love for sure.
Love is very necessary. Fall in love and you'll be happy. That's the life.
Love is very necessary.
Fall in love and you'll be happy. That's the life.
Pepe, what's happened?
Don't you know?
It's a holiday.
No, I didn't know what day it is.
It's Sunday. Everyone gets a holiday.
But it's not Sunday.
If I say so, it's Sunday.
It's Thursday.
That's the trouble with you; you always think it's Thursday.
I didn't think so yesterday.
Just as a favor to me, let it be Sunday.
I want to stroll on the boulevard.
I have a date at the Place Blanche.
Hello, everybody.
How do you like my singing?
What's the good of it?
You ought to appreciate the finer things of life.
Who? Him?
When you feel like that, sing.
It quiets the nerves.
You seem pleased. You've seen her again.
Wouldn't you like to know.
Oh, well. If you don't want to confide in me.
Well, our inspector got himself a haircut.
Did she come back?
A regular Romeo.
You ought to get a permanent wave.
You're expecting her again today?
The trouble with you, Inspector, is that you do too much inspecting.
Now, not a word about what I have told you.
Just between ourselves, yup.
Inspector.
Good afternoon.
I was puzzled when you phoned.
My mission is a rather delicate one but necessary.
I merely wish to suggest that your fiance is a little too fond of shall we say, the local color of the Casbah.
What is all this?
The Casbah is hardly the place for a woman alone.
She attracts too much attention, excites too much desire.
If we, naturally, wish to protect her from any embarrassment.
Further embarrassment can very easily be avoided.
She must not return to the Casbah.
Come in.
Sorry to disturb you.
You're going out?
Looks that way.
Where are you going?
A walk.
But where?
In the Champs-脡lys茅es.
May I ask you to give me a sensible answer?
Then ask me a sensible question. Where could I go?
I don't know anyone in Algiers.
I just walk straight ahead.
Straight ahead?
And where does that take you?
I'll know when I get there.
No you won't because you're not going.
Oh, yes, my dear.
Your hotel bores me.
The head waiter looks like an undertaker.
An every time I step into this apartment it looks more like a funeral parlor.
Goodbye, darling.
I know where you're going.
Ah?
You're going to the Casbah.
So?
You go there every day.
Do I?
To meet Pepe le Moko.
So now you're spying on me?
You're going to be my wife.
You don't make it a very pleasant prospect.
And I won't allow you to behave like this.
I'm glad you told me.
What do you mean?
We've got to be honest.
Why do you think I'm marrying you?
Look at yourself, and now look at me.
I've never lied to you.
You knew I didn't love you when I promised to marry you, and you though it was alright.
Until we are married, I'll do as I please.
That's fair enough.
I forbid you to go.
It's a waste of time.
If you go now, there'll be no use in you coming back.
You've thought it all out pretty clearly. Haven't you?
And I advise you to do the same.
Alright.
Goodbye.
Do it, Gaby. Don't.
No.
What?
You can't go to the Casbah.
But really.
Your fiance was trying to spare you.
He didn't want to tell you the truth as I told it to him.
An attempt was made to capture Pepe le Moko this afternoon.
The attempt was successful.
He was taken?
Not alive.
He was killed.
I just came to tell you, it's Thursday.
I know.
I was right all the time.
You see, I'm not just a fool as you think.
So this is the Place Blanche.
It's not much fun on Thursday, is it?
It doesn't seem like Paris.
What's got into him?
Weren't you ever disappointed in love?
Yes. Badly.
I'll try to please you.
I'm like Pepe.
I like 'em with diamonds.
Now he's missed his chance.
So I guess I'll have to go downtown and give my personal attention to madam's hardware.
What steamer?
The Ville d'Algers? Ten o'clock? Good.
Make the reservation.
Are you leaving?
I suppose you won't stay for the funeral.
Four. First class.
Oh. Send up some whiskey and soda.
You'll have a drink.
Just a short one.
Make you feel better.
Anything wrong?
Why don't you sing?
Why don't you mind your own business?
I am.
Only I just though you might be interested.
I'm going downtown.
What for?
Unlike you, I'm bored.
Anything in your mind?
Just to look things over.
-When are you going?
-Now. No use to see a lawyer about it.
-Do me a favor.
-Sure.
I want you to deliver a letter.
I'd take anything that isn't loaded.
Ok. I get the idea.
Maybe I don't look like Cupid, but I'll manage.
Pen and paper.
Go to the servants' entrance.
Give someone a good tip.
And tell them you've got to have an answer.
Don't worry. I won't come back empty handed.
I'll wait for you at your house.
I'll be back in two hours. Tell Tania.
Good luck.
What time is it?
9 o'clock.
Is that all?
In the morning.
Sun is out.
I slept all that time?
Carlos?
He hasn't come back.
He hasn't come back?
I sat up all night.
I'd like to see him back with what I've got to tell him.
This time, I'll make him listen to me.
Poor Carlos.
Same old story.
Well.
Life is like that.
Yeah.
And we're dumb enough to hang on because we don't want to stir it when.
Smart.
Is Pepe here?
What do you want?
We've been looking for you everywhere. Why weren't you at home?
Because I'm here.
What do you want, L'Arbi?
I must speak to you alone.
What's the matter with us?
Ever got small pox?
-It's alright; you can talk.
-Pepe, I'm ashamed of myself.
What's new about that?
-Oh, It's more than you think.
-I doubt that.
Go ahead and insult me.
I deserve it.
You flatter yourself.
It's about the letter from Pierrot's mother.
I brought it and gave it to Aicha, but I didn't know it was from the police.
If I had known the letter was written by Regis, I wouldn't have done it. Never.
Go on.
It was really a woman who gave me the letter.
I, if I had known the truth, I wouldn't have touched it.
I'm an informer.
Yes, but I wouldn't have done a thing like that.
Oh, you're only half an informer.
The other half is alright.
Oh, that's why I'm here.
For what?
I couldn't stand it any longer. Forgive me, Pepe.
Alright. Stop grovelling; it makes me sick.
I want you to have a good opinion of me.
So?
I want you to believe me.
That's why I'm here, to tell you they got Carlos.
What about Carlos?
The police took him.
-How much did you sell him for?
-I wouldn't be here if I'd sold him.
First Pierrot, then Carlos.
Bad luck always runs in threes.
Your turn will be next, Pepe.
Don't be so sure.
So they arrested him.
Who did it?
Inspector Louvain.
They were about a dozen of them surrounding him.
Was there any shooting?
No, no. They managed very quietly in a nice way.
What did you have to do with it?
I was at the police station when they brought Carlos in.
I had the chance to see him in his cell.
They gave me a letter, the one you had given him.
Told me to take it to the hotel.
Every time there is a letter, he is the one that brings it.
It looks funny to me.
Be quiet.
Oh, I am to be quiet while you write letters to other women?
Never mind that.
You never wrote a letter to me.
Shut up.
So you went to the hotel with the letter.
I did it for you, Pepe.
You get it?
What?
The answer.
Oh, she wouldn't write you.
But she couldn't.
She's being closely watched.
But she expects you this morning.
You can go down without any risk.
Go to her.
Service entrance in the back of the hotel.
She'll be watching from her window.
Is that all?
She wants to come out, but she couldn't get away.
-You're not going out, Pepe. You can't.
-I told you to shut up.
Go on.
She's waiting for me to bring the answer.
What shall I tell her?
She's waiting for it.
Yes.
I'll take the answer myself.
You wait here.
But Pepe.
Don't worry.
My friends will take good care of you until I come back.
But she expects me.
What?
Nothing.
I'll wait.
Tell me.
What about Carlos?
Didn't he say anything else?
Nothing.
They search him?
Yes.
Then they took away the five thousand.
Yes.
-You're sure he didn't slip the five thousand to you?
-No.
You're sure?
What?
Lovain took the money. I saw him put it in his desk.
You said Gaby couldn't write because she was watched.
Yes.
But in a little while she'll be able to see me.
That's funny.
He's going to move away.
Oh, I see.
-But why couldn't she write to me?
-He was there.
But she talked to you.
Because.
Because you don't know.
Now there is another thing that doesn't fit in your story.
How was Louvain able to take 5000 francs from Carlos when Carlos didn't have a hundred?
I don't know.
Do you think Carlos is dumb enough to give you my letter?
All joking aside.
Do you think me so stupid as to believe he would give it to you?
-All joking aside.
-I give you my word.
-And then I will go down to see her.
-Yes.
A woman who is closely watched, it's funny the way she can do things.
Now I've laughed enough!
Do you hear me?
You've made a fool of me!
Carlos was arrested.
Now tell me what happened.
Shall I break your neck to refresh your memory?
No, Pepe.
Slimane planned it all.
Yeah?
He told me to come for you.
- Go on. 
 - He thinks you'll come down.
- Then?
The hotel is surrounded, they're waiting.
Did you see the girl?
No.
Why didn't she come up yesterday?
He told her you'd been killed.
Slimane planned the whole thing.
Is that all?
Yes.
Thanks.
You can't do it, Pepe.
You can't leave me. What have I done?
It has nothing to do with you, Ines.
You're a good kid, but this can't be helped.
It's not your fault.
I won't let you do it. I won't let you. You'll be killed.
Blame it on the Casbah.
It's for her. You don't care about anything else, so you're throwing away your life.
But it's my own life.
Don't do it, Pepe. Don't go. Listen to me.
Pepe.
Wait.
We didn't expect you.
He's not coming here.
He's gone to the boat.
You expect me to believe that?
He is going away with her.
So you're the one to betray him.
You couldn't wait to run to me.
You call it love, but it means you'd kill him before you'd let him go free. That's what you've done.
Sure as if you'd held a gun in your hands.
I couldn't let him go.
I couldn't lose him.
I thought I'd figured all the moves, but I miscalculated.
I didn't think of you.
That's just fine.
In a few more minutes, it might have been put of our hands.
Don't go.
-Give him a chance.
-I did.
But you knew. You planned it this way.
So he'd walk into a trap. And he's done it with your help.
Come on.
You know, the pleasant thing about travelling is going back home.
It's like going away again.
Oh I had a good time. Didn't you, Andre?
Me?
I never laughed so much in my life.
You see, Pepe, we meet at the appointed time.
Tell the truth.
I almost missed the appointment.
Not here.
As you wish.
I can't refuse an old friend.
All aboard who goes on board.
Let me wait here until it leaves.
It's not much to ask.
I can't get away.
I know I can trust you.
Gaby.
Gaby.
Gaby.
Gaby.
Gaby.
Gaby.
I'm sorry, Pepe.
He thought you were going to escape.
And so I have, my friend.
- Quel nom, s'il vous plaît?
- Monsieur et Madame de Chavigny.
Monsieur et Madame...
de Chavigny.
- Merci.
- Merci.
- Quel nom, s'il vous plaît?
- Mr. Chan and son.
Monsieur Chan...
et fils.
- Thank you so much.
- Thank you, monsieur.
- Commandant.
- Bonsoir, Commandant.
- Bonsoir.
- Bonsoir, MonsieurJoubert.
Bonsoir.
- Oh! Excusez-moi.
- So sorry.
Ah, Monsieur Charlie Chan!
Jules EtienneJoubert, chef de police de Monaco.
- I am honored.
- Honor most mutual.
Humbly introduce number one son, Lee.
- Oh, that is French, no?
- Why, yes.
I am charmed.
Oh. Please.
- Excuse, please.
- You see? He is "insult. "
A million pardon, monsieur, but i did not know.
My compliment.
You are my guests.
- No, but-
- i insist. And in Monte Carlo, Joubert's word is law.
Already you offend by not announcing your arrival in Monaco to me.
Humble presence of no more importance... than one drop of rain in, uh, cloudburst.
Oh, come, come, come.
All the world, it knows of Charlie Chan, eh?
- No?
- Well-
Aha. You see?
Today i hear you arrive in Monte Carlo.
Naturellement, i am very anxious you should make my acquaintance.
So i follow you from hotel to casino.
Me voici. Here i am.
Regard with admiration the masterpiece of all casinos.
Perhaps you would like to play a little roulette or chemin de fer, no?
- No.
- Yes. Listen, Pop. I've got a great hunch.
Our room in the hotel at Nice is 125.
I'm 25 years old.
This is the 25th of August.
And by the Chinese calendar, this is the year 9,325.
Twenty-five also amount you borrow from me last week.
I'll pay you back just as soon as i win, Pop.
I can't lose at roulette if I play number 25.
- Perhaps you break the bank with such a system.
- Gosh. Do you think so?
I wonder which table
I'd better play on.
To avoid panic in house, suggest you start attack on smallest bank.
Okay. I'll see you later, Pop.
Allons. You-You and i.
We watch this table where fortunes change hands at- oh, how you say- the flip of the card.
50,000 francs.
Banco.
Please, may i have a thousand of that?
- I- i feel lucky.
- I hope you're right.
- Make your bet, mademoiselle.
- Ah, thank you.
Now you will witness the most bitter of playing.
The man with the bank is Paul Savarin.
Very clever and very rich.
The other one is Victor Karnoff, the great financier.
They are the enemies in the Bourse as well as in the casino.
- Card, monsieur?
- No.
Monsieur has great confidence.
In my own judgment, yes.
You're not afraid to draw to a five, are you?
You misinterpret caution for fright,
Monsieur Karnoff.
I judge the wiles of my opponent as well as the value of my hand.
- Ahh!
- Baccara.
I'm afraid you're a bit too reckless, Savarin.
I find it more exciting than conservatism.
It is ever so.
The money, it is nothing. They play only to give the insult to each other.
Contradiction of old saying that talk is cheap.
Aha. You have said it with a mouthful.
Pardon, Madame Karnoff.
Your brother would like to see you in the bar.
Thank you.
- Hello, Gordon.
- Did Victor see you come in here?
Why, no. He's playing chemin de fer with Savarin.
What's wrong?
I- i've been checking over his securities tonight.
25,000 dollars' worth of the Metallurgic bonds are missing.
Oh.
- Joan, did you take them?
- Why, no! No, i- i don't know anything about them.
Listen, i want you to be truthful with me.
I know you're in trouble, and the bonds might've helped you out.
- Do you think you can get them back tonight?
- Tonight?
There's a bank messenger from Paris waiting at the house right now.
Victor's selling a million dollars' worth of Metallurgics.
This time, he's out to wreck Savarin.
- How much time have i?
- About an hour.
Bring them directly to me at the house.
I'll handle them from then on.
Come on.
Keep your chin up.
- Card?
- No. Merci.
- Everything's ready, Victor.
- What? Oh, fine, fine.
Hello, darling.
I'll be with you in a moment.
- I'm cashing in.
- Hello, Gordon.
Oh, look at all the money the woman has.
It's downright indecent.
So my wealth is now the attraction, hmm?
Still the girl herself.
I, uh- i'll be a little later than i expected tonight.
Will you wait for me here?
- Mmm. Of course.
- Right.
Merci. i just took Savarin for five straight hands of chemin de fer.
Don't gloat, dear.
He'll win it back tomorrow.
Tomorrow he'll lose a lot more to me than he ever staked at a casino table.
- Get your wraps, dear.
- Do you mind going on without me?
I'm winning tonight, too, for a change, and i shouldn't walk out on my luck.
Of course not, darling.
See you later.
Come on, Gordon.
Garçon. My wraps, please.
Oui, Madame Karnoff.
Oh, Pop, i haven't got a cent in my pocket.
Rejoice that you still have honorable pants.
So, you are now a shareholder in the casino.
Chip off ancient block.
Venerable grandparent once have large holdings... in fan-tan house.
Oh! Mais oui.
I am frustrate that you must leave so soon.
Well, you see, i'm exhibiting a painting at the Paris Exposition... and we've got to be there for the showing.
- Ah, monsieur is an artiste.
- Pop says i am.
But i'm not so sure. Gosh, i like detective work better than painting.
If paintings as full of imagination as detective work... he will be Chinese Rembrandt.
- Hotel imperial. Tres vite.
- Oui, madame.
Haut taxi.
It is arranged.
If he does not get you to the train at Nice on time, you will let me know.
- Then i kill him myself, personally.
- Thank you so much.
- Good-bye, Monsieur Chan.
- Good-bye.
- Good-bye, MonsieurJoubert.
- Good-bye.
Imbécile!
Voila!
Au revoir, MonsieurJoubert!
Thanks a lot!
Bonne chance.
Bon voyage. Au revoir!
Oui. Oui.
Non! Non!
Bonne chance!
Bon voyage!
Au revoir!
Merci bien, madame.
Benedictine, please.
Hello, honey.
What's on your mind?
Al, i need those bonds.
- So do i. It's the reason you gave them to me.
- I'm serious.
Victor's sending a large shipment of his Metallurgic bonds to Paris tonight.
I've got to get them back before they're missed.
Sorry, kid, but i don't believe you.
You've got to believe me. Don't you realize what it would mean if he finds out?
Sure. He'd forget about it because you're his wife.
Nothing doing, baby.
You better drink that.
You look as though you need it.
Here. I'll give you this bracelet.
It's worth more than the bonds.
I never touch jewelry, but i would consider cash.
Where would i get $25,000 tonight?
Forget it then.
- Good evening, Monsieur Savarin.
- Have there been any calls for me?
One moment.
I'll inquire of the operator.
- Merci. There were no calls, monsieur.
- Thank you.
If i have the cash tomorrow, will you give me back the bonds?
I thought you needed them tonight.
I'll figure out some way to cover up till i see you tomorrow.
Okay. I'll be here.
Series "G."
18407 to 17.
Right.
'J"...
2264 to 74.
Correct.
Hello, dear!
You're back early.
- How did your luck hold out?
- I should have left with you. I lost everything.
You see? You needed my moral support.
And financial.
But you're busy. I'm going up to bed.
- That roulette wheel gave me a bit of a headache.
- All right, darling.
Get some sleep.
I'll be along later.
- Sorry your luck went sour, Joan.
- It could've been worse.
K-2755 to-
Oh, Monsieur Karnoff, there's a break in the series.
You're right. How about this, Gordon?
Three of these bonds are missing.
That's funny. I'll look among the extra Metallurgics we have in the safe.
Perhaps they're among these we haven't checked, Renault.
Perhaps.
R- 9183 to 93.
Correct.
- How about it, Gordon? Did you find them?
- Yes, here they are.
Guess i put them with the others by mistake the last time i checked up.
- That finishes our work. Doesn't it?
- Oui, monsieur.
I'll tell Ludwig to bring the car around.
Voila. Your receipt.
Oui, monsieur.
He is sending the bonds to Paris tonight.
Oui. By plane, from Nice.
You can bring the car around now, Ludwig.
Bien, monsieur. Tout de suite.
Tell Ramboulette i'll keep in constant touch with him by telephone.
- Very well.
- I don't want any slipups, understand?
- Good-bye and good luck.
- Merci.
I'd like to see Savarin's face when he gets the first market reports in the morning.
Eh? Oh, yes, so would i.
Well, that's that. Think i'll get a breath of fresh air before turning in.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Ingrate!
Ingrate!
It's no use, Pop.
We'd better start walking back.
Illustrious ancestor once say...
"Destination never reached by turning back on same. "
Eh, correction, please.
Instruct loquacious driver, uh, to follow... if successful in assembling jigsaw puzzle.
Comment? Que dites-vous?
When you get the car fixed, follow us!
Oh!
Je ne comprends pas.
Please.
Actions speak louder than French.
Oh!
They don't seem to understand.
Uh, French very difficult language.
There's another car down there, Pop.
Must've been an accident.
Uh, perhaps like own taxi- on sit-down strike.
There's nobody here!
Contradiction, please. Look.
That other car- they must have gone for a doctor.
- Maybe we can help.
- No.
Touch nothing.
Too late for doctor.
This man shot to death.
Shot? Gee, Pop.
I'll bet the chauffeur did it and escaped in that other car!
Is possible.
Note careful attempt to destroy footprints.
But why would the chauffeur bother to do that? They'll suspect him anyway.
Perhaps not worried about own footprints.
Rhinestone suggest presence of lady.
Gee, Pop, it's what the French newspapers call a crime passionnel.
The woman was probably this man's wife or his sweetheart.
She had the chauffeur drive him out here to a lonely spot.
Between them, they murdered him and got away together.
Please, stop deductions-
Also, approaching automobile.
Hey! Stop! Stop!
Vous dites?
Never mind. Come on. There's trouble.
There's been a murder!
Over there.
We just found it.
Uh, this is my father, Charlie Chan.
We were on our way to catch the train to Paris... when we found this car and a man in the backseat.
Now, we've been investigating-
Uh-
It's okay, Pop. I fixed everything.
Why should those officers arrest us?
I told them who we are.
Fortunately, assassination of French language... not serious crime.
- Monsieur Chan!
- So sorry.
But find Monte Carlo hospitality difficult to escape.
Monsieur Lee, what did you tell the officer?
Well, i said, uh-
Oh!
Monsieur Lee has made the slight mistake.
You tell him you discover the auto...
and you murder the man.
In future, remember... tongue often hang man quicker than rope.
I am so sorry.
Say, Pop, the train for Paris- we've got to hurry.
Train depart from Nice
20 minutes ago.
- Then you must stay in Monte Carlo for tonight.
- No- i insist!
I will send to Nice for your baggage.
You will be my guests at the imperial Hotel in the finest room... with the hot and cold waters that runs.
But first we go to my office.
Also, one thing more.
There is no trace of missing chauffeur... but in soft earth near car, discover this.
A woman. Aha!
Now we have some life in the case!
Cherchez la femme.
Always at the bottom of trouble is a woman.
That's just what i told you, Pop.
We have identified the car.
Donnez-moi Monsieur Victor Karnoff.
Oui.
- Same gentleman noticed at casino?
- Unfortunately, yes.
Quel catastrophe.
Écoutez, Monsieur Chan.
Mademoiselle Fifi Zaza reports the loss of puppy dog. Bien.
A doctor has the watch stolen.
Bien.
A bartender attempts the sale of some bonds...
and the bank lift the eyebrows. Bien!
But it has to be the great Karnoff in whose automobile is found a man murdered to death.
Oh, he will be most unreasonable.
Allô.
Bonsoir, Monsieur Karnoff.
One thousand apologies.
No, i hadn't retired.
Go on.
What? My car? Where?
Now, the chauffeur- his name and description, please.
Ah, yes. Oui.
And now, the murdered man in the rear seat-who was he?
That was Renault, the bank messenger.
Why? Why? Robbery, of course. He was carrying a million dollars' worth of my bonds!
A million in bonds?
Sacre bleu.
Why, robbery, of course.
As plain as the nose on your face.
Pardon, monsieur.
On my face.
Well, what issue were they?
Metallurgiques.
Oui. Oui, monsieur.
Je comprends.
Monsieur Karnoff, deeply as I regret to ask it-
No, don't bother to apologize.
Of course i'll come down, as soon as i telephone my bankers in Paris.
This is the most confounded outrage i ever heard of!
Allô. Allô?
Good night, monsieur.
What did he say?
He was most unhappy.
I've given the alarm for the arrest of the chauffeur.
- Can ask question, please?
- Of course.
Mr. Karnoff lose Metallurgic bonds?
Why, yes.
Observe, please.
Report by bank mention bonds of same name.
- Gee, Pop!
- Please.
Permit MonsieurJoubert to interpret same.
It is incredible.
Metallurgic bonds,
$25,000 of them... were offered for sale at the bank by Monsieur Albert Rogers... bartender at the imperial Hotel.
- Bank purchase same?
- They make the report to us.
Should a bartender be so wealthy? No.
So they say to him,
"Come back tomorrow. "
I am slowly confusing.
Present case like too many cocktails.
Make very bad headache.
Perhaps, uh, bartender provide remedy for same.
Bon. We shall see.
Allons.
One moment, please.
Recognize same?
That's the car we saw at the scene of the murder!
Oui, monsieur. Mademoiselle Evelyn Grey.
Aha! The woman in the case!
Oui, Commandant.
Allons!
Mademoiselle Evelyn Grey- she is in?
I will find out, MonsieurJoubert.
There is some trouble, monsieur?
I shall also wish to speak with privacy... to your bartender, Monsieur Rogers.
But he's not here.
He's off duty.
He will not get far.
Mademoiselle Grey does not answer, monsieur.
The key to her room, if you please.
But, monsieur, i assure you mademoiselle is quite respectable.
Who am i to doubt?
I suspect her only of murder.
- Apartment 319, monsieur.
- Merci.
Good evening, gentlemen.
Monsieur Savarin!
A thousand pardons.
I should have answered the door more promptly.
I did not know you were so impatient.
- We were looking for the suite of Mademoiselle Grey.
- This is it.
Evelyn, you have guests.
Monsieur le chef de police... and friends.
How nice.
Won't you come in?
Merci, mademoiselle.
I am so sorry to make this intrusion on you.
I call you on the telephone.
There is no answer.
- Did it not ring?
- It did.
It... did?
Does a desire for privacy usually result in a police investigation?
I quite understand. Mademoiselle, the white roadster in front of the hotel-
- it is yours?
- Why, yes, it is, but-
Explain, please, the reason for which you drive on the Nice road two hours ago.
The road to Nice?
You must be mistaken.
MonsieurJoubert, is this an official investigation?
Oui, monsieur, of a murder.
A bank messenger was killed while carrying bonds of great value.
On the road to Nice?
Where Mademoiselle Grey's car was observed by Monsieur Chan at the scene of the crime.
- I'm afraid you were mistaken.
- It's the same car, all right, Miss Grey-
That's ridiculous. Miss Grey's is not the only car of that model on the Rivera.
- But i'm sure that the-
- Uh, so sorry.
Number one son possibly make error in identity of car.
Excuse, please.
- You are owner of walking stick?
- Yes.
Don't tell me that was also noticed on the scene of the crime.
Newly born scratches indicate... stick might have been present and used...
to scrape away footprints.
I'm sorry to disillusion you...
but you evidently don't know that one of the pleasures of carrying a stick... is to occasionally poke it in hedges and gravel paths.
Habit very delightful, but damaging.
Monsieur Savarin speaks the truth.
I, myself, always dig the walking stick into the flower bed.
Forgive ignorance.
But, uh, ladies on Riviera... also indulge in similar pastime?
I don't understand.
Heels on beautiful slippers... denote recent burial in soft earth.
Please note left heel.
One rhinestone abscond from same.
Superb, Monsieur Chan!
I think perhaps we can repair the slipper of mademoiselle... with the so little rhinestone at my office.
Voila. The fit, it is perfect.
Uh, perhaps memory of whereabouts now refreshed?
Quite. It was my car you saw.
See, Pop? I told you there was a woman in it!
If you please, will you explain?
I left the casino about 10:00... to take an hour's drive before returning for an engagement i had.
On the road to Nice, i saw what i thought was an accident and stopped.
There was a dead man in the car.
Just then two men came along the road.
L- I was frightened.
I thought they'd killed the man, so i drove away before they reached me.
Excuse, please.
If you thought men approaching on road murderers... why stop to rub out own footprints?
The missing chauffeur could have done that.
You were not in car with young lady?
No.
When you drive away, did you not return to the casino?
I- No, i came directly to the hotel... where i happened to meet
Monsieur Savarin.
Ah? And why did you not make the report to the police?
I advised her not to become involved,
MonsieurJoubert.
- Has my chauffeur Ludwig been found yet?
- No, Monsieur Karnoff.
What are you doing here?
Trying to convince MonsieurJoubert...
that neither mademoiselle nor myself is a criminal.
What is their connection in this?
Mademoiselle was on the Nice road when the crime takes place.
- And Savarin was with her.
- He does not admit same.
Of course not, but he had the best motive in the world for being there.
Your imagination is magnificent, Karnoff.
If you are through questioning Miss Grey, i suggest that you allow us to leave.
One moment, please.
Engagement you did not keep at casino was with whom?
- With Mr. Chase.
- That's right.
I was still waiting for her when Mr. Karnoff phoned and told me to meet him here.
I heard them make the appointment earlier in the evening.
But aside from that, what bearing has all this on the case?
To begin at the commencement, you have the description of the stolen bonds, yes?
Right here.
That's the messenger's receipt.
- It contains a list of every bond in the shipment.
- Merci.
Who, beside honorable self, knew of bond shipment?
Gordon, my secretary here, my wife and the bank messenger.
And naturally, the chauffeur Ludwig.
Ludwig, of course!
He might have given you suspicion in some way?
No, i can't think of anything.
Wait. He was telephoning someone just before he left for Nice with the bank messenger.
Aha! Now we arrive in the vicinity of somewhere.
- With whom did he have the talk?
- I don't know.
We will trace the call.
I can save you the trouble.
Ludwig telephoned me.
- You?
- That explains everything.
This man would go to any lengths to prevent my bonds from reaching Paris.
Their sale on the Bourse would have wiped him out.
Ludwig was your spy and accomplice in the murder of Renault, the messenger!
- Be careful what you say.
- Monsieur Savarin-
- i admit buying information, but i don't deal in murder.
- You confess to bribing Ludwig!
- I bought information.
- It's the same thing!
Will you stop mumbling and do something?
He kills a man, ruins me by stealing a million dollars in bonds...
- and you don't even arrest him!
- Karnoff, i warn you-
Messieurs!
I am the police.
I will make the accusation.
- Now-
- interruption, please.
Stolen bonds were insured against theft?
Naturally.
If bonds insured, please explain how ruin possible... because of robbery.
Merci, monsieur.
It is obvious that Karnoff has his own reasons for directing suspicion... on others than himself.
- Do you mean you're accusing me?
- You can't do this to me!
I'm an American citizen!
Hey, what's the big idea?
Who's in charge here anyhow?
I am in charge, and the large idea is you are wanted for questioning.
About what?
This afternoon, you attempt to sell to the bank... three Metallurgic bonds.
We have the report here.
Tonight the messenger of Monsieur Karnoff is assassinated... and bonds of the same issue stolen by theft.
Well, what's that got to do with me?
May i see the report on this man?
For what reason you try to sell these bonds today?
- I needed the money.
- Ah? Perhaps you go on a little trip?
No, i like it here.
Possibly gentleman would tell...
how he acquire bonds.
- That's my business.
- The man is right.
After all, he tried to sell his bonds hours before mine were stolen.
They couldn't possibly have been part of my shipment.
Comparison of numbers on bank report and messenger's receipt... might prove interesting.
- Ah.
- i'm on fire!
Next time, must buy asbestos pants.
Messieurs.
If you must throw the matches, aim for the ashtray!
Now, at what have we arrived?
Checking of bond numbers.
Ah, yes.
The receipt! It is gone!
- Gone?
- Well, who has it?
- You can search me.
- I will search everybody!
One moment, please.
Useless to search for bank receipt.
Obviously, fire started to destroy same.
Well? Who is going to admit the guilt?
You're wasting time.
No one here will admit anything.
Find my chauffeur Ludwig.
Let him do the talking.
Allô.
Ah, bon.
Bien. Merci.
- Ludwig has been found.
- Good. Bring him here and question him.
That, Monsieur Karnoff, is impossible.
Ludwig was found in a small marsh near the scene of the crime.
He is dead.
Hello. Oh.
Yes, i'm alone.
That was a nice little trick you pulled on me.
Al, i'm sorry.
I had- i had to take them.
You know i was in a jam.
But that's impossible.
I haven't that much money here.
Listen, you little double-crosser.
I want that dough, see?
I don't care how you get it.
Only you make it by noon, or I'm talking.
What do you want?
Just a little talk- about those bonds of yours.
- I told the police all i know.
- You didn't tell 'em anything.
The bonds you tried to sell were among those i gave the messenger.
I remembered the numbers the minute i saw that report.
Aw, you're crazy. Besides, why didn't you tell that cop about it if you're so sure?
I have my own way of handling this.
When i first checked my list, those bonds were missing.
In a few minutes, they turned up- very conveniently for someone.
- Where did you get them?
- I bought 'em.
You're lying.
Who gave them to you?
- Nobody, i tell ya. I bought 'em.
- Then you still have them.
I'll buy them from you and pay you double what they're worth.
Well, i- i haven't got 'em right here.
That's the first time you've told the truth.
And i'd advise you to stick to it, Rogers... or you'll find yourself in a nasty situation.
Oh, yeah? Well, maybe i wouldn't be alone.
I might say a lot you wouldn't want to hear.
You might, but i don't think you will.
Good night.
It is the great honor for the hotel that you stay here, Monsieur Chan.
The imperial is the home of all the famous who visit Monte Carlo.
Thank you so much.
Mr. Savarin, he live here long time?
Oui, monsieur. Many years.
He is a fine gentleman.
Yes. Very sad he is suspected by police as criminal.
Monsieur Savarin- the criminel?
Oh, it is not possible.
Share same belief.
- Perhaps would help clear honorable gentleman's name?
- I am at your service.
Would like record of his telephone calls this evening.
- Ah! It is what you call "the alibi. "
- Yes.
One moment, monsieur.
Here are the calls.
There were two of them.
The first one is made by me at 8:00 for Monsieur Savarin.
He directed me to charter a plane at Nice for Paris.
What is time of departure?
He change his mind.
The second call is to Nice Airport at 9:30 when he cancels the plane.
Thank you so much.
Good night.
Bonsoir, monsieur.
What? Oh.
Oh, it's you, Pop.
What time is it?
Where are we?
- Are we following a clue?
- Yes.
Directly to pajamas and bed.
Monsieur a décidé?
One moment, please.
Can assist in negotiating one order of waffles... without danger of arrest?
Uh, why don't you have strawberries and cream and ham and eggs, Pop?
- That's what i'm having.
- Please. Prefer waffles.
J'aurais fraises a la creme... oeufs au jambon.
Et il aura... waffles.
S'il vous plaît, monsieur?
- "Waff-el. "
- Je ne comprends pas.
Please.
One picture still worth
10,000 words.
Waffle, please.
You know, waffle.
Ah. Waff-el.
- Thank you so much.
- Waff-el.
Gee, i'm glad he understood.
I'm certainly hungry.
Excitement of last night... also have no effect on appetite of young lady.
You know, Pop, she never did explain about those footprints.
I've got a theory that she and the bartender, Al Rogers-
- Good morning, messieurs.
- Good morning.
Good morning, MonsieurJoubert.
I didn't recognize you out of uniform.
Oh, the uniform. I only wear him on the most state occasion...
like the visit of your papa.
- Ah. Merci.
- Have had own breakfast?
Yes, but i do not enjoy it.
The eyes, all night long, they have not shut up.
I am very depressing.
Perhaps, uh, bright sunshine bring forth solution.
Note. Young lady keep appointment 10 hours late.
For once, even the search for the woman is not the pleasure.
The head, it is filled with the bumble bee.
Buzz, buzz, buzz.
Have remedy in luggage- prescription of ancient Chinese doctor.
- Please obtain same.
- Sure, Pop.
It'll fix you up, all right.
Voila. Waffle.
Very appetizing.
Thank you so much.
Well, Pop, i hope you enjoy the breakfast you drew for yourself.
Am humbly eating own words.
Cream, please.
Really, darling, you're not very good company this morning.
After all, last night wasn't very pleasant for me, you know.
You still haven't explained about Savarin.
I told you what happened.
I met him in the lobby quite by accident.
Oh, now, Gordon, what's wrong with you?
It isn't me.
It's- it's Victor.
He's pretty badly upset about Ludwig selling information to Savarin.
Hmm. Yes, i can imagine.
- Now he doesn't seem to trust anyone.
- Even you?
Well, he knows about you and me, but-
When he saw you with Savarin last night, well-
- How ridiculous.
- Yes. I tried to tell him that.
Evelyn, promise me you won't see Savarin anymore.
Of course, silly.
He means nothing to me.
There. Does that make you feel better?
I'm sorry, but... it just seems that i resent anyone else being near you.
Oh, darling.
Sometimes you sound like a little boy.
Well, let's not talk about it anymore, huh?
All right. Meet me here for cocktails at 5:00?
Mm-hmm. It's a date.
Well, i must be running along.
It's gonna be a busy morning for me.
Victor's pounding the devil out of Savarin in the stock market today.
- Good-bye, dear.
- Good-bye, darling.
All right. Sell them in 10,000-share lots.
And offer 5,000 Burma Timber at the market.
Hold the line a moment.
Oh, come in, Evelyn.
Oh, never mind.
I know i can't afford to take any further losses, so do as i tell you.
Good. Keep in touch with me... and go to any extreme to hold the market up.
Au revoir.
You saw Gordon?
- Yes.
- And?
I'm afraid that source of information is closed from now on.
What do you mean?
Karnoff is suspicious of me.
Gordon's jealous of you.
We should never have been seen together in public.
- How's the market going?
- Badly.
The surety company gave Karnoff immediate coverage on his stolen bonds.
Their theft didn't cripple him at all.
I've got to do something- anything- to stop him.
You've already done everything possible.
Wait a minute.
Last night, i saw Madame Karnoff... in the bar downstairs, alone.
She was having a very confidential talk with Rogers, the bartender- the same chap the police dragged into the inquiry.
You think that, uh-
Perhaps.
I could be sure... if i only knew what they were talking about.
Maybe i could find that out.
Fine.
Rogers is probably on duty right now.
Hello. What'll it be?
Oh, something strong.
I'm all in after that session with the police last night.
Aw, don't let 'em get you down, lady.
You certainly weren't afraid of them.
I think it's terrible the way they tried to drag you into it.
Heh! They got nothin' on me.
But there's a lot i could say...
If i wanted to.
Excuse me, lady.
Hello. Oh, it's you.
Yeah, I've been waitin'for your call.
Yeah. Yeah.
The sooner, the better.
Yeah, okay.
Number one son evidently sail to Honolulu for ancient headache remedy.
Oh, do not worry.
He probably forgets to come back, eh?
Ah! When i was so young, i often forget... particularly when i meet with a girl.
Ah, bon. Merci.
These are the reports i sent for last night.
The first refers to Mademoiselle Evelyn Grey.
Ah, so sorry, but cannot solve mystery of French language.
Pardon. i make the translation.
Uh, age: 24.
Born in London.
Unmarried.
Occupation: Mannequin.
Left position in April.
Since then, living expensively in Monte Carlo... with invisible income.
Perhaps stolen bonds help pay hotel bill.
You have said something.
Ah, here we have Monsieur Rogers, the bartender.
Age: 35.
Born in Chicago.
Arrested twice for petty larceny.
No conviction.
Occupation: Vaudeville dancer.
Appeared in French music halls in 1936.
Since employed as bartender in Vichy and Monte Carlo.
Very doubtful petty larceny mouse attack millionaire lion.
Ah, but perhaps the mouse drink too heavily of his own cocktails...
and then become not afraid of the lion.
Possible.
Anyway, we make the investigation.
Aha. Listen to this.
At 8:00 this morning, Madame Karnoff bring jewelry to the pawnshop in Nice... and borrow 750,000 francs.
In American money- how much, please?
Uh, 25,000 dollar.
Very strange.
Same amount bartender ask for bonds.
- Ah, you think there is a connection?
- Perhaps.
I cannot make the tail and head of it.
The lady has a rich husband, but no money.
The bartender has no money, but has rich bonds.
Now, what is the answer?
Questions are keys to door of truth.
Eh? Ah! Mais oui!
We speak first with the bartender.
Hey, you. Come here.
Where is Monsieur Rogers?
He left about 10 minutes ago right after he got a phone call.
Give me the telephone.
I will trace the call.
You perhaps hear Monsieur Rogers say where he goes?
Yes. His hotel.
Other people present when telephone call arrive?
Why, yes, but i didn't know any of them except Miss Grey.
- She's a guest here.
- Thank you so much.
Ah! Bon. Merci.
The telephone call, it came from-
- House of Mr. Karnoff?
- Oui, Monsieur Chan.
And they meet at the hotel of Monsieur Rogers. Yes, no?
Perhaps now we catch lion in mousetrap. Or lioness.
We shall see. Allons.
Oui, madame. Oui.
Yes, sir.
I mean, oui.
Eh?
Gosh, Officer, i'm sort of a detective, and there's a man here i'm following.
Silence!
- Gee, you've got me all wrong. I can explain everything.
- Silence!
The mousetrap.
He is dead.
Bullet enter near base of brain.
Body still warm.
I will search the room.
Aha! He was packing the clothes.
For the escape perhaps.
Monsieur Chan.
The bonds Metallurgic.
The stolen shipment.
One million dollars.
Everything is now clear.
The bartender steal the bonds and commit the murders.
Then he become full of fright.
He knows he cannot escape the police chain i draw so tight around Monte Carlo.
So what does he do?
He takes the pistol... point him here, makes the suicide.
- Voila. The case, it is now finished.
- Contradiction, please.
Only Rogers finished.
Case still open.
- Comment?
- Note bullet enter head behind left ear.
Oui?
Also, gun found in left hand.
Oui.
Yet, position of coffee cup and pot... indicate victim right-handed.
It is too true.
Obviously the left hand does not make the suicide for the right-handed man.
But the bonds. Monsieur Chan, do they not prove he is the thief?
Prove only that thief was here.
And plant the bonds and the gun-
On dead man who cannot defend self.
Regard. Chair overturned... in struggle to avoid murderer.
Why could this not happen to someone else?
For 25 years, there is no murder in Monte Carlo.
And then three people are killed- piff, paff, poof- like that.
I am humiliating.
Would be interesting to learn... identity of person who telephone Mr. Rogers.
I will have my men take the photograph of this room... and remove the body.
Then we go to the Karnoff villa and make the questions.
Uh, humbly suggest
Mr. Savarin and Miss Grey also present.
I hope they are not also dead.
Soon we have no suspects left.
Uh, one moment. Look.
My men told you to come here, mademoiselle?
Your men? No.
I drove out with Monsieur Savarin.
- Savarin? Where is he?
- In the house with Monsieur Karnoff.
C'est terrible!
Come. We have not a moment to lose.
That's enough, Savarin! Apologize for your remarks concerning my wife, or i-
- You are all right, Monsieur Karnoff?
- Of course i'm all right.
- What do you want?
- A small talk, monsieur, with your wife.
You can ask me any questions you have in mind.
My wife knows nothing whatever about last night.
Unfortunately, necessary to question fair lady about today.
Pardon, madame.
But why did you this morning... make the appointment to meet
Monsieur Albert Rogers at his hotel?
I warn you, Joubert.
Your insinuation is an insult.
Truth cannot be insult.
Unfortunately, we have traced telephone call.
- But- - Also, we have the report from a certain pawnshop.
- The denial is useless.
- Yes, i suppose it is.
I went to that pawnshop to raise money for Al Rogers.
He- He was blackmailing me.
Has been for months.
Explain, please, nature of club held over head.
I- i married Al Rogers seven years ago.
It was a horrible mistake, and we separated.
Then i lost track of him, but several years later i heard he had divorced me.
I never knew that was untrue until he found me here and started his threats.
Don't worry, dear.
My wife has nothing further to say.
No, Victor, i want to go on.
Last week, Rogers demanded more money than i had... so i- i took three of my husband's
Metallurgic bonds from the safe.
Then Gordon, my brother, told me... that these were the bonds they were sending to Paris.
I was afraid Victor might find out what I had done.
I tried to get them back from Rogers last night, but he refused.
So i... stole them from his room.
He found out immediately, of course, and gave me until noon today to make good.
You give Mr. Rogers money this morning?
No. I- i went to his hotel, but he-
Pop! Pop!
I found the murderer!
It's Rogers, the bartender. I followed him.
I saw him packing his luggage.
He's gonna leave town.
If you hurry, you can still catch him.
Unfortunately, Mr. Rogers already depart on long journey.
- He got away?
- He is collapsed with death.
Dead?
Rogers is-
Oh, Victor.
All of you, don't look at me like that.
I didn't kill him!
I didn't kill him!
He was dead when i got there.
He'd fought with someone.
The furniture was upset.
It's possible, madame, for a woman to have done that.
You pay him the blackmail, yet you fear this is not the end.
He will demand more and more, but there is one way to stop his talking forever.
You blundering idiot.
She couldn't have committed that murder.
Why are you so certain?
Unless you commit the crime yourself.
If you discover the scandal, you also have the motive.
You're insane. I never saw Rogers but once, and that was last night in your office.
Contradiction, please.
Caretaker at hotel of unfortunate bartender...
testify you visit Rogers last night... after inquiry at police office.
All right. All right, i'll admit that.
But today, i haven't been out of this house.
Ask Gordon, my secretary.
He'll verify that.
That's right. Mr. Karnoff and i had breakfast together.
I was with him until 10:00 when i left for the bank in town.
And Rogers was killed between 10:00 and 11:00.
At which time,
Monsieur Savarin and myself... were having a most interesting conversation in this room.
Which cause me to remind myself-
For what reason do you make the visit here today?
I don't believe i have to answer that.
There is much you must answer to.
I have given you a complete account of my actions.
Correction, please.
Explain why, last night at 8:00... you telephone Nice for private aeroplane to Paris.
And why, at 9:30, soon after the murders... you make the second telephone call and cancel the order for the plane.
Very well.
After Ludwig phoned, i made arrangements to fly to Paris... to defeat Monsieur Karnoff's plans.
I was on the way to Nice Airport... when i saw his automobile with a dead man in it.
I thought I might be suspected of the crime if I left Monte Carlo.
So i returned and canceled the plane.
Why did you not tell the truth last night?
If i had admitted being on the Nice road... you would probably have arrested me.
Excuse, please.
You drive to Nice alone?
No. Mademoiselle Grey drove me in her car.
It is very fast, and I was in a hurry.
- Then you didn't meet him by accident after all.
- Please, Gordon, i can explain.
Enough! We have no time for the lovers' quarrel.
Your automobile, mademoiselle, it intrigues me.
Six months ago, you are a poor mannequin in a London dress shop.
Yet today, you possess the fast automobile worth a small fortune.
What are you trying to insinuate?
You do not have the income, yet you have the jewelry, the furs, the automobile.
May i remind you, mademoiselle, there are no Christmas trees in Monte Carlo.
It would seem that the cost of mademoiselle's furs... is more important to the police and Monsieur Chan... than the capture of a murderer... and the recovery of Monsieur Karnoff's bonds.
So sorry for poor memory.
Lee, please obtain evidence from honorable policeman in car outside.
Okay, Pop.
I hope your evidence will be of more importance than Joubert's ridiculous questions.
Monsieur, i demand your apology.
And i demand that you send to Paris for someone capable of handling this case.
Here it is, Pop.
Why, that's my bag- the one the bonds were in.
- The ones they are still in.
- Where did you find it?
In room of murdered bartender.
- Lee, you lock bag?
- No. It was locked when i got it.
So sorry.
Can unlock same?
Why, yes.
Gordon, give me the key.
- They're all here.
- Excuse, please.
Original shipment contain one million dollars?
- Why, yes.
- So sorry to disappoint.
But we check bonds while driving here.
200,000 still missing.
Well, i can't understand that.
You'd better check them, Gordon.
Perhaps you made a mistake.
Is possible, but if secretary's search unsuccessful... suggest you look in own safe.
Just what are you driving at?
Missing bonds possibly placed in safe by murderer...
who also plant bag in room of unfortunate Rogers... to convict him and end case.
Come, come, monsieur.
The safe, if you please.
I have more Metallurgic bonds in my safe... but how could you possibly identify them as the missing ones?
By numbers on bank messenger's receipt.
Why, nonsense. You know that was destroyed in your office.
Contradiction, please.
You place receipt in pocket, then start fire to avoid search for same.
Now, please, restore to hands of police.
Merci for this.
And now... an explanation.
That receipt proved that Rogers's bonds are really mine.
Finding that out would naturally have led you to my wife.
For the moment, i will accept that.
And now, monsieur, the safe.
You will check these numbers with those bonds.
He's right, Victor.
These are part of the stolen bonds.
Who, beside honorable secretary, possess key to bag?
I do. Well, that is, I did.
I gave mine to Renault, the messenger.
Beyond a doubt, the small key discovered in his purse.
Then only you and messenger possess keys?
Why, yes, i guess so.
Then you are murderer.
Why, you're crazy.
Ordinary thief would break lock on bag... or cut leather to open same.
You made one mistake when you leave bag in Mr. Rogers's room.
You open it with key.
That doesn't prove anything. Why, anyone could open that lock with a hairpin.
Impossible, also, to open safe with hairpin... and replace bonds.
Why would i do that? If i had taken the bonds, i'd have sold them, wouldn't i?
Not ifbonds stolen to prevent discovery... of previous theft.
Mystery of young lady's expensive luxuries now explained.
Months ago, you steal bonds from employer's safe... to buy affection of former mannequin.
Last night, when danger of exposure arises, you commit murders... then replace in safe enough bonds to conceal former robberies.
Today, you go to Hotel Regale... plant evidence in Mr. Rogers's room... then murder him when he returns to unexpectedly find you.
I didn't, i tell ya.
- I didn't do it! I didn't!
- The same gun was used in each crime.
- That isn't true. Rogers was shot with a different gun.
- Thank you so much.
Only police and murderer could know same.
Gordon, you didn't do it.
You couldn't have.
Yes, i did it, all right, for a lying little cheat.
I stole for you.
I gave you presents because I liked to see you look more beautiful than anyone else.
You let me think you were in love with me.
Savarin- that's who you were really in love with.
You were just using me- using me to get information for him- and laughing at me behind my back.
Someday there's gonna be a payoff... and it's gonna be my turn to laugh.
- Unfortunate young man perhaps better off.
- Oui.
Mademoiselle Grey... the principality of Monaco makes no accusation against you... but, due to your connection with this case... i must insist you leave Monte Carlo within 24 hours.
- I understand.
- Evelyn, is there something i can do?
Ah, yes, Monsieur Savarin, there is.
I make the suggestion you perhaps accompany mademoiselle as she leaves Monte Carlo.
The trip will be more pleasant if you make it together.
Well, now that your papa wins the honors at Monte Carlo... i suppose you will win the grand prize at the Paris Exposition.
Will be facing greatest mystery... if award given to offspring's painting.
Aw, gee, Pop, it isn't that bad.
Say, that's the same cab we had last night.
Imbécile!
He says he has the new spark plug.
Uh, car with new spark plug like flea on puppy dog.
Make both most active.
For his sake, i hope so.
It is with the lead in the heart i say au revoir, my good friend.
Merci so much.
Good-bye.
- Merci, monsieur.
- Au revoir, MonsieurJoubert.
Good-bye, Monsieur Lee.
Bonne chance!
Bon voyage! Au revoir!
Who's there?
What are you doing there?
- What you doing?
- Looking for something.
A lot of nonsense.
- Haven't seen anything, have you?
- What you mean, seen anything?
- Oh, nothing, nothing.
- Mysterious, aren't you?
Oh it's you, you've taken your time, haven't you?
Your cat is been screaming her head off for you.
Oh, what's she wants now?
- It's trouble for you me girl.
- Why? What's that?
She found two broken cup and saucers... from the Best Crown Derby tea set buried in the rose bed.
Oh, what ever she say?
Said it didn't matter, now said kiss you... and tell you she loved you all the better for it, what do you think?
- Oh, what do I going to do?
- When did you break them?
Yesterday when you was out.
I do not know what come over me.
I do not know what's come over you all this week.
Ever since bank holiday you've going about looking two penny's worth of heaven help us.
- Losing things and dropping things.
- Has Dora come back? Dora.
- What am I going to do?
- Do? Make a clean breath of it.
Tell her if she don't like it, she can do the other thing, I would.
Dora, I want you.
- Dora.
- Oh dear.
- Auntie, leave the poor girl alone.
- Leave her alone, a little sneak thief?
Oh, there you are?
- Did you want me?
- I called you, didn't I?
I suppose you think the china here came from the penny bazaar.
Of course, if you splattered them at the rose bed I shouldn't be... well enough ever to see them, I suppose. Well, I have seen.
Oh, Oh, that's hurt, don't be so clumsy.
You want to break my arm?
- Come, come Dora, isn't as bad as all that.
- Not as bad as all that? It's worse.
What about that chicken you stole on Monday?
- I never stole.
- Whatever would else you call it?
Borrowed it perhaps?
But Auntie dear, we've been through all that already.
You keep out of this.
I don't know what's come over you, I really don't.
Clumsy, thieving, deceitful.
You can leave, you're sacked my dear.
Oh and stop that sniveling and squeaking.
You bring my heart on again, go into the kitchen.
Oh Ma'am please, don't send me away.
I haven't got a penny only what I earn, if I lose my job.
You should've thought about that before you broke my china.
I'm sorry, I've not been meself all this week.
So I've noticed.
Is anything that matters Dora?
You're not in any trouble, are you?
Yes Miss, I am, in manner of speaking.
Oh, a man, eh? So that's the game.
- Men too.
- Not men, just my friend.
He promised to marry me but he keeps making excuses, now I know he isn't keen.
Who is he?
A boy I know, a pageboy at Tall Boys.
- Good for nothing, scoundrel.
- Oh no, he isn't.
- He's nice really, if you know what I mean.
- No, I don't, where he come from?
Sort of Irish I think, he's been to sea too.
He's funny of course, ever so open.
- Baby Face they call him.
- Baby Face?
I'd like to give him Baby Face.
- Oh Ma'am?
- Well what?
- You wouldn't see him, would you?
- See him?
Not to tell him off
I don't mean but perhaps... if you to speak to him might think things differently.
He will when I've done with him.
A matter of facts he said he might be popping in this morning to see me.
Oh, that's right, nothing like visitors to brighten up your morning, eh?
Well, send him in when he comes, I'll deal with him.
Yes.
And Ma'am...
And I spelled that crown down be out of your wages.
What you'd going to say?
Well, I was going to say that I do not know how to thank you for your kindness.
- There, done. How it feel?
- Not much better, I know it's neuritis.
You know what you really need isn't massage, is exercise.
- Your body would take care of...
- Don't you dictate me me about my body.
Nobody here understands my body or anything else about me.
As for sympathy, I've forgotten the meaning of the word.
Too bad. Well, I'll be getting along.
Mind you calling on Wednesday, in case my neuritis sets in again
I'll do that and if neuritis pops up let me know toodle-oo.
Oh, nice way to talk to an invalid.
- What do you want?
- There's a policeman at the back door.
Policeman?
Said he was a policeman, he isn't in his uniform though.
- Said he wants to see you very particular.
- What about?
Don't know, better ask him.
I know my conscience is clear, don't know about other peoples, I am sure.
Probably come about Dora.
Why? What she's done is not against the law, human nature.
- Where is he?
- Coming down to the front door now.
- You come in.
- Thank you.
- Mrs. Bramson?
- Yes.
I'm sorry to break in on you like this.
My card.
- Criminal Investigation Department?
- Oh, purely informal visit I assure.
I don't like having people in my house that I don't know.
Well, I'm afraid the law sometimes makes it necessary.
Oh, thank you.
- You can go.
- I don't want to go.
- I want to be and what's up.
- As a matter of fact, I'd like you to stay.
You might be useful, any of you may be useful.
- You live here?
- Catch me.
Now, it is a lonely spot, isn't it?
Long way for you to walk every day.
- I don't walk, I ride a bike.
- But what's the matter?
Well I just thought that if she walked, you see... she might've used some of the paths around here.
- She might've seen something.
- Something of what?
Well, now I'll tell you, I...
Oh, perhaps I better introduce myself.
I'm Mrs. Bramson's niece, I work for her.
- Or pretends to.
- I see, thank you.
Well now...
I wonder if any of you've seen anything in the least... a bit out of the ordinary around here lately.
Anybody called? Anybody strange wandering about in the woods.
The only visitors been the doctor and the district nurse.
It's been ever so gay.
Oh Miss Grayne is always moving about the woods.
She maybe be able to tell you something.
- Yes?
- No, I haven't seen anything I'm afraid.
Oh yes, I did see some men beating the undergrowth.
Oh yes, yes, I am coming to that.
What's all this fuss about?
Has there been a robbery or something?
- No, there's a lady missing.
- Oh?
From the Tall Boys.
- A Mrs. Shellbrook.
- Shellbrook?
Yes, dyed platinum blonde, widow of a colonel, so she says.
Living alone, so she says. Always wearing them fladelaldy openwork stockings.
- Fond of a drop too, that's her.
- Would you know her?
Never set eyes on her, but you know how people talk.
- Regular red hot mama from what I'm told.
- And what's a red hot mama?
Don't you ever go to the pictures?
Well anyway she hasn't been seen since last Monday.
That was Bank holiday.
She was given to walk in the woods a great deal, in this direction.
She's probably so drunk she fell flat and never come to.
No, we've had the woods pretty well thrashed.
Those were the men you saw.
She was a very flashy... now she is a flashy type of woman, I should say.
- At least I hope I should say.
- What you mean, why you hope?
- Well...
- You don't mean to say she might...
- not be alive?
- It's possible.
- You'll be saying she'd be murdered next.
- Well, that's been known.
Lot a stuff of nonsense, from a policeman too.
Wanted to be brought up on detective stories.
Well, I'd be very grateful to you if all of you keep... your eyes and your ears open just in case, good morning Mrs. Bramson.
Good bye.
Good morning Miss...
Oh I am so sorry.
Why, what's the matter, did you thought of something?
Oh, no, no...
What was it? You were looking strange, if you just thought of something.
No, is nothing really, I was only thinking...
What?
Well...
I often wondered on a very fine morning what it would be like for night to come.
But I never can.
It will have to.
- Silly.
- I should think it was.
No, go on.
Well, here we all are, perfectly ordinary English people.
We woke up this morning thinking, is another day.
Got up, looked at the weather, talked and here we are still talking.
- And all the time...
- What?
All the time there may be something lying in the woods, hidden under a bush.
There two feet showing.
Perhaps a high heel, catching the sunlight, with a bird perched on the end of it.
And the other, the other stocking foot... with blood that dried in the stocking.
Somewhere... somewhere there's a man walking about and talking just like us.
He got up this morning, he looked at the weather... and he killed her.
- Well.
- Miss Grayne, you gave me the creeps.
I don't think the lady can quite describe herself as ordinary... after that little flight of fancy.
I hope she's wrong anyway but it'd be a nice little job of work for us.
Well now, if anything funny happens, just call the lot at Shepperley police station.
- Good Morning.
- Good Morning.
- No, don't bother, good morning.
- Lost of nonsense.
I wonder.
Of course you wonder, anything for a bit of excitement I suppose.
- If you please Ma'am.
- What, what is it?
- If you please, he is here.
- Who's here?
My boy, gentleman friend from Tall Boys.
Bring him in, I am ready for him.
I am going to make that young man realize what his duties is.
That's what I am going to do.
Well?
Morning all.
- So you're Baby Face.
- That's me.
Silly name, isn't it?
I must apologize to all and sundry for my fancy dress but is my working tags.
I've been on duty this morning and I, my hands isn't very clean.
- I did not know it was going to be a party.
- Party?
- Well, it's ladies, isn't it?
- Are you shy with ladies?
Oh yes.
You don't seem to be very shy with Dora there.
- Well I...
- You go away.
Yes.
- You smoke I see.
- Yes I...
I am sorry.
I forget my manners in company, clumsy in the other people's houses, I am sorry.
Now then, you know what I set to see you about?
- Yes I think so.
- You ought to be ashamed of yourselves.
- But I am.
- Well then?
- What time is it?
- Past eleven thirty I think.
- Olivia.
- Yes Auntie?
- You forgotten again.
- What?
- My medicine, half an hour late.
- I'm so sorry.
You know it doesn't do me any good unless I take it regularly.
Unless I see to every single thing myself in this house, nothing gets done.
What filthy stuff, get me a chocolate.
What a good you're to look after an invalid.
- You work at Tall Boys, don't you?
- Yes Miss, twenty four hours a day Miss.
Can you tell us anything about the woman who's been murdered?
You know of course there's a
Mrs. Shellbrook missing, don't you?
I thought you said something about a murder.
- Oh, what a nonsense.
- We don't know, of course but...
- It might've been a murder, mightn't it?
- Oh yes, it might've been a murder.
- Yes.
- Have you ever seen her?
Yes, I've seen her, I've taken drinks and cigarettes her up to her.
- What's she like?
- What's she like?
She's on the tall side, thin ankles with one of them bracelets around on one of them.
- Fair hair...
- Well, go on.
Her eyebrows, thin.
With a white mark above them where it has been pulled out to be in a fashion, you know.
Her mouth, thin as well.
With the red stuff painted around it to make it look more.
You can rub it off, I suppose.
Her neck... rather thick.
She laughs a bit loud... then stops.
She's very lively.
You can't say I don't keep my eyes skin, can you?
- Are you always so observant?
- With the ladies, yeah.
If you weren't so observant that Dora would not find herself in the plummet she's now.
- That's right.
- You don't sound very repentant.
But I am, what's done is done that's my motto with it?
How was is that mean?
She's a fine bit of ice for hot weather, isn't she?
Now say young man about Dora.
How long have you known her?
Not very long.
- The butcher wants paid.
- Dotty.
He says there's men ferreting at the bottom... of the garden looking for that Mrs Shellbrook.
- Do you know about it?
- Well, they won't ferrit long.
Not in my Cabot grass, Olivia...
She's never there when
I want her, no, no, no.
Leave me alone, I don't want to be pushed into the nettles today, thank you,
You're the clumsiest woman I ever had in my service. Never looked, how to look after me.
Don't let me pay the butcher so I won't know where she keeps her purse.
But I do know, so protecting the needles in me quick.
They say at the Tall Boy she's got enough inside of her purse too.
Well, nobody is seen it open.
If you had a peep inside you could done in her straight, so you'll do.
- What are you saying?
- I loathe her.
She's an invalid, isn't she?
If she's invalid I'm Mickey Mouse.
Hear, I must get back to my little pork.
Say, what are you doing in my garden? Get out there.
You're ruining my planted lawn.
Who gave you permission to come in here?
- Did Mrs. Bramson called me, do you know?
- I'm sorry Miss, I don't know your name.
Come here.
That's enough of that, of you.
There's not much doing around here for a girl, is there?
It isn't a very entertaining quarter of the world for young lady, is it?
Danny, what's she say?
Oh I beg you pardon.
I am not a snarl but in case you have a call here again...
I'd like to point out that though I'm employed by my aunt...
I'm not quite in Dora's position.
Oh, I hope not.
I am going to marry her though.
- And I...
- I don't believe you.
- You don't like me, do you?
- No.
Everybody else does.
Your eyes are set quite a far apart and... your hands are quite good.
I don't really know what's wrong with you.
You know, I've been looking at you too.
- You know, if...
- I'm sorry.
But it's a waste of time wasting doing your stuff with me.
- Are you playing up to Mrs. Bramson?
- Playing up?
It just crossed my mind for a minute.
You stand a very poor chance there, you know.
What you bet?
They say they got permits to look for that silly woman and more than they like to know.
Is there anything I hated these men is they think they got authority.
But I don't think they are quite as bad as men who thinks they have charm.
What she mean by that?
Well, there's no use thinking she has that either.
- Now, look here young man, about Dora...
- Wait a minute.
Wouldn't you be more comfortable with a pillow behind your back there?
- No, no, no. I don't mind,
- I'll get wait...
Please don't interfere, I don't like anybody interfering with my chair.
Feel better, isn't it?
You are looking pale too.
- Pale? Did you say pale?
- Washed out.
I said to myself when I saw you for the first time.
I said there's a lady who has lot to contend with.
Well I have, nobody knows that better than I do.
I'm sure.
Oh, it must be terrible to see everybody striding back and forth... and enjoying everything and seeing them tasting the fruits...
Oh, I shouldn't said that.
- I'm sorry.
- But it's true.
As true as you're my witness, so nobody else ever seems to realize.
- Now tell me young man, about Dora...
- Excuse me Ma'am, is that your cat?
Yes.
I haven't seen him before.
May I take him up?
- You like cats?
- I like all animals.
Especially cats.
Ah, he's a beauty.
I bet he's a good companion to you, isn't he?
- Probably the only one in this house who is.
- I'm sure.
Would you mind if I asked you what your ailments are?
Well...
- but haven't you better sit down?
- Thank you Ma'am.
Well I, I have the most terrible palpitations.
- And...
- Palpitations?
And the way you get about.
They're very bad thing to have, you know.
Do you realize that nine women out of ten in your condition... would be lying down and given way.
- Would they?
- Indeed they would.
I knew somebody once who had palpitations and... somebody very near to me.
But dead now.
My mother, as a matter of fact.
- Oh.
- I can just remember her.
- As a matter of fact...
- Yes?
- On no, it's daft thing.
- Come, come out with it.
Is just my fancy, I suppose but you remind me a bit of her.
Of your mother?
Don't like to talk about my mother, makes me feel sort of sad.
She had the same kind look as you have.
The same eyes, very wide apart.
And the same very good hands.
- And the same palpitations?
- And the same palpitations.
You don't mind my talking about your health, do you?
No.
You know, you ought to get used to letting other people do things for you.
- Yes.
- You ought to be very careful.
Yes.
You're a strange sort of boy to be a pageboy.
Am I?
You seem so much too sensitive and understanding.
Well, I've never had any advantages, you know but...
- I've always tried to do the right thing.
- Well, I think you deserve better.
Talking of the right thing, what about Dora?
- I'm going to marry her.
- You are?
Sure I'd, I'd marry her now but for the job I got I can hardly keep myself.
But if you got a job with a bit more money, I'd, I'd marry her like a shark.
How would you like to work for me?
- For you?
- Would you like to?
Indeed I would?
I can't imagine anything
I'd like better than... to live in a beautiful house like this, with a kind lady...
- taking care of her.
- Well, well, we'll see.
- Have you got to go back?
- No, not just yet I, it's my half day.
- Stay to lunch.
- Well I...
- In the kitchen of course.
- Oh yes, I know.
- There's plenty of food, stay to lunch.
- It's very kind of you, I...
Isn't there anything I can do to help a bit?
Take you for a walk, for a ride in the sun shine is ever so nice out.
Well all right,
- You know, I've taken a liking to you.
- Is very kind of you Mrs. Bramson.
It's the way you've talked about your mother, that what it was.
- Was it?
- Yes, a very nice thought of yours.
You'd go out like this every day and there's no one who'd sooner for you than...
- Good Morning.
- Morning Ma'am.
What can I do for you?
I want a shawl, a shawl for an old lady.
Something like you know, keep the draft out.
Yes I think I know. About what price?
Well, I don't want a very expensive one but I want a nice one.
Now, here is a very pretty shawl, this is an Angora.
And the price is 15 shillings.
That's a little bit more than I ought to spend, I thought about 5 shillings.
Here's a very pretty little shawl at 5 and 6, this is Shettland.
It's nice. Would you mind put it on so I can see how it looks?
Certainly.
That's nice, I'll take that one.
Well, I think that's the lot Mrs. Bramson.
Remind him not to too easy with these people.
If they haven't paid by Monday you slap them a writ and don't take any excuses.
Very well Ma'am, you just sign the receipt for the money
I'll count it first.
It's a great deal of money for you to keep lose in the house.
- Are 86 pounds there.
- Quiet, I'm trying to count.
You put me out, what you say?
I only said that it's a lot of money for you to keep lose in the house.
I keep more than that.
Put not your trust and banks is my motto.
Aren't you ever afraid of being robbed or burgled?
No, I am not.
Wasn't there something in the paper about a woman having... disappeared around here and foul play being suspected?
Lot of nonsense, they put anything in the newspapers.
All the same I don't all together like... the idea of you and
Olivia being here all by yourselves.
That's very considerate of you I must say... but you can put your mind at rest, there's a man coming to live here.
So we should be quite all right, thank you.
- A servant you mean?
- Yes, a servant.
- So there's no need to be jealous.
- Jealous?
Don't think I don't know, it's
Olivia you are thinking of and not me.
That reminds me, there's something else I want to talk to you about.
- Olivia?
- Yes, how much do I left her?
- Left her?
- In my will.
You change the will so often I really cant say offhand.
Right I can, two hundred pounds.
I've been thinking it over and I've come to the conclusion it's too much.
- I want to cut it in half.
- Mrs. Bramson?
- What's the matter?
- Well, she hasn't any money of her own.
Now look here Mr. Laurie...
Are you going to take my instructions and do as you are told?
- Or I got to get another lawyer?
- Not of course if you insists.
I do insist.
Now if you stop talking I'd finish counting this money and you can get back to town.
- Oh, it's you.
- I've come to take up my residence.
- Is the old lady in?
- She's always in.
Danny, did she say anything to you?
- Say anything?
- Yes, about us, you and me.
Oh, she said she approved, she gave her blessing.
- Well, then when?
- Soon Dora, soon. There.
- Now you can show me in.
- Well, I like that.
- Good afternoon Ma'am.
- Oh, it's you Danny.
- All ready to move in.
- You brought your luggage?
- Yes Ma'am, it's in the hall.
- Well Dora will show you your room.
Right you are Ma'am, might give me a hand.
- Is that the new servant?
- -Yes, a very nice boy, very superior.
Hello, I'm afraid I'll miss seeing you.
- Good afternoon Miss, just moving in.
- Good afternoon.
Looks like if we're going on our holiday, doesn't it?
- Well, you all finish your business,
- Yes, I'm just going.
- Would you walk to the car with me?
- Oh, I'd be glad to.
- Goodbye Mrs. Bramson.
- Goodbye and you do what I told you.
Who's this chap is moving in?
Oh, he's a boy from the hotel she's taken a fancy to.
- The maid's young man.
- Seems a nice friendly sort of chap.
- You think so?
- Yes, why, don't you do?
No, no I don't
I think he's common and insolent and conceited and completely double faced.
Say, that's a bit strong, isn't it?
What's he done to you?
- He hasn't done anything to me.
- You're on edge, that's what it is.
And do you wonder?
Living in that house with her.
- Has she been awful?
- No worse than usual, I'd expect.
Darling, why do you put up with it?
- What else can I do? I've no money and I...
- You know what else you can do.
- Why not?
- Oh Justin, really not again.
Yes, again and again and again. Olivia, why not?
- Why won't you marry me?
- Because...
I told you before, I didn't love you that way.
I know, even if you don't.
Wouldn't I be better than the old lady?
I wouldn't bully you and treat you like a servant.
You wouldn't have to live here in the middle of the woods where nothing ever happens.
Still there's a chance that something might happen.
- What?
- Oh, I don't know but something.
Oh, I know I'm a fool Justin and you're dear and sweet and you're good.
But I, I just want to wait a little longer.
I know you going to tell me that storybook romance doesn't happen anymore.
Oh no. I won't. I know it does happen, it happened to me, with you only.
- Only what?
- Well...
Isn't always dressed up quite as you imagine it, I mean why shouldn't Romeo wear... tweeds and come along in a car instead of leaping over the balcony.
I found my Juliet wearing glasses, sewing and waiting hand and foot on an old lady.
I recognized almost immediately the imprisoned princess I had to rescue.
Won't you let me rescue you?
No, not yet Justin, .I'm sorry but not yet.
Alright, I shan't give up hope.
- Goodbye for present then.
- Goodbye.
This is Shepperley's Advertiser.
Is this your cap?
- Yes.
- I found it hanging in the hall.
I think perhaps you better keep it in here.
Can you imagine me doing a thing like that?
Hanging it up just like as I was a visitor I am sorry.
Are you all right in here? It used to be our box room, I think we moved everything out.
Oh, it's very nice, thank you I hope
I haven't put you in too much trouble.
I, I've been hanging up a couple of pictures to make it seem more like home.
You ever go to the movies?
- Sometimes.
- Real life is better though.
- Oh, Napoleon?
- He did things.
- Is that your chap?
- What? Who?
- Fellow who was here just now.
- Oh, that's Mrs. Bramson's lawyer.
- What she got a lawyer about?
- Well, he manages her affairs.
Oh, I see.
I thought from the way he looked at you, he was a bit be gone on you.
It's rather stuffy in here, why don't you open the window?
Here, here.
You know you wouldn't be bad looking without them glasses.
Thank you but doesn't interest me very much what I look like.
Don't you believe it.
- Why do you say that?
- I just think so.
I understand you all right.
Don't you think young man you rather forgetting your place?
I'm sorry Miss, I'm sure,
Well, when you finished unpacking perhaps you'd better come and... see if there's anything you can do for Mrs. Bramson.
- Where have you been?
- Nowhere.
Is there anything in the paper?
A lot of sensational rubbish about that Shellbrook woman, I can't read it.
Well, it's a bit of a thrill for a small place like this.
Did you find any clues?
Keeper in Shepperley Wood reported on the night in question about...
2 in the morning he heard someone moving mysteriously in... the wood and whistling Mighty Lak' a Rose. Inquiries are being pursued.
That shows how hard up they are for something to print.
Mighty Lak' a Rose indeed, never heard such rubbish in all me life.
All set and uniform, can I be of service lady?
Silly boy, what's that you hiding?
- Oh, it's nothing.
- But what's it?
- Just a silly idea.
- Come, come, what's it?
Well it's just something I brought along and I thought you might like.
It's a shawl, was my mother's as a matter of fact.
I thought I'd like to see you wear it if you didn't mind.
Danny, that's a very sweet thought.
- Can I put it on for you?
- Yes.
I've always kept it.
It's the only thing of my mother's I've got left.
Now that I see you wearing it like that, it's almost as was herself sitting there.
- Wait a minute.
- What's it?
- It's not quite straight.
- Straight?
There.
Wheel me over to the mirror and let me see it.
Right you are.
- There you are, how do you like it?
- Thanks, very pretty.
Thank you Danny, you're a good boy.
Now I think it's time for my nap.
- Shall I take you in?
- It's all right Miss, I'll do it myself.
- Thank you dear.
- Where do we go now?
In there.
You know this chair works very stiff.
Must be very hard for you pushing yourself about in it.
I can fix it in a jiffy if I have some oil, have you got any?
- There's some in the kitchen.
- Good, now, where do you want to go?
Well now, do you think you can you help me out to the bed?
Sure I can.
- You will be very careful of me?
- I'll treat you like you was made of glass.
Yes, yes that's better.
Ah, that's fine.
Now, just while you're getting your spot of shut-eye.
I'll take that chair in the other room and have it right in half a minute.
- Thank you.
- Is that all right?
Yes, it's very nice, very nice.
What you looking at?
I was looking at your room, I haven't seen it before.
- Very pretty room.
- Yes, everything.
What a beautiful picture.
Beautiful...
Well, pleasant dreams and sweet repose, half the bed and all the clothes.
Silly boy.
- Good night.
- Silly boy.
You agree with me, don't you?
You don't like my being here, do you?
It doesn't make the least difference whether I like it or not.
As I told you before,
I'm really a servant to her myself.
Not a very ordinary servant, are you?
No, I suppose not.
Neither am I.
Go on Danny, tell us some more.
Well, that was when I rode the hounds and had me own pack.
Before you went up in the world and become a page boy I suppose.
You know how that happened? Danny told us about his uncle dying leaving him a fortune.
- How much was it Danny?
- Ten thousand quid.
- It's five when I last heard it.
- And you got through it all in 3 months?
- What you spend it on?
- Champagne, jewels, a villa on the Riviera.
And then you went to sea?
Sailed twice around the Cape of Good Hope before the mast.
Well, I must take these...
Madame Olga's Dream Book?
To dream of spiders means danger is approaching.
Daft.
I did dream of spiders last night, hundreds of them.
I should say danger is approaching too, if you're going on like that.
Has he said any more about marrying you?
Not since the day he moved in here, that's a whole week now.
She hasn't brought it up again either.
Seems like it slipped their memory.
Well then, you did not let him kiss you, not in front of me anyway.
I never let my husband kiss me in front of other people till after we were married.
Then he didn't want to.
Hark at that? He's turned the whole place into a regular circus, that's what he's done.
He'll have the old girl doing a rumba before we know where we are.
I shouldn't have coming in here with my overalls on, I'm sorry.
It's alright, I got the trousers on.
- I'm sorry, is my cigarette annoying you?
- Oh not at all, I like it.
Oh sorry pussy. Here, come here puss, come to Danny.
It won't come out.
Look, right there, over here.
I saw that, leave me alone and don't interfere.
Here, here, look.
That and that and that.
Oh yes of course, thank you dear, thanks.
- Cigarette bother you?
- No, dear, not a bit at, of course not.
I think it's coming out.
Oh Danny, you never forget.
Very different from other people, never remember.
Here, how do you like that for a steady hand?
Oh yes Danny.
There you are, nice chocolate to take the taste off your mouth.
The grocer said there were two gallons of kerosene delivered and not paid for.
And they won't be paid for either, not that I have to go to law about it.
The amount of kerosene that man pretends we use here, would think we drank it.
Oh, I wish you take your papers into the other room.
A sonnet, the flame of passion... is not red but white.
- Not quick but slow...
- Give me that please.
What's it?
- It's a poem.
- Let me see it.
It's only nonsense auntie, really.
Sure from the sounds of it but I can see, can't I?
Writing poetry indeed, that's a hobby in a half I must say.
What do you know about passion anyway?
- Not very much.
- Purse the thing.
I like a bit of poetry myself I do.
But I don't think how you think of those things, I really don't.
She's a dark horse, isn't she?
Writing poetry, did you ever hear such nonsense?
Oh, I dare say she's a bit, a bit repressed.
- Come on now, it's time for your walk.
- Oh Danny dear.
- I got you hat and shawl in the hall.
- Have you got the pills?
- In my pocket.
- And the chocolate?
And the chocolate.
Here you are Madame? Every wish anticipated.
- Is my hat there in the hall?
- Your hat is in the hall.
Yes.
Well, is it cold out?
- There you are.
- Have me shawl.
- And your shawl and my hat, here we go.
- Put it on.
There, isn't it beautiful?
Look at the flowers grown like mad and the tree showing up look like peacock.
And the birds singing their hearts out.
Look at that, mother and child back doing well.
- What do you think of him?
- Danny?
- Oh, he's a all right, a bit of a mystery.
- You think that too?
A terrible liar of course, then a lot of us are.
- Now more than that, eh?
- What you mean?
It's something more that matters him, something he's hiding.
- What?
- I don't know for sure.
- Is Dora about? Oh Dora...
- No, she won't know anything.
She's as a half witted as she's lazy.
She'd cut off her nose off to stop the dustbin...
- smelling sooner than empty it, she would.
- Did anyone say Dora?
Oh Dora, what do you know about Danny, his past I mean?
Only what's he told me
Miss, it's ever so romantic.
Yes, yes, I'm sure.
- Do you trust him Dora?
- I don't quite know Miss.
Sometimes I do and sometimes I don't.
Oh he's all right.
He cracks himself up you know, pretends he don't care a tuppence... but all the time he's got an eye what you're thinking of him, if you know what I mean.
Yes. Yes, I do.
An incredible vanity.
- They always have it, always.
- Who?
- Murderers.
- Miss Grayne...
You mean this woman they're looking for? Oh Miss, you can't.
Doesn't seem possible, does it? Yet murder a thing doesn't seem impossible either.
Just something you read about in the papers.
Can't touch us, it can.
It's here, all about us, in that forest, in this house, we're living with it, we...
I'm going to look through his things, will you help me?
Me? Alright.
- They're all empty.
- Perhaps he hasn't unpacked.
- But he's been here almost a week.
- Where he keep his luggage?
Now here we are, open it up.
See? He hasn't unpacked.
- That's extraordinary to begin with.
- A dirty shirt.
Those socks, three handkerchiefs, some razor blades...
Here is a pocket book.
- Got a a letter in it.
- Oh, we can't read his letters.
Why not? Don't be silly, his wife will do it to him hundreds of times.
Oh, what a niff.
- Dear Baby Face, my only, signed Lil.
- Awful writing.
Next time you strike
New Castle, Ok by me Baby.
Another servant girl I expect, I'm sorry Dora.
- Bus tickets, snapshots.
- Oh, look at that.
The impudence, being taken in a bathing suit.
What a group?
- Look, look, there she's.
- Who?
The woman who's missing, don't you remember that photograph in the paper?
- It's awful to think she maybe dead.
- Awful.
Looks ever so, don't she?
- There was another bag, wasn't it?
- Yes.
This.
- And this.
- Old fashioned, isn't it?
Got it from a box room at the Tall Boys I should think.
- Too heavy for a hat.
- Looks extraordinary, doesn't it?
What's it Miss?
I was just thinking.
Supposing there's something inside of it?
I left the old lady's pills in the pocket of my other coat.
Silly of me, wasn't it?
May I have it back please? It's the only one I got.
- How did you like the letter?
- Letter?
You got it in your hand.
Means well Lil does but we had a row.
She would spy on me.
It's anything I hate it's a spy.
Don't you agree?
I'd sooner have anything than a spy.
- Part a murderer of course.
- What did you say?
I said part of a murderer, of course.
Talking of murder, do you know anything of Mrs. Shellbrook's... whereabouts at the present moment?
Mrs. who?
You not going to pretend you've never even heard of her?
Oh Mrs. Shellbrook's whereabouts.
I thought you said Mrs Chalkbrook's where,
I'm sorry, silly of me I couldn't think.
Well?
I have nothing to go on but I think she's been murdered.
- Oh...
- Who by?
Danny Danny...
The old lady is getting impatient, excuse me.
Wish you can't think that.
I'd sooner suspect my unborn child.
You don't really think he did it, do you?
Do you?
I don't know.
So I closed the door very quickly and said, I'm sorry sir.
So that she wouldn't think I knew there was a woman in there.
Oh Danny, you've been the death of me.
The things you say.
Well now, I think dear, it's time
I went in and had my 40 winks.
40 winks Ma'am or 50 if you like.
You oughtn't me laugh here, there's always my heart.
You've lost your heart, you know you have and to the little fellow who pushes your pram.
Pram?
Stop that noise, I want to go to sleep.
Did you do it?
I told you you'd be better looking without them glasses?
- I don't know what you mean.
- Don't you?
Ah, clumsy.
I am sorry.
You're very conceited, aren't you?
Yes.
And you are acting all the time too, aren't you?
Acting? Acting what?
Look how I can look into the eyes, I can stare you down.
Have a theory it' the criminals who can look you in the eye.
- And the honest one who blush and look away.
- Oh?
- It's a very blank look though, isn't it?
- Is it?
You are acting all the time, aren't you?
- Yes.
- Do you happen to stop acting?
- I don't know it's so long since I stopped.
- But when are you alone?
- Then I'm acting more than ever I do.
- Why?
I don't know, because I like it acting.
Just for change, suppose you let me ask you a question or two.
Just for the change.
Why can't you take a bit of interest in some other body but me?
But I ain't got interested in you.
Only, when you don't talk that's bound to make people wonder.
- Wonder what?
- What you thinking.
You'd be surprised.
I wonder if I would,
I think I can diagnose you all right.
Carry on.
You haven't any feelings at all.
You live in a world of your own, of your own imagination.
I don't know whether I understand you very well.
- Not being so very literary.
- You understand me perfectly.
You still think there's been a bit of dirty work?
- Oh, I don't know.
- Disappointed?
What on earth do you mean, why shall I be disappointed?
Oh, a bit of excitement in a place like this where nothing ever happen, wouldn't it?
But if there has been a murder, it won't go undiscovered long.
- What makes you say that?
- They never do.
They always make one mistake.
That's what you'd think.
What about those you don't know about?
What about the ones who do it and get away with it?
Those are the clever ones, fool the police and everybody.
You take this woman, she's been missing now for two weeks, hasn't she?
They haven't found her yet, have they?
- What was that?
- It's Dora, she's fainted.
I think...
I think they've found something.
Excuse me Miss, might
I use your phone? It's urgent.
Certainly.
- It's right here.
- Thank you Miss.
Shepperley 13.
What's it? What's happened?
I'd rather not saying this, till I've got to, if you don't mind.
Shepperley Police Station?
Who's that? This is Fred Gaston.
We found it. Yes. Right across some rose briars.
Well, not all of it.
Well sir, the head is missing.
Right you are sir.
Thank you Miss, sorry to have troubled you.
You hear that?
- Where you going?
- Going to have a look.
Coming?
I want Keystone 2348.
Yes please.
- What you found over there?
- You better come over here and have a look.
- Hey, what's going on?
- Hello, is Justin Laurie there please?
Oh, is that you
Mrs. Laurie, this is Olivia Grayne.
Yes, is Justin in please?
Oh? Do you know where he is?
I see, no, thank you very much.
It's all right, it's quite all right, thank you.
- Olivia, what you doing here?
- I've got to see you, I got to talk to you.
Is anything that matter?
You look so strange, where is your hat?
Can't we go somewhere, somewhere we can talk?
Here, come on here.
Hi there Laurie, good show.
Olivia, what's it?
Darling tell me.
My dear, your hands are like ice.
- Justin, they found her.
- Found whom?
The missing woman, she's been murdered.
They found the body in the woods near our house.
Olivia.
It's not all, there's more to it than that, her head...
- But who...?
- I don't know...
I don't know, I just came running here to you.
My poor darling, how horrible for you?
- Have they no idea?
- I don't think so, none.
- Well, you can't go back there.
- Oh no, no I can't.
They're drawing stumps in half an hour.
I'll take to town to mother's, you may stay with us.
- Oh, may I?
- Of course you may, as long as you like.
Forever if you want to.
Oh, Justin, you're very good to me.
I'm only sorry it's a thing like this that give me a chance to be.
I do love you so Olivia.
You know, I'd never seen you without your glasses before.
You're very beautiful.
But suppose I'll give mother a call and tell her to expect you.
- No, no don't.
- Why not?
I can't come, I must go back.
But why?
Well I, I can't leave
Mrs. Bramson there alone.
Well she's got, what's his name, that boy hasn't she?
- He is all right, isn't he?
- Oh, yes, yes he's all right, he, well...
I mean, you know, running away like this they may think I did it.
You can't Olivia darling, that be ridiculous, it couldn't been anyone in your house.
No, no, that's right, couldn't have been, could it?
Hey, there's something more behind all this, what's it?
Oh, nothing really, I...
Oh Justin, I shouldn't have come running off to you like this I lost my head, that's all.
I'll be all right now.
Oh, Justin, take no notice of me.
Tell me all about the match.
That was a good boundary you hit, how many was that?
- Six.
- Oh, that's fine, fine.
Now young man, you came over here the day after I saw you at the Tall Boys, is that right?
That's right sir.
You never told me you thinking of making a change.
I didn't know it myself sir that was the first day I call here and Mrs.
Bramson asked me to come and work for her.
- Ma'am, did you know him before?
- No.
- You take up any references?
- I didn't need any references.
I talked him, that's enough for me.
- What you trying to suggest?
- Oh, nothing, nothing.
- Only it seems an odd coincidence...
- Nothing odd about it.
The boy came to see my maid, they going to be married.
- First I've heard of that.
- That's good news anyhow.
Oh, it's awful, awful asking all those questions.
I am not going to stay here any more.
If you run away now they'll think you did it.
I never thought of that.
They'll set the bloodhounds on you, that's what they'll do.
Oh, dear, I never thought I'd get mixed up in anything like this.
You see sir, this is a lot nicer place for me than the hotel.
But for Dora being her and Mrs.
Bramson being like a mother to me.
Yes, yes, I see.
Well, all right then, at least you didn't make any mystery about your movements.
Oh, there you are. Where have you been all the afternoon?
Oh, good afternoon Miss Grayne, we were wondering what had happened to you.
We was getting quite worried, we was.
- Where have you been?
- Nowhere.
I'll have to ask the same questions Miss.Grayne.
Oh, I'm sorry Inspector but I...
I've been to see a friend of mine.
You know what's been happening around here, don't you?
Yes.
You were here when it happened, so Danny tells me.
Then you rushed out to see a friend of yours.
It's true Inspector, I was here when it happened but I...
I lost my head,
I couldn't stay here, I just ran.
Who is this friend of yours?
- Mr. Laurie Mrs. Bramson's lawyer.
- Oh, a lawyer?
Yes, if I can't go to see him as a lawyer, he's a friend of mine.
The only friend I've got, so I went to see him because I was frightened.
- I didn't intend to come back here anymore.
- And he persuaded you to.
- No, no, he told me not to.
- Well then, why did you come back?
I realized that I was being foolish and hysterical.
That I shouldn't leave Mrs. Bramson alone because that would look as thought I...
I don't know, I was so silly to be frightened... so also I came back.
A likely story.
But it's true Inspector, you got to believe that, it is true.
Yes, I believe you.
I know it doesn't sound very sensible but fear makes people do silly things sometimes.
Well, I think that'll be all for the present.
I'm sorry to put you through all this Mrs Bramson but...
- I'm afraid it's only the beginning.
- I can stand it.
Good. Well, I'll be around again and don't you worry Mrs. Bramson, we'll get him.
You've been missing a lot of excitement.
Journalists and photographers.
Mrs. Bramson had her picture taken three times.
I want you to get all the papers in the morning, all of them.
And it wouldn't even be a bad idea to get a book to stick them in.
What you staring at me like that for?
I honestly believe you're enjoying it.
How could you?
Oh, oh, it's you.
What you want?
- What do you want?
- I heard a noise.
- What you doing?
- Making some tea, I couldn't sleep.
Just waiting for the kettle.
Cigarette?
Thank you.
What did you tell that chap this afternoon?
That they found that woman.
Is that all?
Yes of course, that's all.
- What else was there to tell?
- Nothing?
Nothing.
So you just told him that and, and then you come back.
Why?
- What do you mean why?
- Why did you come back?
I told you.
I realized I was being silly to be frightened and I thought...
- Why do you shake your head?
- That isn't why you came back.
- You like that chap?
- What you mean? Of course I like him.
Why aren't you married then?
I don't know what right you have to ask me a thing like that.
Don't be angry, only asked you a civil question.
Why aren't you married?
Hasn't he asked you yet?
- Oh yes, he's asked me but I...
- There you are, you see? You don't like him.
And you're right, you know.
He's not the sort of a chap for you.
You want adventure, don't you?
And it's here, here in this house, here and now in this kitchen.
The two of us alone here.
At this time of night, it's exciting, isn't it?
Something that's never happened to you before.
Being alone at this time of night with a chap like me.
You're not frightened, you're excited.
I can tell you how, your eyes are shining, you got color in your cheeks... and you're beautiful a way he's never seen you.
No, 'I'm frightened of you.
And you feel light as air.
Te same as anybody else for the first time without their overcoat.
We hadn't had a drink but you feel as you have.
You never knew there was such a secret part inside of you.
That's why you come back this afternoon, wasn't it?
Wasn't it?
Danny...
Danny.
Now ladies and gentlemen, I want you first of all of to note the beauty... the calm, the solitude of these surroundings.
And then realize that immediately in front of us lies the spot... where this grisly spectacle was uncovered.
Not one hundred yards... from the rose clad, unsuspecting peaceful residence behind us.
Not for one moment did Mrs. Bramson's think.
Mrs. Bramson is the proprietress of the residence.
- Are you talking about me?
- Ah, good morning Ma'am.
I brought another party, remarkable, isn't it?
The interest shown in this lugubrious occurrence.
This ladies and gentlemen, this is
Mrs. Bramson, of whom I was telling you.
- How do you you?
- Pleased to meet you Ma'am.
Nasty thing to hear turn up almost on your own doorstep, ain't it?
Would you mind if I was to take a picture of you Ma'am?
Not at all, is my hat on straight?
Oh and this young gentleman, now employed by Mrs. Bramson... as personal attendant and bodyguard, was... formally a page boy at the Tall Boys hotel... at the very moment the unfortunate victim of this outrage disappeared.
- And now ladies and gentlemen...
- Can you give me your autograph?
If you draw a little closer... you will perceive the exact spot where the body was uncovered.
Ladies and gentlemen, the exact spot.
Here, who you shoving?
A little orderliness is it what we want.
They say it was horrible how they found that body though.
The moment I heard she was missing I said, search the forest.
She's been murdered, that's what I said.
They could knock me down with a feather, grisly, that what it was, grisly.
There's only one word for it, grisly.
I told my poor mother all about it when I got home at night and that's what she said...
How grisly Emily, how grisly.
- Goodbye.
- Bye. Bye.
Dear, oh dear, oh dear, I feel dead.
Don't be a silly old woman.
You don't look a day over forty.
And after I made you a nice cup of tea... you'll be 25 in the sun and 18 with your back to the light, so consider yourself lucky.
Danny, you're a terror.
Oh dear, oh dear, oh dear, what an afternoon?
I noticed a slight falling off in attendance today.
- Sunday I guess.
- Danny, you mustn't talk like that.
- Oh dear, oh dear.
- Well now, there you are.
- Will you take my hat dear.
- Right you are Mum.
And my cape and don't you call me Mum.
If I can't I call you Mum, what can I call you?
Well, if you are very good
I might let you call me mother.
Ok mother of mine.
Oh Danny, you are a terror, he's been acting like this all the afternoon.
- Has he?
- I'll go make some tea.
Mrs. Terrence will get it.
Mrs. Terrence is entertaining visitors at the scene of the crime.
Besides Mrs Terrence can't make tea the way I can.
- I'm an old sailor Miss. Grayne.
- I'm afraid I'm not much interested.
I'll go and see and put the kettle on.
Now hear Olivia, you're downright rude to that boy.
- What do you got against him?
- His manners.
His familiarity.
His manners are great deal more cheerful than yours is.
He's been in rare spirits all the afternoon.
Whiskey, if my sense of smell doesn't deceive me.
Whiskey? It's a libel.
- The boy is a teetotaler.
- Auntie, how do you know that?
He told me so.
And of course you believe everything he tells you.
You're jealous of him my dear, that's what you are.
I know human nature. I know that boy got a beautiful character.
Look at the way the cat is taking to him.
Animals and young children know about people.
Here you are.
Nice cup of tea with two lumps and some of the little cake you like.
Thank you dear.
Danny, let me smell your breath.
Clean as a whistle, smells of pepper mint.
Yeah, there's some in the kitchen.
The murderer committed the crime in the forest.
Probably under cover of night.
The body was nude.
Attempts had been made to, turn to for the next column.
Attempts have been made to era, eradicate fingerprints... with a knife, possibly a butcher's knife... which was...
- What's the matter?
- I forgot it was Sunday.
They're going to church down in the villages.
All got up in their Sunday best.
The organ is playing and the windows is shining, shining on holy things.
Because holy things isn't afraid of the daylight.
But Danny..
But all the time the daylight moving across the floor... and by the end the sermon the air in the church is turning Grey.
And the people isn't able to think of holy things so much anymore.
But only in the horrible things that's going on outside.
Because they know it's still daylight.
And everything is ordinary and quiet.
And today is the same as all the other days.
And it will come to an end.
And it will be night.
Why Danny, you ought to be a preacher.
Now I think I'm going to have my nap, before supper.
Olivia, take this.
Will you wheel me in?
Anything you say, mother of mine, anything you say
I never knew you have so many words in your head.
I speechify like anything when I'm roused.
I used to go to Sunday school and the words come popping into my head.
Hear now, put your arm under little Danny.
There you are, now what am I going to do with this bundle of rubbish.
There you are, lie down now.
Let your feet up and I'll get your pillow.
- Thank you.
- There you are.
- Thank you.
- Alright.
- I undo your bib and tucker.
- Thank you Danny.
- There you are.
- My, you're so thoughtful Danny.
What is that your wear around your neck? A locket?
It's a key.
The key to your heart? I ought to have that.
Ah, don't be silly.
It's the safe key, I always wear it around my neck.
And you're quite right too, you never know.
Here, let me take your shoes off.
- Thank you Danny.
- Here's one, here's two.
Now, this little pig went to market, this little pig stayed home...
- Don't be silly.
- This little had roast beef... this little pig had none and this little pig wee, wee ran home.
- I wish I can give you tickles.
- You'll be the death to me.
Come on, I cover you all up.
Now, quiet, quiet, you want to sleep now.
Quiet, that's fine, no noise.
That's enough, good night, good night.
- Can I have a read of that?
- If you like.
It's interesting, all this, isn't it?
You have been drinking, haven't you?
- You don't miss much, do you?
- No.
I had a drink and I feel fine.
- You want me to read it to you?
- I'd rather talk.
- Carry on.
- I'd rather ask you a few questions.
Carry on.
Are you sure you were ever a sailor?
Are you sure you weren't a butcher?
Ah, talking daft, doing is the thing.
- But you can talk too.
- Yes, I can.
Did you hear me just now? She's right you know, I should've been a preacher.
I can remember when I was a kid, sitting in Sunday school.
With my mother along side with me and her pointing at the pulpit... and then at me, as if to say, that's the place for you.
I never forgot that,
And I don't believe a word of it.
Neither do I but it sounds wonderful, doesn't it?
I can't remember my mother and I never had a father.
And the first thing I remember is the docks.
And you're the first woman I ever told that to.
So, you can compliment yourself or the drink.
I think it's the drink.
You do live in your own imagination, don't you?
Yes, it's the only way to bear with the awful things you have to do.
- What awful things?
- Well...
I haven't had as much to drink as that.
This is not sort of life for you.
What's it there to it? Tell me that.
What there's to it?
Getting up every morning at seven, washing my stockings... mending them, having breakfast with a bad tempered old woman.
Spend the rest of the day in this... dreary house with her, going to bed at night at half past ten.
- Don't you like the old lady?
- I could kill her.
No, you couldn't. No, not many people has it in them to kill people.
- Oh, no.
- Tell me about your life at the Tall Boys.
My life?
Well, the day didn't start off so good.
With a lot of stuck boots to clean.
And a lot of dirty spoons to polish that is been in the mouths of gaping fools... that looks through me as if I were a dirty window.
Orders orders orders, go here, go there, do this, do that, page, page...
I'm not a page, I'm a millionaire.
And everybody is under to me.
And just when I think I got a bit of peace, there's somebody nagging, nagging, nagging... at me, at me, at me, calls me everything and screams and screams till nothing will shut that mouth only...
Go on.
I'm too smart for you, you'd like to know, wouldn't you?
Why would you like to know?
Why you so interested?
I told you there the other night in that kitchen, didn't I?
- Why were you lying awake that night?
- You were awake too.
Tell me why, you can't sleep, can you?
You can't sleep. There's something in the back of your mind that keeps you awake.
Something you've pushed in the back of your mind that... you can't do anything about and never will.
A little thing, isn't it? A box.
Only a box and it's rather heavy.
The way you was going through my letters the other day... and I had to to laugh.
But the only thing that keeps me awake.
I don't know what to do.
Nothing in the world worries me, nothing worries me.
Only I can't stand a pair of eyes staring at me, with no looking them.
And I don't know what to do, I don't know what to do.
I live by myself, you see, inside here.
And all the rest of you can go hang, after I made use of you though.
Nothing is going to stop me, nothing.
It's all right.
It's all right.
Anybody that's there, I'll deal with them.
You watch me.
- Oh hello Dan, how's things?
- How you sir?
- Good afternoon Miss. Grayne.
- Good afternoon.
Now, we haven't scared you out of the house yet I see.
- Not a chance sir.
- No more news for me I suppose
- I afraid not Sir.
- Too bad too bad.
- How's the old girl bearing up?
- Well, it's been a bit of shock for her sir.
Finding the remains of the lady, almost in her garden if you might say.
The remains of the lady? I wish you wouldn't talk like that, I've seen them.
- Well, you see sir, I haven't.
- No thank you.
You know Dan, I don't mind telling you that they reckon the... fellow did this job was a pretty clever chap.
- You don't say so.
- Yes, regular film star.
Got in all the papers, made his name.
If you can make your name without anybody knowing what it is, of course.
Oh yes, yes, of course.
But any really clever murderer... would've taken the trouble to make sure that the body couldn't be recognized.
But here we come and identify first girl, you call that clever?
What do you think?
Well sir, I'm, I'm a slow thinker.
But if it was clever to leave the lady un, un...
- Unidentifiable.-
- Thank you sir.
To leave the lady unidentified... and not be caught has it been more clever... to leave the lady identified and still not be caught?
Why didn't you sleep in your bed on the night of the 10th?
What's that sir?
Why didn't you sleep in your bed on the night of the murder?
- I did sir.
- Oh no, you didn't.
Ah yes sir that's right, except for about half an hour I couldn't sleep for... toffee and I went up the fire escape onto the roof.
- What time was it?
- I don't know, you know how it is.
You wake up in the middle of the night you don't know what time it is.
I couldn't sleep when I was at sea either.
Why didn't you tell us about your relations with the deceased woman?
- What's that sir?
- Now come along old chap.
You were seen by two maids talking to her in the shrubbery.
Well?
Oh sir, it's been in my conscious ever since.
- Oh, then you and she were...
- No, it was nothing like that sir.
I avoided her ever after the first day she stopped me.
But you know how it is, a lady staying at the hotel... where I was working and for all I knew married.
You are only human, aren't you sir?
I mean when you asked me all about it at the hotel I was... frightened to tell about her stopping me.
And now that I've told you, it's a weight off my mind, you wouldn't believe sir.
You see sir, it was the disgust like of... almost getting mixed up with her that was keeping me awake nights.
I see.
- You're bit of milksop, aren't you?
- Am I, Sir?
Yes, well, that'll be all now, I'll let you off this time
I'm that relieved.
But don't try and keep anything from the police another time.
I won't sir.
Oh, by the way, just one thing, just a matter of form.
But if you don't mind, I just have a quick look through your things.
- Just a matter of form, that's all.
- Yes sir.
Well, where you hang out?
In there, first door on the left.
- You can't miss it.
- Alright, I'll find it.
You can't miss it.
This box is locked, have you got the key?
- It isn't mine.
- Not yours?
- No sir.
- Whose is it then?
I don't know, it isn't mine.
Oh, I'm sorry, I thought that you...
Inspector.
What are you doing with my box?
- Your box?
- Yes, it has all my letters in it.
- But I found it in Dan's room.
- Oh, that used to be the box room.
Oh, I see.
I think I'll keep it in my wardrobe, it'll be safer there.
Oh, I am very sorry Miss, I am sure I am.
- I hope I haven't offended the young lady.
- She'll be alright sir.
Well young fellow, I must be off. You might tell Mrs Bramson I popped in, will you?
I will sir.
- Tell her I hope she'll soon be better.
- I will say, thank you sir.
- Good day.
- Good day sir.
Good...
Danny Danny, take this.
I'm better.
Makes you feel fine.
It's a silly thing to do.
Proper girl's trick, fainting like that.
Do something, it'll do something.
First thing I do, I'll relieve you of that hat box, if you do not mind.
You mind if I go in there?
I don't know what's the matter with you?
You haven't eaten anything either of you.
- Oh, I'm sorry Auntie, I'm not hungry.
- Neither am I.
Must be them peppermints I ate before dinner, sort of took my appetite away.
They didn't take your tongue away, did they?
You haven't uttered a word ever since we sat down the table.
I am sorry, I've a sort of headache.
Headache? Rubbish, at your age? It's imagination.
Oh, what are we doing sitting here in the half light?
Enough to give anyone the fidgets, turn up the lamp.
- And draw the curtains.
- No, no, don't.
Why not?
I don't know why why not, just bring the night nearer, that's all.
What on earth you mean, draw the curtains Danny.
Auntie, will you excuse me I want to go to my room.
- What for?
- I can't sit here any longer.
- You haven't had your pudding yet.
- I don't care for any, thank you.
Well, you can sit and watch us have it then.
I'm sorry, I can't, I just can't sit here any longer.
Oh, it's getting quite chilly.
Get me the little shawl from my room dear, will you?
The shawl dear.
Oh, I'm sorry Mum, in a land of Nod I was.
- Now, what was it Her Highness wanted?
- A shawl.
A shawl. No sooner said than done. Watch me, one, two, three.
Silly boy. Silly boy.
Where you off to?
- I want Keystone 2348.
- Who you telephoning?
Who are you telephoning? Olivia, answer me.
- Hello, is Mr. Justin Laurie there?
- Oh, so that's what it is.
Hello, Justin?
Yes, I've changed my mind, I'm coming up to town, will your mother put me up?
My dear of course.
What's the matter? Anything happened?
Yes but I can't tell you about it now.
I'm coming right up, I'll be there in an hour. Good bye Justin.
Olivia, what is the meaning of this?
Listen to me, I thought I was frightened the other day.
Today, when I saw the light beginning to fail and night coming nearer and nearer...
I felt my fingertips getting cold and I knew for the first time what real terror was.
I'm not a fool and I'm not hysterical... but I can't tell anymore what are things and what aren't.
Day is over and forest is all about us.
Anything can happen. Auntie, you shouldn't stay in this house tonight either.
Very silly of you, trying to scare an old woman with a weak heart.
What have you got to be frightened of?
It's been a murder, you know and the murderer is still about.
Well, nobody is going to murder you.
Besides, we got Danny to look after us.
He is strong as a ox, no silly nerves on him.
- Where is he?
- He's getting my shawl.
It's been a long time.
- Danny.
- Coming Mum, coming.
How you going to get to town?
Not too frightened to walk through the forest, eh?
I'd rather spend the night in the forest than in this house.
That sounds very convincing, I must say.
Well, you can go.
But I'll give you a fair warning... when you come back I'm not so sure that I shall answer the door.
Think that over in the morning.
Morning?
- Whose that at the door?
- My Niece, gone for the night if you please.
Gone? For the night?
Would you believe it? So she's frightened.
Come along with that shawl dear, I'm freezing.
- I don't know what's up with me tonight.
- Then have a chocolate.
Come on, they don't catch me staying here after dark these days.
- Dear, wait for me.
- Oh, I'll be back.
Well, the only way rejoicing.
Everybody seems to be going, what's the matter with you all?
- What we'll have for lunch tomorrow?
- Lunch tomorrow? Let's me see.
How about a nice little steak, with some baked potatoes...
And some of that nice roly poly pudding, with jam on it, the way you like it?
Yes, I think so, yes.
I see, something light, Ok. Good night Ma'am.
- The wood is damp.
- Better get some kerosene.
Danny, do you think Olivia is a thief?
- I shouldn't be a bit surprised.
- What?
- Well, her eyes isn't very wide apart.
- My Goodness, my jewel case.
What a fool I was to let her go and my purse is on the table.
If she's taken anything, I'll have the police after her.
I don't care if she's my niece whether she isn't.
I always hated her mother, as for her father, he was a fool.
Oh, it's you. Slightest thing makes me jump these days.
- Are you going now?
- Yes and you couldn't bribe us to stay?
Oh, It'll be pitch dark in half an hour... and I'm not going to ride through the forest like that, while the murderer maybe lurking.
- I'll go with you, on the other way.
- You going out?
Yes, I feel funny, I have all evening.
- You can't leave her here by herself.
- She'll scream the place down.
I asked this very minute and she said she wouldn't mind.
Says it'll do me good, she won't hear of me staying.
- There's no good arguing with her.
- You telling me.
You have a nice long walk while you get the chance.
We wait on her too much.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Good night Dora, see you in the morning.
It's nothing missing.
The lock is broken, there marks all around.
Talking to my self.
Where is that boy?
Getting kerosene I suppose.
Wish people wouldn't walk out like that, leave me high and dry,
Where are my chocolates?
Oh, there they are.
What was that?
Danny?
Danny...
Clock.
Danny.
What's that boy doing in that kitchen?
I think have the jitters.
I've got the jitters
I've got the jitters Danny...
Danny.
Danny.
He's gone.
They've all gone.
They've left me here alone.
Heavens help me a poor old woman.
Oh Danny.
Danny.
Danny Danny. Danny. Danny.
Danny...
Be quiet.
What shall I do? Danny. Danny.
Danny, where are you?
Where are you? Danny Danny...
There's something outside.
Oh, Heaven help me.
Forgive us our trespasses as we forgive them...
Danny. Oh...
It's all right, it's all right.
No, no, no, it's alright, it's alright.
I will never forgive you..
- No, it's all right, no, no please please.
- I will never forgive you Danny.
Alright, wait a minute...
Here you are.
- I don't want any, I don't want any.
- Come on.
Take a little bit, take a little bit.
That's fine, take a little, I'm so sorry.
Dora and Mrs Terrence wanted me to take them down Main road because they was frightened.
I'm sorry now, that's better, isn't it?
- Not yet, give me some more.
- Yes, here you are..
All alone, all alone I was in the world.
Just an old woman crying for help and no answer.
- No answer.
- A poor old woman crying for Danny.
That's better...
There...
Oh Danny, the relief when I saw your face.
I'll bet you wasn't half glad.
You're the only one that understands me, that's what you are.
I don't have to tell you what I've been through.
I don't have to tell you about my husband now, how unkind he was.
Yes I know...
- No, you don't.
- Yes I know Mum.
That's better, that's better.
Oh Danny, Oh Danny...
Danny dear, you, you remember that time.
You spoke to me about my reminding you of your mother
I remember.
They can say what they like but that was a beautiful thought.
When I think you're just an ignorant boy, it's startling.
I'll never forget it, not as long as ever I live.
That's better, isn't it? That's better.
- I want some chocolate now.
- A chocolate, a chocolate.
One of the little ones, with the violet on top here.
Here you are.
No, no, open your mouth and close your eyes and see what the Queen is got for you.
Silly boy.
You're the only one who understands me Danny.
The only one that understands but what you doing?
- Just playing, just playing.
- Oh no, this is silly.
Great strong hands they are.
You're a pet, my little chubby face.
My little Baby Face, my little Danny.
- Am I in a draft?
- Just a minute.
- I got to take care of myself.
- You have?
- Come now.
- You have?
- I'd like to go into my chair now.
- I'll get you the chair.
There you are, easy does it, easy does it. That's fine, there you are.
Time for bye-byes, time for bed with you.
You're a sleepy girl tonight.
Sandman is coming for you.
Sandman is coming for you.
Rock-a-bye baby on the tree top.
When the wind blows the cradle will rock.
- Danny...
- The cradle will fall.
And down will come Baby, cradle and all.
Rock-a-bye baby on the tree top.
When the wind blows the cradle will rock.
Well, now breaks, the cradle will fall... and down will come Baby, cradle and all.
What a funny look on your face dear, smiling like that.
You look so kind.
So kind.
What you going to do with that?
You killed her, you killed her.
I've never seen a dead body before.
You killed her...
Didn't you?
Didn't you?
Oh, why don't you say something?
Why did you come back?
- Find you out.
- No, that isn't why you come back.
Isn't why you came back the other day either.
Yes, it was, it was. I had to find you out.
Now I have.
You come back here to be alone with me.
The same as you was there in the kitchen the other night.
Didn't you?
Didn't you?
Yes I did, I thought I wanted to.
I never knew before what murder was like.
I thought there was something, something about you that I...
Even after that, when I saw you were frightened, I was sorry for you.
Must been out of my head.
You're loathsome.
Loathsome.
- You sit there looking happy.
- Why not?
Look.
But this is my chance, my big chance.
You're the one I can tell about myself.
- They'll catch you, they'll find you out.
- Oh no, they won't.
There's one big difference between me and the others fellas that tries this game.
I'll never be found out, see?
Because I don't care that.
You don't know me, do you?
I'm sick and tired of hearing how clever everybody else is.
I want to tell them how clever I am for a change.
Money I'm going to have and people doing what they are told and me telling them to do it.
There was a woman at the Tall Boy, wasn't there? And she wouldn't be told, would she?
And that old lady, treating me like a son and a servant at the same time.
She's been more use to me tonight... than she's ever been to any other body as long as she lived.
The world is got to to hear from me.
You wait.
You can't wait, can you?
What do you mean?
Well, when I say I will never will be found out...
I mean that no living soul will ever be able to tell any other living soul about me,
Can you think of anybody who might go tomorrow and tell the police?
- I can.
- No, you can't.
Why can't I?
Well, I'm up against a very serious problem I am.
But the answer to it is simple as pie to a fella like me.
Simple as pie, there's no use looking at that telephone.
The wire is been cut.
The old lady isn't going to be found tomorrow morning.
And maybe she won't be the only one missing.
Perhaps the house will be going too.
The house and both of you gone, gone.
Aren't you frightened?
Don't you think I'll do it?
Yes, yes, I know you will.
But I'm not frightened,
I don't know why but I'm not.
I suppose it's because I'm seeing you for the first time...
- and realizing what an escape I've had.
- Escape?
You can kill me, daresay you would anyway.
At least now I know what you are.
I know what you're like, mad, mad and horrible.
And to think that I was...
Oh, I'm glad that I came back, I'm glad.
You know I made up my mind about you just now when I was telling you about myself.
That's the kind of a fella I am, I make up my mind about something and then I do it.
Remember the first day I come here?
I said to myself when I first saw you... there's a young lady who's got her wits about her.
There's a girl who knows a thing or two... she's not like the others, she's got...
What's that light?
It's somebody out holding a flashlight.
Somebody is watching, they've got no call to watch, I'm the one that watches.
I'll tell them, I'm the one that's watching.
Eyes, hundreds of eyes back of each tree. Thousand of eyes.
What happened?
Like the sound of a big wall falling over into the sea.
Everything is slipping on from under me, can't you feel it?
Starting slow and then hundreds of miles an hour.
There's a wind in my ears, a terrible rushing wind.
Everything is going pass me, like telephone poles, everything going backwards.
Everything I ever seen faster and faster back to the day I was born.
I can see it coming the day I was born.
I'm going to die.
Good evening Miss. Grayne.
- Good evening.
- Olivia.
- Oh hello Dan.
- Hello sir.
- Second time today, eh?
- That's right sir.
What's going on here?
Oh, we were just having a bit of talk before went to bed, that's all sir.
How's the old lady?
- Oh, she's fine sir, fine she's gone to bed.
- Gone to bed?
That's right sir, she didn't want to be disturbed.
- Smell of kerosene?
- Inspector.
It's in there.
You know how she's.
She's a bit nervy these days sir.
Yes sir, she. I haven't got round the corner before she begun calling me.
Danny, Danny, Danny, she screamed
Danny that's the pet name for Dan she has.
Yes sir, she. I told her it was dangerous keeping that much kerosene in the house.
I told her it...
I'm sorry to bring you back at this time of night sir.
Oh, that's all right, it's no trouble.
Let's have a look at your hands old chap, will you?
That's better, you better come along quietly.
I'll leave these two men in charge, they'll see that nothing is disturbed.
This is the real thing my boy.
Acting, that's what she said, wasn't it?
And she was right, you know?
I've playing up to you.
I showed you a thing or two, didn't I?
This is the real thing.
You got a cigarette?
Taste funny.
I want something now I've never wanted before in my whole life.
A long walk.
All by myself.
- It's contrary, isn't it?
- Come on.
Will I hang in the end?
But they'll get their money's worth at the trial.
You wait.
Justin, how?
I tried to get you on the phone again, was no answer.
I was afraid something was wrong so
I called the Shepperley police station.
You don't say thank you to someone who saved your life, do you?
Besides it's more than my life you saved tonight.
- My reason.
- My darling.
How do you do, ladies and gentlemen of the motion picture audience.
This is the National Broadcasting
Company. Graham Massamé speaking.
You listened to the final chapter of the
Phantom Of Crestwood radio broadcast.
Which ended with the mystery still unsolved.
Who killed Jenny Wren?
Who killed Carter? Her companion.
You are invited to submit your own original ending for the story.
And one hundred prizes.
Totalling $6,000 in cash were offered for the best ending.
The National Broadcasting
Company and RKO Radio Pictures.
Have received thousands of original endings for the story.
Of course, as we told you over the air.
The winning ending, need not necessarily be the same.
As that used in the motion picture.
We have kept the solution of this mystery a secret for many months.
But now that the contest is closed.
You are about to see the mystery unravelled.
Before your very eyes on the motion picture screen.
So that you may compare your ending with that of the motion picture
The Phantom Killer.
Of Jenny Wren is still at large.
Who is that killer?
We take pleasure on behalf of RKO Radio Pictures.
In presenting to you:
"The Phantom Of Crestwood."
Graham Massamé signing off.
What are you doing in Los Angeles?
Me?
Why, I'm here to look over the
Olympic Games, stranger.
I wouldn't get mixed up with anything too "gamey" here if I were you.
Me?
─ You, especially.
It's always more fun for us to hook a big fish than a little rat.
They fry better.
I used to work in New York.
I thought you might remember me.
You?
Look again.
Are you a short, fat man?
No.
I might be wrong.
What is your name?
Farnsbarns.
How do you spell it?
The same way you pronounce it.
Jenny Wren.
Hello, Miss Wren.
I'm just waiting for someone, thanks.
Well, perhaps if you would let me know who you are waiting for?
Oh yes, of course. A Mr Farnsbarns.
Fernsbarns?
No. Farnsbarns.
I'm sorry, but I don't recall anyone by that name.
The Bank Of Southern?
─ Oh, no.
This is the Harbor National Bank.
─ Oh, I'm sorry.
That's alright.
Will you have a peppermint?
─ Oh, thank you.
Mr Andes, please.
Mr Andes is busy just now.
Oh, I'm sorry. Will you tell him Miss Jenny Wren ..
A "Miss Wren" to see you, Mr Andes.
Who?
"Miss Wren."
I'll settle with those later.
Alright. Send her in.
You may go in.
Well, Jenny. A pleasure.
A pleasure.
Isn't that a lie?
Can you give me a light please, Priam?
I .. I thought I read you were in the East.
I was.
Anything the matter?
Apparently. From the way you're jittering.
Come, come Jenny.
I'm too old for your tricks.
I'm getting on myself.
─ Nonsense.
I'm retiring, Priam.
Leaving the country.
Oh, that's too bad.
To lose so colorful a character.
When are you going?
─ Not that fast.
There are a few people
I want to see first.
Ah, men, Jenny? Men?
Uhuh .. Herbert Walcott .. Will Jones.
Eddie Mack .. and you.
Yes, dear .. so do be a sweet and give me a farewell party.
At the ranch.
They always were such fun, those parties at Crestwood.
Though you never invited your usual crowd there when I was around, did you?
Well, I could hardly have had you ..
─ I know.
But you are going to have a few of that usual crowd there this weekend.
Walcott, Jones and Mack.
They've been there before, haven't they?
And they always accept your invitations, don't they?
Do you know .. those men?
Uhuh .. also.
Well, they may not be able to accept ..
─ Up to you to see that they do accept.
That Walcott brings his wife.
And Jones that Miss .. whatshername ..?
Ritz that he's engaged to.
─ Why?
What for?
I'm depending on you to do exactly as I say. Do you understand?
You are not to suggest to any of those men that I'll be there.
That you've even seen me.
That this party is anyone's idea but your own.
You understand that?
This is impossible.
I have business tonight.
─ So have I.
Shall we say dinner at eight at Crestwood tonight?
Alright.
"Ironic" I suppose you think?
That the community considers you such an efficient Saint?
No. That's ignorance.
Priam, I have a little sister being graduated from finishing school.
She's coming home soon.
And it seems she has met that young nephew of yours.               ─ Frank?
Uhuh .. the Andes heir.
And they have fallen in love.
And they are engaged.
That's irony, darling.
Perhaps Mr Andes will see you now.
Ha?
Oh yes .. thank you.
Hello, Carter.
Uhoh. Cat on the bed: bad luck.
Have you been busy?
─ A little bit.
Anything break?
─ A telegram.
Anything break with you?
─ Yes. Priam Andes.
Into little pieces.
He's going to invite those men.
Carter darling, why do you always seal my telegrams after reading them?
A force of habit. So you won't know I've read them.
It's from your sister.
─ Oh, what did she say?
Her train gets in at two.
─ Well, she knows the address.
Are we just about packed for Europe?
─ Almost.
Do you think we can afford that space on
A-deck as we're going alone this time?
We will be able to afford it.
After I see the owner in New York.
And sell him back his love sonnets.
You know, it will amuse me.
Having those particular rooms on that particular boat all to myself for once.
[ Buzzer ]
It's the manager of the building.
Someone wants to see the apartment.
Oh, alright. Draw my bath, will you.
Ah, Miss Wren.
Rather delightful weather, isn't it?
I was just telling ..
─ Did you want to see the apartment?
This is Mr ..
─ Why ..
If the rest of this apartment is as charming as this living-room.
I'm sure it will be more than suitable.
Miss Wren's furnishings included as I told you.
Even to the view.
Yes .. of a lot of oil-wells.
Would you like to look in here?
He just told me you were going abroad.
If I should decide to take it, when can I move in?
Sometime next week.
Then I'll let you know here, tomorrow or the next day.
I won't be here.
That's too bad.
If I should decide to take it, I'd like to show it to my mother first.
Carter.
Well .. if you are not going to be here ..
Aren't there some papers to sign .. or something?
If necessary, you can contact me at the
Andes ranch. At Crestwood, up the coast.
Carter .. Mister ..?
─ Farnsbarns.
Mr Farnsbarns and his mother.
Will return. Will you show them around, please?
Thank you.
No thanks.
Oh, Carter. Just pack an overnight bag.
I think you'd better come up to the ranch yourself, when you've finished.
Alright.
Those four unsuspecting chisellers, including my host.
Are going to be desperate when they hear the bad news.
I may need you.
You may at that.
Whether they like it or not.
─ They won't.
I'm dealing this hand.
With stacked cards.
Won't the gentlemen be inclined to shoot?
An old Western custom.
That's baloney, Carter.
Like the weather.
[ Buzzer ]
Give me one.
Just one more before I meet the family. It will steady me.
Hello, Carter.
─ How do you do, Miss Esther.
I'm so glad to see you, Carter.
─ Thank you.
Will you go in the living room, please?
I'll tell your sister you are here.
Getting home after a year always makes you laugh, doesn't it.
You are so happy at having your family meet the train.
They cheer when they see you .. and all that.
I hate cold things.
Come here, then.
Warm now?
Oh, I shouldn't have said that.
Jenny's been swell to me.
Welcome home.
Hello, Jenny.
Hello infant.
This is Frank, Jenny.
I wrote to you about him.
Frank "Andes", isn't it?
─ Right.
Andes is a grand old name in California.
Oh, I don't pay much attention to that.
You've a nice smile. I would use that smile on your uncle if I were you.
When you tell him you're marrying a sister of mine.
It's not my uncle I've got to sell. It's my aunt Faith.
She brought me up and I'm mad about her.
Aunt Faith is a little insistent about family and all that.
You know, the old "Andes" stuff.
As if I were a mountain.
Well, she sounds tough enough.
─ No. Wait until you meet her.
She may drive down tonight when she gets my wire.
I'll bring her up if you're going to be in.
Sorry. Your uncle's been kind enough to ask me up to his ranch over the weekend.
Great! We'll go up.
A graduation party for you.
We'll have a swell time.
You might at that.
Well, children. I've got to dress.
Oh, I can't go to the ranch. My trunks haven't come and I've nothing to wear.
You can wear some of my things.
Well I don't like those black things you wear.
What a shame.
A lot of other people have.
The house is beautiful, I must say.
─ Yes.
I've never seen so many beautiful women in all my life.
By the way, I want to ask you. Where did ..?
It's so old and picturesque.
I'll say so .. 1804.
─ Oh, really?
One can fairly breathe the aroma of old Spain, can't one?
Tell me, haven't you one or two old ghosts about?
Sure. They live in our secret passageways.
Secret passageways? Oh, go on.
No, really. The place is full of them.
The ancestors had to have them for the revolutions in the early days.
Yes. Will you throw one?
─ Yes.
Come this way Mrs Walcott. Will you try?
─ I'll think about it.
I'll try. Come on,
I think it will be fun.
Look here.
Hasn't it struck you as peculiar that so few of us were asked here this time?
And on such short notice, too.
Why?
What's more peculiar, is why we came.
One obeys his banker these days, n’est pas?
Yes .. if one is still lucky enough to have a banker.
Gentlemen .. that reminds me, like Abe Lincoln, of a story.
Kermit. Come on throw one.
You too, Will. It will help your aim after we're married.
Humorous people.
A bull this time.
Oh, you're good.
─ Marvellous.
The unblinking eye, the steady hand.
My aunt taught me all these things when I was a kid.
And fencing, riding, shooting and things like that. Here.
Oh!
Gee, that was close.
One could be killed by one of these things.
"Dead men tell no tales".
Shakespeare.
Ladies and gentlemen. This is my very good friend, Mr Vayne of Boston.
How do you do?
─ His first visit to our great State.
I want you all to meet him.
This is Miss Mears.
─ Good evening.
Come down, Miss Wren.
Hello, Jenny.
Jenny Wren?
─ Evidently.
This is Mrs Walcott - Miss Wren.
Miss Mears.
─ How do you do?
And Mr Walcott.
Oh, the Senator, isn't it?
Not yet. Not yet. After the election perhaps .. Miss "Wren"?.
Was it?
─ Hmm.
Frank you know.
This is my friend Mr Vayne.
I have wanted so much to meet you.
Esther.
And .. this is Mr Jones.
How do you do?
─ And this is Eddie Mack.
Hi, Jenny.
Miss Wren.
A lovely evening.
─ Yes, isn't it.
Is it?
Come on, Jenny. We're going to gamble.
Isn't this a bit indiscreet, Priam?
I beg your pardon, Mr Andes.
Your sister, Miss Faith has just arrived. She is in the living-room.
Pardon me.
Faith.
─ Surprised?
I thought you were in Santa Barbara.
─ I was.
Until I got Frank's telegram.
Yes. He is here.
I suppose you are upset over this girl he intends to marry?
I am, too.
Are you staying over, Faith?
Yes.
I want to meet .. this girl.
No. Don't worry, Priam.
I won't interfere with your guests.
Isn't it a pity that as brother and sister ..
We have so few things in common?
Raymond.
Yes, Miss Andes?
─ My usual place at dinner.
But it's grand being with you, darling.
I wanted you to meet Esther.
That's why I came.
And so personally, when I return to California, I say with the poet:
"Is there a man with soul so dead."
And so on. You know.
"This is my old, my native land."
Shakespeare.
What a widely-read young man you are, Mr Mack.
Mr Walcott.
Surely you enjoyed at least one stay in another part of the country, haven't you?
Oh, but Palm Beach can't touch ..
─ Palm Beach?
When were you in Palm Beach, Herbert?
You never told me.
─ Oh, but I did tell ..
That is .. don't you remember?
No. We don't.
But you remember all the places you've been, don't you, Mr Mack?
Even .. Honolulu.
Sorry.
I may see you more after the marriage, Mack.
Pittsburgh, isn't it?
Oh, I don't envy you.
The drawing rooms on trains are furnaces in September.
Oh, but Will always travels by plane.
─ Does he?
Ever since one hot September, yes.
Mr Vayne.
You've cut yourself.
How stupid of me.
Shall we go in?
Thunder and lightning.
Enter three witches.
Shakespeare.
Seems to me everything you quote comes from Shakespeare. Doesn't it?
Everything I quote does.
Be in the library in ten minutes.
Walcott, Jones, Mack and you.
Make some excuse.
Didn't they teach you kiddies about
Shakespeare in school now and then?
A helluva writer, that fellow.
Steven Di Fangol. An Andes.
Very brave in his brave dress.
Fights and battles ..
And shoes and sealing-wax and cabbages and kings.
I know, aunt.
Doctor Fido Di Van Andes.
Grand inquisitor of the inquisition.
Died in 1497.
Don Diego.
Of California when it was ours.
My grandfather, Frank.
He was killed ..
Fighting for family.
We think of ourselves so little nowadays
─ I don't, my dear.
I think of you.
And your son.
What if I have daughters?
Even you know, can't issue proclamations deciding that.
If the bloods that are mingled are right, there will be sons.
What were you, darling? An accident?
My grandfather said I should have been a man.
And raised me as one.
And you Priam, most of all are wondering what this little party of mine is about.
Well, I'll tell you.
I'm retiring.
I'm quitting early, gentlemen.
Before I'm on the rummage counter.
I'm sailing out at high tide.
And I'm taking enough cold cash with me ..
To ensure me of a comfortable old age.
You didn't know that you'd all been gambling on the same green, did you?
Will Jones, I want $50,000 from you.
I don't think that's too much to ask in the "lover" business.
My business is on the verge of bankruptcy.
I haven't got $50,000.
─ You'll get it.
Priam will lend it to you.
And you Priam, with your bank in such good condition.
You can afford to double that ante.
$100,000 from you.
I can't afford that!
─ Yes, you can.
Mack, you're broke, aren't you?
─ Yes, ma'am.
Hmm .. $25,000.
That's alright if I can raise the money.
What?
─ Well, we're hooked aren't we?
My dear young woman ..
─ $250,00 from you.
One quarter of a million dollars, Herb.
You sanctimonious old hypocrite.
How the mighty are fallen.
─ Be quiet!
What if we refuse this ..?
─ This blackmail?
Yes, blackmail.
─ Do you realize ..
I realize that I can stop your marriage to Miss Mears.
She's the only thing in the world you've ever really wanted, isn't she?
And your marriage too, Mack.
That girl in Pittsburgh.
Who is buying your page in the social register.
I'm, not arguing with you, Jenny.
But I'd like to ring your neck.
Why can't men stay home nights.
This is impossible. You are out of your mind.
Don't you quibble, Priam.
Your letters would look fine in the newspapers.
Ha!
─ And yours, Senator.
It will be patriotic to publish them.
This country could use a laugh right now.
Has it occurred to you that publicity of this sort will put you in the gutter too?
Or in jail!
─ It will never get the chance.
If I can't live in the luxury that you men have accustomed me to.
Je déclare la guerre.
That's all, gentlemen.
No. No, wait.
If it's money you want.
There is a man here tonight who would gladly give you ..
More than all of us put together.
I refer to Mr Vayne.
He saw you in the bank and became infatuated with you.
That's why he's here tonight.
He asked me to invite him here solely to meet you.
You are all he wants.
He'll give you everything you asked for.
─ I'm through with that.
But Jenny, if this man is willing to ..
[ Door knocks ]
Come in.
This was delivered after you left, Miss Wren.
I thought it might be important.
─ Thank you.
My room is at the head of the stairs as usual.
You can go up and unpack.
You must have been born without a conscience.
Oh, a fraternity pin! She's gone through some college, too.
You wanted to know why I was through.
You wondered why I didn't care about Vayne's millions.
I'll tell you why.
Three weeks ago,
I was in the Adirondacks.
Will you wear this for me?
You know, a fraternity pin really means much more than an engagement ring.
I've never given that to anybody before.
Oh, you do love me, don't you?
I think I'd just stop breathing if you didn't.
Why .. of course I do.
Of course father won't give us a nickel, but we'll have each other.
Besides, I've got a hundred a week from my mother's estate.
We get along alright until I knock them over in the streets.
You mean .. you don't get any money from your father if you marry me?
Well, not if I marry anyone until I'm twenty-five.
But think what fun we'll have making a go of it together.
I'm afraid that .. wouldn't be much fun.
Bye bye, Goldilocks.
What .. well, what is it?
You stay away from hungry mama-bears after this.
I may as well give you the needle quickly. It won't hurt so much.
I like you. You're sweet.
But I love the idea of your family's millions.
That's my type.
But .. didn't you mean anything that you said?
Now come on back to the house. I'll leave and ..
You just forget all about me .. come on.
Well, goodbye.
Oh, don't be tragic, youngster.
It's experience.
Come now. Don't be silly.
Goodbye.
Ahh!
That's why I'm quitting.
So, get that cash, every one of you.
Or I'll say it with headlines.
It would give me great pleasure to kill you.
You haven't the nerve .. any of you.
If anything ever kills me except disgust ..
It will be the memory of that boy's face.
Not you.
Do you imagine we fell for that sob-story?
The Adirondacks, eh?
Carter said the package was delivered.
From the grave, I suppose?
Miss Wren.
Is anything the matter?
I .. I think I saw a ghost.
Come now. Let me dispel it for you.
A hundred thousand dollars.
There must be something we can do.
There is only one thing.
─ Sure. Pay up.
No.
[ Girl's scream! ]
That face.
Face.
Come down, come down.
What's the matter?
What's happened?
Look at that dart.
─ It's in her head.
Dear friend.
Faith, where are you going?
I'm going to phone the State Police in the village. That girl's been murdered.
The Crestwood Police, please.
Highway Patrol, Crestwood.
Hello?
This is the Andes ranch.
There's been a murder committed.
I wouldn't report that if i were you.
No?
Take your hands out of your pockets.
Hello.
The storm must have cut the wires.
Get up to the Andes ranch.
Take some men with you.
Somebody started to report a murder.
Hello?
Hello?
Hello .. hello?
The line's dead.
So is Miss Wren.
─ Who are you?
If you please, Priam.
How do you know Miss Wren's name?
I've picked up a lot of interesting things waiting round here tonight.
Who are you?
My name is Gary Curtis.
It is not!
He was in Miss Wren's apartment this afternoon.
He's been in a lot of apartments.
Alright, Officer. Take him in.
Trying to pull a fast one, eh?
That's alright, lady.
Nothing to worry about.
What is all this?
─ Help, help!
Stick where you are, lady.
Gangsters!
Mr Harris and his men, perhaps.
But I'm of the old school.
Do something! Are you men or what?
Did you cut those phone wires, Pete?
─ Right, chief. Now, let's scram.
We can't.
The road has been washed out and there's a 1000 foot drop down the cliff.
None of us can get away.
I came up here for some letters that I was hired to get.
And brought along an old school chum of mine and some of his boys.
Yeah. And walked us right into a murder.
I didn't want you to phone the Police as
I was seen in Los Angeles this morning.
If I'm even seen around trouble ..
They'll save themselves a lot of exercise by simply tagging me.
Stake me in the electric chair and watch me fry.
Excuse me, chief.
It's hanging in this State.
Why, there are comperes in every worthwhile city in this country.
Not to mention London, Paris and Rome.
Sit by, sigh gratefully and cable for ringside seats.
What a party huh, Pete? With you and your men in the ring cooking.
Excuse me, I mean choking.
Yeah.
What are we going to do, chief?
Grab the murderer and turn him over to the Cops before the Cops grab us.
How can we do it?
We don't know who killed her.
That's what I'm going to find out.
If you and your men want to take the rap .. alright.
It's not going to be my neck.
─ Well not ours, either.
You give the orders.
What a brain that baby's got.
One time when ..
─ Don't talk so much.
Now, inside all of you.
─ This is ridiculous.
A crook playing detective, ordering respectable people about.
How do we know you didn't kill Miss Wren?
─ Just a minute.
By saving my own neck, I'll save the innocent among you, too.
But I'm going to do it my own way.
I'm too young to die.
Now, is everyone here?
Answer me, are all of you here?
All but Esther Wren. Jenny's sister.
Where is she?
─ Asleep, I suppose.
I thought it better to tell her about this in the morning.
A pretty sound sleeper, isn't she?
Bright-Eyes.
Find the servants and see what they're up to. Hurry up.
Now, all you in there.
Inside. All of you.
You stay over there.
Will! Will ..
You see .. we're quite serious.
Cat. No-one's to leave this room. Get it?
Come on. Where is this Esther's room?
Esther.
Esther!
Something must have happened to her.
Is she wasn't asleep she would have heard Jenny scream. Everyone else did.
Where is Jenny's room?
Esther.
Esther.
Darling.
It's me, dear. Frank.
Are you alright?
Who's he?
─ Never mind, sweet.
What happened?
I don't know.
Where's Jenny?
─ What happened in here?
It's alright, dear. Tell us.
Try to remember.
I was in your aunt's room.
She wanted to talk to me about us.
I have no objection to you personally, child.
But Andes never mate their thoroughbreds with anything but thoroughbreds.
And I am sure when your background and your sister's is made clear to Frank.
He'll be an Andes enough to see that to carry on the line ..
He must marry a thoroughbred himself.
But we love each other.
Isn't that enough?
That's not important.
A woman is important only to bear sons.
Do you think Frank will listen to this?
It's out of the middle-ages. It's cruel.
I'm not responsible for my sister Jenny, or what she's done.
Our mother was just as fine as you are.
And Frank is about the only person who's ever loved me. Even a little bit.
And I will marry him.
Who is it?
─ It's me, Esther.
Well come on in. The door is not locked.
I must say you don't look too stunning in my black thing.
Why, what's the matter?
Sit down and tell mother all about it.
Jenny, you've got to help me.
Frank's aunt doesn't him to marry me because you .. we're ..
Ahh!!
I realized something was at the back of me.
I started to turn but .. something hit me over the head.
That's all I remember.
Here, dear. Put this over your shoulders.
Where is Jenny?
Jack. Upstairs and watch that girl.
Whoever killed Jenny Wren tried to kill her sister, too.
With this.
Pete, keep your eye on this.
Somebody here might try to wipe his fingerprints off.            ─ Okay.
What do you mean?
I told you that I'd been around for some time tonight.
Out there, waiting. I heard things.
That each of you had a definite reason to kill Jenny Wren.
Splendid .. what was yours?
I'm the one who had no reason to kill her.
You did, as most of you did.
And if necessary.
I am going to wrap up one of you for delivery in circumstantial evidence.
The jury don't understand any other kind.
Your name?
─ Carter.
Carter.
Can't we stop this horseplay and do something?
You were anxious to do something this evening, weren't you?
Yes. I wanted to kill her.
─ Will!
Darling, it's got to come out now.
I'll take my medicine.
I used to know Miss Wren.
But you didn't do this.
─ No.
Maybe not.
When did you last see Miss Wren alive?
When she dismissed me for the night.
─ Was she alone?
No .. Mr Walcott came in.
Who?
Mr Walcott.
Oh.
Well, where were you when I started for bed?
Not in our room.
Alright, Walcott.
You first in the library.
Well, I've grilled the servants. They ain't got no clues so I locked them up.
Have them round up the darts in the playroom.
Ahh!
Jenny .. Jenny!
Jenny.
Esther, please.
Inside.
Mr Curtis. You say you
heard things tonight.
So .. I throw myself upon your discretion.
I have to.
Yes yes, Senator. Let's go.
You called on Miss Wren?
─ Yes.
Yes.
I knocked on her door.
She sent Carter away.
I pleaded with her about this money she wanted.
Wait until after my campaign ends.
Then I will be able to help you handsomely.
Why, this publicity, it would ruin me.
I have no money.
─ You're a liar.
You and your friends made millions on the street this last year.
Selling to suckers.
Why, that is a fiction.
─ No it isn't.
I let your broker take me to dinner last night.
You've been selling short.
Selling America short.
While at the same time issuing political statements about a return to prosperity.
Urging John Jones and his wife to buy.
How do you think it will look on your opponent's billboard in this campaign?
You can't do this to me! A quarter of a million dollars. That's a fortune.
Are you crazy?
Oh .. forgive me.
Oh, forgive me.
I .. well, goodnight. Goodnight.
And so I left.
Now, I mean to cast no unfair suspicion.
But it had been suggested.
That Mr Vayne was interested,
infatuated with Jenny .. Miss Wren.
And so Vayne stayed?
─ Yes.
And you went to bed?
─ Naturally.
Alone, naturally?
Alright. Out.
Mr Vayne.
Here are the darts. Seven of them.
Who were the experts at throwing these darts tonight?
What's that to do with it? Anybody could have used one in his hand.
Then the hand would have crushed the feathers like this.
No.
The dart in that neck was thrown.
But using a thing like that?
Taking a chance for it to kill.
Which indicates the murder was not premeditated.
The murderer used this because he had no other weapon.
How many darts were used when you were playing?
Why ask me? I don't know.
Then there is no telling how many may be still out, in the hands of the murderer.
Yes .. to be used as he sees fit.
Don't say "he"! Anyone of us might have done it you said.
I would have myself if I had known the things that Will has just told me.
"She". That's it. Anything to save time.
Which believe me, is scarce.
The Police are working on the road right now. We've got to step on it.
Yeah, wrap the rope around ..
Mr Vayne.
I ..
I have a confession to make.
─ No!
Here it comes .. come on.
Vayne!
That isn't my name.
I'm Henry T Hesketh.
─ Of Boston?
Yes.
─ And you killed her?
No.
Then what kind of a punk confession is that?
Very well. I'll look through the rest of it in there.
Please .. you can't go on like this.
Sit down.
Something else happened.
If I could only remember.
But don't try.
Something is trying to get through to me.
It's connecting up with something.
I can't remember.
Yes .. I went to Miss Wren's room.
When I saw her for the first time in Andes' office.
I became infatuated with her.
Try to understand that.
And being a banker of importance, you couldn't use your own name.
So Andes played along with you.
What went on in that room upstairs?
Ah ..
I explained to Miss Wren.
I .. well, goodnight. Goodnight.
You will excuse me.
I stepped out on the porch for a walk.
But my door out there must have locked after me as I pulled it to.
Well, this one is not locked.
Has Mr Andes explained?
─ That you're on the make?
Yes.
Aren't you just a little ashamed at your age?
Love, Miss Wren ..
Does fantastic things to all of us.
Yes. I've read about that.
And love .. makes us
do fantastic things, too.
And have those same things done to us.
Goodnight, Mr Vayne.
Will you please get out of here.
Naturally, I left.
I suppose it was foolish at my age
─ To have loved her?
No. Not at your age.
Did you see anyone in the hall?
─ Yes.
When I started from my room .. a door opened.
Someone came into the hall.
When he saw me ..
─ Who?
Frank Andes.
He stepped back into his room.
And I went off.
After a moment, I opened my door again.
The young man came from his room.
Went to Miss Wren's door. And knocked.
What made you open your door again?
Curiosity, I suppose.
─ What time was it?
It was striking 2.
─ And then?
I picked up a book and read.
I ..
I was too disturbed to sleep.
[ Whispering ]
Listen you two. Cut out that whispering.
Get back to where you belong.
Get over there.
Mr Andes.
No .. you.
Do you mean to say that that man has suggested that my ..
Your nephew was the most expert at that darts game.
This is a fine graduation party.
I've graduated alright.
All at once.
─ Don't, dear.
I know what you came here for.
─ Quiet, please!
I don't care! Whoever did this tried to kill Esther too.
You think I'll stand by when it may be tried again?
This is impossible.
Where are your backbones when you allow a common thief to ..
I demand that Mrs Walcott and
I be permitted to go at once.
I ought to pin one right in your button.
Go where, Walcott?
We're trapped here until the Police get through that road.
Hey!
He can't get far.
Alright, kid.
I'll go too.
─ Frank.
You are determined to toss just anyone to the wolves, aren't you.
Anyone that the wolves will go for, instead of me.
It's alright, General.
I'd rather you wouldn't listen to this.
─ I'm going to.
Alright.
She is guilty.
The innocent little girls in stories always are.
Take it easy, Bright-Eyes.
You are taxing your brain.
You said you knew what
Mr Vayne came here for.
Yes.
To meet Jenny Wren.
My uncle told me he ..
─ I know that.
Is that all you meant?
─ Yes. And it's the truth.
Why did you go to Jenny's room?
You .. you didn't?
─ Yes I did.
Oh, I'm sorry.
I .. I don't know what I'm doing.
It's simply that you mustn't think ..
─ She wouldn't even let you alone.
Oh, it wasn't that.
You don't know what's been going on here.
─ Never mind that.
Why did you go to see her, and what happened?
I .. I had to talk to her about Esther.
Don't laugh.
As long as I'm marrying your sister.
Our family becomes yours. Don't you see?
You can't do this to us.
Uncle Priam is terribly upset.
He told me all about it.
Oh, I know he's weak.
And you .. you're not weak?
Uncle Priam doesn't dare tell aunt Faith he's in such a jam.
So I thought I'd talk to you.
I'll get his $100,000 for you some way.
Oh, tell it to me.
Doing business with the kindergarten.
I knew the guards would make a monkey out of me someday.
You've got to promise: whether or not the rest come through, you won't talk.
The publicity.
─ Of?
Esther, eh?
─ Yes.
The mud you throw would stick to her all her life.
It's going to be hard to get my aunt to welcome your sister as my wife as it is.
I like you, youngster.
You've got stuff.
But I've never promised anything before, and I'm not going to now.
If the rest of those fools, as you say, don't come through.
There is going to be more dirt than you've ever heard of.
Oh, Esther can stand it.
It might harden her up.
The child is too soft for this ..
Civilization, anyway.
I might kill you if you hurt her.
─ But why?
It would have something to do with .. honor, I suppose
A word you wouldn't understand.
─ Oh, don't be a silly little boy.
It wasn't any use arguing with her. I left.
Then came downstairs and got some of those darts and ..      ─ No!
You know that you were ..
─ Wait!
There's somebody you haven't thought of.
If you'd give me a chance to remember.
What's happened to those lights?
─ Frank!
Here, dear.
Don't move any of you.
Cat!
─ Yeah?
How'd the lights go out?
─ Don't know.
The light switch. Where is it?
─ Here.
Put it on.
─ One moment.
It won't work.
─ Cat.
Get my flashlight, quick.
Hurry.
Get in there!
[ Girl's scream! ]
[ Gunshot! ]
Cat, get the guests out of here.
─ Wait!
What are you doing?
─ Wait a minute.
That's the death-mask of my son.
It belongs to me. I had it made.
Because of her .. he killed himself.
The story Jenny told us.
He died in my arms .. three weeks ago.
He was all I had.
He told me about Miss Wren.
I determined to make her suffer as she made me.
I determined .. to kill her.
But first .. to torture her with that death-mask.
I .. pretended to be in love with her.
Got Andes to invite me.
I put on the mask.
Went out on the porch.
Opened her door.
I expected to find her alone. Asleep.
But she was awake and screamed.
Her sister who was with her, started to turn.
I picked up the candlestick and struck her. Jenny got out of bed.
She backed towards the door, into the hall.
I heard a peculiar knock.
Her face .. twisted with pain, she staggered to the stairs.
Fell.
I closed her door.
Got back on the porch. Went to my room.
Took off the mask and joined the others here.
I wanted to kill her.
I wish I had.
His heart's gone.
Well.
He's better off.
I couldn't find a thing upstairs, chief.
Wait! I remember now.
Ahh!
Oh look .. look!
Another dart!
It just missed her neck.
She's fainted.
Alright, carry her upstairs.
Bright-Eyes. Go up with them and watch both of them.
The minute she comes to, call me.
She was stabbed because she was going to tell who killed Jenny Wren.
So, whoever's guilty will have to kill her now.
Can't we get out of here?
Not one of us is safe.
Andes! I'll have you run off from every committee in town for this.
By heaven, I'll have your bank examined.
─ Shut up!
You ..
You filthy representative of the cancer choking the life out of the country.
A gangster!
─ Be quiet, please.
Haven't you bungled enough? Or will you blunder on until we're all killed?
No!
This dart wasn't thrown.
It's feathers are crushed.
The girl was stabbed by somebody in this room.
When I find which one of you left this room in the dark.
And appeared with the mask on, I have ..
─ Carter!
Sherlock .. she went up those stairs long before the lights went out.
How did she happen to go upstairs?
─ She had to.
Carter.
We've got to find her.
Alright, all of you upstairs.
Cat, lock everybody in their rooms.
What are you going to do now?
I'm going to turn this place inside out and find Carter for the Police.
Come along.
Come on. Get up there.
Come on, come on. Open up.
Is she still out?
─ Yes.
This dame will relieve you.
The poor child should have a doctor.
When the Police get here, you men will suffer for this.
Maybe we will.
Come on.
Lock the door, then lock her up again in her room.
Listen, chief. My boys are getting nervous.
We don't want to get "hung", chief.
No kidding. What say we pin this on
somebody and take it on the lam, chief?
We might be able to get down that cliff, chief.
Nobody can get down the cliff.
And stop calling me "chief".
They can't just pin it on anybody without proof.
Okay, chief.
Do you think we can find her before the Cops break through that road?
I don't suppose you've ever heard of airplanes?
The Los Angeles Police are in on this by now.
We've got to step on it.
If I could figure out what caused that knock before the dart struck Jenny Wren.
Knock?
Vayne, or whatever his name is, heard it too.
Did Esther Wren talk yet?
─ No.
If it had only been the kid that was murdered, it'd be a cinch.
Oh no.
There's a perfect reason to have wanted to kill Esther Wren.
What?
─ The aunt.
To keep her from marrying Frank.
But she had no reason to kill Jenny Wren.
Say, I've been all over this joint and there ain't no sign of the maid, Carter.
Who was sitting by that lamp before the lights went out?
How do I know? I'm no dick. Why?
Because whoever was sitting here ..
Scraped the insulation off the wires and made a short circuit and blew the fuse.
That's why the lights went out.
Where was Carter when she asked to go upstairs?
Over there, whispering to old Andes.
What were they whispering about that time?
Oh, I know that.
I got it out of Andes upstairs.
She tried to blackmail him for some letters of his that Jenny had.
What a bunch of mangy pillars-of-society.
What I can't figure out is.
If Carter left this room
before the lights went out.
Who made that short-circuit?
Who was sitting in that chair?
Where was the dart that was used on Esther hidden?
Who used it?
What was Esther trying to tell me?
Oh how do I know? I'm only an amateur at this detective business.
Sneak out and see how the Cops are getting along with that road.
Come on. Let's have a look outside.
If Carter was desperate, maybe she did try to get down that cliff.
The woman could jump and evaporate.
I got the motive .. insurance.
You know .. didn't you ever read one of those murder mysteries?
Ah, sit down.
Say, it might have been insurance at that.
If Carter knew she was in Jenny's will.
Why, there wouldn't be ..
Phew.
Wow.
I never noticed that shale.
Why that stuff could sweep you over the cliff before you realize it.
What about that insurance motive?
How could the woman kill all those people without ..?
It's a passageway, Pete.
─ See any faces down there?
You don't believe in ghosts, do you?
─ No. But I'm afraid of them.
This must be hundreds of years old.
Built to get from the house down to the sea.
I guess there used to be a way down that cliff to the boats. Come on.
What's that?
─ It's only a bat. Come on.
I was worried about you.
Well .. I guess we're getting near the house.
Just as I thought. There's a stairway.
Look!
There's Carter, Pete.
And the third dart.
It didn't miss the neck this time.
She was stabbed too.
And dragged here.
Chief.
It's only the death-mask.
Whoever killed Carter must have been the one on the balcony with this face.
Look, chief. A door. Let’s try it.
What did I tell you?
Vayne. He came down through that.
Oh, we're all wet.
─ Why?
How can he be here looking up at the balcony ..
And be up there with the mask at the same time?
Please get him, will you? We got to frame someone for this, quick.
I suppose he was in Jenny's room and out in the hall at the same time, too?
Was he?
He told us he was in Jenny's room with the mask on.
When she screamed and backed out, he heard the knock just before she fell.
Maybe he was lying.
─ He wasn't.
Because just before Jenny fell into my arms, she cried out: "that face".
In your arms?
So, you were in here then?
If we don't get anyone else for this ..
What's to stop me from handing you over to the Police?
Ah, so now I killed her, huh?
Well, Carter seemed to have met you before.
And you seem kinda shady about why you came here.
It kind of adds up.
─ You bet it does, you ape.
You think if the tide wasn't rising above my nose that I'd be her imitating a dick?
I'll show you what I came up here for.
Miss Jenny was after some big dough.
Another boyfriend of hers,
G.K. Volante of New York.
Hired me to get his letters back.
Well, I did.
When?
While you were upstairs talking to these people and getting this.
Okay, chief.
But how did you know she'd have her letters here?
She got them from under the boards yesterday morning.
I saw them in her travelling bag in her apartment later.
What a brain.
Well, it won't be long now. The Cops have got a steam shovel on that road.
I'll give you 10 minutes. Then I'm going to do what they were planning myself.
Shut up.
─ Yeah?
I mean, don't be funny.
─ Well, that corpse ain't.
This dart didn't go in at an angle.
Whoever threw it was directly behind her.
Hey! You going dippy, too?
The knock before the dart hit her.
Pete, quick! The magnifying glass from the library.
Here you are, chief.
And I always thought Sherlock
Holmes used this glass for a gag.
It's a chip of ruby from a finger ring.
They've struck the wall and cracked it.
When Frank Andes pulled back his arm to throw that dart, his hand ..
But this is the old lady's room.
The aunt .. was she wearing a ring?
─ I don't know.
I've got it, Pete.
If she's only wearing that ring now, that's evidence the Police understand.
Where is she?
─ Taking care of the girl.
Unlock the door, quick.
Hey.
We got to find them. She's taken the kid out to kill her. She's tried it before.
There must be an opening into that passageway from here.
That's how they got out.
─ Trying to kill Esther?
Yes. As plain as day.
The aunt saw Esther go into Jenny's room.
When Jenny backed out of the room, the old lady thought it was Esther.
Jenny Wren wasn't meant to be killed at all.
Bright-Eyes. Get the boy, Frank.
He'll know where this opening is.
We'll need him?
Oh .. my shoulder.
Oh I know, dear. You should be in bed.
But it's so nerve-wracking in the house with those men there.
You see .. this is the only way we can get out.
Go on, in there.
The sea air will do you good.
I want to talk to you.
Try to know you better.
Perhaps I have been a little harsh.
Don't be a fool. Show me how to get into the passageway. Why should I lie to you?
I don't know. But you can't convince me that my aunt killed that maid Carter.
I tell you she did.
─ Why?
Because Carter tried to blackmail your uncle for the affair he had with Jenny.
I don't believe that, and I don't believe she tried to kill Esther.
You've got to.
It was Esther she meant to kill last night when Jenny backed out of the room.
If you love that girl ..
You imagine I believe you about my aunt?
Or that I'd help you do anything to her?
Will you believe your eyes?
This room was locked.
Why should she take Esther through these walls? I'll tell you why.
To complete what she started. Keep Esther from marrying and protect the Andes name.
The woman is insane with family pride.
Carter is lying dead in that muck down there. Do you want your girl beside her?
Because that's what your aunt's trying to do. Kill her, now.
Can't you see I'm telling the truth?
Alright.
My father used to joke about my having sand in my veins instead of blood.
The sand in my hourglass is running low.
So it doesn't matter about me.
But it does matter about Frank.
Terribly.
This way.
In my girlhood, this cliff was called "the leap of the lovers".
When two sweethearts of different classes could not marry.
They would let themselves slip to their deaths.
Down to the rocks.
Afraid?
When you left me last night, to go to your sister's room.
You hated me, didn't you.
No.
I rather felt you hated me.
That's what I was trying to remember.
That you might have thought .. Jenny was me.
Why?
You are threatening our name, my dear.
Ahh!
Sorry, Frank.
Was it scraping the insulation off the wire that broke this nail?
Yes.
You witnessed this.
It wasn't very well planned, was it.
I never have been one to think much of consequences, Mister ..
Curtis, is it?
Thank you.
That mask. How did you know about that?
I saw the old gentleman frighten
Miss Wren with it early in the evening.
Thank you.
Police planes.
Thank you.
Ahh!
T-G
THE NUMBER SEVENTEEN
For Sale or Would be Let
Help!
Are you hurt?
Where is that candle?
Take, drink a little.
- Huh?
Yes, yes.  Yes, sir.
Thank you very much.
That's is enough.
I already feel better.
I freaked out and ve fallen rolling.
What about that? Up there...
Let me go!
Let me go, sir.  I have not been...
What were you doing up there?
The house is uninhabited.
I have to sleep somewhere, right?
I have not stolen anything.
Only, I just wanted to sleep, I swear.
I did not kill, sir.
No, I am not, I am not a murderer.
We'll see that.
Come on up.
-No.
I do not want, I do not want to climb.
I have a terrible fear.
Not go back to those damned climb stairs.
I do not want, for nothing in the world!
Oh. Yes, you are. Come on.
Hey, boss, is it a cop?
What is proposed?  Tell me.
I am going to take a look at the body. Then I will decide.
If not police, ...
... What are you looking for?
-Up.
Hey, ...
... I can think of an idea.
- What?
You go first.
- Come on!
What are you doing down there?
I was looking for you, captain.
Where am I?
Yes, right, yes.
-Come.
One moment.
-Top.
I feel bad, very bad.
Help me, please.
I have not been, I swear.
He had been beaten on the head with an iron, I guess.
Who beat him?  I have not seen anyone in the house.
Who beat him?
Head, Wait.
Wait, do not go.
You sure you do not know anything about this?
Of course not.
Man, if it had, would know, right?
A murder is not easily forgotten, I say.
Okay, I guess.
- Yes?
Well, it was about time.
What do you have in your pockets?
Hole.
- What else?
Look, a handkerchief.
I used to gag.
And this is a string.
I used to tie.
A sausage.
As she bumped her head.
Never mind about that.
I said Never mind about that.
A girl!
Yours?
-Yes.
-Jolly little thing.
Yes.
She was.
Look, here is something more, head, medium cigarette.
I had forgotten, I will take a good bit of smoke.
And what about your pockets, eh?
Okay, okay.  I am not curious, I do not care.
Here.
Take the candle.
Hey, Where are you going?
Swear to be moved.
Let's take a look at your pockets.
Oops!
What the hell he is doing with these bracelets?
A gun!
And it is loaded.
The trigger is sticking.
Got something more worthwhile?
Have you found anything out there?
No, only a little candle.
What is this?
Where do these come from?
I found it on the body, boss.
I do not know what it is.
Have you ever seen a pair of handcuffs before?
No, sir.
Never in my life.  I come from a good family.
We better take a look at this chap.
Hey.
Thank you.
If you are really innocent, you have to play clean.
Hey, it clear that I am innocent.
And why not say that fair play?
The same thing that makes the cop, tangle, entangle, ...
... embarullarlo one to fall ...
... but it is wrong, I have not done anything.
I have not done anything.
It is for up there.  Listen.
Eh, is a girl!
Still, not moving, young lady.  Still, the devil.
Turn the sail, soon.
Have you beaten?
Well ...
Take that.
Very nice, huh, boss?
Let me go.
Where is my father?  Dad!
Dad!
Dad!
What have you done with my father?
What?
What are you doing here?  We seek to help...
... if we count all.
That is.
Now they want to help me after having beaten ...
... as they have done.
-So sorry, lady.
Really.
- Who are you?
My name is Ford Raid and this is...
Hey, what's your name?
-Ben.
-Ben, What?
Clearly, something more, my name is Ben Bold.
I have not done much damage with their hitting, but I am stunning.
But that's not my fault, miss, but the cognac ...
... that has given it to revive.
Thank you.
Tell me, did your father is in this house?
Wait, why not climb onto the roof to see if there is anyone?
Yes.  Ben, you go up.
Why me?
Could you raise, has good legs, right?
You see, my father and I lived in the house next door, ...
... in the number fifteen.  This afternoon ...
... my father went up to his room.
Soon after came a telegram for him and I went to take him.
But I found the door locked.
I called and I answered.
It seemed to me strange and I got scared a lot.
Do you see anything?
Yes.
What?
- What?
Roofs.
- What an idiot!
Are you better?
Yes, I'm alright. Thanks.
Well ...
... I looked for a key that opened the door ...
... and when at last I found it, I entered the room ...
... and there was nobody.
Yes...
I couldn't make it out.
Then, I saw that the window was open and, look, ...
... I found this in the antepecho.
I thought dad would have dropped it.
I went out onto the roof through the window, ...
... gate above the floor, ...
... until I fell for the skylight.
You spend half his life in the soil, Ben.
Have you done wrong?
- Who, me? No.
I was in the war, you know?
A mine took me through the air and got off singing.
And the telegram arrived for your father?
Oh!  We forgot.
Have traced Suffolk necklace to Sheldrake.
Expect him to make getaway tonight. Watch number 17.
Arriving later. Barton.
It is strange, very strange.  I fail to decrypt.
Do you know who this is Barton?
Oh!  The card.
Number-17?
What does it mean, captain?
That surely is going to happen tonight something ...
... at number 17.
How strange!  If nothing ever happens here.
It would be better if you get back to your house.
No, I'm not going.
- You do not want to help?
It is a great help, lady.  I served much.
When coming down the stairs by stumbling around, ...
... do not know how much has helped me.
It was fortunate that he was so close to me.
Otherwise I would have killed him.
We have to go from here, it is too late.
What do you think will happen?
I long now.
Are yielding 12.
No, the 11 and a half.
They are calling, are knocking at the door.
It can be the police.
Damn it, the police.
You better return this.
That gun, whose is it?
Of the corpse.
Corpse?
A corpse!
My father!
I have already got the leg.  Not excite, please, miss.
Not excite, nothing happens.
It was gone!
- Huh?
It was gone!
The salesman said we could visit the house.
Ah, yes!
Yes.
Sure, I understand that it is late.
But ...
... I thought I did not mind.
With your permission.
May I come in too, uncle?
Would not it be better to see upstairs first, uncle?
Yes.
Perhaps it would be better.
By the way, ...
- What?
... we do not know your name.
Were not you told the agent?
Oh yes, ...
... but I am afraid I've forgotten.
Do not be forgotten the name of the seller?
Yes, extraordinary.
In fact, I forgot, my friend.
Well, now that they have seen the stairwells, ...
... Do you want to see the rooms?
Who is that?
Does not it seem a little strange question for someone ...
... who only want to rent a house?
He is right.
Excuse me.
-Excuse me.
It is my servant, in case you want to know, Ben.
Yes?
And the lady is a friend of the family.
It is still not in your house, my friend.
I insist that I would like to see the upstairs.
Insist?
That's what he said, he insists.
Eh!  Eh!  Enough of insolence. 驴Insolence?
Yes, sir, insolence.
Yes, let them go if they want it, boss, ...
... although some meddler.
Come on, look, look up to them to jump the eyes.
What a man so much fun.
Very funny.
Both as a clown.  Come on, get it now.
You're an idiot.
Everything is in order, boss, you will not find the bloody corpse.
It has been a while long ago.
Here there is nothing abnormal, man.
No, of course not.
What were expecting?
Will they find all this full of skeletons, Coffin?
They can remain calm in this beautiful home, gentlemen.
They can keep it forever.
I long now.
One-time, not having such a hurry.
What do you say?  What has not hurry?
You tell me who he is for what I have to do?
I will like lightning.  I am ready to leave ...
... this goddamn house whatever.
You do not know who he is Ben Bold.
Beware!  Beware!
... Take care!
Where do they drew that?
We took off the corpse, boss.
And if anyone tries to stop me, there will be more cold cuts ...
... in this damn house.
- Have you hidden yourself?
Huh?
- Have you been yourself?
What if I have hidden ...?  Me?
Already suspicious of me again.
Why he had to hide it?
In my life I have seen in a mess like this.
I'm scared to death.  I just want to get away from here.
I want to go before they kill me, ...
... as in this poor devil who was lying on the landing ...
... and that is no longer.
Walking dead, girls who fall through the roof, ...
... is too much for me.
Put that down.
Hell, has a gun.
Let me go, let me go!  Let me go!
Oh, my God, did not want to do it, believe me!
I did not even know it was loaded, did not know, no.
Come upstairs.
You too, young lady.
I think I Can manage.
Thank you.
Dude, you are wasting your time.
The lady does not hear.
Neither spoke.
Do you mind?
Hands up!
Recorded in this gentleman.
I guess you do not mind.
Not at all.
One with nine.
What little pasta.
Okay, now you, Ben.
Hey, who has given him permission to call me Ben?
How can I call you?
- Do you like George?
You are a kind nice, I like you.
"I will remember this, Governor.
I will give him a post in my cabinet in the next elections.
What job?
-It will be my secretary.
A sausage?
- Eh, eh, hear!
A bit of careful!
It's wonderful.
I will save it in the pantry for Christmas.
Now the lady.
Remove these hands!
If my father were here, it was going to win.
Let's see what that is.
Of Detective Barton?
Why has the telegram?
-A what you care about.
Miss Ackroyd?
Get Involved in their affairs.
Hey, lady, you better answer to what I ask him.
Are you the daughter of the inspector Ackroyd?
Answer, Miss Ackroyd.
Will save you a lot of problems.
Do you know his father this telegram?
No, came shortly after they left him.
What do you know about a diamond necklace?
Not a word, I assure you.
Did not your father told you about this necklace?
If it makes me more questions, I'm going to spit in the eye.
What are you looking for here?
A-Train.
Who the hell are you?
-His nephew ...
... who was waiting at the door.
Tell me, what has?
Traveling tourism?
Well, something like that.
Now I hope a freight train ....
... it must take to the mainland this evening.
Happens next to this house, right?
Here is my ticket.  Where is yours?
Are you sure that is your ticket?
We left without light.  Let me go, go!
I have not been!  I swear that I have not been me!
Let me go!
- Care, which does not escape!
I want to get away from here!
Damn it!
But why have taken me?
Yeah, yeah, okay, I am guilty.
I killed a man with a sausage ...
... and then I've done away with the corpse.
Yes, yes, I have been me who has done everything.
I am a dangerous murderer.  Ya know.
I wish I could do the same with you all.
I would do it, I swear that I would do it, if I die them up.
Where did you get?
In the bathroom.
Well, yes, I'm neat.
Today is not my lucky day.
I am a murderer, a apagavelas ...
... and now they want to become a cod.
Now let's talk about the Suffolk necklace.
Do you know where he is?
- How do I know?
Sheldrake only knows what he is the one who has hidden.
Probably in this house.
Yes, and according to the telegram, ...
... it seems that Detective Barton ...
... also know the hiding place.
If such comes through here, we are lost.
Yes.
Well, as it arrives Sheldrake, ...
... forced him to speak clearly. 驴Obligations?
According to my references, Sheldrake is a man very difficult.
Bah!  I do not know him, but I think you exaggerate a lot.
A kind of legend.
He may be dead.
That body ...
I do not think that is easy to kill Sheldrake.
Street.
You are right, it is not easy to kill me.
Are you Sheldrake?
Do you expect the two trains?
And the lady, too.
What about that other partner?
Husmeando were when we arrived.
There is another locked in the bathroom.  Will have been asleep, I guess.
We have to go sooner, the train will pass soon.
Hey, but ...
... And these two?
I do not think we should leave them well.
That would have tied at least, not you think?
Is it necessary?
If you do not want to go running to alert the police.
I hope that no cares, I do not like to do these things, but ...
I love that I care.
Hands behind.
Someone has to monitor the house ...
... when papa铆to goes on a journey.
Sure, there are many thieves, right?
That's it.
Come on down.
A wait.
At last I find you.
- Are you OK?
Is your father?
Yes.
Is it you who was lying on the landing?
Yes, I order to monitor the house.
Is police?
Inspector-Ackroyd.
I know who you are.
-Hurry, we must help Ben.
Who is Ben?
-Run, is in the bathroom.
For you learn to get in no matter what.
Damn, I got screwed.
Now I'll see you.
Quiet.  Where are you going, mate?
Back, come on.
You are a perfect litter.
I'll have to get rid of you as possible.
Hurry, turn to tie it.
Well tied.
Where is the guy who locked us?
I've gotten into the bathroom.  Believed it was me, huh?
I hope no mistakes this time.
Are you Mr Sheldrake?
You are very smart, you know?
What do you think you have done to my father?
Nothing, do not worry.
What's wrong with you?  Do they not know about?
Leave her alone, she is deaf and dumb.
Well, so what are you waiting for?
-Come on.
Down here?
Yes, it's better.
We wait in the cellar.
Do you mind going first?
I will come back.
She spoke!
It was a tale of a deaf mute.
But, in what order?
It's very funny, huh?
Yes, for me too.
Pronto!
Thank you.
Cool...I fainted.
What do you do with those crooks?
Do you think I keep him in my will?
Will he return to his side?
What else can I do?  Has compelled me to accompany him.
Think I know where is the necklace.
I'm very scared.
Why is pretending to be deaf and dumb?
It feels more secure.
Hurry!
May again rise.
Well...
Are you alright?
Let us not waste time.
His father and Ben!
Now you see what is good, thief!
Why did you hit?  Asshole!
-Damn, ...
... I have to get up.  I did not know it was you.
Could you be a little better!
You are well spent.
What a pair of cake!
Hit his head with the bathtub.
Is bleeding, we have to take you to a doctor.
Is not serious, I take care of him. Pers铆galos.
Agreed.
Come with me, take the candle!
- Again?
My Mother.
What does he want to return to shake off?
What are you going now?
A blow to the head, chief.
The coup will follow us here.
Who would send me to come and sleep in this house?
Damn the time it occurred to me!
I am not going.
Not so dumb, after all?
-What's the idea?
-I am not going.
What do you mean?
I am not going...Thats all.
We must seize the opportunity.
Does not always come out freight trains to the continent.
I have decided to stay and I am staying.
I you are proving very strange.
What is your game?
Why posed as a deaf mute?
Who are you really?  What are you doing here?
Why did not you ask your accomplice?
Okay, it is clarified in the train.  Come on.
Hey, leave them, boss.  I have something to say. 驴Leave?  And that takes women?
No, they will not if I can avoid it.
Ferry with a goods train towards the continent.
The stores we have seen, we&#39;re going to make a visit.
Good night.
-Look at you ...
We do not want to cause inconvenience, but ...
You can not travel on this train, I'm going to stop it.
I suggest you do so, friend, because ...
Come on, let's tie him up, put him in there.
What are you doing here?  How has escaped?
But if you're drunk!
Thank you.
Well, come on, what about it?
What about what?
-The diamonds.
It should be spread, huh?
These cars are like convicts.
Yes, too.
Enough is enough, do not you think?
Keep the hands quiet.
-Come on, Sheldrake, ...
... we know that diamonds are in his possession.
Do you know much then.
-Of course.
Come on, entr茅guenoslos, is a good boy.
Do you think that wearing beneath the hat?
No, but let us see their pockets.
Keep that gun.  Can not see that it is a cop?
Sheldrake may be right.
When you came through the door of that house, ...
... That was the first thing that occurred to me to think.
What stupidity!
-Stupidity, huh?
M茅tal early in the cabin.  Can not see anything that is less ...
... that Detective Barton?
Very smart, Sheldrake, but you will not escape with that necklace.
I have already escaped!
Dirty cheat!
Give me back the collar!
- Me?  If you do not have.
So what has that fake deaf and dumb ...
... that you came.
-No.
Hello.
Give me the necklace right now, charm.
What I am talking about?
Let&#39;s leave of comedies.
Ya, now is going to tell me what you've been suspecting all night.
Yes, I'm a cop.
- What?
Well, now you know what?
I do not have.
For something you have been with us.
I know the necklace as well as Ben.
If I came because I have had been forced.
Hey, listen ...
I have no choice but ...
... to register them.
-Come on, boss, is not well ...
... do that with a lady.
Hey, leave it, what do I have the necklace.  Look, here it is.
Stop, we're going to crash.
So we're going to crash.
- Stop!
Where did you have gotten to know if you can?
Good.
Joe, look at that.
What are you doing?  Out of there!
-Come on, shoot at once!
-I'm going to blow the whistle.
Salta.
Come on, keep on going!
That's it.
We must stop the train.
How will it be?
That valve.
What does it mean?
"I have discovered.
Do you know and who I am?
-No.
Who is it?
It is a detective.
Yes, actually, I'm Barton.
Are you sure?  Does the famous Barton?
Yes, I have been following the trail to Sheldrake ...
... and the collar Suffolk for weeks.
And it has found?
No, but ...
... I have the lady who is almost the same.
The lady, ...
Mr Barton ... ...
... does not have anything to do with that.  Did you know?
On the very police that is, I will say that is exceeding.
Let it settle in my way.
Okay, but let's ...
... that you will not be called Barton, but Doyle.
What about Doyle?
Ladronzuelo is a smart, Doyle, but he has committed two errors.
The former believe that the police would just go behind the necklace.
They also went behind you.
- From me?
Yes, they knew the same way that the necklace would attract Sheldrake, ...
Sheldrake ... it would attract you, Henry Doyle.
You are mistaken.
- Really?
And the second, more serious, ...
... has been done through detective ...
... and just by Detective Barton.
The funny thing of all is that I am Barton.
Bad luck, Henry.
Good evening, ma'am.
What a pint!
Good night.
-Goodbye, Henry.
Hey, so you're a detective really ...
... and I know without a word.
Well?
Well?
What are you going do about it?
What are you going do about it?
You better come along with me.
But ...
... Where?
Perhaps a breakfast.
Do I leave in freedom, captain, ..
... in exchange for a nice wedding gift, eh?
Hold it!
Now, take this. Get this in here.
- Now, watch it.
- Easy now.
That's it.
Hold it. Hold it!
Right.
- Easy now.
- Careful.
- That's it.
- All right, take it to the laboratory.
Let me take it a while,
Professor Arnold.
No, stand back.
Stand back.
Come on.
Let's bring it out.
That's it.
Okay, move.
Come on, up. Come on.
Take it away, old boys.
Ali.!
Ali, what is it?
Dead.
Stand back, everybody. Stand back.
Edfu Ahmad, a light.
I best dragoman in Luxor.
I have fastest donkey.
Please to remove offspring of Satan to some distant place.
You no more want donkey?
Hat to shelter unfortunate head more desirable.
Oh! Hat, hat.
I am first-class service.
Oh, a hat.
Where'd you...
Ah! Effendi Snowshoes.
There you is again, mister.
Ain't there no place where you ain't?
Ah! This time, effendi,
I have big news for you.
But first, baksheesh.
Two bits baksheesh. Two bits.
You might as well go on.
I ain't gonna let you be gettin'...
- no more black sheep money out of me.
- But wait!
Today, I have locate the grave of your sacred ancestor.
Baksheesh.
Two bits baksheesh.
I don't know now, but you sure... you done found the mummy of my great-great-grandpappy?
Nay!
- Your great-great-great-great- great-great-great-great... - Oh, you stutter too much.
I don't believe I'm gonna let you talk me out no more money...
Nay! I am the best son of my father.
I supply all things for this noble gentleman.
I am first-rate service.
Contradiction, please.
For past two hours, have not supplied drink.
Drink? You want a drink?
I'll give you a drink.
- Kind of a strong one, though.
- Pardon, please.
For water to soothe dry throat.
- Would happily give much baksheesh.
- Ah! Baksheesh! Two.
You mean you'd give two bits for just some plain water?
Drop of plain water on thirsty tongue... more precious than gold in purse.
Mr. Tom and them got plenty of water in their tent down yonder.
- Here, I'll go get it for...
- Ah! Baksheesh!
- I am first-rate service!
- You a first-rate liar!
You will soon have mummy... of your great-great-great-great- great-great-grandpappy!
You have ancestors in Egypt?
I don't know. This fortune-teller down in Mississippi... says this here country where all my folks come from.
- Yes?
- And then Mr. Tom... he done won me in a crap game.
I come along to kind of look 'em up.
Reverence of ancestors most commendable.
Sir, there's Mr. Tom and them over here.
Mr. Tom, this gentleman, he wanted to know...
So sorry to intrude, but would much appreciate glass of water.
Oh, of course.
Snowshoes, water.
- Yes.
- This Egyptian sun certainly can get a fellow down.
- Have a seat.
- Thank you so much.
Perhaps you'd like some tea?
Oh.
Would be most grateful.
You...
You are Miss Arnold?
- Yes.
- And you are Mr. Tom Evans?
How'd you know?
- Oh, Snowshoes. Of course.
- Sir?
No. Have met.
- Where?
- Your pictures in offices... of French Archaeological Society in Paris.
Please permit introduction of humble self. Am Charlie Chan.
- Charlie Chan?
- I thought your face was familiar.
- How are you, Mr. Chan?
- Am here to see your learned father.
But Father...
He isn't here.
If you're looking for mysteries, you've come to the right place, Mr. Chan.
Miss Arnold has one all ready for you.
Dad went away over a month ago.
We've heard from him only once since he left.
I know it must sound foolish, but I have the strangest feeling something's happened to him.
He hasn't been himself since he opened Ameti's tomb.
She's just making a mountain out of a molehill.
Insignificant molehill... sometime more important than conspicuous mountain.
Professor Thurston, your uncle, he is here, perhaps?
No, he's in Luxor.
We'll wait till the sun drops, then we'll all drive in together.
Thank you so much.
- Right through the garden.
- Thank you so much.
- Stick around, Snowshoes.
- Yes.
My brother Barry.
Beauty of Egyptian night captured in simple melody.
Those native things are all right for a while... but one of these days,
I'm gonna send home for some jazz.
The old maestro stuff.
Yowzer!
Good evening, Edfu Ahmad.
Has Uncle John returned?
He's in the laboratory, but he heard your arrival in the car... and will be up in a moment.
- Oh, Edfu?
- Yes, Miss Arnold?
- Will you ask Nayda to bring some cigarettes from my room?
- Certainly.
- Here, have one of mine.
- No, thanks. I prefer my own.
We'll go into the study,
Mr. Chan.
- Smoke?
- Do not indulge.
Confound it.!
I've lost my glasses again.!
Edfu Ahmad.!
You mustn't mind if Uncle John seems a bit angry, Mr. Chan.
He'll be all right when he gets his glasses.
Ah. I thought I heard that old rattle-trap of yours drive up, Tom.
It's enough to wake the dead.
When archaeology pays bigger and better dividends, I'll get a new one.
Uncle John, this is Mr. Chan.
- Professor Thurston.
- How do you do?
- So pleased.
- Mr. Chan wanted to see Dad.
- I've explained he's away.
- Oh, yes.
- Sit down, won't you?
- Thank you.
- Was it on a matter of importance, Mr. Chan?
- Most important.
Business with
French Archaeological Society.
Oh, then perhaps
I can help you.
- I'm in charge during my brother-in-law's absence.
- Oh.
Then will come to point quickly.
Matter concerns valuable items...
taken from tomb of high priest Ameti.
In, uh, just what way,
Mr. Chan?
Archaeological Society... financed Professor Arnold's researches...
with understanding that all objects taken from tomb... with exception of those claimed by Egyptian government...
become property of Society Museum.
That's quite correct.
Everything taken from the Ameti tomb... is now in course of cataloging in preparation for shipment.
Correction, please.
Valuable items taken from tomb... discovered six months ago... now in possession of private collectors... and rival museums in Europe.
That's impossible.
Pardon, please.
Here are photographs.
This necklace with identifying seal of Ameti.
This ring of Ameti...
now in Berlin museum.
Then they're imitations.
Why, we have a native craftsman,
Edfu Ahmad...
who can duplicate things like those so closely... that even an expert can't tell the difference.
Pardon, effendi.
Your glasses.
Is that all for tonight?
Yes, you may go.
I'm sure they're imitations, Mr. Chan.
Experts have identified necklace and ring as genuine.
Do you mean that the Society is accusing my father?
So sorry, but Society demands explanation.
On what grounds? They withdrew their financial support before the tomb was located.
I-I-I question their right to investigate anything.
Contract very plain.
Items from Ameti tomb property of French museum.
Must locate Professor Arnold.
Well, I'd be glad to try again, Mr. Chan.
Our last communication came from Napata on the Upper Nile... saying he wished to be undisturbed in his present work.
- He ignores our letters.
- Which isn't like Daddy at all.
Articles from Ameti tomb are here?
Yes, in the laboratory.
Would you care to see them?
Much interested.
Carol, perhaps you'd better go to your room, dear.
- She doesn't like our work, Mr. Chan.
- I hate it!
It's taken my father away from me.
- Something's happened to him, I know it!
- Please, dear.
Can't you help me find him,
Mr. Chan?
You must. You've got to.
If possible, will be most happy.
There, there, there, there.
Let Nayda take you to your room, my dear, hmm?
I'm-I'm sorry.
Good night.
And thank you, Mr. Chan.
She's quite upset, Tom.
- Perhaps you'd better phone for Dr. Racine.
- I think so too.
The laboratory's below,
Mr. Chan.
Thank you so much.
A few of the more important items are here, Mr. Chan.
The rest are in the storeroom.
I'd be glad to check them with you at your convenience.
That would be most helpful.
X-ray machine?
We have the most completely equipped laboratory in Luxor.
This is a radiograph of Ameti.
Very interesting.
Hands crossed in final sleep.
Yes.
Egyptian goddess?
That is Sekhmet, goddess of vengeance.
The ancients endowed her with many supernatural powers, Mr. Chan.
Mmm.
Cannot believe, uh, piece of carved stone contain evil... unless dropped on foot.
- Strange you should say that.
- May I ask why?
That's how Miss Arnold's brother nearly met his death 10 years ago.
Oh. Ameti?
This case holds all that remains of one of the most powerful priests... of the 21st Dynasty.
- Case has not been opened?
- No.
You see it just as we found it.
- Very strange.
- What do you mean?
Varnish on 3,000-year-old mummy case... not completely dry.
I don't understand this.
Perhaps case has been opened.
That's hardly possible, and yet...
You're right, Mr. Chan.
It has been tampered with.
Would be most interesting to see inside.
- You mean open it?
- No, I wouldn't dare, not without Professor Arnold's permission.
He'd never forgive me.
X-ray machine most useful for seeing where eye cannot reach.
I'll get Snowshoes to give us a hand.
See, I could carry you back to Mississippi with me.
And you don't have to worry about no jobs there...
'cause I know a lot of white folks who could keep you workin'.
- Hey, Snowshoes?
- Sir?
- Come on in here. Make it snappy.
- Yes, sir.
You go on now, kitten.
I'll be seein' you maybe tomorrow night.
It's all right with me.
I'll be seeing you anyhow.
Want somethin' outside with me, Mr. Tom?
- Now, give us a hand here.
- I know, but...
- Do as you're told.
- But I don't know much on touchin' dead things.
Now, slide it this way.
Now the feet toward the fluoroscope.
Good. Now, lift.
Lift. Lift.
Slowly.
Now, lower the feet.
Lower them.
Be careful.
Down. Now, raise it.
Raise it.
Mind the frame.
Turn it.
- All set?
- Wait till I put the lights out.
Can't we see better with the lights on?
Quiet, and don't touch anything.
No, sir,
I ain't touchin' nothin'.
Here we go, Professor.
That's Ameti, all right.
See? There's the identifying cartouche suspended around his neck.
Very interesting.
Please.
May display ignorance of Egyptian history by asking question?
Certainly.
Did high priest die natural death?
The Ameti records indicate... that he kicked off peacefully at the ripe old age of 78.
Contradiction, please.
Ameti die very violent death.
How do you figure that?
Observe.
Modern bullet clearly revealed near heart.
- Say, that does look like a bullet.
- That settles it!
- What are you gonna do?
- Open this case.
Can I go now?
No. Get busy.
Haul it down.
But I don't feel so good.
All right now. Come here.
Lift the lid off.
- I'm not prepared for nothin' like this.
- Put it over there.
Let's get it on the table.
All right now.
Professor Arnold!
Look here, Professor, you're not gonna say anything to Carol about this, are you?
Confound it!
The current's off again.
- Hey, Mr. Tom, lookee yonder!
- Look at what?
Miss Sekhmet see us.
That was Carol!
Hey, Mr. Tom, wait a minute!
Nayda!
- I'm all right now.
- Mistress will take medicine?
No! Take them away!
They don't help me.
They never make me sleep.
Dr. Racine says they are helping you.
What happened, Carol?
I was writing a letter to Colonel Bailey at Napata... asking him if he wouldn't try again to locate Father.
- Mm-hmm.
- And suddenly, my hands became icy cold.
My cigarette dropped to the floor.
As I stooped to pick it up, everything seemed to stand still.
I was frightened.
I tried to cry out, but I couldn't.
It seemed as though
I were drifting into space.
I got to my feet.
I must have...
for the next thing I knew,
I was standing in the middle of the room.
And then I saw it, its horrible head coming toward me out of the darkness...
the head of Sekhmet.!
But, Carol, dear, it could only have been your imagination.
Of course, Carol, dear.
It was only your imagination.
I suppose it was only my imagination when the wall of Sarkari's tomb gave way... and crushed me beneath it!
- Be quiet, will you?
- Oh, I beg your pardon.
I'd forgotten. You are the courageous type who doesn't recognize fear.
- Well, I'm not, and neither is Carol!
- Be silent!
A dozen others have died from opening the tombs. Why shouldn't we?
Barry, please!
You know what
I'm talking about, don't you?
It's all our father's fault.
He is the one who brought us into this land of decay and death!
- We hate him for it.
- It isn't true.
Why pretend?
You know you hate him as much as I do.
Barry, come with me.
Why doesn't Father take us away from this dreadful place?
Try to rest, dear.
A good night's sleep will do you a lot of good.
Oh, Tom?
Would you mind staying with Barry for a little while?
- Certainly not.
- Thanks.
Oh, Doctor, come in.
Come in.
- How's Carol?
- She's... She's had a terrible shock.
- A repetition of last week's experience.
- I'm sorry.
- Oh, Dr. Racine, this is Mr. Chan.
- How do you do?
- So pleased.
- A most tragic thing happened tonight, Anton.
- We found the...
- Excuse, please.
Suggest Miss Arnold now more important.
You're right, of course.
She's in her room.
Pardon me.
Mr. Chan,
Professor Arnold's death... throws an entirely different light on the matter of your business in Luxor.
Yes?
I did dispose of those items of the Ameti tomb.
You see, after the Society withdrew its support...
Professor Arnold needed funds to carry on the work.
He borrowed heavily from Dr. Racine... who, after the tomb was finally located... quite naturally felt he was entitled to a share of the finds.
Arnold was an archaeologist, not a businessman.
And with the existing complications of his contract with the Society... the only solution seemed to be that I dispose of a few of the less valuable items... enough to pay part of his obligation to the doctor.
A decision had to be made, so I assumed responsibility.
Why did Professor go away?
He was furious when
I told him what I'd done.
Meanwhile, having found evidence of a royal burial ground at Napata... he decided to attempt locating the tombs... feeling that if he turned over their contents to the Society... they would be amply compensated for what they'd lost from the Ameti finds.
Most commendable.
I'm frightfully worried about Barry.
Now, you're not to worry about anything except getting a little sleep.
There.
That's better.
If Miss Arnold isn't asleep within the hour, give her another of those powders.
- Yes, effendi.
- Good night, my dear.
Good night.
You say obligation to Dr. Racine not fully paid?
When Professor Arnold went away,
Dr. Racine kindly consented...
to extend his note another 90 days.
May I inquire what right this gentleman has to ask questions... regarding a purely personal matter?
Mr. Chan represents the
French Archaeological Society.
And how does that concern me?
Every detail most important where murder concerned.
- Murder?
- Professor Arnold is dead.
- I don't understand.
- Circumstances very mysterious.
Body found in Ameti mummy case with bullet near heart.
That bullet was not the cause of his death, Mr. Chan.
No? Please explain.
There was trouble with the natives a few days after the Ameti tomb was opened.
Professor Arnold was wounded.
- And the bullet not removed?
- No.
Why not?
Examination disclosed it was too near the heart to risk an operation.
- Perhaps I'd better...
- Please.
- Must touch nothing until after autopsy.
- Very well.
Why should anyone have committed such a fantastic crime?
Very strange.
Were it not for bullet in body...
might almost believe in power of ancient goddess.
It's my father.
He's dead, isn't he?
- Yes, Barry.
- I knew it.
I've known it ever since he went away.
He discovered the secret of Ameti's tomb... and the dark waters of the forbidden places... carried him to his death.
Barry, what nonsense is this?
He ignored the warning, and it destroyed him... just as it will destroy us all!
Here, here.
This won't do.
Pardon. Must go.
But first, may have letter of Professor Arnold from Napata?
Why, yes.
I...
I have it here.
Thank you so much.
- Good night.
- Good night, Mr. Chan.
- Am so sorry.
- I'll drive you into Luxor.
- Oh, thank you so much, sir.
- See you in the morning, Professor.
Why not put up with me while you're here?
I have plenty of room.
Have, uh, got extra pajamas?
You bet I have.
Then will be most grateful for hospitality.
- Well, here we are.
- Thank you so much.
Yes.
Egyptian night now most peaceful.
Make yourself at home while I round up those pajamas for you.
- Size 52, please.
- You'll take what I've got and like 'em.
Thank you so much.
- May make notes on writing machine?
- Sure, help yourself.
You'll find some paper in that left-hand drawer.
Thank you.
How are these?
Make Charlie Chan look like zebra.
This is your bunk next to the wall.
With back to wall, can fight off demon of sleeplessness.
What's the matter?
Can't you read your own writing?
- Something here very strange.
- What?
Professor Arnold go to Napata four weeks ago?
Yes.
According to date, this letter written two weeks ago.
- That's right.
- But Professor dead before letter written.
Huh?
Still more strange.
Letter written here on your machine.
Now, wait a minute.
After all...
Observe, please, similarity of type.
Say, they do look the same.
Man who write that letter kill Professor Arnold.
It looks kind of bad for me, doesn't it, Mr. Chan?
Reports of Society indicate you were discharged by Professor Arnold.
Yes, we did have a little argument about the Ameti hieroglyphics.
But Professor Thurston took me back again a few days later.
Who, beside you, use writing machine?
Well, Thurston, Barry,
Edfu Ahmad, even Snowshoes.
- We all do.
- Edfu Ahmad. He is Egyptian?
According to him, a direct descendant of Ameti.
Young Mr. Arnold mention secret of Ameti tomb.
- Tomb has secret?
- Not that I know of.
You see, the records indicate that Ameti was supposed... to have collected the mummies and the royal paraphernalia... of the 20th Dynasty pharaohs for safekeeping.
Professor Arnold thought that he had discovered the treasure when he opened the tomb.
But it didn't pan out that way.
He was still looking for it at the time he disappeared.
- Would much like to see Ameti tomb.
- Tonight?
- Waiting for tomorrow waste of today.
- Let's go.
As usual, the battery's dead.
Hey, Snowshoes?
- Huh?
- Bring your flashlight. We're going to the tomb.
Now? Tonight?
Yes. Make it snappy.
All them hants.
Why don't you let 'em sleep nights?
Gettin' 'em all stirred up.
No wonder they get so mad and kills folks.
Somebody looking for you, you wouldn't be there to calls yourself.
- Come on, Snowshoes.
- Yes'm.
- There your light, Mr. Tom.
- All right, give us some of it down the steps.
What do you want me...
There.
- After y'all, gentlemen.
- Go on!
But y'all comin' too, ain't ya?
- Yes. Go ahead.
- Okay.
Hold that light still so I can see the lock.
- Yes'm. I'm just so cold-like.
- Yeah, you act like it.
All right. Turn on the power.
Ameti tomb equipped with modern convenience.
Nothing too good for old Ameti.
This is the anteroom where we found a few important pieces.
But it was in there we made our real discoveries.
The mummy case was in this stone sarcophagus.
Very interesting.
From here, an image of Sekhmet kept watchful eye over old Ameti.
All the good it did him.
- Yes. And that?
- Oh, that's the storage room.
In here, we found Ameti's chariot... and his bed, and a whole raft of personal effects.
Even an alabaster jar that still carried the odor of the perfume it had contained.
Also very interesting.
Uh, another room?
No, that's just an unfinished passage.
Ameti probably died before his tomb was completed.
- Now what?
- I wonder!
- Snowshoes, snap on your flashlight!
- Yes'm.
- But something done knocked it out of my hand.
- Well, find it.!
Yes'm.
Oh, Lordy, there's something in here with us. Look.
Oh, she got me.! Oh, she got me.!
She got me.! Oh, Lordy,
I'm here with this ghost.! Oh, Lord...
- Excuse me, Mr. Tom.
- Get away with that thing!
- See where it went?
- Came in here.
Well, it's a cinch it isn't in here now.
Very strange.
Sekhmet disappear like, uh, Cheshire Cat... of Alice in Land of Wonder.
Stumps me.
Looks like somebody's gunning for us.
As son Lee would say, you telling me.
The powder is a harmless sedative, effendi... prescribed quite regularly by Dr. Anton Racine.
Dr. Racine perhaps buy mapouchari here?
No, no. I do not sell the drug at all.
- No?
- No.
Thank you so much.
Ah.!
Effendi Snowshoes.
Oh, mister, I ain't feelin' so good this morning, ya hear?
Tonight, we go to burial ground... and steal the mummy of your sacred ancestors.
I don't know. But after last night, graveyards, hants and me... gonna be strangers, total and complete.
Hey!
I am first-class servant!
I am best dragoman in Luxor!
- Good evening, effendi.
- Good evening. Professor Thurston in?
He's in the laboratory with Dr. Racine... and the other learned gentleman from Luxor.
The anatomical investigation to determine the cause... of Professor Arnold's death is in progress.
- Other learned gentlemen are police?
- The police, effendi.
Huh.
Thank you so much.
Oh, pardon.
May ask question, please?
Certainly, effendi.
Ancient Egyptians familiar with effects of, uh, mapouchari?
The ancients had knowledge of many things.
Of, uh, mapouchari?
Perhaps so.
I could not say.
No?
Thank you so much.
- Oh, good evening, Mr. Chan.
- Good evening.
- That will be all.
- Your Excellency, may I present Mr. Chan?
His Excellency Fouad Soueida of the police department in Luxor.
- So pleased.
- Pleasure indeed, Mr. Chan... but under unfortunate and most perplexing circumstances.
Cannot read printing in new book until pages cut.
Oh, yes. Professor Thurston has explained... that you have been good enough to interest yourself in the case.
We will be most grateful for the benefit of such assistance... as you may be able to offer.
Very pleased to cooperate.
Am certain matter now in most efficient hands.
Oh, thank you.
I believe that is all for now.
I will make my report at once.
- Good night, Doctor.
- Good night, sir.
- Good night, Mr. Chan.
- Good night.
Oh, you have list of articles from Ameti tomb?
Oh, yes. I had Edfu Ahmad prepare it for you today.
If you'll excuse me.
- You have determined cause of death?
- Yes.
There's evidence that a heavy blow at the base of the brain... induced a cerebral hemorrhage.
- Also find small incision at jugular vein?
- Yes.
Made for purpose of draining blood to mummify body.
That seems rather an obvious conclusion.
Conclusion also obvious.
Operation performed by hands of expert.
A sharp knife in the hands of any intelligent person... could accomplish the same thing.
Many intelligent persons afraid even to touch sharp knife.
Bullet near heart removed?
Of course not. Professor Thurston explained last night... that it had nothing to do with Arnold's death.
So sorry.
Memory very bad sometimes.
You have a theory about this, of course.
Theory like mist on eyeglasses... obscures facts.
Our local authorities have very clear vision, Mr. Chan.
- You'll find them most helpful.
- Yes.
Thank you so much.
- Tom?
- Yes, dear?
There's no reason for our staying in Egypt now.
Now, don't you worry.
It's just a matter of a little while until we can get things settled here...
then we'll all be going home.
- Shall I ask him to stop?
- No, please don't.
It seems to take his thoughts off all that's happened.
Tom, I'm worried about Barry.
This superstition of the tomb, it's-it's beginning to affect his mind.
Oh, Carol, I didn't know that you and Tom had returned.
We only took a short walk.
- You won't mind if I go in now, dear, will you?
- Of course not.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- How's she feeling, Tom?
- She's worried over Barry.
He's letting that foolishness about Sekhmet scare the life out of him.
With all that's happened, you can hardly blame the boy.
So sorry to intrude.
Did you find the list of items correct, Mr. Chan?
- Thank you so much.
- Then if there's nothing else this evening...
Uh, please, time now to discuss matter of great importance.
- Yes?
- May ask question, please?
- Certainly.
- Can explain perhaps, uh... effects of drug mapouchari?
Well, the effects depend largely on the individual.
- Yes?
- In general... the victim loses all sense of time and reality.
He suffers from false convictions, hallucinations.
If the doses are sufficiently powerful, death ensues.
That is perhaps explanation.
Explanation of what,
Mr. Chan?
Strange mental condition of Miss Arnold last night.
You mean she was drugged?
Analysis of cigarettes today disclose mapouchari.
- What?
- Surprised...
you did not recognize the symptoms...
which you described so clearly, Doctor.
This is incredible.
Why should anyone do such a thing?
Problem still to be solved.
- Perhaps Mr. Barry has answer.
- What do you mean?
Remarks made last night suggest he know... where father was searching for secret treasure.
That knowledge most dangerous.
Important we speak with Mr. Barry at once.
Very well.
Barry, what is it?
Let's get him to bed, quickly.
- He's dead.
- Dead?
Apparently a violent reaction of the heart... which may be occasioned by sudden shock or terrific fright.
But what could've caused it?
We were all on the patio.
- We saw nothing.
- The gods of Egypt are powerful gods.
Their vengeance has taken
Professor Arnold, and now his son.
What do you know of the death of Professor Arnold and Barry?
Sekhmet's warning was not heeded.
Excuse, please.
Avenging goddess not responsible... for mapouchari in cigarettes.
I know nothing of that.
Well, who supplies cigarettes for Miss Arnold?
Why, you.
You buy those cigarettes.
Tom, call the police.
Don't move, effendi!
The police cannot help you now.
This household is marked for death.
Stay where you are, effendis.
You knew there was danger.
Then you must've suspected this madman.
Why didn't you warn us?
Your carelessness is responsible for that boy's death.
Most regretful.
Impossible to prepare defense until direction of attack is known.
- Shall I call the police?
- Yes.
One moment, please.
May call police if you so desire... but shall continue investigation in own way.
Extend deepest sympathy.
Good night.
I'll be back later.
- Mr. Chan?
- Yes?
What are you gonna do now?
Have curiosity to visit tomb... where goddess Sekhmet mysteriously disappeared last night.
- Let's go.
- Yes.
Hey, Snowshoes, come on with that light.
Yes'm, but I was just seein' if anything was behind us...
'fore it get in there ahead of us.
Go ahead.
Have made search for secret way out?
We've checked every inch of the place a dozen times.
This was the storage room?
Yes.
Hieroglyphics and symbols different from other rooms.
- You know meaning?
- That upper border is Ameti's prayer... to the goddess Sekhmet for protection.
- And, uh, these?
- Merely ornamentation.
The design alternates with the symbols expressing life... and death, and so on across.
Story of man very short.
Life, death.
Life, death.
Am reminded of ancient sage
Confucius who writes, uh...
"From life to death is reach of man."
- Observe?
- That's good logic, all right... but it doesn't get us anywhere.
Most peculiar.
Ghost of Sekhmet disappear in room of mystic symbols.
Try both together.
Mr. Tom, you stirrin' up them hants again.
Is that a grave?
Secret waters which Mr. Barry mention last night.
- Snowshoes, bring the light.
- Yes'm, but...
Say, do you think Barry really knew about this?
Hasty conclusion easy to make like hole in water.
I wonder who that was masquerading as Sekhmet.
Murderer of Professor Arnold who tried to frighten us from tomb.
Observe.
Direction of current indicate...
water flow under rock.
If there's a current, that means this water comes from the Nile.
It's a cinch there's something on the other side.
Good swimmer could maybe dive under, find out?
- Nothing like trying.
- But, Mr. Tom... you oughtn't dive in them hants' swimmin' hole.
- Quiet, Snowshoes.
- Would recommend extreme caution.
Now, don't worry about me.
- Waterproof.
- Thanks.
And you're gonna have to hold your breath you don't know how long.
Well, here goes.
Hey, Mr. Tom, you forgot to take off your wristwatch!
Somethin' must've done happened.
He ain't said nothin' yet.
Professor Arnold.
Why... What do you...
Look, Mr. Chang.
He must've made it all right.
Mr. Tom, that you?
- Mr. Tom?
- Come, please.
Yes'm, but we oughta wait before we know where we goin'.
- Look!
- Mr. Tom?
Tom?
- Is he hurt bad?
- Help, please.
- Must get Mr. Evans to doctor at once.
- Yeah.
Come on, come on.
More.
Oh, excuse, please.
Professor Thurston gone long?
- He went into Luxor to see the police.
- Oh.
- Mr. Chan?
- Yes?
I hope Effendi Evans will get well.
Kind thoughts add favorable weight... in balance of life and death.
Professor Thurston has returned?
No, effendi.
Inform, please, will be in laboratory.
Is he going to be all right,
Doctor?
He has a very good chance.
I hardly know what to suggest, Your Excellency.
Would you care to start your investigation in Barry's room?
All in good time, Professor.
I shall take care of everything.
Pardon, effendi. Mr. Chan is waiting for you in the laboratory.
- Mr. Chan?
- I thought you told him to go.
Will you please come with us,
Your Excellency?
What are you doing here,
Mr. Chan?
Pardon intrusion of unwelcome presence... but have learned something of great interest.
His Excellency will be judge of that.
Most happy to have Excellency's distinguished opinion.
Also of Miss Arnold, if you would be so kind.
Very well, Mr. Chan.
Your prying into our affairs has brought us nothing but misfortune.
First it was Barry, and now it's Tom.
- What's happened to Tom?
- Attempt made on life tonight... in Ameti tomb.
- Two bullets in chest.
- Where is he?
Oh, wait, please.
He's still unconscious.
Dr. Jaipur is with him now in the guest room.
You had no right to expose Tom to such danger.
We looked to you for protection, which you haven't given us.
- I'll have to ask you to leave, Mr. Chan.
- That is already arranged.
- His Excellency is taking charge.
- Thank you.
Regret humble efforts have been unsuccessful.
Admitting failure like drinking bitter tea.
One last request.
Permission, please, to perform simple demonstration?
Thank you so much.
Sealed tube like this could contain enough gas to cause death?
That would depend upon the kind of gas used... also the amount inhaled by the victim.
At time of death,
Mr. Barry playing violin.
Observe hole through which murderer... insert tube of deadly gas into sound box.
All very interesting,
Mr. Chan.
But how could your murderer have broken the tube while Barry was playing?
Murderer very ingenious.
He knew scientific fact... that very thin glass vibrate to certain sound.
Will demonstrate.
While playing, Mr. Barry's face directly over sound vent.
Inhale deadly gas.
Die almost instantly.
You have established motive,
Mr. Chan?
Motive for murders of professor and son very clear.
Of course.
What is it?
Discover hidden room in tomb tonight... also clothing of Professor Arnold.
- Then he did find the Ameti treasure?
- Yes.
And someone else having same knowledge... kill professor to keep treasure for self.
Then when murderer believe... son Barry also know secret, kill him too.
Edfu Ahmad! That explains the ravings about the vengeance of Sekhmet.
Head mask of goddess also found.
Mask used by murderer to frighten intruders away from tomb.
When device fail, murderer resort... to more practical methods... bullets... as in case of Mr. Tom Evans tonight.
Did Mr. Evans see who fired the shots?
Bullet mark on flashlamp prove light focused on guilty man.
- Then I must talk to him at once.
- Excuse, please.
Must not disturb at present.
When conscious,
Mr. Evans will name murderer.
Case now in your hands,
Excellency.
Good-bye, gentlemen.
Thank you so much.
Well, Your Excellency?
It is really a very simple matter.
All we have to do now is to capture Edfu Ahmad... and have, uh, Mr. Evans identify him.
- Oh, Mr. Chan?
- Yes?
If I've been rude, I...
I owe you an apology.
I resented your attitude of suspicion.
I didn't realize how cleverly you were handling this matter.
Thank you so much.
You don't seem to realize you are dealing with a fanatic, a madman.
Edfu Ahmad must be captured dead or alive!
And send a troop of my men here to keep watch outside.
Yes, yes. Immediately.
Sorry to keep you waiting, Your Excellency.
These were in my room.
Thank you. Mm-hmm.
- Pardon me.
- Yes, Doctor?
- Is Dr. Racine still here?
- Why, I think you'll find him on the patio.
Then with your permission,
I shall leave the patient in his care.
How soon will I be able to talk with Mr. Evans, Doctor?
It may be some time before he recovers consciousness, Your Excellency.
Hmm. Then there's nothing to do but wait.
- Good evening, Dr. Racine.
- Good evening.
I trust you understand this emergency required immediate attention...
- and you were not available.
- Certainly.
I'm very glad that Mr. Evans was in such capable hands.
- Thank you, sir. Good night.
- Good night.
- Oh!
- Oh, I'm sorry I startled you.
One of my lancets is missing, and I thought perhaps Dr. Jaipur... might've borrowed it and left it here.
I'm sure I don't know.
Have you noticed any change?
He seems all right.
Oh, he must get well.
Would you mind opening the window a little, please?
Has Tom recovered consciousness?
Not yet.
He has a slight temperature... but that's to be expected.
Then if there's no immediate danger, you'd better get some rest, dear.
- But, Uncle John, I...
- Now, Carol, remember, you've been ill.
Come, let me get you something to make you sleep.
- I'm all right.
- Now, don't worry.
I'll let you know the moment there's any change.
I'll be back shortly.
One moment, please.
Do not move.
Place knife on table.
- Here are your police, Mr. Chang.
- Thank you so much.
- What has happened, Mr. Chan?
- And where did you find that lancet?
It was missing from my case.
Very clever thought... to insert lancet into bullet wound... to make silent only witness who could accuse you.
But what about Edfu Ahmad?
Entirely innocent.
Fanatic devotion to resting place of ancestors...
provide excellent shield for real murderer.
You kill Professor Arnold for Ameti treasure.
You drugged
Miss Carol's cigarettes... to discount anxiety over disappearance of father.
Later, when Mr. Barry appeared to have knowledge of treasure... kill him also to keep secret.
And tonight, shoot Mr. Evans when he recognize you in tomb.
Bullet which wound
Professor Arnold six months ago... and one which wound Mr. Evans tonight fired from same gun... your gun.
Take him away.
You have been very helpful,
Mr. Chan.
Thank you so much.
Most grateful for very able assistance.
It was terrible sitting here waiting... wondering how your plan would work out.
Courage greatest devotion to those we love.
Good-bye, Effendi Snowshoes.
Yes'm, but where you go from here?
Journey of life like feather on stream... must continue with current.
Yes. Sir?
I guess you right, but I'm goin' with you.
- Carol.
- Tom, darling!
That's enough, Charlie.
What'd he do that last mile in, Doc?
You didn't seen any jackrabbits pass him, did you?
Maybe we should've sent him to the Olympic Games instead of his son Lee.
- Yeah.
- If son Lee win 100-meter swimming race... chest expand two inches more.
Well, as long as it's your chest and not your waistline, it's all right.
Show him how you can touch the floor with your fingers, Charlie.
- [Strains]
- [Laughing] That's enough.
Well, you're all right until next year's physical examination, Charlie.
You won't be retired this year.
Hello. Who's going fishing?
Charlie. I'm lending him my tackle.
Do you know what this is?
Sure. That's a Waikiki spinner.
Say, that's a beauty, eh?
But he'll need a good heavy line with that.
What do you think he's going fishing for- whales? He needs a light silk line.
Oh, you're talking through your hat.
What-What line do you prefer, Charlie?
Oh, just piece of string with hook on one end, optimist on other.
[Laughs]
A good combination at that.
But honorable chief recommend latest scientific implement... to catch unwary fish.
Well, good luck to you.
But I know you'll get 'em... even if you have to bring 'em in with handcuffs.
Thank you so much, but this time "fish-hunt," not manhunt.
- [All Laughing]
- Well, good-bye, boys.
Good-bye.
Hey, Pop!
Oh, excuse me. I thought my pop was alone.
How do you do, Mr. Scott?
Well, son, what are you all steamed up about?
Junior son Charlie most anxious to start on fishing trip.
Yeah, and I bought a book on how to catch 'em- The Fisherman's Guide.
Good idea.
If don't catch fish... book provide excellent fish story.
Ah, we'll catch 'em all right.
Gee, that's swell tackle!
Look at it sparkle.
Good fisherman, like clever merchant, know lure of bright colors.
But suppose the fish are color-blind?
[Laughs]
Answer that, Charlie.
Well, in that case, perhaps guidebook give address of good fish market.
But anyone could tell a store fish... because it hasn't got the marks of a barbed hook in its mouth.
Fear number two son, like older brother Lee... develop symptoms of detective.
Ah, I can beat Lee at detecting right now.
- [Airplane Droning]
- Gee, look at that big new plane up there!
That's the Hopkins ship. They're making a test flight for the government... demonstrating a new way of handling a plane by remote radio control.
Oh, I know.
Like they do with battleships... so they can send them out to fight without any men on board.
Would be greatest blessing... if all war fought with machinery instead of human beings.
Hello. Hello.
3,000 altitude.
Shall I switch over to radio control?
No. Wait for instructions.
I believe, Colonel, if we keep the plane in sight of the field in the preliminary test... it'll be better for observation.
That's a good idea, Mr. Cartwright.
Unfortunately, Masters, my regular test pilot, injured his shoulder.
We had to substitute Edwards, and he's not so familiar with the robot.
What is the operating radius of the device, Mr. Hopkins?
That's undetermined.
In previous inventions... transmission of the radio control wave was affected by static.
But in Mr. Cartwright's device, we've successfully overcome that.
We can direct a plane over a charted course as long as the motors function.
Well, it sounds all right.
That's why I'm putting all my resources back of it, Commander. I believe in it.
I know what a powerful weapon it would be in the hands of an enemy.
- That's why I want our government to control it.
- Are you ready, Mr. Cartwright?
Ready. Hello? Hello,
Edwards. Switch over.
Okay.
She's on, sir.
The plane is now under radio control from the board here.
Have you any special test in mind, Colonel?
- Take her to 6,000 feet and bank while climbing.
- Yes, sir.
Look at that plane climb!
It's probably under radio control now.
Remarkable achievement of science- body perform work while brain detached.
I'm sure glad you can't go fishing by radio.
Huh? Gentle hint. Come on.
[Cartwright On Radio]
Hello? Hello, Edwards. How's she riding?
[Edwards]
Smooth as silk, Mr. Cartwright.
There's a strong wind drift from the south, but stabilization is perfect.
Why, Dick, what are you doing here?
I've been watching that plane because
I thought you were up there flying it.
No. I knocked my shoulder out this morning.
I didn't want to risk anything going wrong in the test, so I bowed out.
- But everything will go off all right, I guess.
- Well, I hope so.
Hello, Edwards.
Watch yourself. Power dive.
Okay, let her go.
That's good enough for me.
Pull her up.
Cartwright, she's heading out to sea.
Bring her back.
- She's out of my control!
- The plane isn't out of the pilot's control.
- Order Edwards to return!
- Hello, hello, Edwards!
Edwards! Hello!
The phone's dead.
He's deliberately making off with the plane.
Get out another ship and take after him.
[Phone Ringing]
Hello. This is Mr. Hughes.
Oh, Pan American Airways.
Yes, I'll use my reservation on tomorrow's Clipper for San Francisco.
Thank you.
Calling all United States and commercial craft in Hawaiian waters.
Watch for monoplane, number NC203R.
Report immediately any information to Pearl Harbor Naval Base.
News flash! No trace yet of the plane which vanished mysteriously 48 hours ago.
Were plane and pilot swallowed by the sea?
Or is their disappearance a part of a daring spy plot?
Government agencies are making every effort to solve the riddle...
and expect to have an answer at any moment.
- More later.
- Gee, Pop... they're having as hard a time finding that plane as we are catching fish.
Fish in sea like flea on dog- always present but difficult to catch.
Maybe we'll have better luck here.
I'll take a look around.
Hey, Pop, come here quick!
Hurry up!
Hurry up!
Right down there. Look.
[Chan]
"NC203R."
Undoubtedly the missing plane.
Run to nearest telephone and notify authorities.
Okay, Pop.
Get a shot over there.
Stand out of the way.
Hey, kids, get down from there.
Will you come in a minute, gentlemen?
There's our answer- deliberate theft.
The ordinary mechanism is intact... but the most important part of the device is missing.
And so is the pilot.
Yes, with an invention any foreign power would pay millions to get.
Instrument could be duplicated without aid of original plan?
Easily- by taking it apart and copying it.
Edwards knew that.
That's why he stole it.
Well, he certainly took a long chance setting the plane down on the edge of the water.
Oh, no, he didn't. Tell him what you found in my fisherman's guidebook, Pop.
Fisherman's guidebook show lowest tide of season... was Tuesday at 11:00 a.m.
Halfhour earlier same day, plane disappear from Honolulu.
With tide out, hard sand beach... make excellent landing field.
But unless there was an accident in landing, how do you account for the fire?
Evidence that device was carefully removed... prove fire started later.
Pilot Edwards wear flying suit while testing plane?
[Hopkins]
No, just flannel shirt and trousers.
Here, Pop!
Tell him about this zipper we found.
Long zipper of type used on flying suit... suggest that plane have other passenger besides test pilot Edwards.
That's impossible. The plane was inspected before it left the field.
No one besides Edwards could've been aboard.
I'm no detective, but it's apparent to me... the pilot stole the device and tried to burn the plane to cover the theft.
He's right.
The man we want is Edwards.
In nearby lagoon have already located murdered body... of unfortunate pilot Edwards.
Gee, Pop, you never told me that!
The idea is ridiculous. No one could possibly have hidden aboard the plane.
I inspected it myself just before it took off.
There you are, Charlie.
- How soon before, please?
- Not more than five minutes.
- Any workmen in vicinity?
- A few.
Possible, then, for man to hide in plane after inspection?
Yes, it would be.
But I'll soon find out.
I'll check every man that was on the field at the time.
- Would you like to question them yourself, Mr. Chan?
- Not necessary.
May examine time cards, please?
Certainly.
I'm at a loss to understand this.
All our mechanics are brought here from the
Mainland. They're old and trusted employees.
Were they all here on the morning of the test?
[Hopkins] No, only the ground crew.
The installation was complete...
and I gave the shop force the day off.
Most strange.
- What is it, Charlie?
- Note.
Stamp of Monday night on time cards, light ink.
But stamp ofTuesday morning in heavy ink.
Well, there's nothing strange about that.
The timekeeper must've changed the ribbon.
Quite correct. But notice peculiar circumstance.
Here is card of one man who finish work on Monday night... yet stamped with heavy ink ofTuesday.
So it is. That proves this fellow stamped his card Tuesday, or somebody did it for him.
Also could establish alibi for man who remain on field Monday night... to conceal self in test plane.
- Whose card is that?
- Name: Miller.
Address: Tropic Hotel.
You're sure Miller didn't sleep here Monday night?
I know he didn't.
But he was here Tuesday... and that's the last
I've heard from him.
Disturb nothing, please.
Mr. Miller have lady visitor Tuesday evening?
I should say not! I don't stand for carrying-on in my house.
Very commendable precaution.
But observe.
Hairs from white fox fur... indicate fashionable lady visitor sit here... while talking with someone opposite.
Well, no woman came in here without me knowing it.
Evident bird of fine plumage escape sharp eye of eagle.
You say you saw Miller on Tuesday night?
Didn't say I saw him, but I know he was in.
I put a telephone call through for him to the Royal Hawaiian Hotel about 8:00.
- Who was call to?
- I don't listen in on my guests' telephone conversations.
Unfortunate not to break rule on this occasion.
Anyone connected with the aviation company live at the Royal Hawaiian?
I do, Cartwright does, and so does Masters.
Masters? Isn't that the pilot who was supposed to fly the test?
Yes.
Presence of wine glasses... suggest hospitality offered to lady of white fox fur.
But not used.
And no wine visible.
I don't allow drinking either.
Excellent reason to conceal forbidden fruit.
Perhaps in closet.
- [Screams]
- Miller!
Unfortunately dead.
And that telephone call to the Royal Hawaiian... involves either Hopkins,
Cartwright or Masters.
What about the gal- the one with the white fox fur?
One more crack, and very bright junior son walk home.
Excuse me, Pop.
Well, whoever murdered Miller stole the invention to peddle to some foreign government.
Quite correct. But Honolulu make very poor market.
We'll check every ship that's put out of here since 8:00 Tuesday night.
Perhaps murderer make more speedy exit- use flying ship to reach Mainland.
The Clipper left here
Wednesday at 2:00... the day after the device was stolen.
- Pan American office.
- Okay, Chief.
Here's the passenger list.
Richard Masters!
- Is that the Masters connected with Hopkins Aviation Company?
- Yes, it is.
Recall if Mr. Masters arrive at dock alone?
No, he came in our car from the Royal Hawaiian Hotel with a lady.
Notice only one lady on passenger list-
Miss Yvonne Roland.
- Wear white fox fur?
- Yes, she did.
Police headquarters. It may not be too late to check on them at the other end.
Hello. Chief Scott speaking.
Contact San Francisco Police...
and ask for a tracer on Richard Masters and Yvonne Roland.
Arrived on yesterday's Clipper.
Hey, Pop! White fox fur.
Now positively walk home.
There's nothing suspicious about Masters leaving on the Clipper.
He's a member of the American Olympic team.
He had to fly back in time to make his boat from New York to Germany.
Well, that seems to alibi Masters.
Then the call Miller made to the
Royal Hawaiian at 8:00 Tuesday night... must have been to the woman.
- But 8:00 Tuesday night Miller called me.
- What about?
His return ticket to Los Angeles.
Our workmen are leaving tomorrow. I asked
Mr. Hopkins to send the ticket to his hotel.
Quite correct. Found same in Mr. Miller's mailbox.
Here. Look at this passenger list.
See if you recognize any of these names.
Yes, here's one. Now I know who's guilty of these crimes.
- Who?
- Arthur Hughes.
He's a notorious filibuster who's made a fortune selling arms... to revolutionists in every part of the world.
From the time I had Cartwright's invention, he's been after me to sell it.
If I'd known he'd followed me to Honolulu...
I'd have suspected him at once.
Charlie, see if you can get any information on this fellow Hughes.
Have already investigated all passengers on Clipper.
For past two weeks, Mr. Hughes guest at Royal Hawaiian Hotel.
[Chief]
That's funny, Mr. Hopkins.
You both have been at the same hotel, yet you didn't know he was in Honolulu.
- Whether you believe it or not, I didn't.
- Excuse, please.
Truth, like football, receive many kicks before reaching goal.
Wouldn't it be advisable to trace Hughes immediately?
That's up to Mr. Scott.
We're leaving on tomorrow's Clipper... and I'll put the matter in the hands of the San Francisco Police.
Coming, Cartwright?
Thank you, gentlemen, for the help you've given us.
I'm not so sure the guilty man isn't walking out right now.
His story about Hughes was altogether too pat.
K.G.P.D. Coming in.
- Hello?
- San Francisco on the air, Chief.
Send it through.
[Man On Speaker]
San Francisco Police... reporting tracer on Richard Masters and Yvonne Roland.
Both left Oakland Airport
9:30 Thursday morning... on transcontinental plane for New York.
Regarding later request on Arthur Hughes... this passenger removed to emergency hospital under influence of powerful drug.
Recovered sufficiently to leave hospital in two hours.
Destination as yet unknown.
That is all.
How did that Hughes information happen to come through?
Took liberty of requesting same.
[Man On Intercom]
Yes, sir?
Contact New York for follow-up on Masters and the Roland woman. Get a tracer on Hughes.
Mr. Hughes now become mysterious needle in hay pile.
Honolulu calling
San Francisco Police.
A follow-up on that Clipper tracer-
Mr. Scott, did you get anything on-
Lady of white fox fur?
That is purpose of visit?
No, sir. I brought you down a pot of tea and some sandwiches.
Oh.
Consideration for paternal stomach most unusual.
Yeah. You know, I've been thinking it over, and I've got a theory.
Oh, you have theory?
Suggest you go home, sleep on same.
Meanwhile advise honorable mother... am waiting for important message from New York.
Okay, Pop.
But I'll bet it's the gal with the white fox fur.
[Both Laughing]
Yes? Here comes the dope on that Honolulu tracer.
Get ready to pass it on to San Francisco.
Yes? They're on the steamship Manhattan.
Your work must be intensely interesting.
You know, shortwave radios always fascinated me.
- Oh, really?
- We get excellent reception in Honolulu.
Oh, I pick up the Islands on the shortwave sometimes.
Well, I wonder-
But you're so busy.
Oh, no, not at all. In fact-
Well, l-I mean, not right now anyway.
Come on in, and I'll see if I can get something for you.
- Two minutes of 9:00.
- [Intercom Buzzes]
[Man]
San Francisco coming in.
San Francisco Police reporting tracer from New York on Masters and Roland.
Here's something now.
San Francisco Police talking to Honolulu.
[Man] Both sailed on steamship
Manhattan for Berlin.
Boat left New York 11:00 tonight.
Regarding other inquiry-Arthur Hughes had reservation on same vessel but missed sailing.
Followed in tug to Sandy Hook and boarded ship there.
That is all.
Oh, that was marvelous. Just as clear as we get it at home. Thank you.
Oh, that's all right, Miss Roland.
It's a pleasure.
- Ah, you're so nice. Good night.
- Good night.
Come in again.
Hughes, Yvonne Roland and Masters-
all on the steamship Manhattan.
Say, that's the boat your son Lee's on... the one that's taking the American Olympic team to Berlin.
The same. Berlin now attract many foreign visitors.
Offer excellent opportunity for spies of all countries to operate without suspicion.
That's the very place the thief could easily dispose of the robot.
Charlie, Lee is going to meet his pop in Berlin.
Well, aren't you surprised?
Suspected same.
Have already sent note in tea basket... for honorable wife to pack traveling bag.
Well, they've got a big start on you.
Their boat docks in Hamburg in seven days.
Race not always won by man who start first.
Please.
Will leave tomorrow in company with Hopkins and Cartwright on Clipper.
Honolulu-
18 hours to Mainland.
Then transcontinental plane from San Francisco.
Thirteen hours across country to New York.
Take Zeppelin Hindenberg from Lakehurst, New Jersey... across Atlantic Ocean to Friedrichshafen, 61 hours.
It's fortunate we haven't been delayed.
We'll be on the dock in Hamburg when the Manhattan arrives.
I still think we should have radioed the steamship to have their baggage searched.
Good hunter never warn tiger of trap.
Oh, observe below- steamship Manhattan.
- Boy, is that some sausage!
- Say, that thing really travels fast too!
- How many people does it carry?
- How should I know?
Gee, would I like a ride in that!
[Woman]
Why didn't they send us over in it?
There's no second class on an airship.
- [All Laughing]
- Oh, excuse me, Betty.
- Oh, that's all right, Lee.
- As my pop would say...
"Man who stretch neck looking up very apt to break neck falling down."
- Have you seen Dick Masters?
- Well, l- Oh, he must be somewhere around.
Now, don't try to cover up. I know.
He's with Miss Roland, isn't he?
Now, Betty, don't you worry about that.
Oh, I'm not.
Don't think I'm jealous.
Only... I'd like to throw that slinky brunette overboard.
I wouldn't have said anything if you hadn't mentioned it, Betty... but I've got a theory about that woman.
She's an adventuress.
- What?
- Shh. Come over here.
You know, I'm a pretty good detective, and I observe things.
Well, there's another fellow on the boat watches everything she does... especially when she's with Dick.
- What for?
- Well, I have a theory on that too.
As my pop would say, "When a woman play with fire, man get burned."
Or something like that.
[Laughing]
Well, what are you two conspiring about?
Oh, hello, Dick.
Fancy meeting you here.
- Hadn't you noticed I was on the boat?
- Occasionally.
I suppose I have been monopolizing Dick's company... but I am so interested in all you athletes.
Radiogram for you, Miss Roland.
Oh, thank you.
Will you excuse me?
Would you mind posing for a photo, Mr. Masters?
I am so interested in all you big athletes.
- Aw!
- [Squeals]
- [Groaning]
- Oh, that's swell. Hold it.
- Say, let me carry that for you.
- Go on!
Say, Betty, how's chances taking our picture?
Come on, gang.
Let's all get in on it.
[Man] Hey, Charlie. Come on, Francis.
You want your picture taken?
[Chattering Continues]
[Laughing]
Oh, let me have a picture of all of you.
- Really, I'd rather-
- Oh, please. I'd love to have one. Go on.
[Man]
Get off of my leg. Come on, guys.
Come on, Betty.
[Squeals]
Back a little further, please.
I'll fix it for you. How's that?
[Chattering Continues]
I'll be right back.
So sorry.
[Speaking Chinese]
- Thanks, Betty.
- I'll have the films developed for you this afternoon.
- Oh, never mind. I'll do it.
- But I want some extra prints.
It'll be no trouble, really.
I'll see you later, Dick.
Well, we'd better clean up for lunch.
Am I having lunch with you and Miss Roland?
- No, you're lunching with me alone, you pest.
- Oh!
Meet you in five minutes.
Psst. Betty.
I was right.
She is an adventuress.
She has a husband.
Look.
Where did you get this?
That fellow Hughes swiped it out of her book, and I got it from him.
I'll bet he's her husband's private detective getting evidence for a divorce.
If she gets Dick in trouble,
I'll tear her apart.
- I think I'll do it right now.
- Wait a minute, Betty.
As my pop would say, "Sugar catch more flies than hamburger steak."
[Laughs]
Or something like that.
But you stick with them. Don't leave
Dick alone with her for a second.
That Roland gal is going to think
I'm her Siamese twin.
- And leave everything else to me.
- Right.
Most excellent view of stadium for Olympic Games.
Very interesting. But I'm more concerned with the business that brought us here.
Useless to sprinkle salt on tail of time.
Must wait until
Manhattan dock tomorrow.
[Steam Whistle Blowing]
We received your radio at sea last night, Inspector Strasser.
No one has yet gone ashore.
The three passengers you mentioned have been carefully watched.
- Has any baggage been taken ashore?
- Nothing yet, sir.
Mr. Cartwright is standing by in Customs to identify the device.
Exactly. You see, Mr. Chan,
German methods are very thorough.
Have greatest admiration for well-known efficiency.
Suggest we interview
Miss Roland immediately.
Yes, sir.
- Miss Roland in her room?
- Yes, sir.
[Knocking]
[Knocking]
Recommend use of key.
It looks as though the Roland woman met the same fate as Miller.
It is forbidden to touch anything.
Shut the door.
When was lady last seen?
When she came from the deck to her stateroom shortly before midnight.
The steward has been on guard ever since.
- Anyone visit room?
- No, sir.
No one has come in or out since I've been on duty.
Then someone was waiting here when she entered.
- Did you hear any unusual noise?
- No, sir.
Then he must have made very short work of her.
And this is probably the weapon he used.
The dent was caused by a heavy blow.
And that clock establishes the time when the crime was committed- at precisely 17 minutes after 12:00.
Excuse me, sir. I was near the door then, and I didn't hear anything.
You were probably asleep.
That's enough. You can go.
- May examine, please?
- Certainly.
What was the location of the ship at 17 minutes after 12:00?
About 20 miles off the mouth of the Elbe River.
We were proceeding slowly in a heavy fog.
Exactly. Conditions were perfect for the murderer to dispose of the body.
You see?
The porthole is still open.
He then searched the room, found the stolen object... and escaped without detection.
- A perfect reconstruction, Inspector Strasser.
- [Clicks Heels]
- Exactly.
- [Knocking]
Oh, I beg your pardon.
- I thought this was Miss Roland's cabin.
- Hughes!
Well, this is a surprise.
I never expected to meet you here, Hopkins.
There's the man we want.
The woman was his accomplice.
When he thought they had the device safely in Germany, he murdered her as he did Miller.
That's a very neat plot. It suggests an author's perfect knowledge of events.
When were you in this stateroom last?
I'm sorry, but I've never enjoyed the privilege of Miss Roland's intimate company.
Then explain, please, importance of recovering cigarette lighter from table.
Oh, I did that rather awkwardly, didn't I?
But I'm sure I can explain it.
I was on deck last night with Miss Roland.
I offered my lighter for her cigarette.
She failed to return it.
- I dropped in to pick it up.
- Well, you must think we're all fools.
I'm not acquainted with the other gentlemen.
I demand his arrest!
Pardon, please.
No occasion for arrest.
What do you mean?
Sorry to explode theory of brother officer... but no evidence of murder here.
One moment, please.
Observe.
Dent in water carafe... fit round knob on post of bed... so.
Note, please, varnish chipped on same.
Exactly!
Also took liberty to examine fingerprints on neck of bottle.
Match lady's fingerprint on glass top of dresser perfectly.
Mr. Chan, this is extraordinary.
But I have the solution.
The woman arranged all this herself... so she could get ashore with the stolen device and escape pursuit.
Congratulations, Herr Inspector.
We'll have her in custody in 24 hours.
Well, since you have no further need for me, I'll-
No, you don't. I want this fellow's baggage searched.
You're overplaying your hand,
Hopkins.
- But if the police wish it, I shan't object.
- Exactly.
And I'll arrange for the release of the other passengers and baggage.
Can join you on dock later?
Hello.
Pop! Gee!
What are you doing here?
Please explain first most unceremonious entrance.
I was going to make an investigation here.
I came over the rail so no one could see me.
- Still playing tricks of detective?
- Yeah, I'm hot on a case.
The woman who has this cabin is an adventuress, and she's got a husband... and he's got a private detective named Hughes on this boat watching her.
Now she's trying to hook Dick Masters.
And Betty- that's Dick's sweetheart- is all upset about it.
I said I'd straighten it out.
Suspect recent activities of swimming caused water on brain.
No, sirree. I tell you, this is the real thing.
There isn't a murder yet, but I'm sure glad you're here.
You can help me. Take a look at this radiogram her husband sent her.
Hey, what's happened here?
Object of hot case make mysterious disappearance.
Don't worry, Pop.
With you helping me, I'll find her.
Look! Here's a swell clue!
Her white fox fur!
Have heard enough of white fox fur.
Gee, Pop, why didn't you radio me what was going on?
- I could've had the case closed by the time you got here.
- Modesty most commendable.
Well, you and I could've handled it better than that foreign cop.
All Strasser is doing is sitting back there and getting Hopkins's and Cartwright's life story.
- At least we got a clue.
- White fox fur?
No. That radiogram.
Only thing I can't figure out is where the husband fits in.
Suspect husband, like toupee on bald head... used for cover-up.
Message really very simple. Observe.
Read every fourth word.
"Your followed.
Boat waiting. Cuxhaven. "
Cuxhaven! That must be where she went overboard... and her pals had a boat waiting to pick her up.
And she got away with the invention.
Most improbable lady would risk injury to delicate device... by bath in salt water.
But what could she do with it?
Perhaps accomplice smuggle same ashore.
Well, it wasn't Dick Masters, because
Strasser searched everything he had.
Lady have contact with other athletes?
No. Only Betty Adams, and-
Say, I got it!
She borrowed Betty's camera, and she didn't give it back till last night.
Maybe she hid it in there and Betty carried it ashore.
- Possible.
- But Betty's on a special train ahead of us.
Say, Pop, we gotta do something.
- If Betty has it, those crooks'll be after her.
- [Knocking]
Come in, please.
Excuse me, Mr. Chan.
I dropped in to thank you... for helping me out of that situation this morning.
Very happy to be of service.
But situation in your favor that time.
That's fair enough.
- Sit down, please.
- Thank you.
I'd like to repay you by giving you a tip.
You'll be much safer if you spend your time in Berlin enjoying the Olympic Games.
All play and no work make Charlie Chan very dull policeman.
I wonder if you've been smart enough to figure out who killed Miller.
Perhaps you... have answer.
I think in the final showdown, you'll ask Mr. Hopkins.
Well, I must be going.
[Gunshot]
I got him, Pop! Help me!
Please to release too active number one son.
Well, you must pardon my rough tactics... but I saw a rifle barrel in the car driving on the road beside us.
Now humble turn of Charlie Chan to be grateful.
Thank you so much.
When we meet again, we'll start even?
- [Door Closes]
- Say, that guy's too smart.
He timed the shot almost to a second.
But I'm awfully glad he pushed you out of the way of that bullet.
Humble parent seem to have fortunate fate of cat with nine lives.
I just want you to keep the one you have now.
And I'm sticking with you to see that nothing happens.
Correction, please. Will personally deliver you to Uncle Sam at Olympic Village.
- But, Pop-
- Also have desire to interview
Miss Betty Adams... to learn if she used camera for picture-taking this morning.
Gee, that's right. If she did, she discovered the invention in there.
Now reveal intelligent mind of good detective.
Thanks, Pop. We sure make a swell team, don't we?
Hmm.
[Crowd Cheering]
[Excited Chattering]
So this is Berlin.
- I've never seen so many bicycles in my life!
- Shucks, what a reception!
Hey, someone swiped my camera!
- How do you say stop in German?
- Hey, "stoppa" the bus!
- Arrestez-vous!
- Halta la machina!
- It's empty.
- I should've known better.
Gosh, I wanted that camera to get some pictures of the Games.
Gee, this isn't so bad.
I think I'll take that bed by the window.
Say, I wonder how you ask for a shampoo and a finger wave in German.
[Laughs] I wonder how you ask for something to eat.
It would be better if you girls would see the head matron now... to arrange for your seats in the dining hall.
That's me. I'm starved.
- I could eat a 16-pound shot.
- Well, come on.
- Let's all sit together.
- I wonder where that sauerkraut emporium is.
[Door Opening]
[Chan]
One moment, please.
May examine contents of basket?
It is nothing.
The girl athletes are forbidden candy.
I have taken it to report to the matron.
Would be most happy to save you trouble.
Hand it over!
Will identify, please.
- That's it!
- At last!
And it hasn't been tampered with.
It's been a long trail, Mr. Chan.
Last step ease toil of most difficult journey.
I'll take it.
Recommend immediate delivery to American Consul.
Life in danger while device in your possession.
Well, that's a chance
I'll have to take.
My responsibility's greater now than at home. I'll take charge of it.
- Come away from that window!
- [Maid] Look out! The police are here!
Who was in that car?
Take her away.
We'll find out who her accomplices are.
[Cartwright]
I should think that's obvious.
The Roland woman was associated with Masters, and the device was in his sweetheart's luggage.
[Hopkins] I'll report this to the American
Olympic Committee at once!
- [Strasser] Do you know this Masters?
- Certainly. He worked for me.
Mr. Chan?
Your son Lee told me you were here searching my luggage for some stolen invention.
Yes, and we found it.
- What?
- Excuse, please.
Miss Roland visit your room last night on boat to return camera?
Yes, she did. I was packing, and she insisted on helping me.
I suppose she hid the robot in your baggage without your knowing anything about it.
If that's where you found it, she must have.
You needn't look at me like that. I'm telling the truth.
I think you're trying to protect Masters.
The authorities will settle that.
You won't need the authorities.
Dick'll settle it himself.
Perhaps we've been a little hasty.
Hasty accusation like long shot on horse race.
Odds good, but chances doubtful.
Very obvious now why
Miss Roland borrow camera- give her excuse to visit stateroom... and conceal candy box with device in Miss Betty's luggage.
She certainly knew what she was doing.
The customs officials hardly looked at the luggage of the Olympic athletes.
When I get that matron down to headquarters, she'll tell where the Roland woman is.
Very commendable, but must not forget immediate danger.
Power behind Miss Roland will lose no time in attempt to regain most valuable robot.
Exactly.
And while you remain in Berlin, I'll see to your police protection, Mr. Hopkins.
- Excellent idea, Inspector.
- All right, gentlemen.
I'll drive you to your hotel.
Excuse, please.
Prefer to remain at Olympic Village... for visit with son Lee.
- May use telephone, please?
- Certainly.
- Thank you so much.
- [Clicks Heels]
[Door Closes]
Sure. Mr. Romeo, lady-killer. Just because that banjo-eyed brunette looks at you...
- you go for her like you're trying to break a world record.
- Forget it, will ya, Betty?
How did I know what was going on?
I only tried to be nice.
You were. You couldn't have been any sweeter if you'd given her a hacksaw to get out of jail.
And if Hopkins goes on making cracks, that's just where we'll be.
Well, I told you
I'd take care of all that.
- Then you'd better hurry up and see the police about it.
- All right. I will.
- But first I'm gonna settle with Hopkins.
- Dick! Dick, come back!
- Oh, ya big mug!
- What's the matter?
Oh, that poor goof. I told him what Hopkins said, and now he's going to knock his block off.
- That's swell! And he can do it.
- Oh, shut up.
I didn't mean that, Lee.
But don't you see?
If Dick gets into trouble, they'll suspend him from the team.
Gee, that's right. And as my pop would say,
"Don't rub sore finger with sandpaper."
- Oh, we have to stop him!
- We will, if I have to sock Hopkins myself.
Come on!
Might have been safer to leave the device in the hotel vault overnight.
I'm not trusting anybody.
If I'd know when I invented the mechanism... that it was gonna turn into a Frankenstein,
I'd have destroyed it.
Well, it's over now. We'll be safely on our way back to America in 24 hours.
I hope so. Well, I'll go wash up for dinner.
[Door Closes]
- Don't do it, Hopkins.
- What do you want?
Guess.
[Engine Stops]
- Is that their room on the second floor?
- Yes. He should be there now.
Keep your eye on that window. Be ready to make a fast getaway when he comes out.
I'll be in the lobby.
- Mr. Chan, I want your advice.
- Yes?
I heard an argument in Mr. Hopkins's room, and I was about to go in... when Mr. Hopkins himself let a man out.
- Who, please?
- That's it- I don't know.
Nobody has entered since I've been here, and
I arrived with Mr. Hopkins and Mr. Cartwright.
Most mysterious.
Perhaps wise to investigate.
[Gunshot]
Assistance, please.
[Batters On Door]
It was Hopkins. He escaped through the window. He's got my invention!
- Notify Inspector Strasser immediately.
- Yes, sir.
[Cartwright]
I hadjust left Hopkins alone...
so when I heard voices in here, I hurried in.
Hughes was accusing Hopkins of deliberately double-crossing his stockholders... by stealing my invention to sell it to a foreign government.
One moment.
Will corroborate?
- That's quite true.
- Continue, please.
They quieted down after I came in, but Hughes...
threatened to expose Hopkins ifhe didn't cut him in.
After Hughes left,
I asked Hopkins for an explanation.
He ignored me, went over to the desk and started to pack the device in a handbag.
I tried to stop him, and he drew a gun.
I grabbed for it. He tried to shoot me.
In the struggle I was hit on the head.
[Officer]
You can't go in there. It's forbidden!
Forbidden, my eye! I'm workin' on this case. I'm Chan and Son.
- Hello, Pop. I got some valuable information.
- Go ahead.
As Betty and I drove up, we saw a man drop out of that window into the garden.
Two guys helped him.
They started for a car. I went after them.
One of the guys slugged me.
They got away.
That settles it. Hopkins will be apprehended immediately.
In Berlin, things like this cannot happen.
No. By this time he's probably disposed of the device and is on his way out of town.
What's your connection with the Cartwright invention?
I tried to buy it from Hopkins, but he wouldn't do business.
Then when it was stolen in Honolulu...
I figured that Yvonne Roland had it, so I followed her.
But flying into San Francisco, she outsmarted me.
I caught up with her again on the Manhattan, but I didn't get anywhere.
She stuck too close to her friend Masters.
Wait a minute.
Look here, Mr. Chan.
I didn't have anything to do with this.
That's why I came here tonight- to make Hopkins take back what he said about Betty and me.
I suppose the reason you didn't come up here right away was... because you had a date in the lobby with Yvonne Roland.
- Yvonne Roland? In this hotel?
- Dick, is that true?
- Well, l-
- Oh!
- Hey, Betty.
- Wait! Give explanations to the police.
All right. I did see her, but I didn't have any date with her.
Just as I came in she was standing in the lobby. I started after her.
I wanted her to face Hopkins to help clear me.
Well, she ducked into the florist's shop,
I followed, but she got away.
Then I came up here. And now I'll take care of you for making that crack in front of Betty.
[Whistle Tweeting]
- Take them out of here.
- [Dick Straining]
[Officer]
Get out. Get- Get out of here.
- Mr. Chan, I apologize. It's impossible.
- [Door Closes]
- Things like this cannot happen in Berlin.
- [Clicks Heels]
[No Audible Dialogue]
- You were successful?
- Yes, Your Excellency.
- I received it directly from his hands.
- Very good.
Examine it, Carlos.
I hope you have the draft for the price agreed upon, Your Excellency.
You will receive it as soon as the transaction is completed- before I leave Germany.
Yvonne! What is this?
He's double-crossed you.
"Compliments of the Olympic Committee." Very clever.
The book must have been substituted at the sports forum.
There's only one person clever enough to have done that: Chan, the detective.
Our game is with the Oriental now.
[Lee]
But when did you get it, Pop?
Took opportunity to acquire same during excitement in girls' dormitory.
Then no wonder you weren't worried when Hopkins got away.
Important lesson for good detective:
When all players hold suspicious cards, good idea to have joker up sleeve.
[Laughs] Well, we got that cleaned up, Pop.
Now all we have to do is land the guy...
that killed Miller and round up this gang of spies.
[Knocking Continues]
Letter, Mr. Chan.
- [Coin Clinks]
- Thank you so much.
Thank you.
What it is, Pop?
Envelope, like skin of banana, must be removed to digest contents.
Ticket to Olympic Games and letter.
Gee! Box 22.
That's where all the big shots will sit.
Letter apparently from big noise also.
"His Excellency, the Honorable Charles Zaraka...
"requests the pleasure of Mr. Chan's company... at the opening of the Olympic Games."
Zaraka?
You've never met him.
I have never met Santa Claus either, yet accept gift from same.
[Marching Band.
Fanfare, Up-tempo March]
[Crowd Applauding]
[Applauding Continues]
[March Continues In Distance]
Mr. Chan?
We haven't met, but I'm sure you've heard of me. Yvonne Roland.
Had looked forward to making acquaintance before leaving Berlin.
- This is His Excellency, the Honorable Charles Zaraka.
- A very great pleasure, Mr. Chan.
This is most unexpected compliment to humble policeman.
Are you sure that fellow knows his stuff?
He's the best in Berlin.
He'll read every move of their lips.
All right. They're in Box 22.
[Applauding Continues]
[No Audible Dialogue]
[March Continues]
A most illuminating spectacle,
Mr. Chan-
the nations of the world about to struggle for supremacy on the field of sports.
Yet behind all this there is another struggle going on constantly... for world supremacy in a more sinister field.
It's not a game for amateurs, Mr. Chan.
I hope you get my meaning.
Could not be more clear if magnified by 200-inch telescope.
Then wouldn't it be advisable for you to turn over the Cartwright invention to us...
and return to your own little game in Honolulu?
Perhaps... but player sometime disregard even most expert coaching... from sidelines.
- You have the afternoon to consider it.
- Thank you so much.
That's all I wanted to know.
Stick around. Enjoy yourself.
She's even got the nerve to sit in a box. Why don't we go in and make the cops arrest her?
Well, that's a box reserved for the foreign diplomatic corps. The police can't butt in there.
As long as she's with that big shot, she's protected by his diplomatic immunity.
Oh, you'd find some reason to stall out of it.
All right.
Have it your way then.
Aw, Betty, you shouldn't be like that.
A fella doesn't wanna be put on the spot by his girl all the time.
[Applauding In Distance]
- He's right over there by that center arch.
- Thanks.
Mr. Lee Chan?
I have a message for your father.
He's on the south side of the stadium in a box.
- Will you take me to him, please?
- Sure. Now you fix things up with Dick.
I'll see ya later.
Let's go, my man.
Drive us around the south entrance.
- Okay.
- No. Let's walk. It's quicker.
- Dick! Dick!
- [Car Door Slams]
- Get going!
- [Engine Starts]
Dick!
Mr. Chan, the ceremonies are almost over.
What is your answer?
Only one possible for... amateur.
Device will be returned to United States War Department.
- Thank you so much for a very enjoyable afternoon.
- It was a pleasure.
- Here.
- Let me go, you idiot!
Mr. Chan,
Lee has been kidnapped.
Lee?
You have our deepest sympathy, Mr. Chan.
If we can be of service, please call on us.
- [Knocks]
- Come in, please.
There is no news yet.
If the boy is in Berlin, we'll find him.
A dragnet is closing in on every known criminal hideout.
Don't give up hope.
Ancient Chinese philosopher say...
"Hope is sunshine which illuminate darkest path."
[Glass Breaks]
"If you wish news of your son...
"be in your same seat in the Olympic stadium tomorrow... alone and unguarded."
Eleven more hours of anxious waiting.
Don't fear, Mr. Chan.
Tomorrow they'll walk into a trap.
- The police will be there and make short work of them.
- No. Instructions very explicit.
Must walk path... alone.
[Announcer] 1,500-meter title won by Lovelock, New Zealand.
The time. Three minutes,
47 and 8/10 seconds.
- A new Olympic and world's record.
- Oh, the relay's going to start.
This is gonna be a new record sure.
[Pistol Fires]
- Come on, Jesse. Open up that lead!
- Come on. Take 'em!
Pick 'em up, big boy!
Pick 'em up and lay 'em down!
- [Woman] Let's go! Wykoff!
- [Woman #2] Come on, Metcalfe!
- [Man Shouts In Foreign Language]
- [Woman] Come on, Ralph!
- [Man] Look at that boy go!
- [Man #2 Shouts In Foreign Language]
- [Woman] Open up that lead, Franklin!
- [Woman] Come on, Franklin!
[All Cheering, Shouting, Indistinct]
[Man Shouts In Foreign Language]
[Women]
Come on, Frankie!
[Man] Look at that Wykoff go!
Break that record!
- [Woman] Come on, Wykoff! Come on, Wykoff!
- [Men, Women Continue Cheering]
[Announcer] 100-meter relay title won by the United States.
Time.39 and 8/10 seconds.
A new Olympic and world's record.
- Are all the men at their posts?
- Yes, Inspector.
- Every exit in this part of the stadium is covered.
- Good.
- There goes Dick. He'll take 'em in the pole vault.
- You've got that all set, huh?
Well, if he doesn't,
I'll break his neck.
[Announcer] Masters of the United States has just cleared...
- 14 feet and two inches on his second try.
- He did 14 feet and two inches.
Oh, Dick can do better than that.
- [All Chattering]
- Way to go, old fella.
Message for gentleman in Box 22.
[Announcer] The bar for the pole vault has just been raised to 14 feet, three inches.
[Cartwright] It's rather an extraordinary request, Mr. Chan.
I don't know how to answer you. I didn't even know you had the device in your possession.
- Very well, you know it now.
- I don't feel I have anything to say about its disposal.
I signed my rights over to Mr. Hopkins and retained only a small interest.
Hopkins is a fugitive from justice.
But if I have your authority to use the device... we can deal with these criminals.
- Are you willing to put it back in their hands, Mr. Chan?
- Cannot answer as officer.
Must speak as very humble father.
- If there's no other way, of course you have my permission.
- Good.
Please accept gratitude of most anxious parent.
Besides, Mr. Cartwright, when the boy is returned safely... we will go after the criminals and get it back.
One more request, please.
This time must insist on acting alone.
Any effort to help might result in serious consequence.
You have our word, Mr. Chan.
We will wait for a message from you.
Hmm.
Good-bye.
And as a further precaution for your safety, Mr. Cartwright... you will remain with me.
He's here.
Checkmate.
How do you do, Mr. Chan?
I'm glad you followed instructions this time and didn't depend on the police.
Wise philosopher once say...
"Only foolish man will not acknowledge defeat."
- I'm sure he was Chinese to have been so clever.
- Thank you so much.
Am ready to complete transaction.
- May now see number one son?
- In just a moment.
There's one more, uh, formality.
- Ask Mr. Hopkins to come in.
- Yes, sir.
You may put the device on the desk, Mr. Chan.
That's it- Chan's signal.
His transmitter's working.
What does your direction finder say?
North by northeast, two points east.
Calling B.P. 41.
Calling B.P. 41. Calling B.P. 41.
Coming in.
Car 37 picked it up.
- "North by northeast."
- North by northeast.
- "Two points east."
- Two points east.
Contact all cars in Areas "D" and "F" for check on direction.
Calling all cars, Areas "D" and "F."
Pardon our caution, Mr. Chan... but Mr. Hopkins will have to identify the mechanism... just to be sure there hasn't been another, uh, mistake.
Yes. This is the Cartwright invention.
Thank you, Mr. Hopkins. That's all.
And now my son, please?
- Bring the boy in.
- Yes, sir.
Car 46 reporting second triangulation point.
- "West by southwest."
- West by southwest.
- "Six points south."
- Six points south.
Car 49 reporting third point.
- "South by southeast."
- South by southeast.
- "One point south."
- One point south.
Notify all cars to converge on Area "D," Block 21.
That definitely sets your location.
Your plans worked perfectly.
Exactly. Soon we will be there, and you will have your device back.
- Calling all cars.
- All right, Sergeant. Go ahead.
I'm sorry I got you into this, Pop.
Danger, like red light on end of moving train, now safely past.
[Zaraka]
Except for one slight detail.
I must make very certain that the pursuit ends here.
I'll remember you when my plane is crossing the border out of Germany.
Good-bye, Mr. Chan.
Just a moment, Zaraka.
Were you planning to leave?
Get their guns.
Line up over there, all of you!
Just a minute.
Give me that bag.
Still playing tricks, eh, Mr. Chan?
- What is it?
- It's a phony.
- It's a transmitter!
- Chan's signal stopped coming through.
- They've discovered the trick.
- Call the other cars. See if they have contact.
Calling all cars.
Calling all cars.
Very clever, Mr. Chan- in touch with the police ever since you've been here.
Come on.
Where is it? And talk fast.
- All cars have lost contact.
- Then instruct them to proceed in the same direction at full speed.
- We must get to Chan.
- Calling all cars.
For the last time, where is the Cartwright invention?
Reposing in place of utmost safety.
Get away from that kid.
Back against the wall, you.
Do I get my answer?
[Engines Stopping]
[Brakes Squeaking]
- It's the police.
- Surround the house.
Don't let any of them get away.
[Battering On Door]
Search the house!
- They went up there!
- Round them up!
- [Clicks Heels]
- Mr. Chan, you see? We have arrived in time.
- The police of Berlin are very efficient.
- [Gunshot]
Inspector! Inspector Strasser!
Keep him covered.
Most unfortunate occurrence.
He's still alive.
Remove him. Get the doctor.
If Mr. Hopkins regain consciousness, report immediately.
Okay, Pop.
- What happened in here?
- I was going by the door when I heard a shot.
As I stepped in, Hopkins was lying on the floor, and Hughes was standing over him.
You can't pin that shooting on me.
I just came in through that door, when l-
One moment, please.
- You did not come into room when shot fired?
- No, I stopped at the door.
Strange.
[Chan] Ink spilled here when Mr. Hopkins fall... yet stain your shoe while standing at door.
Conclusive proof you were close to Mr. Hopkins when he fell.
Now very evident attempted murder of Hopkins... was last act to save self.
You are murderer of mechanic Miller in Honolulu...
and thief of own invention.
That's ridiculous.
I've helped you in every way possible.
If I'd wanted to steal the invention,
I could have easily made a copy.
That would have been obvious way and easy to trace.
But you saw opportunity to gain large fortune... without sharing with your partner, Mr. Hopkins.
[Chan] So devised clever scheme to remove suspicion from self...
by having Miller murder pilot Edwards and steal robot from test plane.
Then, assisted by Miss Roland, you murder Miller... and turn device over to Miss Roland... for delivery to Mr. Zaraka, head of foreign spy ring.
Second point. When Miss Roland disappear before boat reach dock... quite evident someone warned her of plan for capture.
- Hopkins knew the plan as well as I did. He could have-
- Excuse, please.
Mr. Hopkins entirely innocent.
Here tonight he perform heroic deed... when, at risk of his own life, he identify imitation as real device... to assist Charlie Chan in rounding up ring of spies.
And now, final evidence.
The time he disappear from hotel room... found something you overlooked:
Unfinished cablegram written in Mr. Hopkins's own hand...
addressed to United States
War Department.
"Have recovered
Cartwright invention.
Returning to America immediately for"-
- That's where it ends.
- Observe, please, what follows.
[Strasser]
There's nothing but a blot across the page.
Indicate when writing message,
Mr. Hopkins suddenly interrupted by action... which cause pen to slip from fingers.
Pop, Mr. Hopkins is still unconscious, but he's gonna be all right.
The doctor found a bump on his head that must have been made a couple of days ago.
Thank you so much for corroboration- prove you knock Mr. Hopkins unconscious... then drop him from window into arms of confederates, as seen by son Lee.
- That is all.
- Take them out.
Well, it looks like we cleaned this case up, Pop.
But how did you change the robot into a transmitter?
Constructed same in most efficient
Berlin police laboratory... with help of honorable inspector.
You're a fine officer, Mr. Chan.
You went through with your duty even though it meant risking your son's life.
- Better for Oriental to lose life than to lose face.
- You bet. But, you know... for a while I was afraid I wouldn't be there to win that 100-meter swim tomorrow.
- Perhaps good idea not to accept gold medal until race is won.
- [Chuckles] Don't worry, Pop.
I learned to sprint when you used to chase me through the water with a paddle.
Come on, Lee, boy!
Oh, yeah!
Come on! Come on!
- Come on!
- He won!
- Attaboy, Lee!
- Thank you.
- Good work!
- Thanks.
- [Dick] Congratulations!
Congratulations, fella!
Ah, thanks!
- I made it, Pop!
- Very lucky.
- Was prepared for emergency.
- [Laughing]
Hey.
You ever feel like strangling your wife?
You know, reading about this lawyer guy Perry
Mason sort of encourages the idea in me.
Yeah, having him to defend you, you'd probably get a medal instead of a hanging.
Sure, just like this hatchet killer getting himself a jury of all women.
Look at that.
From what they say, 12 women ain't too many for him to handle.
Hang me, I'm as guilty as this innocent child.
Women weep as defense lawyer makes final plea for client.
Hey, give me 4 of those rags and keep yourself the change.
Perry Mason wins brilliant battle of wits.
Hey Toots, where's my picture?
I stood right next to Perry.
Even as you and I.
Boy, did we put that trial over, they're raving about us.
Look Perry.
But on the other hand Wilbur, I contend that the 4 I've selected will lend... themselves more aptly to the Bordeaux treatment.
But Perry, taking into consideration, in this species of crustacean... the tail folds under the body, not over.
Objection sustained.
Joe, we've decided upon these 4 antagonistic anthropods.
- Could we conclude some purchase agreement?
- What is it?
He means he wants to buy them chump.
- Good evening Mr. Mason.
- Evening Clancy.
Make it snappy Clancy, the papers say we're a genius, take a look at that.
Why, thanks.
Oh, pard me Mr. Mason, a lady was looking for you.
- Good, not carrying a gun or a hatchet.
- Send all dames to me, that's my department.
- That's a dead issue.
- Then who?
Hello Slug.
Great speech Perry, big success, you certainly put it over.
Thanks, thanks. Gangway, Ok boss...
- What is that?
- An epicure's dream Luigi.
I bought them myself, I selected them myself and now I'm going to cook them myself.
- Thanks,
- A noble experiment Luigi.
- I'm sorry we're in conference.
- I'm still going to China.
Just lead me to a skillet my learned friend.
Si, signore.
- Hurray for Mr. Mason,
- Mr, Mason, my congratulations.
Have you read about your big success, Mr. Mason?
No, I never read criminal news, come on Toots.
Joe, this one is on my bill if there's room enough.
Hello, signore Mason, buona sera, come esta?
- Bella, Bella, permit me.
- Seguro, excuse me.
Pierre, we are going to try a noble experiment,
- Si?
- Crab a la Bordeaux.
Benisimo.
- I want to find a white wine, a Bordeaux 21.
- Bellissimo.
We'll mince the crab like lobster thermidor.
Add cheese Pierre, a grated Parmesan.
- No Gruyere tonight.
- No Gruyere tonight? That's tyrannical.
But that's your stomach, not mine.
Good thing you brought the coroner with you.
- Pierre, you'll be wanting my recipe.
- That's right, that's right.
Señor Mason, there's a lady waiting at the bar.
- If she's at the bar must be for you Toots.
- I'm too busy for that.
No señor, she said she wants to see you.
All right Tony, we'll have the lady later with a cognac.
- But she say it is very important.
- So is the cognac Tony.
I'll take care of that.
He's got cooking on his mind.
Si señor.
Gentlemen, tonight we make history.
Tonight we startle the entire cooking world.
Our experiment will rank with those of Albert of the rich.
Hello Perry.
What are you doing?
Whipping up a little fudge?
Rhoda. If I'd known it was you I wouldn't have kept you waiting a minute.
No, I know.
Why, is only been a few years now since you were supposed to meet me at a certain bar.
Oh, 5 years as I reckon time. Luigi.
- Bars were against the law then.
- So you wouldn't be seen in one?
Right. Wilbur, you watch the crabs, Toots, you watch Wilbur.
Rhoda, it's great seeing you again.
You haven't changed a bit.
- You like women a lot, don't you Perry?
- They're nice.
Would you do something for one even if you were never going to see her?
I would, if she were pretty.
Anything but my recipe for onion soup.
I never told you that, did I? No.
Good, I was afraid I might have.
- When I was younger I was pretty impulsive.
- Yes, I know.
This girl's husband was too.
He disappeared 4 years ago and then, a short time afterward, he died suddenly.
Died, eh?
Well, at least she was told that he was dead.
That's something you'd think she'd check up on pretty carefully.
- Just one of those things Perry.
- And now she's married again?
No.
That is, she wants to get married again but... somebody told her that she had to prove definitely that her first husband is dead.
- You don't want me, you want the coroner.
- Are you going to help the poor kid Perry?
It's just that she's curious about her legal standing.
Just curious, eh? Just a curious bride?
All right, call her that if it makes it more intriguing to you.
I am mainly intrigued with the idea of having another drink.
Have one Perry, maybe it'll make you more sympathetic to my sad story.
You have one too, then maybe you can make your sad story a little better.
- Waiter. 2 more, just like the last.
- Si, señor.
Won't you help her a little? For me Perry?
When you put it like that, I've got to.
Tell your curious bride to call at my office for an appointment.
Oh but...
Second hand information is always unsatisfactory.
What's her name?
Her name, if you have to know, is, is Helen, Helen Crocker.
Right, where does she live?
If she won't come to see me I may have to drop in on her, on my way to China.
- 1496 East Sycamore.
- 1496 East Sycamore.
- That must be a nice residence district.
- Yes.
If it weren't underwater.
The bay drowns out East
Sycamore Street to the 800 block.
Mr. Mason, I'm sorry but for your experiment my only Bordeaux is a 1918.
Use Chablis 21.
What difference does it make Perry, what her name is or where she lives?
This girl is a friend of mine and she's in trouble, you can give me the information.
Drink your drink Rhoda, you're getting terribly upset over this friend of yours.
Well, I wish I could make you realize what a bad spot she's in.
- Been married long?
- You mean, my friend?
I mean you sweetheart.
You still know everything, don't you Perry?
Well, I know that when a woman fingers her wedding ring like you're doing... that she hasn't had it on long.
- No Chablis 21.
- No Chablis 21?
Then I'll have to take a look in your wine cellar Luigi.
I'll be back in less than 5 years this time.
In the meantime perhaps you can think of your friend's identity and her correct address.
I'm getting interested in our curious bride.
Come on Luigi.
Chablis '21.
Bravo, señor Mason knows Luigi's wine cellar better than Luigi, eh?
I going to watch you from now on.
Hurry up, Luigi, I'm hungry.
I'm sorry Rhoda...
Is that you Rhoda?
- Carl, are you awake?
- Yes, I couldn't sleep.
I, I'm sorry.
How's your headache, dear?
I, I thought the air clear up but it's worse now.
- And my legs ache from walking so far.
- That's too bad.
- You were gone a long time.
- I, I have a sharp pain here.
Carl... would you mind if I slept in the other room tonight? I'm afraid that I'll keep you awake.
- If you'd rather.
- I think it's better.
There. Now you go to sleep, you need your rest.
- Good night.
- Good night.
Excusi, telephone for señor coroner.
- I will connect.
- Sorry boys.
Yes, this is the coroner.
I will, over my dead bodies.
But I can't help you look all afternoon,
I'm in an important meeting of the...
International Committee for the Elimination of Starvation.
All right.
But I want you gentlemen to remember one statement made in my official capacity.
I'll be seeing you.
Well Wilbur, what is the latest error of my astute Grand Jury friends?
Some geek by the name of Gregory
Moxley, sounds like a toothpaste... was laid gently to rest 4 years ago at Meadowbrook Cemetery.
Say, that's mighty nice country up there.
You get a marvelous view of the mountains and ocean.
Some lunatic thinks he saw Moxley on the Street... and Grand Jury wants me to look in the coffin.
Better look in the coffin Wilbur.
We'll finish our coffee at the morgue.
No, now listen, I don't want to be inhospitable boys...
Oh no Wilbur, you wouldn't deny us this midnight rendezvous with death.
Kind of a smelly place, now I warn you...
Cafe Royale... is the loving invention of a man of emotional depth and courageous imagination.
- It adds a finishing touch to a fine dinner.
- Amen.
Wilbur.
Do you want yours through your strainer?
Come on, come on, what's the dope?
Gregory Moxley, died 4 years ago, pneumonia.
Burial from funeral parlors of Malivinsky and O'Darrell.
- Height, 5'11.
- Weight, 189.
Which one, Malivinsky or o'Darrell?
Get a can opener son, we'll see whether this Moxley died of pneumonia or a wild hare.
I shouldn't wonder if you're due for a surprise Wilbur.
Surprise, in my business? Never.
Nothing but deadly monotony.
Well gentlemen, we might as well get started.
Wish I going to China with you Perry.
Well, if you were a blonde and you could take shorthand, you would be.
Get 3 slabs ready, I'm bringing friends.
- This is one case I'm curious about.
- My honor gentlemen, ex-officious.
Step lively, my good men.
Oh, I say old thing, you're becoming slightly green beneath the gills.
Me?
Well, I'll be.
Gentlemen...
In all my experience as a coroner I, I...
Step up please.
Look at this.
I always wondered what they did with those things.
My grandmother had one of those back in 1860 in front of her cigar store.
Good old Moxley.
He gave his 6 feet of land back to the Indians.
What a yarn, what a yarn.
White man saved from the grave by noble redskin, where's the phone?
This is a headline story.
Spudsy?
There are certain elements of time and event... in this nutty night that might be fitted together, if a man had time.
- For instance.
- Four years.
Husband supposed to be dead.
Rhoda.
I once fought a guy in Fresno, 8 rounds, who had a sister called Rhoda.
This Rhoda hasn't got a brother but she had a husband.
Oh, it's too bad I'm on a vacation.
Because Spudsy, I'm as curious as a June bride.
Well, well. You make a very lovely figure Spudsy... stripped down to your bike togs to squeeze an orange.
- Where's Ping?
- Chinese new year's, he's celebrating too.
Think you need a little ice.
I guess we better fill it up the rest of the way with gin.
No hurry though, he won't be up for hours.
My orders. I told him he needed a little shuteye.
- Oh, you told him.
- Yeah.
Wake up darling, all aboard for China.
Don't you hear the call of the Orient?
There are a thousand Chinese gongs clanging in my head.
- Here, drink this.
- Oh, I couldn't.
My mouth tastes like the whole Chinese army marched through it last night.
Possibly that explains the beaded bag on your highboy.
- Haven't you looked through that bag yet?
- No, but I'm going to.
- Number 3489261.
- The girl, you mean?
- No, I mean the .25 colt automatic.
- Right.
Looks like you knew she was going to meet you.
Oh sure, that's why she got that very potent drug from a prescription by a Dr. Millbank.
- She's got...
One lipstick, one compact, one lace handkerchief, one telegram.
That proves you were awfully drunk, otherwise, you wouldn't have remembered so well.
If I could only remember who the girl was.
- You remember me, don't you?
- Oh, yes, you're Della Street.
Right, so you needn't lie to me, just tell me how long it'll postpone that trip to China.
Not a moment.
I gave her a chance last night to come clean.
So did whoever sent this telegram.
- Await your final answer.
- At 5 o'clock today extreme limit.
What a memory, who tore off the signature?
That's something I can't remember because I didn't know, I wish I did.
You got an awfully faraway look in your eye Perry, and it isn't China, either.
You're wrong Della.
My heart throbs only with the passionate desire to eat shark fins and bird's-nest soup.
I know, but first you're going to clear up our little mystery.
You know that as well as I do, so you might as well get started working.
- I don't want to work, I need a vacation.
- You need a cold shower.
Anybody think that I was the secretary and you were the boss.
- Well, maybe I am.
- Eh?
China will still be there, they're not going to move the Great Wall.
- Mr. Mason?
- Yes?
You wanted me to remind you not to forget to take your clothes off.
Thank you, miss Street.
- After you doctor.
- Thank you.
- Where's the patient please?
- Just a minute.
Spuds.
Mr. Drake, Dr. Millbank.
How are you?
You'll let me see the patient as soon as possible of course.
Sit down and shut up or you'll be the patient.
Hi Della.
- Where's Perry?
- In the shower.
I've got the doctor in there.
Too late to do any harm, he's recovering.
- Hey, Toots.
- Yes?
- Is the doctor here?
- Yes, I got him in there.
All right, let's operate.
Good morning doctor, nice of you to come right over.
I was led to believe I was to attend a patient here.
Nice of you to believe that doctor, sit down.
You're getting all the important remarks down in shorthand, aren't you?
I will, if any turn up.
Doctor, don't let the feminine adoration of the younger set make a sap out of you.
Might I ask who it is that's trying to make a sap of me at the moment?
I'm Perry Mason.
If you weren't already a sap, you wouldn't give poison to your lady friends.
Your advice would be a lot more important if I knew what you were talking about.
And if you did.
I am talking about Rhoda Montaine.
Let's both talk about her now.
Well, since I don't intend to discuss her, I might as well leave.
You'll stay and I'll talk.
Then maybe we'll let you talk.
Just what do you want with me?
You seem to know everything already.
If you like miss Montaine well enough... to send her out armed to the teeth with instruments of death... you ought to like her well enough to explain yourself.
The medicine was just a hypnotic to produce sleep.
- Permanent sleep?
- No, I tell you it isn't a poison.
The gun is.
Rhoda was in trouble and needed protection.
She hasn't got the gun now, she's only got you for protection and me.
You tell me where Rhoda is and
I'll tell you how we get her out of this.
I haven't anything to say.
Did it interfere with your friendship for Rhoda... when she married
Carl Montaine, the millionaire's son?
I don't know why I should discuss this matter with strangers.
I'm her attorney.
Do you know who sent that telegram?
I haven't anything to say.
- Where's my breakfast?
- On the way.
How about you, doctor?
I?
It's a cinch to be very tasty, Spudsy cooked it.
- Oh, I guess I'll have some.
- Fine, we're having fowl, I believe.
- I've never had that before, for breakfast.
- Doctor, how do you like your goose cooked?
But this is very irregular sir.
But I received this message on a business matter.
Tres important and so stupidly
I lose the address of the sender.
Please, you could discover it up for me?
- You are Mr. Montaine?
- Oh, oui.
Well, I'll see what I can do for you sir.
Monsieur Montaine. I have for you ze office.
Merci.
Hello? Is this you Della?
What have you found out for me, eh?
There was a marriage license issued last week in the name of Carl Montaine of Pasadena.
The girl was Rhoda Moxley, a widow.
Widow Moxley, the coffin man, eh?
Listen my chickadee, get in touch with the gas and water company and... see if any connection had been made for the husband.
I want the address, no?
No, and in case you're interested, your accent is lousy.
Here it is sir.
The name of the sender
Mr. Montaine is Gregory Moxley.
Moxley?
- Yes, that I know.
- Yes, that we know.
- But the address...?
- 316 Norwalk.
- There you are, sir.
- Ah, merci.
Merci.
I'll still make that boat to China.
Yeah, but how?
It looks like a Chinese puzzle.
That's because you got such a pure mind Spudsy.
Our girlfriend Rhoda thought she was a widow for 4 years.
Then she thought she'd become a bride again.
- She did, eh?
- She did.
That's what her first husband had been playing dead and waiting for.
Now he's turned up and is putting on the pressure.
- Excuse moi.
- It is nothing Spudsy, rien.
Oh sorry Spudsy,
I'll have to handle this alone.
We only want to give Moxley such a scare he'll hide himself in a coffin.
Come in.
- Good afternoon.
- Good afternoon.
I'm here to take charge of things for Rhoda.
- You remember Rhoda?
- Do I?
Remembered her 4 years after you died.
- Oh, so I'm a dead one, am I?
- I wouldn't say that exactly.
Not to a man smart enough to pull that trick with a wooden Indian.
Oh, you know all about the wooden
Indian, eh? You think that's all right?
Oh, I think it's too bad you had to wait 4 years to collect.
Well, even a smart fella makes a little mistake, sometimes.
- You made a big mistake Moxley.
- You're going pretty good yourself buddy.
I ain't Moxley.
If you want to see the mastermind Moxley, he's in there.
Oh. Thanks.
- You wouldn't be Moxley, would you?
- Not if I could help it.
There's Moxley.
There you are.
That's what happens to them when they get too smart.
You better take a good look at him.
- Dead, eh?
- That's a great discovery.
Just give us your name so we can make sure that you get full credit.
Keep away from that phone.
Put that gun away, you might break something.
That you, Perry?
- Well, bless my soul.
- Hello Wilbur.
Well, you boys are as inaccurate as usual.
- He's not a crook.
- He's a cook.
And one of the greatest in the world.
Makes scrambled eggs taste like peach Melba shortcake.
Hello? Hello?
Let me speak to miss
Street please, this is Mr. Mason.
- Hey, he ain't Perry Mason.?
- Oh, ain't he?
You just finding out?
Don't you ever read your blue book?
Hello Della...
What's new at the gas station?
Both gas and water connections were made in the name of Carl W. Montaine... at 2309 Hawthorne Avenue.
- Got it?
- Right.
- Thank you my good woman.
- You're quite welcome my good man.
Well, it's a mighty nice little murder Perry.
Wilbur, I wish I were going to read about it in a Chinese newspaper.
Who are you working for, the dead man or the dame that bumped him off?
What happened?
All I know is what I see on the floor.
Mr. Moxley, you won't change places with any wooden Indian this time.
Any details on how he joined your tribe?
Oh, some.
First the police knew was when people across the way in the apartment house... reported last night about 2:30 that someone over here was trying to disturb the peace.
That's a nice conservative way of putting it.
Somebody made quite a mess of this apartment.
Certainly made a mess of Mr. Moxley.
Hit him on the head with a poker... stabbed him in the back.
Gosh, that's enough to kill any man.
- Any fingerprints?
- Can't even find the knife.
And you say a woman did it?
Well, a couple across the way said that... just before the glass crashed they heard a woman's voice.
- Hello chief.
- Hello Frank.
- Hello Frank.
- Hi boss.
- Hi Joe.
- Hello Wilbur, you got it all figured out?
- Oh, as usual.
- Hello Joe.
- I thought you'd gone to China.
- You wouldn't think Joe, you hope.
I hope you found Mr. Mason standing over the corpse with a smoking revolver.
He just got here but he knows plenty chief.
He ought to be chief of detectives instead of you Lucas.
- He knows what he's talking about.
- What are you doing here anyway Mason?
Oh, just a little social call, the coroner sent for me.
Oh, yes, yes. I want to consult you about a recipe for icebox cookies.
He didn't talk about no cookies, he talked about Moxley and a dame named Rhoda.
And some racket that
Moxley was working on her.
Who's Rhoda?
You wouldn't want to know Joe, it'd get you all mixed up.
We found some keys that don't belong these doors... on the floor near the body and they'll tell us who this Rhoda was.
Anyway, that tells me one thing the police knew and I didn't.
But just one thing.
Mason phoned chief and wrote something on a slip of paper.
- Well Mason, what was it?
- Well, I'll tell you Joe.
Just a little music for my exit march.
Well, goodbye boys.
As the coroner says, I'll be seeing you.
- Nice friends you got Wilbur.
- Even you Joe, would like his cooking.
I might if he did it in China.
Let me see those keys.
2309 Hawthorne Avenue and don't spare the horses.
Ok boss.
I guess you didn't have much trouble handling Moxley.
- No Spudsy, even you could've handled him.
- Did you put him in his place?
Somebody else had already done a very excellent job of putting Moxley in his place.
Yeah.
Oh sorry, I'm looking for Rhoda Montaine.
- She's isn't here.
- You don't think so?
- I know she isn't.
- Who are you?
- I'm her husband, that's all.
- You're one of her husbands, that's all.
I know how upset you must be.
I'll answer all phone calls for you.
Yeap.
No, no, this is the Doc Wallabar saloon.
We eat guys with names like that.
Who was that?
That was Joe Lucas, chief of police detectives.
They're catching up with us, in case you don't know we're Perry Mason.
Sit down Montaine, your, your legs are giving way.
What do the police want? What do you want?
I'm trying to help Rhoda, where is she?
I wish I could tell you Mr. Mason.
She acted rather strangely all day.
And a little while ago an express-man came for her trunk.
- Then she took a light bag and left.
- An express-man, eh?
Light bag? What did she say?
Just that going away was the only way to save me from scandal.
- What scandal?
- I, I, I don't know.
You must know something or is it too cold in here for you?
Anybody be a little shaky if...
- his wife walked out like that.
- And the police were about to walk in?
What they want?
Why does everyone know about this except me? It isn't fair.
Maybe knowing all about it will calm your nerves.
A little after 2 o'clock this morning, your wife's former husband,
Gregory Moxley was murdered,
Rhoda wouldn't do it, she didn't.
The police found some keys beside the body.
That screaming phone means they've traced them to your wife.
- My father could get me out of this.
- Not with all the Montaine millions.
He could get it hushed up but I can't tell him.
There's never been anything like this in our family.
I don't know what he'd do to me.
It's terrible Mr. Mason, what can I do?
The best thing for you to do at any time is nothing.
- But probably even that is asking too much.
- Scandal will ruin me and my father too.
They're going to question you.
Don't talk, not a word.
- But I can't conceal facts.
- Say nothing and plenty of it.
A husband can't testify against his wife in a criminal proceeding.
Oh, but they'll make me talk.
I'm sorry to see that Rhoda developed such a taste for hummingbirds.
Hello, hello?
Calling all cars. Attention, all cars.
Check all airports for woman suspect in Moxley murder.
Suspect named Rhoda Montaine.
Description as follows...
Why the airport?
Are you going to fly to China?
Step on it Spudsy, my friend Lucas will put a tail on us.
Easiest way to get rid of them is by stopping, I haven't mopped up a cop since 31.
Airport, that's where Mason is heading.
How you know you'll find her at the airport?
She expressed her trunk and is carrying a light bag.
That means she's traveling fast and high.
Well, this crate is going to take off itself any minute.
If she gets off on a plane it will means she's running away and that'll hang her.
Streetcar blocked him.
All aboard please, plane taking off in two minutes. All aboard.
Want me to hold him off?
I know a little jujitsu.
They can't arrest her if they don't find her.
You stay near the ticket window.
Frances darling, it was all a horrible mistake, that woman was my sister.
I know what happened.
Come on darling, we're going to be married.
Get in a phone booth as quickly as you can, I'll be right with you.
Spudsy...
- Can I have a box of matches?
- Here you are.
Thanks.
Get down on the floor.
- How can I? There isn't room.
- Get down and make room.
Right now, it's the most comfortable place in the world for you.
- There he is.
- All right, we'll park here.
Hello Enquirer, get me Toots Howard.
Tell that curious bride of yours that her husband is very definitely dead now.
Perry, what do you mean?
- Hello?
- Hello Toots, Perry Mason.
I'm closeted in a phone booth with Rhoda Montaine.
The little lady the state is going to try to hang as the murderer of Gregory Moxley.
By this time Toots, you've probably read of the killing in your rival paper.
I'm at the municipal airport up to my neck in police detectives.
Your pretty neck is even worse off.
Hey, you're sinking pretty low.
You want me stagger over and rescue you?
If you get here soon enough, the Enquirer can have the honor of capturing the beautiful murderess.
Right.
You're not going to turn me over to anybody for a crime I didn't commit.
Keep your head and your voice low and tell me what did happen.
I don't know, I didn't even know he was dead until now.
You were doing a nice job of hanging yourself, running away like that.
I knew there be some kind of scandal and
I didn't want to bring my husband into it.
Keep your head.
I thought Moxley is been dead 4 years, honestly.
I know and Moxley thought when you married a rich kid that... he could come back and make himself a nice living.
But what happened?
Moxley said if he didn't have money by
2 o'clock this morning, he'd make trouble.
You couldn't get the money but you went to his apartment anyway.
Yes, he was furious, I, I couldn't do anything with him.
Somebody took care of him all right, who?
I don't know.
He hit me and then the lights went out.
But I didn't kill him, I swear I didn't.
I hope not.
But if we're going to keep that
District Attorney from hanging you... we've got to do something more than hope and swear.
- Hello?
- Hello, airport?
There's a funny-looking guy at the newsstand reading a magazine he hasn't paid for.
- Call him to the phone, will you?
- All right.
Hey bud, you at the newsstand, telephone.
- Hello?
- Spudsy...
Toots Howard will be here any second...
I want to talk to him before those two dicks crash down on me.
- What shall I do, the usual thing?
- Not to them.
At the moment Toots arrives, take a good sock at your nearest neighbor.
Ok.
Perry, what we going to do?
- No matter what happens, don't talk.
- All right.
The DA will ask you a lot of questions. He'll do everything he can to make you answer them.
- You got to promise me you'll keep quiet.
- I promise Perry.
Tell him you won't say a word unless I'm with you.
I won't talk, how many times do I have to say it?
Dozens and probably that won't be enough.
Wonder how much rent he pays for that place.
Maybe he's getting a reduction on account of taking a 6 months lease.
Goodbye.
Hey, man, you gone daffy?
Hey, what's going on?
Oh, Toots.
Now get this through your head. Don't talk.
- Don't talk.
- All right, all right.
This is Toots Howard, you'll be all right with him.
- Hello Perry.
- Toots, this is Rhoda Montaine.
Of her own free will she surrenders to you gentlemen as representatives of the Enquirer.
- Well, that's fine Perry.
- Hold it like that please. Shoot.
Hey, what does this mean?
Means that Ms. Rhoda Montaine, of her own free will, has surrendered to the press.
See here Mason, if you think you can get away with this, you're crazy.
If you think I can't get away with it, just start something and see how crazy I am.
Cut it out Fred, he's dynamite.
Young lady, you're under arrest.
Oh, not so fast brother.
Miss Rhoda Montaine surrendered to the Enquirer... which paper will turn her over to the District Attorney... as soon as we get our exclusive story off the press.
All right, we'll accept her from the Enquirer...
As long as we get her, we don't care how low we have to stoop.
On the pages of the Enquirer she'll get a square deal.
For once, we'll let the great
American public try a case.
So, that's the kind of a shyster you are.
One more crack like that, my fine flatfooted friend and I'll tear you boys to ribbons.
Assisted only by my friend,
Mr. Spudsy Drake. Where? Spudsy.
Yeah? You want me?
- What would you do without me?
- I'll get you a nurse to hold your hand.
Am I to be permitted to talk to the almighty District Attorney?
Ah, hello Stacey.
How long do you think you're going to get away with hiding my client from me?
I could excuse a flatfoot like Lucas, but our esteemed District Attorney?
Why don't you have the
Enquirer find her for you?
You and the paperboys work so well together.
The husband? Oh yes, you'll see him too.
In court sir, when I go to trial.
That will get you nowhere, you can read, can't you?
Well, I thought you might possibly had read some law in your day.
You did? Well, that's fine.
They'll not change the law for you, Mr. DA.
The husband can't testify against his wife in a criminal proceeding, even you know that.
- I see.
- Montaine senior's outside.
The kid's father.
- What's he like?
- Looks like he knows his way around.
Past 60, thin straight mouth and poker face.
I've got him, look perfect,
C. Philip Montaine of Pasadena.
I'll dust him off and send him in.
- Come in Mr. Montaine.
- Thank you.
- How do you do?
- Mr. Mason.
Sit down Mr. Montaine,
I've been expecting you.
Then you hoped I'd bring my checkbook.
Naturally, since I happen to be defending your daughter-in-law.
And naturally, you got the amount of the check pretty well set in your mind.
Naturally.
Mr. Mason, I am prepared to double that amount... if you will consent to let me decide the perfect outcome.
- Oh, sit down, Mr. Montaine.
- Thank you.
And tell me your idea of the perfect outcome.
My son married a woman whose greatest affection was for his pocketbook.
- That was Rhoda I suppose.
- Yes, yes.
A woman whose previous life was hardly above reproach.
Yes, they say she even ran around with lawyers.
A woman who even after her marriage made clandestine appointments... with a young intern named
Millbeck and with her former husband.
I think it would be best Mr. Mason... if my son were free from this unfortunate marriage entanglement.
I see, then it is your intention to find your son's marriage illegal.
In a nutshell Mr. Counselor, I shall attempt to do that very thing, at any cost.
Even at the cost of Mrs. Montaine's life?
I've made quite a lot of money in my time young man.
But I didn't make it by being blunt.
And I've done pretty well in my own small way, mainly by being blunt.
I'm defending a woman charged with murder Mr. Montaine... and it's my idea to defend her as well as I can.
- Then you refuse my offer?
- As bluntly as possible.
I guess I shall have to rely on the District Attorney Mr. Mason.
I guess you will, although I can't absolutely recommend him as a man to depend on.
It promises to be a very interesting battle counselor.
I'll do my best to make it so Mr. Montaine.
- I hope we should meet again, soon.
- I do too sir.
- I have a friend I'd like you to meet.
- Yes?
- Wilbur Strong.
- Wilbur Strong?
- I don't think I quite place the name.
- Our coroner.
Good day sir.
Well?
I thought you said you were going to dust him off.
- I decided to let you do that.
- I did.
Sir C. Philip Montaine of Pasadena.
Della, I'm going over
District Attorney's office.
Oh, by the way, you'd better call the steamship company and... tell them I won't be able to make that boat for China.
They'll be awfully glad to know that, the boat sailed this morning.
Wait a minute.
- You can't see the District Attorney.
- No till I open the door.
Hello Perry.
Something worrying you?
Why, I know, it's the Montaine-Moxley case.
Well, don't let it upset you or my practice.
I'll see if Lucas knows where the young lady is.
If you're pretending that you think Joe Lucas... knows anything, I know
I'm getting the runaround.
This is Stacey, is Lucas there?
- Old friend named...
- Mason.
Mason, inquiring about him.
I don't know sir, I really couldn't tell you.
- I think Mr. Lucas is out playing golf.
- Golf? The lucky stiff.
Probably find him at the club.
- Out there yesterday, I shot a...
- You boys aren't playing golf.
You're playing hide and seek.
It's a kid's game at best Mr. DA.
Bad shot Mr. Mason.
I got a little surprise for you.
Come in, Mr. Montaine.
Carl.
Hello Rhoda.
I guess you two would like to be left alone.
Ok Paul, get it all and don't let the newlyweds get you too excited.
Oh darling, I missed you so much, you're all that I've got to keep me going.
Oh Carl, it's been so awful not seeing you.
I knew when I ran away that it was going to hurt me but... but I had to do it to keep from hurting you.
Let's not talk about how hard it was for you to keep from hurting me.
But, but I did.
I tried every way possible to make Moxley go away.
I suppose that's why you sneaked down to Luigi's that night.
Yes, I wanted to consult
Perry Mason about the legal side.
And what were you consulting Dr. Millbeck about.
The medical possibility of a man returning to life?
- He's just an old friend.
- Just an old friend?
But you had to sneak out of the house to meet him?
Carl, you can't mean that...
I mean that I called his apartment the night of the murder, he wasn't there.
You two were together.
I'm your husband but I, I'm not intimate enough with you...
Carl, you don't think that...
And I thought that you loved me.
The only thing that's kept me going during these past awful hours was... was the thought that you'd stand by me.
The law must take its course Rhoda.
Even if it means scandal for the Montaine name.
Those are your father's words Carl.
They, they don't sound like you.
Well, I guess that young couple of yours won't be speaking to each other for quite a while.
Here's that statement you ordered if you want it now.
I guess so, we aren't proving anything here.
Only no matter how low Moxley was, that girl killed the wrong husband.
Bah, don't be so sentimental.
Sorry, time is up, I can't let you two have any more secrets.
- Thanks for the favor Mr. Lucas.
- Oh, that's all right.
Sit down Mrs. Montaine.
Now don't worry, I just had a talk with the District Attorney.
Now, the people in the apartment house next door... claim that Moxley's doorbell was ringing at the time that the murder was committed.
Now Mrs. Montaine... if you were ringing Moxley's doorbell and he didn't answer the door... because he was busy getting killed at the time... it couldn't have been you that killed him.
Don't you see, that lets you out.
Yes, that must've been it I...
I rang the doorbell and didn't get any answer.
I remember exactly now.
Well, that's fine, saying that will get us a lot further than you just waiting for...
Perry Mason to let you talk.
Now, you just sign this statement to that effect and everything will be all right.
You can't go in there Mr. Mason, the District Attorney is very busy.
Not too busy to look over this habeas corpus for my client.
- But Mr...
- A gentleman of the press.
- That makes it perjury.
- I'm sorry, but we want to see Perry Mason.
Here's something for you to write down in your book.
The District Attorney isn't busy now.
He isn't in his office, where is he?
- I don't know.
- You're fired.
Gentlemen of the jury.
- All right Perry, let's have it.
- Gentlemen of the jury...
For I could ask for no more jurisprudent assemblage than this astute group.
Is it not with the utmost falseness that this building is known as the hall of justice?
That's right Perry.
I have here a document.
Known technically as a habeas corpus, you know the meaning of that word.
The ancient Romans from whom it sprang knew its significance... but does our District Attorney?
It means that my client, that innocent child victim of modern scheming... must be delivered into my hands.
A privilege which is being denied me and her.
But is this justice served? It is not.
Not only is my client hidden from me, the District Attorney hides from me.
Now spread that on your good sheets.
Is that all right for the climax or could we do it better?
Very good.
- They might know the answer.
- Hello Perry.
You're getting very hard to find Mr. DA.
I have a present for you.
Oh, we have a little legal document too.
Perhaps you recognize the signature.
It's your client's.
When she signed this, she practically signed her death warrant.
I'm sorry sir, but I don't think the snails have had enough of vitamin D.
What about the bouillabaisse?
Well, it's very difficult to trace the diet tendencies and ancestry of each individual fish sir.
Very well my good man, start serving.
And you my good woman, start talking.
Oh, he's been stone deaf since birth.
Oh, I never hear anything unless the great oracle flimsy-flamsy... pops his potent puss in my definite direction.
- Little more quiet please.
- Yes, right.
Go ahead Rhoda.
Moxley was so furious about my not bringing the money that he hit me and... and tried to choke me.
Then I broke loose and I grabbed a poker from the fireplace.
- When he came at me again, I hit him good.
- Good?
Well, when I get you before the jury, don't hit so enthusiastically.
- He staggered back but he didn't fall.
- That's where you ran out?
No, I started to but suddenly all the lights went out and I realized that... somebody else was in the apartment.
Maybe it was the wooden Indian who came to scalp Moxley for revenge.
- You couldn't see who it was Rhoda?
- No, everything was happening at once.
There were matches being lighted by somebody and a doorbell was ringing, frantically.
Then I heard the sound of glass crashing in the bedroom.
And after that, the doorbell stopped ringing and all was quiet.
- Then I ran down the steps to my car.
- You went right home?
Our plea would've been self defense.
But you smashed all that up by telling the police that you were ringing the bell.
I can scarcely remember signing it.
All the state has to do is produce the person who was ringing the bell.
Their finding your keys beside the body makes you out a lovely little liar.
What difference does it make with Carl against me.
- What did you marry him for?
- I loved him.
He was so helpless and his father had ruined his life.
- Yes, well the state is trying to ruin yours.
- Your time is up.
We'll show them a thing or two Rhoda.
Joe?
Do you happen still to have a gentleman named Fibo Morgan on the guest list?
- Sure, he's in cell 9.
- Well, I'd like to see him, please.
Certainly.
- Oh, what do you want now?
- Perry Mason to see you.
Too late to do me any good this time.
Hello Fibo.
How are you Mr. Mason? Come and sit down.
- You coming out to my hanging?
- I don't think I'll be able to, sorry.
Oh, that's too bad.
I wish you'd try and make it.
Fibo, that blonde cousin of yours, is she still around and about?
Florabelle? Yeah.
You think she'd do something for me, for what I did for her?
The only hitch is, you done too much for her, she's quitting the racket... and getting married to a paperhanger, can you figure that out?
- Is her record still clean?
- Yeah.
- She's still at the Churchill hotel?
- Yeah.
Do the police know she's a relative of yours?
I never took my work into my own home.
As I remember Florabelle, she had what it takes, she was a pretty good actress.
That girl had a great future, one of the best in the badger game.
I think I've got a little farewell performance for her.
Oh gee, that's swell Mr. Mason, you know I've been feeling awful low about her marrying... that paperhanger.
Now I can put that rope necktie around my neck... a-grinning knowing that Florabelle is carrying on the family tradition.
What's this? What's this?
- I remembered that you liked snails Fibo.
- Snails. Ah gee. Well, so long Mr. Mason.
- Good evening Mr. Mason.
- Come in Spudsy, I want to talk a minute.
I got work for you tomorrow.
I'll be free until 6:30 when the Lasky
Spumoni fight goes on the air from New York.
Spudsy, Moxley's record was to marry women and then disappear.
Lots of husbands would like to do that.
He'd wait until his widows had married again and then he'd come back and demand money.
Oh, I know one thing, he's not coming back this time.
And so tomorrow
Spudsy, you must go out and... find some other woman that Moxley was married to.
Oh, I suppose I take a spyglass, go down to San Diego and...
- start looking up and down the coast.
- You'll get her down to the morgue.
I don't care how but you'll get her down there.
Have her identify Moxley as her dead husband.
That makes it so
Rhoda ain't married to Moxley... because he's already got another wife living.
Yes and it makes her marriage to Montaine legitimate.
Under the law, a husband can't testify against his wife.
That'll stop young
Montaine from going on the stand.
Now we're getting somewhere.
Now, you've got just 12 hours to find that woman.
It's a cinch.
You think I better start from north to south or go from east to west?
Oh, come come Spudsy, surely you can think of some lady friend who might've wed Mr. Moxley?
Well, I've known a lot of women in my life... but I usually stuck with the dames that weren't the marrying kind.
While you're in this sentimental mood... remember a certain blonde living at the Churchill hotel.
She might need a lot of consoling right now...
Because her brother is going to get his neck stretched.
Partly, but more because of her grief over the recent tragic murder of her husband.
Boy, am I glad we thought of her?
Oh, Gregory, Gregory, to think that after all these years...
- Oh, my darling.
- Are you ready boys?
- Just a minute, Mrs. Lawson.
- Hold it, thank you.
That's fine boys.
Mrs. Lawson, the Times will give you 1,000 dollars... for the exclusive story of your marriage to Moxley.
Money can't bribe me miss.
My love for Gregory was too great and too fine to be... splashed all over the front page of your yellow sheet.
What about this wooden Indian business lady?
Is that the way Moxley walked out on you?
That was poor Gregory's only complex.
He used to call our love nest his tepee.
- And me his little wigwam.
- Oh, well isn't that sad?
There you are, boys.
We're from the District
Attorney's office madam.
- What is your name?
- Mrs. Gregory Lawson sir.
This man is my husband and his name is Lawson not Moxley.
What makes you think he's your husband?
Don't you think I know every hair on poor Gregory's head?
I, who have been with him through fair weather and foul?
Say, what was he, an airplane pilot?
You'll pay for that sir, blaspheming the dead.
There'll come a day when you'll be judged... and in a higher court than you've ever seen.
- Where is your marriage license Mrs. Lawson?
- I have it right here.
A document sealed with love. Oh, Gregory.
Sonora, Mexico, eh?
I'm afraid you'll have to come with us, Mrs. Lawson.
The District Attorney wants to talk to you.
You mean to tell me that I'm not to have a minute along with my dead?
How do you figure Toots?
It looks to me like Perry was born with a lot of lucky horseshoes.
Yes and he only puts one in his glove.
When he swings a fast one at a DA.
Doctor, someone wants to speak to you.
- Oh say, can I take another peek at Moxley?
- Make yourself at home Toots.
Hey Toots, who won the Lasky-Spumoni fight?
Who's that? Come out of there.
Come on, come on.
Put that light out and fight like a man.
- You wouldn't hit me, would you Spudsy?
- Perry.
Della told me you were here so I...
If it's a toothpick you want I got one.
Look.
That's funny, my kid sister is saving them too.
She's got 273 of them,
I've only got one.
How were things at the morgue?
I stymied them.
Look.
You should've seen the faces on the District Attorney's stooges.
Good work Spudsy.
And you should've seen the tears streaming down her kisser.
Really, she's more of a legitimate fake than I thought she was.
Ah, why I never get any credit?
Smell, boss. Tear gas.
I fed that blonde enough to drown out the District Attorney.
- You're making a sissy out of me.
- I gassed myself.
Oh, this makes a nice farewell scene here in the moonlight, doesn't it Spudsy?
- You going away boss?
- No, but you are.
- South San Francisco.
- But...
Don't cross me when
I'm in this condition Spudsy.
Tell me you want to go down to south San Francisco and...
Investigate every resident of this, this Fremont hotel.
All right boss, I'll go.
I didn't mean to make you cry.
South San Francisco is very dear to my heart.
One moment please.
Ok, miss Dowstry, here's your lady.
Don't let me stop your fun sister.
From the look on that pan of yours it must've been a nice, juicy conversation.
- I've heard better.
- Confidentially...
Can you talk with your mouth full of food?
Confidentially, I go for a bite in 15 minutes.
Can I join you?
I got a hunch we can write a swell book.
With your ears and my brains.
Well, I generally don't accept invitations from gentlemen but I think you're pretty safe.
- ♪ I was pure and Lily-white ♪
- ♪ She was pure and Lily-white ♪
♪ Just a baby from the clover in the house of Casanova on a dark and stormy night ♪
- ♪ I was an orphan in the storm.
- ♪ She was an orphan in the storm ♪
- ♪ But my heart was young and warm ♪
- ♪ Yes, her heart was young and warm ♪
You mean the one in white, leading the number?
Yeah, not bad?
I traced her here all the way from south San Francisco.
Well, she's just your type.
- ♪ Oh sisters, weep for me ♪
- ♪ boo hoo hoo ♪
- ♪ There ain't no sleep for me ♪
- ♪ boo hoo hoo ♪
♪ There ain't no peace of mind, till I find ♪
♪ That double-crossing son of a gun of the lowest kind ♪
- ♪ The dirty dog. ♪
- ♪ They'll round him up this very night ♪
- ♪ If he doesn't do what's right ♪
- ♪ if he doesn't do what's right ♪
♪ He'll be quickly executed for the gal he disreputed on this dark and stormy night. ♪
Been able to think up any reason for connecting her with the case?
Sure, she and her brother.
- Her brother?
- A guy by the name of Oscar.
They phoned Moxley from the hotel just 30 minutes before he got bumped off.
- The telephone operator gave me the tip.
- Good.
You stick with me, I've already checked on it and I found out she married Moxley last year.
That makes Florabelle an illegitimate wife, what could I do without you?
How late did you say we were going to work?
Too late. Besides, they're all married to big, tough truck drivers.
The poor kids.
♪ He'll be quickly executed for the gal he disreputed on that dark and stormy night. ♪
Can we talk to you for a minute? We're inspectors from the telephone company.
Telephone company? I haven't much time now, can you wait a minute?
Lady, I wish we could but the telephone company wants an answer right away.
An answer? What's the beef?
Somebody is been slipping salted pennies in the box for the nickels?
No, long-distance trouble.
You were in south
San Francisco the night of the 12th.
Is it a crime now being in south San Francisco?
No, but it's a crime to try to collect money over the telephone by threat.
That's almost as bad blackmail as demanding money by postal card.
It looks like the telephone company got the wrong number as usual.
Lady, there's no use denying... that you called San Francisco that night from the Fremont hotel.
No? Well, there's no use in claiming we tried a shakedown.
- Who's we?
- Oh, I guess it was two other people.
I guess that just about proves it was a man's voice putting in the call.
- And that voice was your brother's.
- Is that what the report says?
Yeah, here's the official index card, look.
Say, did you notice who that call was to?
I didn't notice before myself.
It is to Gregory Moxley, the guy that got bumped.
A murder rap, eh? Well, that sort of takes it out of our hands, don't it?
Wait a minute, that telephone call didn't have anything to do with that killing.
You ain't going to get us mixed up in any murder case lady.
- Wait a minute, listen.
- Good night.
Come on, you're due for the hot shivers number.
- Hot shivers?
- Brother, I'm already shaking.
- Balboa Hotel and make it snappy.
- Balboa Hotel, right away.
- Taxi?
- Taxi.
Follow that cab.
- Is Mr. Pender in?
- Yes, he's upstairs.
- Thank you.
- You're welcome.
- Pack of specials.
- Yes sir.
- Who is it?
- It's me, open the door.
What you doing here?
I thought I told you not to come?
Oh, don't go haywire.
Wait till you hear what I got to say.
All right, go ahead, spill it.
Tell me the truth Oscar, did you really kill Moxley?
Of course I didn't. Say, what's eating you?
I was on the scene but I didn't do the work.
Then what are you afraid of? Why don't you go to the cops and square yourself?
Because they got nothing on me and I want to keep them that way.
- Now beat it, get out of here.
- But I want to help you.
Will you please do as I say for once.
Come on, goodbye.
And keep the family trouble in the family.
- Ok, but watch your step.
- Don't worry about me.
Oh, pardon me.
Tell your partner when he comes back I got a few... cases of that stuff that's way ahead of that caramel, what they sell in the stores.
I think you're in the wrong kennel brother.
Oh, I don't think so.
- Maybe it's the wrong hotel.
- I guess so.
Don't I know you?
You're from south San Francisco, ain't you?
Your name is Pender.
Say, I kind of remember you too buddy.
Come on in.
I thought your face was familiar.
Where did we meet?
Well, wasn't it in the pool room?
Oh yeah, the pool room.
Are you sure it was me?
- Maybe you're talking about my brother?
- Well, it was such a long time ago.
- Maybe it was your brother.
- That's funny.
Because I never had a brother.
And what's more, I never had a sister either.
You never had a sister.
Oh, what do you think of that?
No, no sister, no brother. In fact, I'm an orphan.
Now ain't that sad.
The back stair, the porch, the kitchen, the living room, hall, bedroom.
Yeah, and another night like this and
I'll be cutting paper dolls to go in that.
Pretty late for a lady still to be working.
Yes and it's late for a lady to be still in jail.
And is late for Spudsy to be out on a wild goose chase.
Yeah but you still have that Moxley widow.
I don't think I'll have her long.
From the way she's behaving down at the morgue, she'll hold out all right.
She's got a lot of what it takes, for a blonde.
She better have.
- Or else you're getting...
- Sure I know the gamble.
It's blonde on all the rest of it.
But this isn't his life at stake.
Blondes have been known to make saps out of supposedly intelligent men.
Yes, I've heard that.
But don't start out to prove it right now.
Things are messed up badly enough right now.
- You better go home.
- Perry?
Perry my friend, Hello Della..
Well, I got some more bad news for you.
Your young doctor Millbeck turned out to be a bell ringer.
He admitted to Lucas it was him ringing the bell... while Moxley was up rehearsing his death rattle.
Well, that's fine, he certainly fixed things up beautifully for Rhoda.
Didn't he, though? Her say was her ringing the bell and her keys by the body..
She's a pretty spot. Well, guess
I'll have a little of your embalming fluid.
Your own private stock, hey Perry?
- You want a straight one now?
- I guess I will.
Give in a little blonde, answer the phone.
- You told me to go home.
- Never mind.
Hello, Perry Mason talking.
Oh, put the master on.
The District Attorney.
What you going to do? Keep me here all night?
You don't get to...
- Hello?
- Hello Stacey.
Sorry to keep you up so late, worrying about me.
Well, I think we've managed to work out something that'll keep... you up all night, every night until the trial.
I wouldn't mind a little competition for a change.
Listen Mason... you're not planning to use that woman's identification of Moxley as her husband?
Somebody paid her to do that.
We caught her putting the money in the bank.
- That's a lie.
- Ah, sit down.
I got that money as a present.
I got an uncle in
Australia who's rolling in dough.
And you got a cousin in Saint Quentin who's waiting to get his neck straight.
Yes, but Perry Mason doesn't deny that it was a false identification even if you do.
Remember you're fooling around with a murder charge here.
All right. All right.
It was a whim boys, that's all. Just a whim.
Well, that's more like it, now you can have a cigarette.
Yes, of course we've got a confession.
I could use it to make you withdraw... only it would deprive me of the pleasure of beating you once, good night Mr. Mason.
For once.
Well, the blonde turned out to be just a blonde after all.
- She gave in.
- They're really getting tough this time.
Yeah, you can go to China most any time now.
- Perry, I...
- I told you to go home.
- Spudsy, what's happened?
- I met Oscar Pender of south San Francisco.
Good, you look as though you found out something.
I did.
I found out that Pender was in Moxley's apartment the night Moxley got bumped.
There's a man I want.
Why didn't you bring him in?
For two good reasons.
First, I had to get my health back before I tackled him.
And second, he was practically surrounded with private detectives.
- You are sure they were private detectives?
- Sure, I can smell them.
He gave them the slip but not me.
- I outfoxed him.
- Get this Spudsy...
Go back out and outfox Pender even if it kills you.
I'm going but this time I ain't going alone.
- Well, good luck this time Spudsy.
- Bring back the body.
Someone with money is interested in finding Oscar Pender.
Someone with money asked me to go easy on the Rhoda Montaine defense.
Della, get someone with money on the phone.
Now, take it easy.
But I've told you time and again Perry, that's all that happened.
Then you went home?
Yes, I went home and I put the car in the garage and I... tried to close the doors and I couldn't.
Because the bumper of
Carl's car was sticking out.
Then I, I went upstairs and I tried to sleep and I couldn't.
- Isn't that enough?
- I think it is.
I'm sorry to have put you through all this again.
Oh, I don't see what difference it makes anyway.
- I haven't got a chance.
- Yes, you have.
True they've got you, they've got Dr. Millbeck and Florabelle.
They got almost everything, almost.
Tell me Perry, is there some hope?
What you going to do?
- I'm going to give a cocktail party.
- Oh Perry, don't joke please.
I'm not joking, it's our only hope but it's a good one.
- You got to answer me one more question.
- All right Perry, all right.
Do you remember in those dynamite cocktails...
I used to shake up whether I used Martinique or Jamaican rum?
Jamaican.
Oh, a Jamaica rum dinner in the hold on.
A big party tonight, you like a big party?
- Oh, very good, big party.
- Oh, no, no. No gun please.
Oh, that thing is not loaded.
Very too familiar with gun is not loaded.
This kind of party you may need it.
Come on get along or I'll pop you.
All right, me go. Oh, dinner whole party.
Very big party tonight, Ping happy.
My friends... since by some weird whim of fate there has arrived here such an unassociated group,
I suppose the most appropriate toast would be to the hope, however remote... that some mutual benefit may come out of the meeting of this strange assembly.
Skoal.
- Hello? Oh, just a moment, Mr. Mason?
- Oh, I think it's my busy day.
Thank you. Hello? Who?
Mr. Drake...
Della, shut off the phonograph, will you?
But I happen to be occupied.
Couldn't the matter hold over until morning Mr. Drake?
Oh, cut it out, will you?
You know I don't like to be called Mr. Drake.
Are you positive Mr. Drake?
Sure I'm positive,
I brought him in personally.
- What would you do without me?
- Very well, bring him right up.
All right gentlemen, let's go.
My assistant Mr. Drake... of the Petaluma Drakes has found a man he believes to Bethe murderer of Gregory Moxley.
Then you can free Rhoda?
Better fortify yourselves with another cocktail gentlemen.
- Yes, a good idea.
- All right, all right.
Come in Mr. Pender, we are all looking forward to seeing you.
Well, take a good look at me and take a good look at your friend here.
Because sometime soon there'll only be one of us.
One more crack like that and there'll be 3 of us because I'm going to bust you in two.
Come in Mr. Pender and sit down.
Sit down gentlemen and let's talk about your last murder.
I'm too busy thinking about one I got coming up.
You always come up to the big city for your killings?
Oh, I was there when Moxley got it all right.
- Only I was just enthusiastic audience.
- At least you were enthusiastic.
You must've been to stab him so deep.
Say, everyone else is getting a drink.
Why don't I get one?
Oh, I beg your pardon. Ping.
Sorry to have neglected you.
I only went up to Moxie's to get some money he swindled out of my sister.
- Thanks.
- That's all right.
You had a perfect motive for killing Moxley.
- Not bad buddy.
- Thank you.
Your sister phoned
Moxley from south San Francisco... half an hour before his death and told him that if he didn't kick through you'd kill him.
Now you didn't want to make your sister out a liar, so you killed him.
I got a better answer.
If I had someone who understood language.
Give me a chance Mr. Pender, I'll try hard.
Well, I didn't kill Moxley.
And you know how I can prove it?
- I certainly don't.
- By Moxley's own blood.
I've some of it on my shirt from the night of the murder.
Then I trust you haven't changed your shirt since Mr. Pender.
Well, I went up to Moxley's.
I walked the back steps and when I get to the back porch...
I hear a sound of glass crashed inside.
All right.
Well, that didn't seem kosher to me, so I scrammed down the steps and hid in the dark.
That sounds kosher enough, go on.
And then I heard somebody hot footing it down the back stairs.
And they were running so fast they bumped right into me.
And didn't say, pardon me?
He says something worse than that, he says, Moxley is been killed.
Did you get a good look at this man?
Well no, was dark and besides,
I wasn't worried about the murder.
I was more worried about what my sister was going to do to me.
You seem the kind of man that would sort of size him up as he came at you?
Well, I measure him as best I can so I know just where about to hit him.
- Would you say he was about my size?
- Well, no.
Gentlemen, will you stand up please.
Would you say about Carl's size?
- I'm not sure.
- Perhaps the size of Mr. Montaine?
No, not so heavy and not so stiff.
Doctor, will you step forward please?
Let's all try to refresh Mr.
Pender's somewhat elastic memory.
Well, I'd say he was about the size of this guy.
We're all about the same size.
It was dark, how do you know?
Well, I was holding him just like this and my arm was out about like that.
And what did this man about the doctor's size, say?
He said, let's take it on the lam.
Well, I think that eliminates you doctor.
Well, he didn't say it just the way I did.
He said we better beat it or we'll be suspected of murder.
And what did you answer, in your own quaint language?
Well, I told him I had already ankled up from south San Francisco... just to glom a big load not a coffin from this guy that got shived in the ack-bay.
And did the gentleman seem to understand that?
He knew what it was about all right,
Because he handed me a wad of money and told me to beat it.
And now Mr. Pender, about your shirt.
- Size 16 1/2.
- No, I meant about the blood on it.
The blood come off the money.
Out of all the millions the Montaines have... none of their money would've blood on it, would it?
Certainly not Mr. Mason.
Then Carl is eliminated, too.
Yes, Mr. Lawyer... eliminated from your facetious and supposedly humorous insinuations.
At the risk of appearing to contradict myself, it doesn't eliminate Carl.
It points the finger right at him.
I trust you're not as confused as you seem sir?
No, not at all.
In fact the story starts with you.
The day you came to my office and tried to bribe me into hanging Rhoda Montaine... innocent or guilty,
You hung yourself that day right out on a limb.
Really? I assure you I felt no discomfort.
You couldn't buy me so you bought a crew of private detectives... to find Oscar Pender here, and get him out of the country.
To save the neck of your son.
You knew she was guilty... because you were at the Moxley apartment when the murder took place.
You'd like to be able to prove that and I'd like to hear you try.
All right, all you got to do is listen.
- Sit down Mr. Montaine.
- Thank you.
When you saw your wife sneak out the night of the murder... you thought she was going to a rendezvous with Dr. Millbeck.
So you followed her.
Excellent imagination counselor.
But this isn't imagination.
Rhoda unlocked the garage doors when she left.
But she couldn't lock them again when she returned... because in your haste to beat her home... you neglected to get your car all the way into the garage.
So when she tried to close the garage doors they caught on the bumper of your car.
Now, you followed her to Moxley's apartment.
You couldn't get in the front door so you sneaked up the back stair.
You seem to be getting my son and Mr. Pender confused.
No, I'm not getting either of them confused.
I'm just getting Carl straightened out.
You heard Moxley threaten your wife.
You heard her try to phone for help.
You thought of the name she'd have to use, the name you gave her.
The sacred, precious name of Montaine.
Insane tirade.
In your excitement you turned out all the lights.
You went in and struggled with Moxley and you killed him.
What?
You killed him.
- Let me go, it's a frame-up, are you crazy?
- I recognize him, that's the voice.
And that's the hand, the hand that carved the life out of Gregory Moxley.
Lights, Spudsy.
Well, I think we'll all need another cocktail.
- I'll take a dozen.
- I could use one.
I didn't kill Moxley,
I didn't, I swear I didn't.
You're wrong about the killing.
When Rhoda came out of Luigi's
I followed her to Moxley's apartment.
Just as I got there I saw Millbeck drive up.
He ran up to the front door and rang the bell.
I ran around the house and up the back stairway.
I heard Moxley and Rhoda struggling as I came in, I saw him striking her.
She backed away, found a poker and struck him with it.
I, I fumbled about until I found the fuse box... and switched off the lights,
I only did it to help Rhoda.
When I came back,
Moxley was in a murderous rage.
He rushed at me, we fought.
All this time the front door bell was ringing.
I managed to knock him down.
Almost out, it made him Wilder.
I could see he was going to find some weapon, so... so I reached down and picked up a chair.
I threw it and shattered the mirror.
I hit him again, he staggered back and fell against a blade of glass.
I heard it cutting into his flesh.
He just, just seemed to hang there.
And then, then he fell.
That's what killed him.
I, I knelt down beside him, I...
I must've been out of my mind.
Before I realized what I was doing
I'd pulled the glass out of the wound.
That's how I cut my hand,
I was in a panic, I didn't know what to do.
I wrapped up my hand as best
I could and picked up my hat and... ran out the back way again.
On the stairs I ran into Oscar Pender.
The rest happened just as you said, I gave
Pender money so he'd go away and keep quiet.
I didn't intend to accuse Rhoda.
I, I thought she'd plead self-defense and the jury would free her.
- I thought...
- That's enough.
I believe what your son is said, but a jury will have to be convinced.
No, put that away, bring it to my office at 10 in the morning.
Your son's defense and Rhoda's divorce will make quite a dent in it.
Ping, hats and coats please.
Toots, your paper gets the privilege of... turning the Moxley murder suspect over to the police as usual.
Thanks, I will handle it with our usual gentility.
Oh doctor, you better run right down to the jail.
Rhoda will be out by the time you get there... and her nerves may need some medical attention.
Thank you, Mr. Mason.
Spudsy...
Put on the phonograph, there's a record of Sibelius there that will...
- make a very good exit march.
- I hope Sibelius is a classic, I hate jazz.
- Wilbur, grease the skillet.
- Just the culinary coroner.
- How does that look to you Mr. coroner?
- Oh mate, come on, I'm starving.
Della, I think I'm going to need a vacation.
- Ever think about taking a trip to China?
- Oh, there's a great idea.
You're going as soon as this case is finished if I have to go along to make sure.
There's another great idea.
It'll be one time you can depend on a blonde.
- Delicious.
- Nutritious.
You're so wonderful, if only you couldn't cook.
Aka: Les Disparus De Saint-Agil - The Missing Boys Of Saint-Agil http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0030062
The Missing Boys
Of Saint-Agil based on the novel by
Pierre Very
Directed by
Christian-Jaque
The Saint-Agil Boys' School, where the action takes place, does not exist in reality and the characters are imaginary.
We simply wanted to provide viewers with an opportunity to remember a time when they too were thirsty for amazing adventures.
Saint-Agil
Boys Boarding School
Dormitory
- Hi, Martin.
- Hi, Martin.
Hi.
We were up to Article 7.
We'll read it together.
Then we'll discuss it.
It's pointless. Once we decide to do something, we have to do it.
Not just "do it", but "accomplish it".
Which means studying the question in depth.
Thanks.
Planning it out.
Silence, please!
I need to reread the report.
It's just a bunch of papers!
And it's freezing in here.
Don't you think, Martin?
What did you say?
Nothing, I was talking to Martin.
With all these drafts, he's gonna get a cold.
Leave Martin be!
It's true!
Our skin and flesh act as a kind of overcoat.
But he's naked all year round.
- I demand silence.
- Fine. I'll shut up!
OK, I'll read it.
Report on the secret activities of the Able Cowards Club.
Statutes. Article 1.
The Club members' goal is to set sail for the USA.
Article 2:
The Club comprises three members.
Let's do a roll call.
Number one?
Present.
Number two?
Present.
Number three?
Present.
I'll continue.
Weekly night-time meetings will be held in the science classroom, presided over by Martin the Skeleton.
Article 4:
Members have sworn not to set sail individually.
I repeat: I say we strike that article.
Too late, you took an oath!
If you had a chance to go alone, wouldn't you take it?
- I'd go with you, or not at all!
- So you say...
Can I read the last notes?
Sure, go ahead.
A: Which airline do we choose?
B: How do we board?
C: What will we do once we reach free America?
D: Remember to study the St Etienne
Standard Catalog of Military Firearms.
E...
Footsteps.
It's Planet again.
Planet? Always Planet!
Is he a sleepwalker?
Not a sleepwalker, an insomniac.
It's the same thing.
So we�ll adjourn... till next week for the report?
And we won't set sail for a decade.
You're always griping!
No. I'm just saying.
You're "just saying" what?
If Columbus had worked this slow, he'd never have gotten anywhere.
You think he didn't study the map before leaving?
Study the map?
He took an egg, balanced it on its tip and took off in his ship.
That's how he did it.
And I'll do the same.
Now I'm going to bed!
Me too. Aren't you coming?
No. I wanna work on my novel.
Your "novel"!
What's this novel about?
It's about all the adventures we'll have once we get there.
Once we get there...
How depressing to hear this!
- Are you coming?
- Yes.
Chapter IV
Where the three Able Cowards, after making (and losing) a fortune, arrive at the Mexican border.
Second meeting with the mysterious man.
Why are you back so soon?
I saw something.
Sorgues?
I hope they didn't catch you!
No, but I saw something.
Something amazing!
Who's talking?
Who's talking in the middle of the night?
Unbelievable.
Tell us in the morning.
We'll pretend we're sick.
We'll be able to talk at the infirmary.
Yes.
Unbelievable!
What's all this chatter?
In the middle of the night?
I've never heard of such a thing!
I believe you're talking to yourself, my friend.
I'm sorry, Mr. Planet.
You're forgiven.
Come, gentlemen!
Come on!
Time to get up!
And be quiet about it!
Get up, gentlemen!
Come on!
Get a move on!
What're you waiting for?
Didn't you hear the reveille?
- Yes, sir.
- Well?
All that talking kept me awake last night.
So I wasn't dreaming!
There was talking...
Who was talking?
- It was... - Who?
- I don't know, sir.
I fell asleep right away.
Macroix.
- What're you doing?
- I'm sick.
- What is it?
- Red robin.
- What?
- My throat's red.
It hurts, as if a bird were pecking at it.
- Sir!
- What?
I'm sick too.
What have you got?
Same thing as Macroix.
It burns, it hurts!
- It hurts, sir!
- You too?
It hurts here.
How very curious.
- Sir?
- What is it?
I think I've got it.
- What?
- Red robin.
No, this can't be!
Morning, Mr. Planet.
Morning, Donnadieu.
I trust you slept well.
Please keep your jokes to yourself.
Jokes?
I suffer from insomnia, and every morning people ask me how I slept.
It's stupid! And uncalled-for.
Good morning.
Good morning, Lemel.
Good morning, Donnadieu.
Good morning, Planet. Slept well, Planet?
No, Mr Lemel. I didn't.
I never sleep.
You understand? Never!
Do I ask if your wine's well fermented?
You and your insinuations...
I'm just saying aloud what people say behind your back: that you drink... alone, in secret!
You're imagining things, Mr. Planet.
You have no character.
You're an oddball, a crackpot.
A sleepwalker, in fact.
As such, I despise you.
He despises me!
Did you hear, Mr. Donnadieu?
That lush despises me!
A man who drinks in secret and who reels along in public.
What? I, reel along?
- I dare you to repeat that!
- Don't start fighting, gentlemen.
Between Frenchmen, when war is imminent?
When the enemy's at our gate?
Good morning, gentlemen.
I trust you slept well?
Yes, headmaster.
I mean... no.
I mean... a little.
- Good morning, gentlemen.
- Good morning.
Good morning, Mr. Walter.
That Mr. Walter doesn't look like a very nice man!
Indeed.
Gentlemen!
He looks like a perjurer to me.
Furthermore, he scares the children.
I beg your pardon, gentlemen!
Walter is undoubtedly a fine man.
He hasn't been here long, but his work is beyond reproach.
He may be slightly reserved, but he's an excellent living language teacher.
I don't like foreigners.
You shouldn't generalize, Mr. Lemel.
Like in everything, there are good ones and bad ones.
Well, I'm sure he's a bad one.
Good or bad, it's always with foreigners that we'll go to war.
Can't you watch where you're going?
Sorry, I didn't see you!
That's no excuse to step on my feet.
You gotta look before running.
You gotta look!
You hear me?
Yes. I'm not deaf.
What? Talking back to me?
Dirty little rascal.
I'll teach you some respect, you hear me?
You're here to obey, not to talk back!
You hear me? To obey!
You good-for-nothing!
Excuse me, Mr. Lemel.
You shouldn't yell at the kids.
They're fragile.
Children are sensitive.
Yelling scares them.
Think you don't scare them, with that mug of yours?
Trust me, Mr. Lemel, yelling is no way to teach children.
If I started yelling in your ear, to teach you respect...
If I started yelling like this...!
Gentlemen! What's going on here?
Well, headmaster, this lunatic is always provoking me.
Excuse me, headmaster.
Mr. Lemel is exaggerating.
I was just explaining something.
I'd like a word with you, Mr. Walter.
I'm telling you.
It's like he came out of the wall.
Then he disappeared again.
"Like he came out of the wall."
We get it!
You dragged us here for that?
I tell you: it's true!
Better quit writing novels; you're going batty!
You can laugh as much as you want, but something odd is going on around here!
Gentlemen!
Have you quite finished?
This isn't the visiting room!
We're not talking, we're gargling.
Then gargle in silence!
There! Now stay put.
You're not sick!
Why did you come here?
I lied!
It's my turtle that's sick.
We have to cure it.
- What's the problem?
- It won't eat.
- What do you feed it?
- Nothing.
- Why?
- I don't know what turtles eat!
- They eat lettuce.
- Lettuce? Thanks.
Who's that little boy?
He's younger than the others.
Mr. Brezillier's son.
The teacher who died.
He was a widower, so the headmaster and I decided to keep the boy on.
Brezillier was a strange man.
He dabbled in the occult sciences.
You believe in that stuff?
Not really...
I do.
I'm telling you this for your own good.
You're not likable enough, and you're aggressive.
Which explains the other teachers' hostility towards you.
Their hostility, headmaster, doesn't bother me in the least.
I'm here to work, so I work.
I ask for nothing more.
It's not just about work, here at Saint-Agil.
You have to make yourself likable too.
And it seems that even the children...
I mean...
You bother them...
You scare them.
Me?
I scare the children?
Mr. Mazeau!
Got any gum?
Gum?
Another American invention!
Eating rubber... it's ridiculous!
Do I eat my suspenders?
Got any lettuce?
- Lettuce? - Yes.
- Not here, no.
- I'll get you some later, son.
- Thanks, Mr. Mazeau.
Why did you ask for lettuce?
For the little one's turtle.
Are you eavesdropping again?
I wasn't!
This yard belongs to everyone.
But you're the only one who'll get a good spanking! Beat it!
They wanna beat me up, sir!
Not big enough to fight back?
It's three against one!
He's lying; we'd never gang up on him!
They would. They're always threatening me.
They always stick together!
Who knows what they're up to!
They even plot at night...
They're up to no good!
I never asked you.
Why are you telling me all this?
'Cause they're up to no good.
It's not nice to spy on your peers, Fermier.
If you don't stop, we won't be friends anymore.
I'm warning you: we won't be friends at all.
I'd like to ask you a question.
Will you answer sincerely?
- Yes, sir.
- Yes, sir.
Do I scare you?
No, sir.
- No.
- No, sir.
That's what I've been told.
Then they're liars.
We're not scared of anything, anyway.
Thank you.
I didn't dare tell him, but sometimes he does scare me.
Why?
I don't know, he's kinda weird.
Silence, please.
For today's dictation, I've chosen a writer who's not on the curriculum, but I thought it'd be interesting, to get away from the classics.
His name is Wells. W - E - L - L - S.
H. G. Wells, who wrote many novels, the most famous being...
"The Invisible Man."
In English: "The Invisible Man."
First, I'll read a few excerpts.
The invisible man, is a man... who's found a way to disappear at will.
Obviously, this is just science fiction, therefore inconceivable.
No it's not; I saw it!
What could he have seen?
What's that, Sorgues?
You read this book?
No, sir, but I saw one.
"One" what?
A man who can disappear.
Silence, please!
Sorgues is losing his marbles!
Silence!
Sorgues...
I'm warning you.
I don't like that kind of joke.
Now for the dictation.
Chapter one.
The strange man's arrival.
The stranger came early in February...
I tell you I saw him!
Who spoke?
Was it you, Sorgues?
Yes, sir.
I said I saw him, as clearly as I see you.
- Who?
- The man who appears and disappears.
Here we go again!
Gentlemen!
Silence, please!
Please, keep quiet.
Sorgues...
I'm sorry, but I won't have you mocking me like this.
I'm throwing you out.
He's lost his marbles!
Maybe he really did see something.
Like what? The Headless Horseman?
I demand silence!
Go see the headmaster and give him this.
I thought changing the curriculum a bit would make you happy.
To my great regret,
I see I was wrong.
Therefore, today's dictation won't be "The Invisible Man", but the life of Shakespeare.
So Mr. Walter threw you out because you were clowning around, and you invented this far-fetched story as an excuse?
No, sir. I assure you.
It just came blurting out.
But I swear I saw that man!
A "supernatural" man?
And you just happened to see him in the science classroom.
At night.
And what were you doing there?
Huh?
Thorny question, huh?
I can't tell you, sir.
It's a secret.
A secret?
You have too vivid an imagination.
It'll play nasty tricks on you.
Here. Go back to class.
Why bother asking for lettuce?
Now that you've finished, we'll move on to another type of exercise.
Visual memory.
Take a quick look at both sides of this banknote.
Don't linger.
Quickly.
I repeat: to learn to draw well, visual memory is essential.
Grevin, for example:
What did you notice about the banknote?
It was a 100 Francs note.
And what'd you notice, Billard?
A man with an anvil.
And a woman holding a shovel.
- And...
- And what?
A hammer and an anvil.
Very poor visual memory!
And lots of numbers...
And what did you notice?
I noticed five women.
Maybe six...
Yes, sir: six women.
What's so funny?
They're naked, sir!
There's no point in going on.
You're looking without seeing.
That's why real masterpieces go unnoticed.
No one even bothered looking at the artist's signature.
The signature of the engraver.
Yet I once knew a brilliant engraver.
Do you know how he exploits his brilliance?
He teaches a bunch of idiots!
What's so funny, Macroix?
Always the Three Musketeers.
The same three rebels!
I'll lick you into shape!
On your feet, Macroix!
Baume, on your feet!
Sorgues, on your feet!
Sorgues, on your feet!
- Where is Sorgues?
- He's not here, sir.
He left without asking permission?
No, sir, he was never here.
Sorgues wasn't here for drawing class?
Where is he, then?
Sorgues's gone missing.
- Well?
- Nothing.
We asked everybody in town, but there's no sign of him.
As if he'd disappeared into thin air!
Let's not get ahead of ourselves, gentlemen.
I'm convinced the boy simply ran away.
Possibly.
Sorgues is an impressionable young man.
Maybe Mr. Walter was a bit too aggressive... when he threw the boy out of his classroom.
Please, Mr. Lemel!
I only did my duty.
Children are sensitive, Mr. Walter.
You should go easy on them.
Please don't speak to me in that tone.
I'm only stating my opinion.
It's no surprise that a student runs away from a boarding school, when one of the teachers scares the students!
Say that again and...!
Mr. Walter...
Get a hold of yourself.
Sorry, sir.
But there are times... when I can't help myself.
May I be excused, sir?
And to think some people refuse to believe... that there'll be war!
Please, Donnadieu, leave us in peace!
Sorry, sir.
Look what I found in Sorgues's desk, sir.
Very curious.
Travel brochures, catalogs, fares...
I believe our young friend premeditated his actions.
But he won't get far, that's for sure.
He might already be at home by now.
- Did you wire his parents?
- Yes.
Good.
Fetch his two friends, Planet.
Baume and Macroix?
Very well, sir.
Baume, Sorgues and Macroix.
A fine trio they make!
Hope you didn't shout it from the rooftops, Mazeau?
I don't want this unfortunate incident to leak out.
I was incredibly discreet, sir.
- Yet...
- Thanks, you can go now.
Fine, sir.
Yet, I'm extraordinarily worried.
I told you to go, Mr. Mazeau!
Fine, sir.
I'm worried because
I'm firmly convinced... that little Sorgues was hypnotized.
I'm sure someone here has the evil eye, and I'll prove it!
"Hypnotized"!
Why not "bewitched"?
The occult sciences will end up turning Mazeau's head.
- But it might be true.
- What?
That someone's got the "evil eye".
Mr. Lemel, you're not being coherent!
What?
How dare you say that?
And if front of Mr. Donnadieu, the worst gossip in the school?
That's not very nice, sir.
That's not very kind.
I've had it with being spied on!
- One of these days...
- One of these days, what?
Come in.
You may go.
Fine, sir.
What are you doing here, Mazeau?
I'm thinking.
I'm more and more convinced that the boy was put to sleep.
Put to sleep?
I know what I'm talking about.
Hypnotism.
The eyes...
You can't understand, Mr. Planet, since you never sleep.
Maybe it's Planet who's got it.
Got what?
The evil eye.
The evil eye...
So you refuse to answer?
We're not refusing, we can't tell you.
'Cause we don't know anything.
Fine.
I appealed to your sense of honesty and loyalty...
I was wrong.
I swear Sorgues didn't tell us anything.
I swear it too.
Goodnight, headmaster.
Goodnight, Mr. Planet.
- Sweet dreams!
- Right...
- Good night, sir.
- Good night, Mr. Walter.
Good night.
Don't you find it odd that
Mr. Walter is going out, given that he rarely leaves the school?
You're the odd one, Planet.
A student's disappeared and now you see mystery everywhere!
There's mystery in books, but rarely in life.
Trust me.
- Good night, headmaster.
- Good night.
You shouldn't have come tonight!
Something's happened.
That's precisely why I came.
I doubt you really know what happened.
Obviously! No one tells me anything.
They use me, spy on me, watch my every move.
You have a persecution complex.
That's not good.
I've had it!
I feel like everyone suspects me!
It's unbearable.
There are times when I just wanna blurt it all out. It's suffocating me!
Blabbing might suffocate you even more.
It's fair to say it'd suffocate you for good.
What're you doing here?
I came to keep you company.
'Cause I know you don't like drinking alone.
- Cigarette?
- No, thanks.
Me neither.
What're you reading?
Albrecht Durer's biography.
A brilliant painter.
Other people's lives interest you?
Obviously, since I botched mine.
What're you moaning about?
You make a good living.
"A good living"!
No?
It's none of my business, but I'd love to know how you spend your money.
See these reproductions of Albrecht Durer?
Well, they're not reproductions!
They're originals.
That's how I spend my money.
Wonderful works of art!
Genuine masterpieces!
I don't like art; it's useless.
How dare you say such a thing?
Not so loud...
Careful.
Let's have a little game.
As you wish.
Do you really think art is useless?
Useless!
Once you hang it up, that's it.
It's over.
Huh?
I'm a simple man.
I like simple and fun things.
A knife, a box of matches...
These are simple, fun things.
With a knife, you can sharpen a pencil.
With matches, you can start a fire.
With a knife, you can also slit someone's throat.
With matches, you can burn a house down, or start a forest fire.
Huh?
What can you do with a painting?
Number 8.
I've got it.
I've got the 12 too.
Lottery games are just great!
To think some people bother playing chess!
- I�ve got that too.
- You must be cheating!
Number... 90.
I've... got it.
Number 78.
- I've got that too.
- Screw this game!
Mr. Lemel...
I came here today to tell you, as nicely as possible, that you absolutely must stop drinking.
Huh?
Alcohol's bad for you.
Makes you do stupid things, makes you say stupid things.
Unless you drink it like me.
That is: on occasion.
I demand to know what was done to that boy!
In a respectable boarding school, boys who don't sleep in their beds at night must be punished.
Let's start with roll call.
Baume? Present.
- Macroix?
- Present.
Sorgues?
Sorgues is declared missing.
Let's read the minutes.
"We disapprove of Sorgues's behavior,
"He wasn't supposed to leave without us.
"Especially without telling us.
"Without money or a sense of initiative, without a working knowledge of English,
"he's bound to fail.
Serves him right!"
Sign it.
I won't sign. I don't agree.
He was right to leave.
- Planet.
- Yes, Planet.
We'd better go back to bed.
Five cases of sparkling wine.
1, 2, 3, 4, 5. Good.
14 boxes of cookies. Good.
Four cases of lemonade.
Good.
Hey, where are the banners?
Got the mail, Mazeau?
I didn't have time for that, Mr. Planet!
I'm taking deliveries.
It doesn't look good.
Tomorrow's Saint Agil Day... and the banners aren't here yet!
The mail's on my desk. - I'll sort it.
Every year the banners get here at the last minute!
How hard can ordering banners be?
What poor organization!
How odd!
What?
A postcard for Baume, from America.
America? That's incredible.
And from New York to boot!
Signed "Able Coward".
What an unusual name!
"Able Coward"?
Looking for something, Mr. Walter?
Yes, is there a letter for me?
No, sir.
Thank you.
He asks about a letter every day, but he never gets any.
Bizarre...
Say!
Could this postcard be from Sorgues?
From Sorgues?
It's possible! He's been missing for two weeks.
But it's signed "Able Coward".
So? It could be a nickname.
So where's my lettuce?
You promised to get me some.
Don't worry, I'm on it.
Baume!
Yes, sir.
Thank you, sir.
It's incredible!
He's a bastard because he left alone, but he made it there, and that's just incredible!
Why's it addressed just to you?
Dunno...
How rotten!
He could've sent me one too.
Or addressed it to me too.
They'll question us.
Planet was gawking at me!
We've got a spy in our midst!
This is what we do to spies!
We rub their ears.
Then we tear 'em to pieces!
You're hurting me! You bullies!
You fat lumps!
Hey, here's your lettuce!
Thanks, sir.
- Macroix, out!
- But, sir...
Macroix, I order you to leave!
If it turns your crank...
How dare you...?
After I order you to leave, you dare say to me,
"if it turns your crank"?
If that's the way you want it, it's off to the headmaster's office for you!
If it turns your crank.
Gentlemen, after this unfortunate and unpleasant incident, we'll play "March of the Giants".
On my command!
Headmaster, when I noticed Macroix's absence,
I told myself:
"That's it, he's gone missing!"
Don't be alarmed, children.
You can sleep in peace.
Your schoolmate can't be very far.
But how extremely unfortunate!
Extremely, headmaster.
- Headmaster?
- What is it?
This afternoon, in the schoolyard,
Baume and Macroix said a lot of things.
We'll discuss that tomorrow.
It's time for these young ones to calm down... and get to sleep.
Come now!
Time for bed!
Headmaster.
I searched everywhere, and found absolutely nothing.
But I got to thinking, and something struck me.
A mysterious detail, which worries me more and more.
I think you'd better go to bed, Mazeau.
Yes, sir.
When Sorgues disappeared,
I found his lettuce on the floor.
Macroix asked for lettuce and he's disappeared too.
But now I can't find his lettuce.
Why is that?
That's the question.
Why lettuce, and for whom?
It's a mystery!
Where'd they go?
Pipe down!
Anyone still up in three minutes won't be attending the festivities tomorrow night.
What'd you tell the headmaster?
Tell me or I'll break your nose!
Don't. I gotta tell you something.
What?
You lost your postcard from America, right?
How would you know?
Did you swipe it?
No, but I know who did.
I asked for silence, remember?
Lights out, gentlemen.
Come in.
I want my postcard back, Mr. Walter.
Your postcard?
What postcard?
The postcard from America.
You picked it up off the ground.
Give it back.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Fine.
You don't trust me?
I trust no one here.
MARTIN THE SKELETON.
Sorgues, declared missing.
Macroix, declared missing.
- Baume...
- Present.
I knew I'd find you here.
"Martin the Skeleton, or the Adventures of the Able Cowards".
This is all very clear.
The other two ran away, and you planned on joining them.
You won't have to bother!
You're expelled from the boarding house.
You three were troublemakers.
Two are gone, and when you leave, there will be no more trouble!
I'll wire your guardian to come pick you up.
Till then, I advise you to behave.
You can attend the festivities tomorrow.
It's all I can do for you.
Hernani!
I tell you the time has come.
My time.
What will you do with me?
Your choice: the dagger or poison!
What have you done, poor wretch?
- You asked for it!
- What a horrible death!
No, Hernani, don't.
Everything's going dark, Do�a Sol.
Are you in pain?
I feel nothing.
Do you see lights in the shadows?
Not yet.
Do�a Sol!
Look at me.
Closer, still closer!
Is she dead?
I am accursed!
Magnificent!
I love it when the dead come back to take their bows!
It's the world turned upside down.
It should be the living paying homage to the dead.
To the buffet, children!
It was good, wasn't it?
Help yourselves.
Tragedies make me thirsty.
I believe you've had enough champagne, Mr. Lemel.
What would you want me to drink, headmaster?
I gotta leave the lemonade to the kids!
Besides, champagne isn't bad.
It's the teetotallers who are evil.
Right, Mr. Walter?
You look like death warmed over.
Actually, you look like a spy!
Please, Mr. Walter...
Please!
Stop making a spectacle of yourself!
Why?
I have my reasons for drinking.
I could tell you my reasons.
In fact, I will tell you... sir!
If you don't shut up, there'll be consequences!
Consequences?
I'm finished; a failure!
Consequences mean nothing to me.
Come, Mr. Lemel.
Let's go take a walk and get some air.
Why?
There's nothing left to drink, here.
I've set aside a few bottles in my room.
Mazeau, you're a peach!
You lead, I'll follow.
Come.
One shouldn't make a spectacle of oneself, headmaster.
Come, Mr. Lemel, come!
Yeah, I drink! So what?
If I were a success - a great artist, for example -
I'd be commended for it.
All the great men drank.
Even the Great Charlemagne!
Henri IV liked the sauce... too.
I know, I know.
Come, Mr. Lemel!
Ravaillac drank too!
Michelangelo... Robin...
Robinson Crusoe.
Du Guesclin.
Philip the Fair.
Come, Mr. Lemel!
Philip the Fair.
What a man!
He had the Knights Templar burnt at the stake, because they were spying on him.
Served them right!
They're spying on me too.
'Cause I got something in common with Philip the Fair.
Let me tell you...
Headmaster!
What's the commotion?
What's going on?
I don't know.
The fuses must've blown.
Get the emergency lamps.
Please remain calm!
Nobody move!
Headmaster!
Mr. Lemel fell.
The lamps, sir.
Mind the younger ones.
He fell over here.
- What happened?
- I don't know.
- Quick, get a doctor!
- No. Wait.
He's dead.
A horrible accident.
Yes.
An accident?
Yes, an accident.
It's awful.
He almost fell on top of me.
I was here and he fell there.
Close call!
Mr. Planet, please contact the chief of police.
Fine, sir.
Mazeau, replace the blown fuses.
- Fine, sir.
- Here. - Thanks.
Come on, boys. Time for bed.
Come on.
Go to bed, children.
- He fell from the second floor.
- Did you see him?
- He wasn't bleeding much.
- Yet he must have fallen on his head!
Since you're here, hold this.
I'm checking which fuses blew.
This one's OK.
This one too.
This one too.
It might be this one.
It was.
Now go to bed.
- The party was going so well!
- But ended so badly... - Alas!
You say Lemel drank a lot?
He's dead now - we can say it.
He was a drunk. Especially tonight.
I get it. He undoubtedly fell over the balustrade.
Mr. Boisse, could you pinpoint... the source of the blackout?
I'm not sure.
A short-circuit, no doubt.
We've always had... electrical problems here.
If you don't mind, I'd like to examine the exact place where he fell.
A simple formality, before
I can give you a burial certificate.
Come on, gentlemen!
Time to get up!
Up!
What's the holdup?
Quick!
Time to get up, Baume!
Baume!
Where's Baume?
- Have you seen Baume?
- No, sir.
Baume's gone.
That's the third one!
Already finished?
Don't wolf it down!
Easy...
Briquet's right, this isn't normal.
After Sorgues... Macroix.
And after Macroix, Baume. Who's next?
I'm gonna write my folks.
I don't wanna stay here;
I'd rather go to public school.
Say!
Maybe there's a vampire here.
- A vampire?
- Yeah, a bloodsucking vampire!
I don't wanna stay here...!
- I want to leave.
- Calm down now!
It's getting stifling now.
If you ask me, it's a bad omen.
Trust me: all hell's gonna break loose.
Hell's gonna break loose!
Like a thunderstorm!
- What?
- War.
That's three missing now...
I came to get my postcard.
And I found it.
Don't come any nearer!
Stay where you are or I'll scream!
I'll scream!
You're crazy!
What's wrong with you?
I don't trust you.
I don't trust anyone here.
You're scared of me?
I wasn't before, but I guess I was wrong.
Don't come any closer!
Stay where you are!
Fine, I won't budge.
How'd you get in here?
Everyone's looking for you.
They think you've gone missing too.
I'm not missing.
I just pretended to be.
There are things I need to find out.
And I will.
- First of all, why'd you take my card?
- Why?
Because Sorgues's disappearance seemed strange to me.
I wanted to know...
Know what?
Who'd sent that postcard.
Sorgues sent it!
No, it wasn't Sorgues.
He may not have mailed it, but he's the one who wrote it.
I recognize his handwriting.
- Only...
- Only what?
He didn't add Martin's secret sign.
Which means he was telling us something's wrong!
I know what's up!
Sorgues didn't go to America voluntarily.
He was kidnapped!
I have more proof.
Sorgues was writing a novel, the only thing he cared about.
He left without it!
So what?
It means he didn't have the time to take it with him!
I don't know who took him away, but I'll find out.
Have a close look at that card.
And you'll see... that the stamp is a fake.
This card did not come from New York.
It's just been dropped in the school mailbox, by someone who wants us to believe... that Sorgues has left for America.
Who might that be?
I don't know yet, but I'm trying to find out.
Maybe it's you.
Are you still suspecting me?
Can't you see I'm trying to help you?
Maybe together we'll be able to solve the mystery.
I don't trust you.
You got so mad yesterday!
You threatened Mr. Lemel.
When someone picks on me,
I become violent.
Yes. Very violent!
That's why Mr. Lemel fell.
What are you saying?
You're crazy...
Do you really believe that?
I was just joking.
I know it wasn't you.
I was by your side when Lemel was murdered.
You have no evidence.
Here's your evidence!
Look, a fork.
A short circuit is very easily made.
Look.
And it's easy to push a drunk man, when it's dark.
I'm astonished.
Who do you suspect?
I already told you.
Everybody.
But me.
And you.
So, you trust me?
As far as the fork is concerned, you can't be blamed. I don't know about the rest.
Saint-Agil. What a curious boarding school this is!
I was making fun of Sorgues, when he said that he saw someone coming out of the wall.
I was wrong. He must have seen something in the science classroom.
And that's why he's missing.
I'll investigate tonight.
What kind of investigation?
I don't know yet, but I'll find out.
- What?
- I don't know.
Well, I'll go with you.
As you wish, but be careful... if you do anything stupid, everyone will hear me.
I won't be taken away as easily as the others!
Mr. Walter, what do you think of Philip the Fair?
Philip the Fair?
What are you talking about?
I'm asking you what you think of him.
Philip the Fair was a French king.
Lemel said he was like
Philip the Fair.
Then he fell.
Do you know what
Philip the Fair used to do?
Not much, I believe.
He was a counterfeiter.
That's odd...
Sorgues and Macroix have been kidnapped... because they've seen something!
Sorgues saw a man appear and disappear out of the wall, right here.
Out of the wall?
That's ridiculous!
You know what we look like?
Well...
We look like two idiots.
Sorgues saw a man appear and disappear!
- Enough!
- No!
I can't stand listening to this, over and over.
"Appear and disappear!"
I feel like I'm going crazy, or like I'm becoming an idiot.
Footsteps!
Come. We won't find anything here.
We will.
You're so stubborn!
I'm staying.
Go ahead and stay.
If you want something, you know where you can find me.
Philip the Fair!
What is it?
Nothing. I'm invoking the moon.
It's a Mexican tradition.
- Really?
- Yes.
...and Sorgues, held captive by the counterfeiters in the old Mexican mill, suddenly started invoking the moon.
And the moon said:
Able Coward.
"Able Coward"?
What does it mean?
Leave me alone!
I told you that I hate it when someone reads over my shoulder when I'm writing!
It wouldn't matter; I can't read!
- Why are you looking, then?
- I like it.
Well, I don't!
OK...
This boy's got a wild imagination!
How can he come up with all this stuff?
I already told you.
I don't like people reading over my shoulder.
And you can't even read!
It's not my fault if I can't read!
I've had it - this is my mill!
Your mill?
It's a fine one, for sure!
Nothing but ruins!
Ruins!
Ruins and dust!
Is it my fault if the industrial mills ruined me?
If my wife ran off with a big-shot miller?
Next you'll say it's my fault if you got into counterfeiting!
I had to do something...
I get bored when I do nothing.
Thank God the boy's here!
When I read his novel, it's the best part of the day.
Leave me alone.
Don't read over my shoulder!
I wanna know what happens.
Can't you read it aloud?
If it makes you happy...
"In this old and stuffy
"Mexican mill,
"poor little Sorgues was being held captive.
"It was Bernadin, known as Boulder Bernadin
"because he was so hard-headed
"who was put in charge of guarding him,
"because he was a stupid and illiterate brute.
"But deep down, he wasn't really a bad Mexican."
That's me, right?
He's talking about me in his book?
It's wonderful!
I'll get you some coffee for that!
"There was also Alexis the miller.
"He smoked a pipe all day long, like a poor devil.
"In his absence, his accomplices...
"talked behind his back, calling him a cuckold and laughing about it."
Now that's funny!
And acutely observed.
"The third..."
That would be me.
"seemed one of those people who talk all the time...
"and do nothing at all."
That's a keen observation too.
Enough already!
How can I write with all this talking?
I can't concentrate!
I need pens, paper and blotter!
Don't get upset now!
Take this.
It will cheer you up a bit.
It's strong, but I added extra milk.
Coffee's good for people who do brain work.
Thanks, Bernadin.
You're very kind.
I'll continue. "One fine day, Sorgues found out that "Three Stars",
"the students' nickname for their drawing teacher
" - due to his cognac drinking habit -
"was also part of the gang."
Three Stars...
Poor Lemel!
He won't draw the banknotes any more.
- It was you who murdered him?
- You're crazy!
I have never killed anyone.
Never.
Besides, I wasn't in charge of killing him.
I only had to keep an eye on him.
Wait for me there!
You're too young.
Go to bed and sleep.
What are you doing here?
I think it's dangerous.
- You want to rescue him?
- Sure.
Go get the others.
Tell them to wait for us on the first floor. Quick.
Go quietly!
Someone's talking? Who's talking?
Now they talk in the middle of the night!
I'm telling you: I don't want to go!
Shut up or I'll cut out your tongue!
Follow me.
I'm dreaming...
How funny, I'm dreaming...
I see Baume. Baume...
The third one to go missing.
So, what's this mill?
Just an ordinary mill.
Don't worry.
Get down.
Are we going to get in?
The most important thing is getting Sorgues and Macroix out of there.
- Have you seen Macroix?
- No. Maybe they've separated them.
Macroix is tough.
They must have locked him in the basement.
I want to get out of here!
Silence!
You could keep quiet without me having to ask you.
I want to get out of here.
- Go away.
- Those trees scare me!
Stay, then. But shut up!
- What are we going to do?
- We need a strategy.
Position yourselves for battle.
The third dormitory, the elders, will be our shock troop. To the front!
The second dormitory, our backing troop, to the right!
The first dormitory, the youngsters, will be our reserves!
To the back, quick!
This is what they call
"night manoeuvres"!
Silence!
Why did they lock them up in a mill?
To turn the millstone.
Like slaves!
Holy cow!
My butt is cold!
'Cause you're scared.
Do you understand?
We have to surprise the enemy.
Anyone want to volunteer?
To do what?
To come with me.
Into the mill?
No. I'm too scared.
- I'm going.
- Very well.
Now, everybody walk to the door.
Quietly.
Are you leaving?
Yes.
I don't like murders.
What's that?
Some copies.
Worthless samples.
A souvenir of Lemel.
You made up your mind, then?
Are you leaving?
Yes. Any counterfeiting business always ends up badly.
Not a word. Don't insist!
Look!
And there are three times more in the back!
These kids have some guts!
We are besieged by Lilliputians!
What do you want?
Sorgues!
Sorgues! Nothing less!
And Macroix!
Macroix?
Who's Macroix?
Our friend.
He's not here!
I've never seen him.
Oh, your friend! Sure!
How would you know?
He's here. In the basement!
Sure, in the basement!
Then go get him right now!
Right. Let's go get him.
Come on, to the basement!
Come.
Come on, to the basement!
The basement is 10 km away.
We're going to the station, what did you think?!
Leave it to me. Come on.
Did they hurt you?
They're nice fellows.
I had them under my thumb.
Who took you away?
You'll never guess.
- Baume, they have escaped!
- Who? - The gangsters!
They won't go far. Quick!
What is it?
All the students are missing!
It's impossible.
He's out of his mind!
He's completely crazy...
Mazeau!
Mazeau!
The dormitories are empty.
All the students are missing!
Huh?
Stop! Stop!
They're here!
What's going on?
This time it�s war!
So?
- Don't you want to come in?
- No.
Why?
We're scared; we're talking about a crime.
And there's a murderer.
We don't want to be taken away.
Well, OK.
I'll go in with Sorgues.
Stop people coming out.
What if it's the murderer?
Take him prisoner.
Silence, now!
Sir!
Headmaster, sir!
It's disgraceful.
They're crazy!
It's disgraceful.
They forced us to go with them.
They say that you have taken
Sorgues away, that you have killed Mr. Lemel and Macroix!
Baume said that!
Then he said...
What did he say?
That you killed Lemel because he was going to talk.
This kid is a mythomaniac.
He's getting his revenge because I threw him out!
He took me away when I told him that I had seen a mysterious man in the science classroom.
When he dismissed me,
I went out that door.
Then he caught me from that one, while I was passing by.
Where I found the lettuce!
Headmaster... the evil eye... it's you!
Lemel's murderer, it's you.
And you've killed Macroix!
No. I wouldn't dare...
You've lost, Boisse.
Yes.
I've lost.
But I don't know anything about Macroix.
I couldn't hurt a kid.
I don't know where he is.
That's the truth.
I'm sorry, I fell asleep.
You're excused.
- Macroix is back!
- You see!
This is good news.
People in town were starting to talk.
I didn't want to tell you, sir, but you understand...
Macroix!
Baume, Sorgues!
How are you?
Where were you?
I went to America.
Are you serious?
Well, almost.
- Almost?
- I was in Le Havre, in Normandy.
I embarked secretly.
They caught me.
- It's incredible. Tell us more...
- Boisse is going to scold me!
You shouldn't worry about Boisse any more.
- No way...
- Yes!
Macroix?
- How do you do?
- How are you?
- Very well, thank you.
- I'm glad to see you again.
Mr. Walter...
Do you want to attend our secret meeting in the science classroom?
Certainly. With pleasure.
- Hi, Martin.
- Hi, Martin.
Mr. President.
Mr. Walter, Able Coward.
The Able Cowards secret society, as a token of gratitude for your services, has decided to nominate you
Chairman of Honor!
I give you the floor.
My friends, thank you.
Mr. President,
I'm very honored.
The missing Boys of Saint-Agil based on the novel by
Pierre Very
Directed by
Christian-Jaque
The Saint-Agil boys' school, where the action takes place, does not exist in reality and the characters are imaginary.
We simply wanted to provide viewers with an opportunity to remember a time when they too were thirsty for amazing adventures.
Saint-Agil
Boys boarding school
Dormitory
- Hi, Martin.
- Hi, Martin.
Hi.
We were up to Article 7.
We'll read it together.
Then we'll discuss it.
It's pointless. Once we decide to do something, we have to do it.
Not just "do it", but "accomplish it".
Which means studying the question in depth.
Thanks.
Planning it out.
Silence, please!
I need to reread the report.
It's just a bunch of papers!
And it's freezing in here.
Don't you think, Martin?
What did you say?
Nothing, I was talking to Martin.
With all these drafts, he's gonna get a cold.
Leave Martin be!
It's true!
Our skin and flesh act as a kind of overcoat.
But he's naked all year round.
- I demand silence.
- Fine. I'll shut up!
OK, I'll read it.
Report on the secret activities of the Able Cowards Club.
Statutes. Article 1.
The Club members' goal is to set sail for the USA.
Article 2:
The Club comprises three members.
Let's do a roll call.
Number one?
Present.
Number two?
Present.
Number three?
Present.
I'll continue.
Weekly night-time meetings will be held in the science classroom, presided over by Martin the Skeleton.
Article 4:
Members have sworn not to set sail individually.
I repeat: I say we strike that article.
Too late, you took an oath!
If you had a chance to go alone, wouldn't you take it?
- I'd go with you, or not at all!
- So you say...
Can I read the last notes?
Sure, go ahead.
A: Which airline do we choose?
B: How do we board?
C: What will we do once we reach free America?
D: Remember to study the St Etienne
Standard Catalog of Military Firearms.
E...
Footsteps.
It's Planet again.
Planet? Always Planet!
Is he a sleepwalker?
Not a sleepwalker, an insomniac.
It's the same thing.
So we�ll adjourn... till next week for the report?
And we won't set sail for a decade.
You're always griping!
No. I'm just saying.
You're "just saying" what?
If Columbus had worked this slow, he'd never have gotten anywhere.
You think he didn't study the map before leaving?
Study the map?
He took an egg, balanced it on its tip and took off in his ship.
That's how he did it.
And I'll do the same.
Now I'm going to bed!
Me too. Aren't you coming?
No. I wanna work on my novel.
Your "novel"!
What's this novel about?
It's about all the adventures we'll have once we get there.
Once we get there...
How depressing to hear this!
- Are you coming?
- Yes.
Chapter IV
Where the three Able Cowards, after making (and losing) a fortune, arrive at the Mexican border.
Second meeting with the mysterious man.
Why are you back so soon?
I saw something.
Sorgues?
I hope they didn't catch you!
No, but I saw something.
Something amazing!
Who's talking?
Who's talking in the middle of the night?
Unbelievable.
Tell us in the morning.
We'll pretend we're sick.
We'll be able to talk at the infirmary.
Yes.
Unbelievable!
What's all this chatter?
In the middle of the night?
I've never heard of such a thing!
I believe you're talking to yourself, my friend.
I'm sorry, Mr. Planet.
You're forgiven.
Come, gentlemen!
Come on!
Time to get up!
And be quiet about it!
Get up, gentlemen!
Come on!
Get a move on!
What're you waiting for?
Didn't you hear the reveille?
- Yes, sir.
- Well?
All that talking kept me awake last night.
So I wasn't dreaming!
There was talking...
Who was talking?
- It was... - Who?
- I don't know, sir.
I fell asleep right away.
Macroix.
- What're you doing?
- I'm sick.
- What is it?
- Red robin.
- What?
- My throat's red.
It hurts, as if a bird were pecking at it.
- Sir!
- What?
I'm sick too.
What have you got?
Same thing as Macroix.
It burns, it hurts!
- It hurts, sir!
- You too?
It hurts here.
How very curious.
- Sir?
- What is it?
I think I've got it.
- What?
- Red robin.
No, this can't be!
Morning, Mr. Planet.
Morning, Donnadieu.
I trust you slept well.
Please keep your jokes to yourself.
Jokes?
I suffer from insomnia, and every morning people ask me how I slept.
It's stupid! And uncalled-for.
Good morning.
Good morning, Lemel.
Good morning, Donnadieu.
Good morning, Planet. Slept well, Planet?
No, Mr Lemel. I didn't.
I never sleep.
You understand? Never!
Do I ask if your wine's well fermented?
You and your insinuations...
I'm just saying aloud what people say behind your back: that you drink... alone, in secret!
You're imagining things, Mr. Planet.
You have no character.
You're an oddball, a crackpot.
A sleepwalker, in fact.
As such, I despise you.
He despises me!
Did you hear, Mr. Donnadieu?
That lush despises me!
A man who drinks in secret and who reels along in public.
What? I, reel along?
- I dare you to repeat that!
- Don't start fighting, gentlemen.
Between Frenchmen, when war is imminent?
When the enemy's at our gate?
Good morning, gentlemen.
I trust you slept well?
Yes, headmaster.
I mean... no.
I mean... a little.
- Good morning, gentlemen.
- Good morning.
Good morning, Mr. Walter.
That Mr. Walter doesn't look like a very nice man!
Indeed.
Gentlemen!
He looks like a perjurer to me.
Furthermore, he scares the children.
I beg your pardon, gentlemen!
Walter is undoubtedly a fine man.
He hasn't been here long, but his work is beyond reproach.
He may be slightly reserved, but he's an excellent living language teacher.
I don't like foreigners.
You shouldn't generalize, Mr. Lemel.
Like in everything, there are good ones and bad ones.
Well, I'm sure he's a bad one.
Good or bad, it's always with foreigners that we'll go to war.
Can't you watch where you're going?
Sorry, I didn't see you!
That's no excuse to step on my feet.
You gotta look before running.
You gotta look!
You hear me?
Yes. I'm not deaf.
What? Talking back to me?
Dirty little rascal.
I'll teach you some respect, you hear me?
You're here to obey, not to talk back!
You hear me? To obey!
You good-for-nothing!
Excuse me, Mr. Lemel.
You shouldn't yell at the kids.
They're fragile.
Children are sensitive.
Yelling scares them.
Think you don't scare them, with that mug of yours?
Trust me, Mr. Lemel, yelling is no way to teach children.
If I started yelling in your ear, to teach you respect...
If I started yelling like this...!
Gentlemen! What's going on here?
Well, headmaster, this lunatic is always provoking me.
Excuse me, headmaster.
Mr. Lemel is exaggerating.
I was just explaining something.
I'd like a word with you, Mr. Walter.
I'm telling you.
It's like he came out of the wall.
Then he disappeared again.
"Like he came out of the wall."
We get it!
You dragged us here for that?
I tell you: it's true!
Better quit writing novels; you're going batty!
You can laugh as much as you want, but something odd is going on around here!
Gentlemen!
Have you quite finished?
This isn't the visiting room!
We're not talking, we're gargling.
Then gargle in silence!
There! Now stay put.
You're not sick!
Why did you come here?
I lied!
It's my turtle that's sick.
We have to cure it.
- What's the problem?
- It won't eat.
- What do you feed it?
- Nothing.
- Why?
- I don't know what turtles eat!
- They eat lettuce.
- Lettuce? Thanks.
Who's that little boy?
He's younger than the others.
Mr. Brezillier's son.
The teacher who died.
He was a widower, so the headmaster and I decided to keep the boy on.
Brezillier was a strange man.
He dabbled in the occult sciences.
You believe in that stuff?
Not really...
I do.
I'm telling you this for your own good.
You're not likable enough, and you're aggressive.
Which explains the other teachers' hostility towards you.
Their hostility, headmaster, doesn't bother me in the least.
I'm here to work, so I work.
I ask for nothing more.
It's not just about work, here at Saint-Agil.
You have to make yourself likable too.
And it seems that even the children...
I mean...
You bother them...
You scare them.
Me?
I scare the children?
Mr. Mazeau!
Got any gum?
Gum?
Another American invention!
Eating rubber... it's ridiculous!
Do I eat my suspenders?
Got any lettuce?
- Lettuce? - Yes.
- Not here, no.
- I'll get you some later, son.
- Thanks, Mr. Mazeau.
Why did you ask for lettuce?
For the little one's turtle.
Are you eavesdropping again?
I wasn't!
This yard belongs to everyone.
But you're the only one who'll get a good spanking! Beat it!
They wanna beat me up, sir!
Not big enough to fight back?
It's three against one!
He's lying; we'd never gang up on him!
They would. They're always threatening me.
They always stick together!
Who knows what they're up to!
They even plot at night...
They're up to no good!
I never asked you.
Why are you telling me all this?
'Cause they're up to no good.
It's not nice to spy on your peers, Fermier.
If you don't stop, we won�t be friends anymore.
I'm warning you: we won't be friends at all.
I'd like to ask you a question.
Will you answer sincerely?
- Yes, sir.
- Yes, sir.
Do I scare you?
No, sir.
- No.
- No, sir.
That's what I've been told.
Then they're liars.
We're not scared of anything, anyway.
Thank you.
I didn't dare tell him, but sometimes he does scare me.
Why?
I don't know, he's kinda weird.
Silence, please.
For today's dictation, I've chosen a writer who's not on the curriculum, but I thought it'd be interesting, to get away from the classics.
His name is Wells. W - E - L - L - S.
H. G. Wells, who wrote many novels, the most famous being...
"The Invisible Man."
In English: "The Invisible Man."
First, I'll read a few excerpts.
The invisible man, is a man... who's found a way to disappear at will.
Obviously, this is just science fiction, therefore inconceivable.
No it's not; I saw it!
What could he have seen?
What's that, Sorgues?
You read this book?
No, sir, but I saw one.
"One" what?
A man who can disappear.
Silence, please!
Sorgues is losing his marbles!
Silence!
Sorgues...
I'm warning you.
I don't like that kind of joke.
Now for the dictation.
Chapter one.
The strange man's arrival.
The stranger came early in February...
I tell you I saw him!
Who spoke?
Was it you, Sorgues?
Yes, sir.
I said I saw him, as clearly as I see you.
- Who?
- The man who appears and disappears.
Here we go again!
Gentlemen!
Silence, please!
Please, keep quiet.
Sorgues...
I'm sorry, but I won't have you mocking me like this.
I'm throwing you out.
He's lost his marbles!
Maybe he really did see something.
Like what? The Headless Horseman?
I demand silence!
Go see the headmaster and give him this.
I thought changing the curriculum a bit would make you happy.
To my great regret,
I see I was wrong.
Therefore, today's dictation won't be "The Invisible Man", but the life of Shakespeare.
So Mr. Walter threw you out because you were clowning around, and you invented this far-fetched story as an excuse?
No, sir. I assure you.
It just came blurting out.
But I swear I saw that man!
A "supernatural" man?
And you just happened to see him in the science classroom.
At night.
And what were you doing there?
Huh?
Thorny question, huh?
I can't tell you, sir.
It's a secret.
A secret?
You have too vivid an imagination.
It'll play nasty tricks on you.
Here. Go back to class.
Why bother asking for lettuce?
Now that you've finished, we'll move on to another type of exercise.
Visual memory.
Take a quick look at both sides of this banknote.
Don't linger.
Quickly.
I repeat: to learn to draw well, visual memory is essential.
Grevin, for example:
What did you notice about the banknote?
It was a 100 Francs note.
And what'd you notice, Billard?
A man with an anvil.
And a woman holding a shovel.
- And...
- And what?
A hammer and an anvil.
Very poor visual memory!
And lots of numbers...
And what did you notice?
I noticed five women.
Maybe six...
Yes, sir: six women.
What's so funny?
They're naked, sir!
There's no point in going on.
You're looking without seeing.
That's why real masterpieces go unnoticed.
No one even bothered looking at the artist's signature.
The signature of the engraver.
Yet I once knew a brilliant engraver.
Do you know how he exploits his brilliance?
He teaches a bunch of idiots!
What's so funny, Macroix?
Always the Three Musketeers.
The same three rebels!
I'll lick you into shape!
On your feet, Macroix!
Baume, on your feet!
Sorgues, on your feet!
Sorgues, on your feet!
- Where is Sorgues?
- He's not here, sir.
He left without asking permission?
No, sir, he was never here.
Sorgues wasn't here for drawing class?
Where is he, then?
Sorgues's gone missing.
- Well?
- Nothing.
We asked everybody in town, but there's no sign of him.
As if he'd disappeared into thin air!
Let's not get ahead of ourselves, gentlemen.
I'm convinced the boy simply ran away.
Possibly.
Sorgues is an impressionable young man.
Maybe Mr. Walter was a bit too aggressive... when he threw the boy out of his classroom.
Please, Mr. Lemel!
I only did my duty.
Children are sensitive, Mr. Walter.
You should go easy on them.
Please don't speak to me in that tone.
I'm only stating my opinion.
It's no surprise that a student runs away from a boarding school, when one of the teachers scares the students!
Say that again and...!
Mr. Walter...
Get a hold of yourself.
Sorry, sir.
But there are times... when I can't help myself.
May I be excused, sir?
And to think some people refuse to believe... that there'll be war!
Please, Donnadieu, leave us in peace!
Sorry, sir.
Look what I found in Sorgues's desk, sir.
Very curious.
Travel brochures, catalogs, fares...
I believe our young friend premeditated his actions.
But he won't get far, that's for sure.
He might already be at home by now.
- Did you wire his parents?
- Yes.
Good.
Fetch his two friends, Planet.
Baume and Macroix?
Very well, sir.
Baume, Sorgues and Macroix.
A fine trio they make!
Hope you didn't shout it from the rooftops, Mazeau?
I don't want this unfortunate incident to leak out.
I was incredibly discreet, sir.
- Yet...
- Thanks, you can go now.
Fine, sir.
Yet, I'm extraordinarily worried.
I told you to go, Mr. Mazeau!
Fine, sir.
I'm worried because
I'm firmly convinced... that little Sorgues was hypnotized.
I'm sure someone here has the evil eye, and I'll prove it!
"Hypnotized"!
Why not "bewitched"?
The occult sciences will end up turning Mazeau's head.
- But it might be true.
- What?
That someone's got the "evil eye".
Mr. Lemel, you're not being coherent!
What?
How dare you say that?
And if front of Mr. Donnadieu, the worst gossip in the school?
That's not very nice, sir.
That's not very kind.
I've had it with being spied on!
- One of these days...
- One of these days, what?
Come in.
You may go.
Fine, sir.
What are you doing here, Mazeau?
I'm thinking.
I'm more and more convinced that the boy was put to sleep.
Put to sleep?
I know what I'm talking about.
Hypnotism.
The eyes...
You can't understand, Mr. Planet, since you never sleep.
Maybe it's Planet who's got it.
Got what?
The evil eye.
The evil eye...
So you refuse to answer?
We're not refusing, we can't tell you.
'Cause we don't know anything.
Fine.
I appealed to your sense of honesty and loyalty...
I was wrong.
I swear Sorgues didn't tell us anything.
I swear it too.
Goodnight, headmaster.
Goodnight, Mr. Planet.
- Sweet dreams!
- Right...
- Good night, sir.
- Good night, Mr. Walter.
Good night.
Don't you find it odd that
Mr. Walter is going out, given that he rarely leaves the school?
You're the odd one, Planet.
A student's disappeared and now you see mystery everywhere!
There's mystery in books, but rarely in life.
Trust me.
- Good night, headmaster.
- Good night.
You shouldn't have come tonight!
Something's happened.
That's precisely why I came.
I doubt you really know what happened.
Obviously! No one tells me anything.
They use me, spy on me, watch my every move.
You have a persecution complex.
That's not good.
I've had it!
I feel like everyone suspects me!
It's unbearable.
There are times when I just wanna blurt it all out. It's suffocating me!
Blabbing might suffocate you even more.
It's fair to say it'd suffocate you for good.
What're you doing here?
I came to keep you company.
'Cause I know you don't like drinking alone.
- Cigarette?
- No, thanks.
Me neither.
What're you reading?
Albrecht Durer's biography.
A brilliant painter.
Other people's lives interest you?
Obviously, since I botched mine.
What're you moaning about?
You make a good living.
"A good living"!
No?
It's none of my business, but I'd love to know how you spend your money.
See these reproductions of Albrecht Durer?
Well, they're not reproductions!
They're originals.
That's how I spend my money.
Wonderful works of art!
Genuine masterpieces!
I don't like art; it's useless.
How dare you say such a thing?
Not so loud...
Careful.
Let's have a little game.
As you wish.
Do you really think art is useless?
Useless!
Once you hang it up, that's it.
It's over.
Huh?
I'm a simple man.
I like simple and fun things.
A knife, a box of matches...
These are simple, fun things.
With a knife, you can sharpen a pencil.
With matches, you can start a fire.
With a knife, you can also slit someone's throat.
With matches, you can burn a house down, or start a forest fire.
Huh?
What can you do with a painting?
Number 8.
I've got it.
I've got the 12 too.
Lottery games are just great!
To think some people bother playing chess!
- I�ve got that too.
- You must be cheating!
Number... 90.
I've... got it.
Number 78.
- I've got that too.
- Screw this game!
Mr. Lemel...
I came here today to tell you, as nicely as possible, that you absolutely must stop drinking.
Huh?
Alcohol's bad for you.
Makes you do stupid things, makes you say stupid things.
Unless you drink it like me.
That is: on occasion.
I demand to know what was done to that boy!
In a respectable boarding school, boys who don't sleep in their beds at night must be punished.
Let's start with roll call.
Baume? Present.
- Macroix?
- Present.
Sorgues?
Sorgues is declared missing.
Let's read the minutes.
"We disapprove of Sorgues's behavior,
"He wasn't supposed to leave without us.
"Especially without telling us.
"Without money or a sense of initiative, without a working knowledge of English,
"he's bound to fail.
Serves him right!"
Sign it.
I won't sign. I don't agree.
He was right to leave.
- Planet.
- Yes, Planet.
We'd better go back to bed.
Five cases of sparkling wine.
1, 2, 3, 4, 5. Good.
14 boxes of cookies. Good.
Four cases of lemonade.
Good.
Hey, where are the banners?
Got the mail, Mazeau?
I didn't have time for that, Mr. Planet!
I'm taking deliveries.
It doesn't look good.
Tomorrow's Saint Agil Day... and the banners aren't here yet!
The mail's on my desk. - I'll sort it.
Every year the banners get here at the last minute!
How hard can ordering banners be?
What poor organization!
How odd!
What?
A postcard for Baume, from America.
America? That's incredible.
And from New York to boot!
Signed "Able Coward".
What an unusual name!
"Able Coward"?
Looking for something, Mr. Walter?
Yes, is there a letter for me?
No, sir.
Thank you.
He asks about a letter every day, but he never gets any.
Bizarre...
Say!
Could this postcard be from Sorgues?
From Sorgues?
It's possible! He's been missing for two weeks.
But it's signed "Able Coward".
So? It could be a nickname.
So where's my lettuce?
You promised to get me some.
Don't worry, I'm on it.
Baume!
Yes, sir.
Thank you, sir.
It's incredible!
He's a bastard because he left alone, but he made it there, and that's just incredible!
Why's it addressed just to you?
Dunno...
How rotten!
He could've sent me one too.
Or addressed it to me too.
They'll question us.
Planet was gawking at me!
We've got a spy in our midst!
This is what we do to spies!
We rub their ears.
Then we tear 'em to pieces!
You're hurting me! You bullies!
You fat lumps!
Hey, here's your lettuce!
Thanks, sir.
- Macroix, out!
- But, sir...
Macroix, I order you to leave!
If it turns your crank...
How dare you...?
After I order you to leave, you dare say to me,
"if it turns your crank"?
If that's the way you want it, it's off to the headmaster's office for you!
If it turns your crank.
Gentlemen, after this unfortunate and unpleasant incident, we'll play "March of the Giants".
On my command!
Headmaster, when I noticed Macroix's absence,
I told myself:
"That's it, he's gone missing!"
Don't be alarmed, children.
You can sleep in peace.
Your schoolmate can't be very far.
But how extremely unfortunate!
Extremely, headmaster.
- Headmaster?
- What is it?
This afternoon, in the schoolyard,
Baume and Macroix said a lot of things.
We'll discuss that tomorrow.
It's time for these young ones to calm down... and get to sleep.
Come now!
Time for bed!
Headmaster.
I searched everywhere, and found absolutely nothing.
But I got to thinking, and something struck me.
A mysterious detail, which worries me more and more.
I think you'd better go to bed, Mazeau.
Yes, sir.
When Sorgues disappeared,
I found his lettuce on the floor.
Macroix asked for lettuce and he's disappeared too.
But now I can't find his lettuce.
Why is that?
That's the question.
Why lettuce, and for whom?
It's a mystery!
Where'd they go?
Pipe down!
Anyone still up in three minutes won't be attending the festivities tomorrow night.
What'd you tell the headmaster?
Tell me or I'll break your nose!
Don't. I gotta tell you something.
What?
You lost your postcard from America, right?
How would you know?
Did you swipe it?
No, but I know who did.
I asked for silence, remember?
Lights out, gentlemen.
Come in.
I want my postcard back, Mr. Walter.
Your postcard?
What postcard?
The postcard from America.
You picked it up off the ground.
Give it back.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Fine.
You don't trust me?
I trust no one here.
MARTIN THE SKELETON.
Sorgues, declared missing.
Macroix, declared missing.
- Baume...
- Present.
I knew I'd find you here.
"Martin the Skeleton, or the Adventures of the Able Cowards".
This is all very clear.
The other two ran away, and you planned on joining them.
You won't have to bother!
You're expelled from the boarding house.
You three were troublemakers.
Two are gone, and when you leave, there will be no more trouble!
I'll wire your guardian to come pick you up.
Till then, I advise you to behave.
You can attend the festivities tomorrow.
It's all I can do for you.
Hernani!
I tell you the time has come.
My time.
What will you do with me?
Your choice: the dagger or poison!
What have you done, poor wretch?
- You asked for it!
- What a horrible death!
No, Hernani, don't.
Everything's going dark, Dona Sol.
Are you in pain?
I feel nothing.
Do you see lights in the shadows?
Not yet.
Dona Sol!
Look at me.
Closer, still closer!
Is she dead?
I am accursed!
Magnificent!
I love it when the dead come back to take their bows!
It's the world turned upside down.
It should be the living paying homage to the dead.
To the buffet, children!
It was good, wasn't it?
Help yourselves.
Tragedies make me thirsty.
I believe you've had enough champagne, Mr. Lemel.
What would you want me to drink, headmaster?
I gotta leave the lemonade to the kids!
Besides, champagne isn't bad.
It's the teetotallers who are evil.
Right, Mr. Walter?
You look like death warmed over.
Actually, you look like a spy!
Please, Mr. Walter...
Please!
Stop making a spectacle of yourself!
Why?
I have my reasons for drinking.
I could tell you my reasons.
In fact, I will tell you... sir!
If you don't shut up, there'll be consequences!
Consequences?
I'm finished; a failure!
Consequences mean nothing to me.
Come, Mr. Lemel.
Let's go take a walk and get some air.
Why?
There's nothing left to drink, here.
I've set aside a few bottles in my room.
Mazeau, you're a peach!
You lead, I'll follow.
Come.
One shouldn't make a spectacle of oneself, headmaster.
Come, Mr. Lemel, come!
Yeah, I drink! So what?
If I were a success - a great artist, for example -
I'd be commended for it.
All the great men drank.
Even the Great Charlemagne!
Henri IV liked the sauce... too.
I know, I know.
Come, Mr. Lemel!
Ravaillac drank too!
Michelangelo... Robin...
Robinson Crusoe.
Du Guesclin.
Philip the Fair.
Come, Mr. Lemel!
Philip the Fair.
What a man!
He had the Knights Templar burnt at the stake, because they were spying on him.
Served them right!
They're spying on me too.
'Cause I got something in common with Philip the Fair.
Let me tell you...
Headmaster!
What's the commotion?
What's going on?
I don't know.
The fuses must've blown.
Get the emergency lamps.
Please remain calm!
Nobody move!
Headmaster!
Mr. Lemel fell.
The lamps, sir.
Mind the younger ones.
He fell over here.
- What happened?
- I don't know.
- Quick, get a doctor!
- No. Wait.
He's dead.
A horrible accident.
Yes.
An accident?
Yes, an accident.
It's awful.
He almost fell on top of me.
I was here and he fell there.
Close call!
Mr. Planet, please contact the chief of police.
Fine, sir.
Mazeau, replace the blown fuses.
- Fine, sir.
- Here. - Thanks.
Come on, boys. Time for bed.
Come on.
Go to bed, children.
- He fell from the second floor.
- Did you see him?
- He wasn't bleeding much.
- Yet he must have fallen on his head!
Since you're here, hold this.
I'm checking which fuses blew.
This one's OK.
This one too.
This one too.
It might be this one.
It was.
Now go to bed.
- The party was going so well!
- But ended so badly... - Alas!
You say Lemel drank a lot?
He's dead now - we can say it.
He was a drunk. Especially tonight.
I get it. He undoubtedly fell over the balustrade.
Mr. Boisse, could you pinpoint... the source of the blackout?
I'm not sure.
A short-circuit, no doubt.
We've always had... electrical problems here.
If you don't mind, I'd like to examine the exact place where he fell.
A simple formality, before
I can give you a burial certificate.
Come on, gentlemen!
Time to get up!
Up!
What's the holdup?
Quick!
Time to get up, Baume!
Baume!
Where's Baume?
- Have you seen Baume?
- No, sir.
Baume's gone.
That's the third one!
Already finished?
Don't wolf it down!
Easy...
Briquet's right, this isn't normal.
After Sorgues... Macroix.
And after Macroix, Baume. Who's next?
I'm gonna write my folks.
I don't wanna stay here;
I'd rather go to public school.
Say!
Maybe there's a vampire here.
- A vampire?
- Yeah, a bloodsucking vampire!
I don't wanna stay here...!
- I want to leave.
- Calm down now!
It's getting stifling now.
If you ask me, it's a bad omen.
Trust me: all hell's gonna break loose.
Hell's gonna break loose!
Like a thunderstorm!
- What?
- War.
That's three missing now...
I came to get my postcard.
And I found it.
Don't come any nearer!
Stay where you are or I'll scream!
I'll scream!
You're crazy!
What's wrong with you?
I don't trust you.
I don't trust anyone here.
You're scared of me?
I wasn't before, but I guess I was wrong.
Don't come any closer!
Stay where you are!
Fine, I won't budge.
How'd you get in here?
Everyone's looking for you.
They think you've gone missing too.
I'm not missing.
I just pretended to be.
There are things I need to find out.
And I will.
- First of all, why'd you take my card?
- Why?
Because Sorgues's disappearance seemed strange to me.
I wanted to know...
Know what?
Who'd sent that postcard.
Sorgues sent it!
No, it wasn't Sorgues.
He may not have mailed it, but he's the one who wrote it.
I recognize his handwriting.
- Only...
- Only what?
He didn't add Martin's secret sign.
Which means he was telling us something's wrong!
I know what's up!
Sorgues didn't go to America voluntarily.
He was kidnapped!
I have more proof.
Sorgues was writing a novel, the only thing he cared about.
He left without it!
So what?
It means he didn't have the time to take it with him!
I don't know who took him away, but I'll find out.
Have a close look at that card.
And you'll see... that the stamp is a fake.
This card did not come from New York.
It's just been dropped in the school mailbox, by someone who wants us to believe... that Sorgues has left for America.
Who might that be?
I don't know yet, but I'm trying to find out.
Maybe it's you.
Are you still suspecting me?
Can't you see I'm trying to help you?
Maybe together we'll be able to solve the mystery.
I don't trust you.
You got so mad yesterday!
You threatened Mr. Lemel.
When someone picks on me,
I become violent.
Yes. Very violent!
That's why Mr. Lemel fell.
What are you saying?
You're crazy...
Do you really believe that?
I was just joking.
I know it wasn't you.
I was by your side when Lemel was murdered.
You have no evidence.
Here's your evidence!
Look, a fork.
A short circuit is very easily made.
Look.
And it's easy to push a drunk man, when it's dark.
I'm astonished.
Who do you suspect?
I already told you.
Everybody.
But me.
And you.
So, you trust me?
As far as the fork is concerned, you can't be blamed. I don't know about the rest.
Saint-Agil. What a curious boarding school this is!
I was making fun of Sorgues, when he said that he saw someone coming out of the wall.
I was wrong. He must have seen something in the science classroom.
And that's why he's missing.
I'll investigate tonight.
What kind of investigation?
I don't know yet, but I'll find out.
- What?
- I don't know.
Well, I'll go with you.
As you wish, but be careful... if you do anything stupid, everyone will hear me.
I won't be taken away as easily as the others!
Mr. Walter, what do you think of Philip the Fair?
Philip the Fair?
What are you talking about?
I'm asking you what you think of him.
Philip the Fair was a French king.
Lemel said he was like
Philip the Fair.
Then he fell.
Do you know what
Philip the Fair used to do?
Not much, I believe.
He was a counterfeiter.
That's odd...
Sorgues and Macroix have been kidnapped... because they've seen something!
Sorgues saw a man appear and disappear out of the wall, right here.
Out of the wall?
That's ridiculous!
You know what we look like?
Well...
We look like two idiots.
Sorgues saw a man appear and disappear!
- Enough!
- No!
I can't stand listening to this, over and over.
"Appear and disappear!"
I feel like I'm going crazy, or like I'm becoming an idiot.
Footsteps!
Come. We won't find anything here.
We will.
You're so stubborn!
I'm staying.
Go ahead and stay.
If you want something, you know where you can find me.
Philip the Fair!
What is it?
Nothing. I'm invoking the moon.
It's a Mexican tradition.
- Really?
- Yes.
...and Sorgues, held captive by the counterfeiters in the old Mexican mill, suddenly started invoking the moon.
And the moon said:
Able Coward.
"Able Coward"?
What does it mean?
Leave me alone!
I told you that I hate it when someone reads over my shoulder when I'm writing!
It wouldn't matter; I can't read!
- Why are you looking, then?
- I like it.
Well, I don't!
OK...
This boy's got a wild imagination!
How can he come up with all this stuff?
I already told you.
I don't like people reading over my shoulder.
And you can't even read!
It's not my fault if I can't read!
I've had it - this is my mill!
Your mill?
It's a fine one, for sure!
Nothing but ruins!
Ruins!
Ruins and dust!
Is it my fault if the industrial mills ruined me?
If my wife ran off with a big-shot miller?
Next you'll say it's my fault if you got into counterfeiting!
I had to do something...
I get bored when I do nothing.
Thank God the boy's here!
When I read his novel, it's the best part of the day.
Leave me alone.
Don't read over my shoulder!
I wanna know what happens.
Can't you read it aloud?
If it makes you happy...
"In this old and stuffy
"Mexican mill,
"poor little Sorgues was being held captive.
"It was Bernadin, known as Boulder Bernadin
"because he was so hard-headed
"who was put in charge of guarding him,
"because he was a stupid and illiterate brute.
"But deep down, he wasn't really a bad Mexican."
That's me, right?
He's talking about me in his book?
It's wonderful!
I'll get you some coffee for that!
"There was also Alexis the miller.
"He smoked a pipe all day long, like a poor devil.
"In his absence, his accomplices...
"talked behind his back, calling him a cuckold and laughing about it."
Now that's funny!
And acutely observed.
"The third..."
That would be me.
"seemed one of those people who talk all the time...
"and do nothing at all."
That's a keen observation too.
Enough already!
How can I write with all this talking?
I can't concentrate!
I need pens, paper and blotter!
Don't get upset now!
Take this.
It will cheer you up a bit.
It's strong, but I added extra milk.
Coffee's good for people who do brain work.
Thanks, Bernadin.
You're very kind.
I'll continue. "One fine day, Sorgues found out that "Three Stars",
"the students' nickname for their drawing teacher
" - due to his cognac drinking habit -
"was also part of the gang."
Three Stars...
Poor Lemel!
He won't draw the banknotes any more.
- It was you who murdered him?
- You're crazy!
I have never killed anyone.
Never.
Besides, I wasn't in charge of killing him.
I only had to keep an eye on him.
Wait for me there!
You're too young.
Go to bed and sleep.
What are you doing here?
I think it's dangerous.
- You want to rescue him?
- Sure.
Go get the others.
Tell them to wait for us on the first floor. Quick.
Go quietly!
Someone's talking? Who's talking?
Now they talk in the middle of the night!
I'm telling you: I don't want to go!
Shut up or I'll cut out your tongue!
Follow me.
I'm dreaming...
How funny, I'm dreaming...
I see Baume. Baume...
The third one to go missing.
So, what's this mill?
Just an ordinary mill.
Don't worry.
Get down.
Are we going to get in?
The most important thing is getting Sorgues and Macroix out of there.
- Have you seen Macroix?
- No. Maybe they've separated them.
Macroix is tough.
They must have locked him in the basement.
I want to get out of here!
Silence!
You could keep quiet without me having to ask you.
I want to get out of here.
- Go away.
- Those trees scare me!
Stay, then. But shut up!
- What are we going to do?
- We need a strategy.
Position yourselves for battle.
The third dormitory, the elders, will be our shock troop. To the front!
The second dormitory, our backing troop, to the right!
The first dormitory, the youngsters, will be our reserves!
To the back, quick!
This is what they call
"night manoeuvres"!
Silence!
Why did they lock them up in a mill?
To turn the millstone.
Like slaves!
Holy cow!
My butt is cold!
'Cause you're scared.
Do you understand?
We have to surprise the enemy.
Anyone want to volunteer?
To do what?
To come with me.
Into the mill?
No. I'm too scared.
- I'm going.
- Very well.
Now, everybody walk to the door.
Quietly.
Are you leaving?
Yes.
I don't like murders.
What's that?
Some copies.
Worthless samples.
A souvenir of Lemel.
You made up your mind, then?
Are you leaving?
Yes. Any counterfeiting business always ends up badly.
Not a word. Don't insist!
Look!
And there are three times more in the back!
These kids have some guts!
We are besieged by Lilliputians!
What do you want?
Sorgues!
Sorgues! Nothing less!
And Macroix!
Macroix?
Who's Macroix?
Our friend.
He's not here!
I've never seen him.
Oh, your friend! Sure!
How would you know?
He's here. In the basement!
Sure, in the basement!
Then go get him right now!
Right. Let's go get him.
Come on, to the basement!
Come.
Come on, to the basement!
The basement is 10 km away.
We're going to the station, what did you think?!
Leave it to me. Come on.
Did they hurt you?
They're nice fellows.
I had them under my thumb.
Who took you away?
You'll never guess.
- Baume, they have escaped!
- Who? - The gangsters!
They won't go far. Quick!
What is it?
All the students are missing!
It's impossible.
He's out of his mind!
He's completely crazy...
Mazeau!
Mazeau!
The dormitories are empty.
All the students are missing!
Huh?
Stop! Stop!
They're here!
What's going on?
This time it's war!
So?
- Don't you want to come in?
- No.
Why?
We're scared; we're talking about a crime.
And there's a murderer.
We don't want to be taken away.
Well, OK.
I'll go in with Sorgues.
Stop people coming out.
What if it's the murderer?
Take him prisoner.
Silence, now!
Sir!
Headmaster, sir!
It's disgraceful.
They're crazy!
It's disgraceful.
They forced us to go with them.
They say that you have taken
Sorgues away, that you have killed Mr. Lemel and Macroix!
Baume said that!
Then he said...
What did he say?
That you killed Lemel because he was going to talk.
This kid is a mythomaniac.
He's getting his revenge because I threw him out!
He took me away when I told him that I had seen a mysterious man in the science classroom.
When he dismissed me,
I went out that door.
Then he caught me from that one, while I was passing by.
Where I found the lettuce!
Headmaster... the evil eye... it's you!
Lemel's murderer, it's you.
And you've killed Macroix!
No. I wouldn't dare...
You've lost, Boisse.
Yes.
I've lost.
But I don't know anything about Macroix.
I couldn't hurt a kid.
I don't know where he is.
That's the truth.
I'm sorry, I fell asleep.
You're excused.
- Macroix is back!
- You see!
This is good news.
People in town were starting to talk.
I didn't want to tell you, sir, but you understand...
Macroix!
Baume, Sorgues!
How are you?
Where were you?
I went to America.
Are you serious?
Well, almost.
- Almost?
- I was in Le Havre, in Normandy.
I embarked secretly.
They caught me.
- It's incredible. Tell us more...
- Boisse is going to scold me!
You shouldn't worry about Boisse any more.
- No way...
- Yes!
Macroix?
- How do you do?
- How are you?
- Very well, thank you.
- I'm glad to see you again.
Mr. Walter...
Do you want to attend our secret meeting in the science classroom?
Certainly. With pleasure.
- Hi, Martin.
- Hi, Martin.
Mr. President.
Mr. Walter, Able Coward.
The Able Cowards secret society, as a token of gratitude for your services, has decided to nominate you
Chairman of Honor!
I give you the floor.
My friends, thank you.
Mr. President,
I'm very honored.
Shall I get you a taxi, sir?
- No, thank you. Please send to Hotel Mazarin.
- Yes, sir.
- There.
- Thank you, sir.
Don't put that away.
Give me something please.
- I'm desperate.
- Begging's not permitted here. Get out.
Please. It is always good fortune to give alms upon entering city.
- Thanks, brother.
- Come on. Move on. Get out.
All right.
All right.
Hello. Yes.
Oh, Mr. Chan.
Yes. Have only just arrived.
May see you please?
I'm leaving for the show now.
I think I've really discovered something.
I have a record of all the...
Please.
No more talk now.
Will see you after show at Le Singe Bleu. Thank you.
Good-bye.
See you later.
Please. To this address.
- Are you all right, sir?
- Yes.
- Please drive to address given.
- Yes, sir.
Charlie Chan!
- Yes, please.
- Well, give me your hat and your coat.
Gee, it's great to see you again.
- Much pleasure to see you.
- Go right on in.
- Here, sit down. Make yourself at home.
- Thank you so much.
Dad said in his letter you were here for a holiday.
Yes, only business in Paris is vacation.
Well, you deserve one after that job in London.
All the papers were full of it.
Papers exaggerate importance of humble efforts.
I wired Dad I'd take good care of you.
We're gonna have a great time.
So kind.
But first one little item of business.
- Must open account at Lamartine Bank.
- Oh, that's easy.
I'll arrange an appointment for you to meet the head oft he bank himself.
- Paul Lamartine?
- None other. I work there, you know.
Dad's one of the directors, so it occurred to him that I should go and do likewise.
- You are bank director?
- Oh, no. In 20 years maybe.
Dad had the old-fashioned idea that
I ought to start at the bottom and work up.
Yes, young bird must learn to fly.
Every day from 9:00 till 5:00.
But after that, my time's my own.
And I'm going to spend it getting you into mischief.
Mischief sounds nice.
Then you will arrange interview... when?
- Tomorrow morning at 10:00.
- That is very good.
Oh, you're not going.
How about a little drink?
No, thank you.
Some other time.
- Oh, wait a minute, Charlie.
Here are some friends of mine.
One of them is very important.
- Yes?
- I want you to meet her.
What is this?
What do you want?
- Boo! We want a drink.
Don't we, old partner?
We certainly do.
- Hello, darling.
- I'll put you down right here.
May I introduce Mr. Chan?
Miss Lamartine.
- How do you do?
- Miss Jacquard.
- How do you do?
- And Mr. Max Corday.
- How do you do?
- Mr. Chan is from Honolulu an old friend of my father's here on a vacation.
Ah?
[ Imitating Chinese Accent]
Me very happy know you.
Maybe you "likee havee" little "dlinkee".
Very happy to make acquaintance of charming gentleman.
Me no "likee dlinkee" now...
"Pelaps" later.
- Oh, now I know I need a drink.
Help yourself.
There's a cold bottle right there.
- Good.
- Me "likee dlinkee" now.
- All "light", Ming Toy.
Charlie, Yvette is the important one.
- Much pleasure to meet.
- Thank you.
- Youth tonic for old blood.
- Why, you're not old at all.
Maybe not heart, but joints sometime argue matter.
- Charlie, we're engaged.
- Oh, that is good. May I congratulate?
- Thank you.
- Company, forward march.
- Company, halt. One, two.
In excitement of happy party, will not forget appointment at bank?
Oh, Victor Descartes never forgets. Do I, darling?
Leave it to Victor always to get more business in the family bank.
- Why not?
- To Mr. Chan's holiday in Paris.
[ Chuckles ]
Thank you so much.
You will excuse, please? Must go now.
Ah, wait a minute. Oh, don't move, Mr. Chan.
Hold it just a minute now...
- Oh, he's at it again.
- That's right, Mr. Chan. Hold it there.
A few swift bold strokes.
There you are.
A little souvenir of your first night in Paris.
Most clever, excellent likeness of rotund Chinese.
- I may keep?
By all means. Why, someday those little sketches of Max Corday... may be priceless treasures.
- Uh-huh.
- Thank you so much.
Must not intrude any longer.
- Oh, come along, Charlie. Why not join us?
- Yes, do.
- We'd love to have you.
- Some other time, please.
Have heard so much about thrilling dancer at Le Singe Bleu.
Have desire to see.
Great. I know.
If Mr. Chan won't join us, we'll join him.
- Good idea?
- Great idea!
Absolutely. Then, well, here's to Le Singe Bleu.
[ All ]
Le Singe Bleu.
-This is it! Le Singe Bleu!
- Folks, here we are.
- Humpty Dumpty, come on.
- Come on, Mr. Chan.
- Thank you so much.
Come on, darling.
Oh, here, here! Look out, you, where you're going.
You think the sidewalk belongs to you?
Aw, none of that now or I'll call a policeman.
Wait just a minute, old man. Here.
Here, old fella. Run along and buy yourself a drink. And don't be so belligerent.
- We're not the enemy you know.
- Thank you.
What a horrible man!
Yes, most unfortunate.
Well, pardon the interruption, folks.
Let's not have it spoil the fun.
Come on.
- Come on.
- Let's go inside.
- He's at it again.
- All right?
- Very good.
- Do you like?
- [Charlie] Very nice.
And you... How do you like my bold strokes, my darling?
Not too bold.
Oh, that was lovely.
Too bad you don't dance, Mr. Chan.
Mud turtle in pond more safe than man on horseback.
And now, ladies and gentlemen, we're going to have that little star... whose interpretation of the dance Apache...
I know will thrill you...
Mademoiselle Nardi.
- [ Man ] What in the world could that be?
Victor, what was that?
- What's the matter?
- Please stand back. Take your seats.
Please! Please!
Please!
- Very important.
- [Woman ] Well, what's happened?
[Woman ]
She's dying! Get a doctor!
Nardi.
Nardi.
Look... in... apartment...
Yes, yes?
Nardi. Nardi!
Am so sorry.
[Man ] Don't ask any questions.
Open the door.
[Man #2]
Yes, sir.
- That'll be all.
- Yes, sir.
Well, a pretty swell apartment.
Look for all letters, papers, photographs, address books.
I'll examine them at my office.
Find anything?
The usual things... and a recipe for apple pie.
Mmm.
Great work, Laverne.
Chinese incense burner.
Reminds me, my old friend
Charlie Chan's in town.
I wonder what he's doing.
He solved the stable murder mystery in London, didn't he?
Yes.
Great work it was, too.
Yes.
Great work it was, too.
You'd better come along with me.
I'll leave Pierre to keep an eye out in the hall.
Thank you so much.
Come out, please.
Who are you?
Hello, Pop! What's the matter?
Did I scare you?
Gosh, it's good to see you.
Heart most joyful to welcome.
[ Chuckles ]
Honorable mother send me cable from Honolulu... saying big boss send you to Europe on buying trip.
Did not expect to see worthy offspring so soon.
- Business good?
- Fine.
I was in Rome when
I heard you were coming here.
So I finished my business in a hurry and hopped a train.
- Now we can see Paris together.
- Yes, yes. [ Chuckles ]
Most welcome.
Say, you're looking great.
Most fortunate to be looking at all.
What do you mean?
Attempt on life in last hour... indicate this humble person unwelcome in gay city.
Say, I thought you were here on a vacation.
Vacation only bluff. Am here on case for London banking house.
Let me stay and help you, Dad.
No.
You here for good time.
Go find same.
Joy in heart more desirable than bullet.
She was honorable coworker... murdered tonight before we could have talk.
That settles it, Dad. If somebody's gunning for you, I'm staying here.
- No.
- Please.
Thank you so much.
But you must admit there is foundation for my doubt... that you came here especially to see me.
I am not easily deceived, you know.
You old darling, you know I can twist you right around my finger.
Well, how much is it today?
Oh, shall we be quite reasonable and say, uh, a thousand francs?
Anything... just to be rid of you.
There.
Receipt, please.
[Man Chuckles]
Well, hello, stranger.
Where have you been?
- How are you, Albert?
- Uh, this requires your signature.
- I'll look it over.
- I haven't seen you in ages.
- Won't you come in and visit me for a while?
-Yes, of course.
Now, young lady, I'm going to make you give an account of yourself.
Sit down.
Cigarette?
Thank you.
- You used to come in and see me quite often.
- That was a long time ago.
- I've missed you.
- Now, you're not going to start that again.
Please don't.
You know Victor and I are engaged.
Yes. Some fellows have all the luck.
Have you, uh, told him about us?
He knows we went around quite a bit.
But does he know about your letters?
Letters?
Oh, you mean those foolish, silly love letters.
Might not sound so foolish and silly to Victor.
- You haven't kept them.
- I treasure them.
Albert, you shouldn't.
You must tear them up.
You've got to.
I've got a better idea.
I'll deliver them to you in person some evening... at my apartment.
I didn't think you could be so contemptible.
Well, it was just an idea.
- Wait here. Observe closely.
- Observe what?
Don't know. Good detective never ask what and why until after he see.
Okay, Pop.
I mean, yes, sir.
- Oh, good morning, Miss Lamartine.
- Good morning, Mr. Chan.
- May I help you, sir?
- Yes, thank you.
Where can I find
Mr. Victor Descartes?
Right over there, sir.
Third window.
You young fool, the statement's wrong.
It's a swindle.
I always knew this place was a nest of thieves.
I always knew this place was a nest of thieves.
-Well, if there's some mistake...
- I'll have every one of you in jail... starting with that swine Dufresne.
I tell you, I've been cheated.
I demand to see Dufresne.
If l can't see him,
I'll see Lamartine himself.
- What's the trouble here?
- Mr. Xavier is complaining that-
I tell you, I demand to see the managing director.
I've been grossly swindled, and it's an outrage.
- I want to see Dufresne.
- I am the office manager.
Oh, I don't want to do business with small fry-
- That'll do.
- Take you hands off me!
Don't be rough with him.
Just put him outside.
You imbeciles!
I'll have the law on you for this.
You can't do this to me.
Why, I'm an old soldier of the Republic.
You've cheated me and robbed me! Pigs!
- Get along or I'll call the police.
- You mean, I'll call the police.
I'll get justice.
Then I'll land you all in jail.
- Good morning.
- Oh, hello, Charlie.
- Mr. Latouche.
- Yes, what’s it?
- This is Mr. Chan.
- Oh, Mr. Chan. Yes.
Mr. Descartes told me about your appointment with Mr. Lamartine.
I am the office manager.
Will you come this way?
I must apologize for such an unpleasant scene.
- Apology not necessary.
- Xavier, poor fellow-
He's hardly human, an unfortunate relic of the war. Shell shock.
Xavier. [ Chuckles ]
He has odd name.
Yes, yes. Xavier.
Marcel Xavier.
Of course, the bank, as a rule, doesn't deal with such petty accounts as his... but Mr. Lamartine's sympathetic nature-
He's such a fine man, sir.
Kindness in heart better than gold in bank.
- Excuse me. Come in.
- Thank you.
Oh, Mr. Lamartine's in conference, sir, with Mr. Dufresne.
That's quite all right, Bedell.
After you, Mr. Chan.
Mr. Lamartine, this is Mr. Chan.
You had an appointment.
- How are you, sir?
- So glad to meet.
This is Mr. Dufresne,
Mr. Chan.
- How do you do?
- Much pleasure to meet.
Won’t you sit down,
Mr. Chan?
Thank you so much.
Well, Mr. Chan, what can I do for you?
You're here on a holiday,
I understand.
Uh, business too.
About, uh, bonds of this bank.
Our bonds are the best investment in France today, eh, Dufresne?
None better. And now we have a new issue off ours, Mr. Chan.
Pardon, please.
Uh, business about last bond issue.
Please forgive deception about vacation.
- Uh, business very serious for you.
- What do you mean?
Clients in England who buy many of these bonds... send me here to investigate fraud in your bank.
Fraud... in my bank?
These will explain.
Note, numbers are same... but printing not quite.
There must be some mistake.
Hmm, the printing varies unquestionably.
It is a forgery.
Signature not forgery.
It is my signature.
How can such a thing be possible?
Someone must have included these with the real bonds at the time you signed them.
There are six pairs.
Each of a different thousand.
That means that this business has run through the entire issue.
[Lamartine]
What are we going to do?
Investigate.
That is why I am here.
If this becomes known, there will be a panic.
Thousands of people will suffer.
Clients in London of same opinion.
Secrecy most necessary.
Even police must not know.
What do you want us to do, Mr. Chan?
First step, must have complete list of all sales of this issue.
You shall have it within 24 hours.
I'll make a check-up of the other banks immediately.
Good. Meantime, am stopping at Hotel Mazarin.
- Well, can I drop you off?
- No, thank you. Have car waiting.
I'll let you know what I find.
Be assured, we'll help you to get to the bottom of this, Mr. Chan.
Must turn up many stones to find hiding place of snake.
- Good day.
- Good day.
- We must follow.
- Who? Him?
Important fox must not know hounds pursue.
Charlie, my friend.
Well, how are you? How are you?
Now, what are you up to in Paris?
- Up to holiday. See Paris, die happy.
- Good.
Well, it'll only take a moment to deposit my monthly insult, and then we'll make a day of it.
We'll talk shop at the department, have a good time... and then tonight, the best dinner in France.
- [ Chuckling ] Excuse, please-
- Now, no excuses.
I'm a dangerous man to offend, and if you don't come along, I shall be offended.
Only foolish man waste words when argument is lost.
[ Chuckles ]
Excuse me.
Then we can take in Egypt and the pyramids in the moonlight and all that.
And after Egypt, well... if there's any place you'd like to go, we might take that in too.
I suppose the bride-to-be has something to say about our honeymoon trip.
Say, you act as though you were in Egypt right now.
- You haven't heard a word I've said.
- Oh, of course I have.
You were saying that, uh-
- Well, what were you saying?
- Is anything the matter?
- Oh, nothing, really.
- Have I said anything?
Oh, of course not.
I need some sleep, that's all.
We've been out late every night this week.
Well, if that's all it is, you can sleep late tomorrow.
- Come on. Let's go somewhere and dance.
- No. My mind's made up.
I'm going to get some sleep.
Tomorrow night then?
- I suppose I could be persuaded.
- [ Chuckles ]
I persuaded you to become engaged to me, didn't I?
Of course I had nothing to say about that.
Nothing at all, except to say yes.
Home, James.
Oh, home it is then.
Oh, here we are.
I'll get my key.
- Good night.
- Good night.
- Say it.
- I won't say it... because you know perfectly well that I love you.
Good night.
Taxi!
Number 8, Lafayette Place.
- Hello.
- [ Man ] Is that you, Dufresne?
- Oh, uh, hello.
- Did that money come in today?
Yes, uh, two million francs.
It's in my box at the bank.
Why didn't you meet me as we planned?
With that Chinese snooping around?
Are you certain that money's in your box?
Of course I'm certain.
What are you driving at?
Then why are you taking the midnight plane to Switzerland?
Why, uh, to head off Garon before he tries to sell... that last series of bonds you printed, that's why.
We've got to be more careful until this thing cools down.
I think you're lying to me, Dufresne.
- I'm not lying. I'm using my head.
- [ Hangs Up]
Hello?
Hello?
Hello?
Oh, uh, it's you.
Come in.
I had fallen asleep while reading.
- I'm sorry I disturbed you.
- That's perfectly all right. I'm glad you came.
- Won’t you sit down?
- No, thanks.
I've come for my letters.
May I have them?
Why, certainly. You didn't believe
I was really going to keep them.
-Well, what else was I to think?
- I'll prove that you're wrong.
Then you're really going to give them back to me?
Of course. They're right here in my desk waiting for you.
I'm not the big bad wolf you thought I was.
There you are, my dear.
- [Yvette Screams]
- What was that noise?
I heard a pistol shot in there.
- Will you please go and get a policeman?
-Yes, sir.
- I'm pretty sure.
- What's the matter in here?
-[Woman ] I heard a pistol.
-[Woman #2] I thought it was in the street.
[Woman ]
I'm pretty sure it was in here.
Now get in here.
Keep moving.
Keep moving.
- [ Gasps ]
- What's happened here?
It's murder.
- She killed him.
- I didn't kill him!
- Look, here's the gun.
- Don't touch that!
- Don't let her get away.
- I'm not trying to get away!
Police headquarters.
[Charlie]
Then you have theory as to who kill Nardi?
During the last few weeks this girl has been seen with some of the richest men in town.
Why, listen to these names-
Emanuel Castaneda from the Argentine.
Paul Dorville, French financier.
Albert Dufresne, banker.
And a half a dozen others.
Men worth millions.
And one of these do murder?
Oh, no, Charlie. No.
Here, let me show you.
A beautiful girl like Nardi couldn't go around with the men she did... without stepping on some other woman's toes.
All right, somewhere, sometime she aroused the jealousy... of some discarded sweetheart who determined to kill her.
A woman familiar with Nardi's act.
A clever, intelligent woman... smart enough to conceal and execute a fairly ingenious crime.
It's a perfect case.
- Hmm. Only one small detail missing.
-Yes, what's that?
Murder.
Perfect case, like perfect doughnut, has hole.
[ Chuckles ] Oh, I see.
Same old pessimist, aren't you?
Optimist only sees doughnut.
Pessimist sees hole.
Yes, he's here.
Just a moment, please.
I beg your pardon, gentlemen.
- Police headquarters on the telephone for you.
- Oh, thank you, Pierre.
Excuse me, Charlie, please.
Thank you.
Hello?
Yes.
Renard speaking.
Who?
Where?
Yes, yes, of course.
I'll come myself at once.
Yes.
Pierre, my check please.
- Yes, sir.
-Well, Charlie... here's where I plug the hole in your doughnut.
Not satisfied with killing the woman who stole her sweetheart... our murderess has now shot the man who threw her over.
And this woman is?
Yvette Lamartine, daughter of the banker.
- Must make correction, please.
- Well, go ahead.
Impossible Miss Lamartine kill Nardi.
- Impossible? Why?
- Last night she with me when Nardi killed.
- With you?
- That is hole in first doughnut.
Oh.
Oh, thank you.
All right, Charlie, it was just a guess.
But there is no hole in this one.
They have caught her... practically red-handed.
- We go see?
- Right.
- You have all their names and addresses?
-Yes, sir.
You'll be called when your testimony is required. No one is to leave the city.
You may go now.
So you continue to refuse to tell me the real reason for your visit to this apartment?
I merely dropped in to say hello.
We were friends.
Friends? How long had you known Mr. Dufresne?
Since he became my father's assistant two years ago.
Oh, come now, Miss Lamartine.
Please, let's be reasonable.
You don't expect us to believe your fantastic story of a mysterious, black-gloved hand...
- which you say threw a gun into this room.
- I told you the truth.
You were discovered with a gun in your hand from which one shot had been fired.
You made a desperate effort to escape.
Aren't those the facts?
- Why, I was-
- Aren't those the facts?
- Yes.
- Good. Now we're getting somewhere.
How long had you been on intimate terms with Albert Dufresne?
I'd rather not understand you.
How long have you been in the habit of paying visits at this apartment at night alone?
- I refuse to answer such a question.
- Very well then.
Another little question-
Why did you kill Albert Dufresne?
I didn't kill him.
I told you what happened.
The shot was fired from in there, and someone threw the gun into this room.
You came here tonight because he was going away. He was tired of you.
- In a fit of jealousy, you shot him.
- It isn't true!
I didn't do it!
I didn't kill him!
- Ready, Gaston?
- Ready, sir.
Fingerprint her.
Have Marchand compare them.
Yes, sir.
Over here, please.
This way, please.
Place the three fingers of the right hand on this pad.
Then press them on this paper.
- Come on.
- [ Laughing ]
Albert! Whoo-hoo!
Come on, honey.
Albert-
It's all right.
- Say, what's going on around here?
- You'll be properly informed.
Now, look here.
I come to see my friend Albert... and I find the place surrounded by hundreds of policemen.
What is this?
Wewant to see Albert.
Albert Dufresne is dead.
Murdered.
[Gasps]
Did I... understand you to say...
Albert has been murdered?
Yes. You say you are a friend of his.
A very good friend.
Laverne, take down this gentleman's answers to my questions.
That's all, thank you.
[Whispering ]
You have good reason for coming here?
[Whispering ]
I didn't kill him, Mr. Chan. I didn't.
Very easy to believe you.
But facts now very necessary.
You are engaged to very nice young man.
You must have had reason for presence here.
Why, I-
Desire to help if can.
Then... will you take these for me?
- Shall I destroy?
- Please. Please.
Answer no more questions.
Silence big sister to wisdom.
- [ Buzzer Buzzes ]
- See who that is.
- Why, is something wrong?
- Step inside, please.
You may go now.
I beg your pardon... but this murder has been a great shock to me.
Murder?
- Not Mr. Dufresne.
- Come in, please.
I'll answer all your questions.
Good evening, Mr. Chan.
- When did it happen? Who did it?
- Just who are you?
I'm Henri Latouche of the Lamartine Bank,
Mr. Dufresne's close associate.
I came in to see him on a matter of importance connected with-
Sit down, please.
I'll question you later.
"2-8-C-G"-
Hmm.
- All through, Gaston?
- All through, sir.
- Well?
- The fingerprints on the gun are hers, all right.
There's a small scar on her right thumb which makes identification easy.
Good. All right, that's all.
Take her away.
Why,
Miss Lamartine-
Well, Charlie?
You believe young lady guilty?
Don't you?
Hasty conclusion like gunpowder- easy to explode.
Oh. All right, Charlie. Let's have it.
What have you found?
Answer in there.
But I've already inspected this room.
[ Chuckles ]
And I looked out here too.
- Find nothing?
- Not a thing.
No burnt match, no monogrammed cigarette stub... not even threads torn from a tweed suit.
Uh, flowers maybe say something.
Flowers?
What do you mean?
Well, by George, look at that.
That stem must have been broken during the last hour.
Why, the flower's not even wilted.
It looks as if someone may have come up here by this balcony.
That is hole in second doughnut.
Mmm.
Comfort of bed now most desirable.
I see.
You can't take it, Charlie, can you?
Charlie Chan very sleepy.
This is terrible,
Mr. Chan, terrible.
Isn't there something that I can do?
Just take it easy, old man.
I'll be with you in just a moment.
It's an open-and-shut case.
In spite of your doughnuts, that young lady is going to find it very difficult... to explain her fingerprints on that gun.
Very difficult to explain hole in doughnut, but hole always there.
[ Laughing ]
We'll see about that.
- [ Speaking Chinese]
- [ Speaking Chinese]
I know you did not kill anybody.
I'm sorry, Pop. But I got a lot to tell you.
I made notes.
- Tell me on way.
- Okay, Pop.
- Say, Pop, I-
- Wait, please. You watch here all evening?
- Sure. And I saw-
- Please.
Perhaps you see man on crutches come out.
Maybe after you hear gunshot?
Yeah. The same guy I saw at the bank this morning. How'd you know?
- You follow?
- I'll say I did.
He got into an old taxi and I trailed it.
I never let it out of my sight.
He stopped about five miles from here... a limousine pulled up alongside and he got into it.
- Can you beat that?
- [ Charlie ] What happened next?
[Son ] I stepped on the gas and got close enough to spot the car's number.
But it was a high-powered baby and it got away from me.
Mmm. Eyes of kitten open only after nine days.
Wait a minute!
That isn't all.
When I came back to Dufresne's apartment,
I saw the same limousine.
I checked the license plate.
Some guy came out with a girl, they got into it and drove away.
- Man have walking stick?
- Yes.
Girl have small, round hat?
- That's them. Do you know 'em?
- Man is artist.
He draws very funny pictures.
Why, hello, Mr. Chan.
Come in. Glad to see you.
- Here. Let me have your hat.
- Thank you so much.
Well, this is a surprise.
This time I'm not going to ask you to have a "dlinkie," but I want you to have a drink.
- Much pleasure.
- Sit down, please.
Thank you so much.
You know, Mr. Chan,
I'm all broken up about this thing.
Albert Dufresne was one of my closest friends.
Can you imagine Yvette Lamartine doing a thing like that?
Excuse, please.
Miss Lamartine did not kill.
Guilty man is crippled soldier named Marcel Xavier.
Maybe you can give me information.
I?
[ Chuckles ]
Why, gladly, of course, if I can.
But, uh, why me?
Tonight, after murder...
Xavier come from Dufresne apartment, depart in taxicab... and later get into your car.
My car?
You mean to say that this man used my car? For what?
Maybe to take off disguise.
I don't understand.
Oh, I see.
This Xavier character is only a disguise for the murderer.
He commits his crime... escapes in a taxi... uses somebody's car in which to take of fhis makeup... and then steps out in his true character with no one the wiser.
That's not a bad idea!
[ Chuckling ]
- Very clever idea.
- Yes.
Oh, say. You didn't come up here thinking I might be Xavier.
Like all detectives, must consider every possibility.
[ Laughing ]
Well, it's a lucky thing for me... that Xavier bumped into me last night in front of that café.
- You remember.
- Oh, yes, yes. Yes.
- Please forgive stupid error.
- Why, certainly, Mr. Chan.
- All's forgiven.
- I must go now. So sorry to disturb.
I'm sorry I couldn't have been any more help to you.
On contrary.
Have been most helpful.
Oh, your hat.
- Thank you so much. Good night.
- Good night.
- Wait a minute.
- What's the idea?
You are leaving on long journey?
- Why, I, uh-
- Inside, please.
Little keyhole big friend to stupid detective.
Have you found something, Dad?
Broken bank seal found at Dufresne apartment... matches perfectly with this broken seal.
That man is murderer.
This washes the case up, doesn't it, Dad?
- He killed Dufresne and the dancer Nardi.
- No.
Night Nardi killed, this man with me.
Must find murderer of Nardi.
C-1-9-3-3-7, series "M."
- C-1-9-3-3-7, series "M."
- Right.
D-3-1-2-8-6, series "L."
- D-3-1-2-8-6, series "L."
- Right.
I had to break a date with Lucille tonight, darn the luck.
- Wonder what the idea of the bond checkup is.
- I don't know.
Old Lamartine's been buzzing about all day like a fly with one wing.
[Bedell ]
But it's impossible, Mr. Chan.
I have no authority to give you
Mr. Xavier's address.
Assure you, matter most important.
No, I can't, and I won't.
That's final, Mr. Chan.
What is so final, Bedell?
Perhaps I can be of service.
Most humble apologies, make so much trouble.
But desire to know where can find Marcel Xavier.
May I ask why,
Mr. Chan?
This morning I hear him make threat against man now dead.
So he did.
So he did.
Get Xavier's card at once.
Of course you're going to arrest him.
Canary bird out of cage may fly far.
Ah, poor Dufresne.
What a tragedy.
To be shot down in the very prime of life.
He was a splendid man,
Mr. Chan.
A splendid man.
Ah, here we are.
Marcel Xavier.
Rue de Pont number 17.
Rather a nasty neighborhood,
Mr. Chan.
Charlie!
Been looking all over for you.
We've got to help Yvette.
Isn't there something you can do?
I don't believe she killed him.
Even if she was in his apartment, she must have had good reason for being there.
Faith is best foundation for happy future.
Then you don't think she did it either?
Can assure you young lady is innocent.
I knew it! Oh, she couldn't have done it, Charlie.
But innocence must be proven.
You would like to help?
Would I?
I-I-I'd do anything.
- I'd tear up the stones in the street.
- Not necessary.
You can please help me to this address?
"Rue de Pont 17.
Come on, Charlie. Let's go.
That phone's been ringing for 10 minutes.
It's getting on my nerves!
Don't open your mouth.
Hello?
- [ Man ] Is that you, Corday?
- Yes.
That meddling Chinese is on his way to Xavier's. I'll meet you there.
All right.
Who was that?
Where's my father going?
Where is Xavier's?
Try and find out.
You go back to car and wait.
If you're going down there,
I'm going with you.
- Take that.
- What about you?
Always carry spare in case of blowout.
Hold this.
What are you gonna do?
Cannot see contents of nut until shell is cracked.
Close door, please.
Do not touch.
Please light candle.
Fingerprints?
Look.
Why, there aren't any on it.
Man cannot drink from glass without touching.
Xavier was all shot up during the war.
Maybe he has to wear gloves.
You have seen him at bank perhaps many times.
He wear gloves?
I - I don't remember.
Have seen Xavier at airport upon arrival in city... on street night Nardi killed... and in bank- no gloves.
You've certainly got an eye for detail.
Grain of sand in eye may hide mountain.
Strange for man to... wear gloves inside... and outside with bare hands.
Say, that is odd.
Blow out candle.
Come.
- [Click]
- Look!
Quiet.
Follow.
[ Gasps ]
Charlie!
Only bullfrog.
Creepy place, isn't it?
Many strange crimes... committed in the sewers of Paris.
Charlie!
Lamartine bonds!
Very clever forgeries.
- Forgeries?
- Yes.
And here are tools for engraving.
And printing machine.
So that's why we were checking out that series of bonds in the bank today.
Yes.
Did you find something,
Charlie?
List of bond forgeries.
Why-Why, that's the sketch
Max made last night at the café.
Charlie, do you think-
- Did you hear that?
-Turn out the lights.
Drop that gun.
Don't move.
Charlie!
Charlie!
- Are you all right, Charlie?
- Yes. Thank you so much.
Marksmanship most excellent.
But made mistake of shooting at flashlight on end of moving broomstick.
You meddling devil!
Honorable ancestors refute suggested kinship.
Hands down, please.
Someone's coming.
[Whispering ]
Over here. Get down.
Close behind me, men.
He may be in here. We'll rush him.
Hello.
- Well! Charlie!
- Dad! I'm glad you're all right.
We seem to have arrived ahead of Mr. Xavier.
When Xavier phoned Corday, I knew you were on the spot. I got hold of Mr. Renard.
Yes, he told me all about it. We'll take care of this Xavier when he shows up.
You two men stay here.
- Go upstairs, tell the sergeant.
- Wait, please.
Uh, not necessary.
- What's that?
- I show you.
Stand up!
You got him, didn't you, Pop?
That's Marcel Xavier!
Correction, please.
There is no Marcel Xavier.
No Xavier?
Then who the devil is he?
Please to remove gloves.
Note- hands not those of beggar.
Charlie, what's all this about?
Answer concealed, maybe... behind false face!
Why, Mr. Latouche!
All right, Charlie.
I'm waiting for the answer.
Bond forgery plot conceived by very clever criminals-
Corday and Latouche.
Between them, they create fictitious character Marcel Xavier.
When Latouche is Xavier,
Corday is Corday.
When Corday is Xavier,
Latouche is Latouche.
Oh.
I begin to see.
System gives both men perfect alibi.
Well, by George, that is clever.
- How did you guess it?
- Correction, please. Did not guess.
Gentleman who give me
Xavier's address... make mistake of leaving same handwriting down here... on list of bond numbers.
Oh!
- See?
- Hmm.
Also, gentlemen overplay hand in acting part of Xavier for me.
Both know I go to café.
Latouche appear as Xavier... and Corday give him money.
Inside of café,
Corday watch me... while Latouche kill my assistant.
- Assistant?
- Yes. The dancer, Nardi.
Next morning,
Corday know I go to bank.
He appear as Xavier and play scene with Latouche.
- But what about Dufresne?
- Dufresne was accomplice in bank... who tried to cheat
Latouche and Corday.
Tonight... when Dufresne planned to leave city with money received... from bond forgeries...
Corday arrive in apartment as Xavier, kill him... and later take off disguise in car.
Well, good work, Charlie.
- All right, Laverne, take him away.
- Come on.
- May- May see you, please?
- Why, certainly.
Must trouble you to release other assistant from prison.
- Other assistant?
- Yes.
Miss Lamartine.
You see, she in Dufresne apartment to get information.
Very important letters... for me.
But I don't see-
Oh.
So the age of chivalry isn't dead after all.
- Thank you so much.
- [ Chuckles ]
Come along, Charlie.
You tell me all about it over a cup of coffee.
- And, uh, doughnuts?
- Yes!
What's the matter,
Joe? Nervous?
Oh, this job gives me gooseflesh.
You're new here, but in a couple of months, you'll get as jumpy as me.
- I worked around sanitariums before.
It's not so bad.
I like the cuckoos myself.
They're the same as anyone else... only they're smart enough to admit they're nuts.
Look at him.
- That guy sings every night, and it's making me screwy.
They oughta keep him out of that recreation room after hours.
- Who is he?
- Nobody knows, not even the guy himself.
He was picked up on the streets.
Amnesia case.
Then he went daffy, and he's been here ever since.
Come on.
Let's get a cup of coffee.
How many times have I told you not to interrupt my singing?
Every night for seven years.
So there is only one answer.
Either you quit singing, or I'll quit bringing the paper.
I don't know what you're talking about.
Lilli.
Lilli.
Did you say something?
I remember now.
You don't mean you remember who you are, do you?
I've got to get out of here right away!
Sure, sure.
Only just take it easy.
Let me take you to your room.
And I'll get the superintendent.
Los Angeles Police calling car 17. Car 1-7.
Man answering description of escaped maniac just seen at 16th and Hill.
Step on it, boys.
That is all. Roberts.
Another one of those phony leads.
Our only clue- a torn newspaper containing plenty of pages of news... of which any one item may have caused that man to become violent.
Well, this is not a séance.
Who has an idea?
Why do you keep harping on that newspaper?
Maybe he tore it up as an emotional outlet.
- Any other clever thoughts?
- How do we know he's even in the city? We have no leads.
We haven't any pictures.
The asylum never takes any.
We've run down every angle, and most of them are phony.
Every railroad, terminal dock, bus line and main artery is being watched.
- What else can we do?
- I even checked all the airports personally.
That's fine, Kelly. Now you better cover the merry-go-rounds and scenic railways next.
Where would this man get money for airplane rides? He's been a charity case for years.
I want every one of you to get this.
As long as that madman's loose, it means he may strike at anytime, anyplace.
I want you men to cover every foot of ground around the asylum.
Check every house, gas station, every road out of there. Someplace there's a clue.
Find it. Now get to work.
Kelly, you stay here. It might do you a little good to meet a real detective.
Ask Mr. Chan to come in.
Wait a minute. You haven't called
Chop Suey in on the case, have you, Chief?
No, but it's not a bad idea.
And take your hat off.
You could learn a little politeness from the Chinese too.
Thank you so much.
Honorable father once say, " Politeness- golden key that open many door."
Glad to see you, Charlie. I was hoping you'd drop in before you went away.
Yes. Work finished.
Return to Honolulu by midnight boat.
Can't be separated from that family of yours.
Become habit, like murderer always return to scene of crime.
Oh, Sergeant Kelly.
- Salutations.
- So pleased.
- Sit down, Charlie.
- Thank you.
I wanted to congratulate you on the racetrack case.
That gang of racketeers nearly ruined American horse racing.
Humble servant very fortunate in stumbling on solution.
Ah. Lucky, eh?
Yes.
Confucius say...
"Luck- happy combination of foolish accidents."
Tell me, Charlie. How did you ever happen to hit on the clue?
It was so small, so obscure.
Small things sometime tell large stories.
For instance, very obvious here that... many men indulge in nervous fit.
Perhaps unfortunate assistant receive dressing down on carpet?
Say, how did you wise up to that?
When policeman on small pay... discard large cigar after two puffs... sure sign of distress.
Also note cigarette die in infancy.
Yeah? Well, suppose you tell us what case we were being bawled out on.
- That ought to be easy for him.
- Not difficult.
Escaped maniac, case number A-469W.
Morning press already inform me torn-up paper only clue.
And there's the case number!
- Congratulations.
- Charlie... do you think this paper may have any bearing on the case?
Heel mark on face of beautiful lady very significant.
Ah, that nut just stepped on it on his way out.
Note carefully.
Heel on picture before paper torn.
Sure sign man know woman unpleasantly.
You're right.
It's deliberate mutilation.
I tell you, the dame is cold turkey.
I saw her at the opera house yesterday, and she knows nothin' about him.
Yes?
Madame Lilli Rochelle to see you.
- Have her come in.
- Yes, sir.
- Inspector Regan?
- Yes.
- I'm Madame Rochelle. This is Monsieur Barelli.
- Enchanté.
How do you do? Sergeant Kelly you know.
And Mr. Chan.
Mr. Chan! You here on the mainland?
This is a delightful surprise.
Plum tree blossom many time... since I hear silver voice of Madame Lilli in Honolulu.
Thank you. Mr. Chan,
I'm in frightful trouble.
Someone has threatened my life.
They're going to kill me.
"They"? Who's they?
My dear inspector, Madame Rochelle expects you to find it out.
Show him the card you have received.
Someone sent me flowers at the theater today. This was attached to it.
- Won't you sit down, Madame Rochelle?
- Thank you.
Perhaps you're right, Charlie.
Our madman does know Madame Rochelle.
I told this officer that I do not know your escaped maniac.
Madame meets many people, but she usually avoids the mad ones.
- Do you suspect anyone?
- No. None in particular.
Naturally, a person in my position makes many enemies.
They're all people who are jealous of me.
Others even imagine they're in love with me...
and, of course, resent the fact that I do not return their regard.
- It's the price of popularity.
- Madame is a great favorite.
But there's no one you can actually point to?
No. But I am afraid, Mr. Regan.
I demand protection for madame, not only for herself, but for the sake of her public.
The voice they love must not be stilled.
- You will give her a guard.
- Just what is your connection with this case, Mr. Barelli?
Enrico is the baritone of my company and one of my dearest friends.
All right. The opera house will be searched and men stationed... at every entrance and exit during the entire performance tonight.
Thank you. And of course
Mr. Chan will be there.
Madame's voice like monastery bell- when ringing, must attend.
You're so kind.
And now I must hurry.
I have costumes to be fitted.
Come, Enrico.
- See you later, Mr. Chan.
- So happy.
I don't like that guy Barelli.
I think he uses perfume.
Hello? Yes, McGrath?
What? My wife in
Inspector Regan's office?
That's right, Mr. Whitely.
She just left here.
And with Barelli again.
You want me to go to the opera house?
No, it isn't necessary.
I have other ideas.
One dozen American Beauty
Roses to Belvedere Apartments.
Miss Lotus Quong Toy.
That will be three dollars.
Uh, Miss Lotus evidently gilded lily.
Pop, you got here just in time. How about a little advance on my allowance?
- I'm almost broke.
- Puppy love very expensive pastime.
Ah, gee, Pop, we're leaving tonight.
And this is just, well, sort of a farewell present. She's a lovely girl.
Graceful as bamboo shoot, beautiful as blossom of water lily.
Yeah, that's her!
When did you meet her?
Never. But long time ago use same description for honorable mother.
Roses and romance like tenor in opera- sing most persuasive love song.
You like the opera?
Such beautiful music.
Rigoletto, Il Trovatore,
Pagliacci, Cavalleria!
Pardon, please. Opera season good for flower business.
Sure. Today stands right there,
Signor Barelli, the great baritone.
He ordered three dozen of the American Beauties...
for the signora.
Signora? You mean
Madame Lilli Rochelle?
No, no. He's got wife hisself.
And no one send flowers for Madame Lilli?
Today, no.
But tomorrow... maybe bushels for her magnificent voice.
When she sings-
Thank you so much.
Please. You send card with flowers?
No. Just cancel the whole thing. Hey, Pop!
- Ah, gee, Pop. Why can't I go to the opera with you?
- Impossible.
You very busy tonight finish packing baggage.
I did it all an hour ago.
They're all ready to be locked.
- Must get steamship tickets.
- Here they are.
- Well, must pay hotel bill.
- Here's the receipt.
Now will you let me go?
First return three dollars for flowers not sent to Miss Quong Toy.
I- I guess I forgot that.
Please. Do not need soup and fish.
Have other plans for you.
Tickets, please. Have your tickets ready, please. Thank you. Tickets, please.
I'm sorry, boys, but no reporters allowed in the theater tonight.
- I know, Pop. We're late.
- Traffic jam.
I tell ya, nobody can see
Madame Rochelle tonight!
Officer, this is a private matter and it's important. Please let us in.
Good evening, Madame Barelli.
Pop, what time did my husband leave the theater this afternoon?
- Why, right after dress rehearsal.
- With Madame Rochelle?
- No, madame. He was alone.
- What's he paying you to lie?
Why, madame.
Who was that firecracker?
Anita Barelli, second soprano.
The wife of Barelli, our baritone.
- Kinda jealous, huh?
- Did you ever see a baritone you could trust?
What's the idea?
Can't you take "no" for an answer?
But I know she'll see me. I'm her-
- Please get us some water.
- We were right! She saw him too.
- Saw what?
- A strange man hiding in here among the costumes.
I was working on Madame Lilli's dress.
I went over in that corner for some lace.
- There he was standing, staring at me.
- Did you see him?
No. Agnes screamed and I ran to her.
No one else was in sight.
- What'd this guy look like?
- All I could see were his eyes. They were horrible.
- Take a look around, boys, and this time find him!
- Did you see anybody?
- No, I didn't see anybody.
- Maybe she just imagined it.
No, I didn't. I saw him all right.
Just leave it to us, sister.
We'll take care of everything.
Come on. Get out now, all of you!
The curtain's going up in a few minutes.
- Don't worry, lady. He won't come in here again.
- Don't leave me alone, Officer!
Shut up! You've got the whole company upset.
- You cops would make anybody hysterical.
- Say, who are you?
My name's Arnold.
I'm stage manager here.
And this opera is going on tonight even if Frankenstein walks in.
That's him again!
- Say, which one of you-
- What's the trouble, Sarge?
- It's one of these guys and I can pick him out! He's a Chinese!
- Yeah? Well, line up here.
Now take off those tin hats.
They're all Chinese!
Boys, boys, put those helmets on!
There's the overture. Come on!
Come on! Get into your places!
Just a minute, you two!
- I thought I told you to stay out of here.
- You did.
One of those boys that know all the answers, huh? Come on.
- Take your hands off her.
- She's lucky I haven't got the bracelets on her.
But we haven't done anything.
We only wanted to see Madame Rochelle.
- It means everything to us.
- It means nothing to me. I've got my orders. Come on.
Now, I don't know how you got in, but this is the way out.
- Why don't you let us explain?
- Please.
Officer, take 'em out of here.
And if I see you again tonight... you'll be doing your explaining to a judge!
This place is driving me screwy!
Where's Regan and his pal, um, Egg Foo Yong?
Here, please.
- I'm sure glad to see you, Chief.
- What's the trouble?
- In the first place- - Have already heard of ghostly visitor from man who tend door.
- Oh.
- Have you searched the entire house?
We've been over this joint so many times I could tear it down... and build it again without misplacing a brick.
Perhaps maybe called on to do same.
Suppose we start systematic investigation.
Look here, Whitely.
You can't talk to me that way!
Barelli, I've warned you before to keep away from my wife.
- This is the last time.
- But perhaps Lilli-
I'll see you about this later.
Now get out.
I want to talk to you.
- Gravelle!
- Yes.
I- I thought you were dead.
Dead? That's what everybody thinks.
What-What are you doing here?
Why shouldn't I be here?
I've work to do.
Gravelle sings tonight.
Don't move another step.
You want to tell them I'm here, but nothing can stop Gravelle from singing tonight!
Carnival! My greatest role.
The voice of Mephisto coming from the flames.
The flames! That was it.
The flames all around me.
The theater on fire!
And someone locked Gravelle in his dressing room.
Who?
You know. Tell me.
- Anita? Anita?
- If you tell them I've come back, I'll-
No. No, no, I won't.
Anita?
Come in.
Hello, dear.
This is Mr. Chan, a detective.
- Madame Barelli.
- So pleased.
And sorry to disturb.
What can I do for you, Mr. Chan?
In humble role of investigator... seek information concerning flowers... sent to you this afternoon by honorable husband.
Flowers? You-
You must have felt very guilty about something, Enrico.
Don't tell me you have forgotten our wedding anniversary.
I had. And I didn't receive the flowers.
Bouquet, like summer tourist on wrong train- evidently suffer switch in destination.
I can imagine what their destination was.
You will have to excuse me, Mr. Chan.
I have a very difficult makeup.
Will question you later.
What's all this about?
Most mysterious.
Someone sent your bouquet to Madame Lilli with threat of death.
With a death threat?
You suspect enemy who might do same?
No, but whoever it was must have had good reasons.
Evidently do not waste love on Madame Rochelle.
Why should I?
She's done everything to humiliate me...
even to stealing my husband.
The entire company knows it and laughs at me.
So sorry.
Disloyalty of husband... sometime ample provocation for revenge.
But I didn't send that note, if that's what you mean.
The flowers were never in my room.
Contradiction, please.
What are you doing?
Cremated ghost of card from flower shop.
I know nothing about that.
You'll-You'll have to go now, Mr. Chan.
Thank you so much.
Gravelle.
- Do you believe her story?
- Not sure until burnt card prove otherwise.
I'm afraid it's too charred to tell us much.
Sometime jewel found in ashes.
Here, you let my supers alone!
Now listen, Inspector.
I've never been a violent man... but if you don't stop this lunkhead cop of yours from chasing my soldiers around...
I'll- I'll-
I won't be responsible.
All right, line up. Quick.
There's your cue.
Go on. Enter.
- There's the Chinese mug I've been looking for!
- Kelly.
What's that, a laundry ticket?
Much laundry, but all dirty.
- "Dear Pop-"
- "Pop"?
Say, is that your kid?
Chip off ancient block.
"Somebody hiding in opera house.
"Madame Lilli and husband in big fight.
Also, have fingerprints you ask for."
Say, if that's your son, who are all the other Chinese?
Honorable fraternity brothers of worthy son... incognito.
Hydrochloric acid, please.
And here's the ferricyanide potassium.
Marriage of two acids reproduce lost writing on burnt card if lucky.
- Have, uh, fingerprints you mention in note?
- Sure.
This is Mr. Whitely's.
I'll bet he's wondering when he lost it.
I almost got caught lifting this out of Mr. Arnold's vest.
This is Madame Barelli's.
- What's the matter, Pop? Lose something?
- Not yet.
But light fingers on number-one son most alarming.
Gee, Pop, we've got it! This proves the flowers were in Madame Barelli's dressing room!
Madame Barelli's fingerprint, please.
Fingerprint on card not hers.
You wouldn't dare do such a thing.
Sorry, Lilli. I've given you your last chance to make a fool of me.
You can't prove anything with your cheap insinuations and lying detectives!
If you name Enrico in a divorce action, he'll deny everything and so shall I!
Barelli will deny nothing when I get through with him tonight.
Tonight? What are you going to do?
Madame Rochelle, two minutes.
- All right. I must go.
- I'll wait.
- Lilli. What's wrong? You should be on the stage.
- I must talk to you.
- Whitely?
- Madame Rochelle!
For the sake of Puccini,
Verdi, Wagner and me... get on that stage!
I'll see you after the first act.
You!
Yes, Barelli.
I've come back to take your place tonight.
Get out of here.
Get out of here, I say!
If it's the dead you're afraid of, don't worry!
I'm alive, even though
I was locked in a burning theater!
I didn't do it. I swear I didn't!
It was a mistake. Lilli-
Yes, Lilli!
Two minutes, Mr. Barelli.
Mr. Barelli, your cue!
This is Madame Lilli's great scene with Mephisto. He joins her in a duet.
She refuses his love, and he stabs her.
Strange. I never heard that quality in Barelli's voice before.
It's great. Eh, Charlie?
All right, Lilli. Lilli! Lilli!
Mr. Arnold!
Will someone bring me a chair, quick!
- What happened? What's the matter?
- Something's wrong.
- What's happened?
- I don't know.
She must have been unconscious when I picked her up on stage.
I bet Barelli had something to do with this.
Hey, you! Come on, boys.
Stop!
Open up here!
- Open up!
- What's the matter?
It's Barelli, Inspector!
He just ran in and locked the door.
- Break it in.
- Wait a minute.
I got a personal grudge against that canary.
Barelli!
Stabbed through heart.
But I just saw him come in here.
- Yeah, he must've bumped himself off.
- Contradiction, please.
Observe. Implement of death missing.
Dead hands cannot hide knife.
You're right. Someone must've been waiting in here to kill him.
Whoever it was certainly worked fast.
He had to commit the murder and escape while we were breaking in the door.
One moment.
Examine wound, please.
It's beginning to dry.
Coagulated blood denote murder committed some time ago.
Oh, yeah? Then I suppose it was his ghost that socked me.
Perhaps substitute devil sock honorable colleague on chin.
Aw, you're just guessing, brother.
This window hasn't been opened so long, the bolt's rusty.
And that door was locked on the inside!
If he didn't sock me and then run in here, where is the guy who did?
Perhaps murderer knows other way of departing from room.
Inspector Regan, there's a trapdoor up here.
I'll handle this.
Go up there with him and take a look around.
- Get the coroner here. Tell the boys to keep their eyes open.
- Yes, sir.
All right, folks, back up.
Out of the way.
Wait a minute, lady.
You can't go in there.
Let me in to him.
He's my husband!
Oh! Enrico! Oh!
Find anything, Kelly?
Nothing yet, Chief.
There ain't nobody up here.
I'm gonna find out if there is.
No Chinese cop's gonna show me up.
Take a look down that other end.
Come outta there.
Stay where you are.
- Who's he?
- I don't know who he is... but I'm gonna find out what he's doing in here.
Get Regan.
What's wrong?
Lilli!
She's dead.
- What's the trouble?
- Murder. And here's your man.
- That's a lie.
- I came in here... and found him standing over the lady with blood on his hands.
There's a dame with him too.
She must be around someplace.
- Go and get her.
- Keep your eye on him, Dugan.
Stabbed. Just like Barelli.
Yes, but Barelli die first.
Blood here still fresh.
He must've come in here while I was out phoning for a doctor.
You leave Madame Lilli alone?
Why not? She was supposed to have police protection, wasn't she?
It's your negligence that is responsible for my wife's death.
- That's enough, Whitely.
- Please. Mr. Whitely's right.
Humility only defense against rightful blame.
Here's the knife!
He must've put it there!
I never saw that knife before!
Whoever commit crime safe for moment.
What do you mean?
By handling knife you have covered fingerprints of murderer.
Come on, everybody.
Into your second act costumes.
Well, come on! Hurry up!
Hurry up, all of you!
- Are the understudies ready?
- Yes, sir.
We're not going on, Mr. Arnold.
Not with a madman loose.
- Two people have been killed already!
- Any one of us may be next.
Don't you realize this is opening night and there's a packed house?
You might as well go on with the show... because none of you hams are leaving the theater until this thing is cleared up.
- This is an outrage!
- Come on. Come on.
I knew Madame Barelli very well.
I was with her this afternoon.
- What time, please?
- Oh, about 4:00 or 5:00.
He's lying. At 4:30, my wife was in Inspector Regan's office.
Pardon, please.
How you know that?
Why, Lilli told me, of course.
You knew Madame Lilli received threat of death this afternoon?
- Certainly not.
- What did you think she was doing in my office?
Why, she told me she'd missed a piece of jewelry from her dressing room.
Be so kind to explain what happened when you carry Madame Lilli into dressing room.
I laid her down on the chaise longue.
Then I sent Madame Barelli to get some smelling salts.
While you remain alone with Madame Lilli?
Yes. But I immediately went out to call a doctor.
So sorry to trouble.
That's quite all right, Mr. Chan.
When you return to dressing room, what happen?
I didn't return.
On my way back, I-
I was told my husband was dead.
No longer necessary to remain.
Thank you so much.
What's the use of all this questioning?
Here's the man you want.
I demand his arrest.
Please.
Voice from back seat... sometime very disconcerting to driver.
Kindly explain blood on hands once more.
When I came into the room,
Madame Lilli was halfway off the couch.
- I started to lift her up and then realized-
- You expect us to believe that?
One moment.
Explain purpose of visit, please.
I'll explain that.
I'm Lilli Rochelle's daughter.
That's the most ridiculous yarn I've ever heard.
My wife had no daughter.
She'd never even been married before.
That isn't true! My mother never acknowledged me openly.
Ever since I can remember, I've been kept hidden away in boarding schools.
Even when I grew up, it was always the same.
She was afraid a grown daughter would hurt her career.
I've tried to be close to her, but she wouldn't let me.
And now it's too late.
Still have not explained urgency of visit here tonight, Mr. Childers.
We wanted Madame Lilli's permission to get married because Kitty is under age.
- You ask consent before?
- Several times, but she always refused... because she knew our marriage would expose her secret.
She even threatened to send Kitty away where I could never see her again.
- That was cause of quarrel?
- She had no right to spoil Kitty's life.
So tonight we came here to ask permission for the last time.
- And when she refused, you killed her.
- I did not!
Please, spare feelings of bereaved young lady.
I'm going to hold you both for further investigation.
One more question.
Can tell present whereabouts of male parent?
My father died in a theater fire when I was about four years old.
He was an opera singer.
Thank you so much.
Excuse, please.
Nothing up here.
Ah, nothing anywhere.
You stand around that stage like a herd of seals...
waiting for mackerel.
All right. Now you do it.
Left! Right! Go!
Pop, this proves that whoever took
Barelli's place committed the murder.
Quite possible.
Gee, what about Mr. Whitely and Madame Barelli?
- They had reason enough to do it.
- Also possible.
- And that fellow Childers-
- Please.
Man who ride on merry-go-round often enough finally catch brass ring.
What's your idea, Pop?
Have here very interesting newspaper item... relating death of Madame Lilli's first husband, Gravelle... in opera house fire in Chicago.
Gee, Pop, if there was only a picture of him!
Get Los Angeles Bulletin on phone.
Information, please.
Hello, Hudson?
Smitty, Chicago Sun, speaking.
The Gravelle picture is coming through.
Okay, Smitty. We're standing by.
It'll only be a minute now, Mr. Chan, while they regulate the speed... so that the roller holding the picture in Chicago is revolving at the same rate... as the roller holding the negative in this cylinder.
Here it comes.
The two machines are now locked together as one.
A small light is traveling over the picture in Chicago.
It's an electric eye that tells this electric eye over the wire what it sees.
Then this electric eye prints on the negative... in this cylinder in black and white... what it sees in Chicago.
I'll have it developed immediately, Mr. Chan.
Many things now clear.
Thank you so much.
- That's him.
- You sure?
I'll never forget those eyes. Who is he?
For present, Mr. "X."
- The opera's over.
- Must insist... no mention of picture to anyone.
- Not me.
- Here, Agnes. Take this stuff.
- I'm so glad to get out of here.
- You and me both.
I never had such a night in my life.
Now must work fast. Have only
30 short minutes to trap murderer.
Why 30 minutes?
Must catch boat for Honolulu.
- Please stop worrying, dear.
- I can't help it, Phil.
I can't help feeling that our coming here tonight had something to do with it.
- How could it?
- I don't know.
But that detective sensed it too.
That's why he accused you.
I'm not worried, honey.
Everything's gonna be all right.
And, young lady, I'm taking on a new job today:
Trying to make you happy.
That's better.
You're gonna keep on smiling too.
I'm gonna make you forget there ever was such a thing as trouble.
Inspector Regan wants to see you, Childers.
- Phil!
- I won't be long, honey.
What do you want?
I'm not going to hurt you.
You are Kitty Gravelle.
I knew you a long time ago.
Please don't come any closer.
You're afraid of me, aren't you?
Don't be. I want you to know me. I'm-
Sit down. Please.
Now listen.
Don't you remember this?
It means nothing to you?
Wait! Try to remember.
There was a house and a garden... and a little girl who'd run to the window to listen when I played to her.
And when I'd sing, she'd fling her arms around my neck and put her head on my shoulder!
If you touch her, I'll kill you.
Pardon intrusion, please.
Had no intention of harming beautiful young lady.
Why did you come here?
Merely wished to make telephone call.
Excuse, please.
You're lying.
You're one of the police who are after me tonight.
You wanted to trap me, but I was too clever for you.
You thought Gravelle was a fool.
That's what Lilli and Barelli thought when they locked me in a burning theater.
But I got out, and now they're dead.
You'll never put me behind those walls again.
Remember presence of honorable daughter.
She didn't know me.
She's afraid of me.
She thinks I'm mad.
Everybody thinks I'm mad!
A very old Chinese wise man once say...
"Madness twin brother of genius...
"because each live in world created by own ego... one sometimes mistaken for other."
Your world, music.
Yes! I live in a world of music.
Symphonies, operas, great audiences.
I sing to their applause.
Much applause tonight after beautiful aria.
Always.
Would grant privilege of hearing magnificent voice again?
You mean tonight? Here?
Yes. Will have stage ready and orchestra waiting.
Yes, I'll sing.
You don't expect everyone to stick around here... while you turn a nut loose on that stage, do you?
- What'll we tell all these people?
- Very simple.
Say Mr. Arnold trying out new baritone.
Charlie, you can't do that. The man is mad.
He's a homicidal maniac.
Therefore must use utmost precaution.
Hope plan will make murderer reveal self.
Reveal self? Who do you think's been doin' all the killing around here?
And now you want him to sing again.
Old Chinese proverb say-
Old Chinese proverb say-
Oh, yeah? Hmm.
Excuse, please.
Why, yes, I can sing Lilli's role... but under the circumstances, I-
So sorry.
But hoped for assistance... to apprehend murderer of husband.
I'll do anything you ask, Mr. Chan.
But I won't be able to wear Lilli's costume.
Own costume sufficient.
Thank you so much.
What's the idea of making us get into costume again?
Agnes! Agnes! Give me
Madame Barelli's costume right away.
- Are we ever going home?
- Is this gonna keep up all night?
- Here.
- Where's the belt?
If it isn't there, I don't know where it is. Here. Take this. It'll do.
Oh, hurry up.
Let's get it over with.
This was place you occupy when Madame Lilli on stage?
- Yes.
- Please to remain here while Madame Barelli sing.
- Very well.
- Thank you.
If that Chinese dick knows where he is... why don't we grab him and haul him down to headquarters?
Unwise officer who eat apple not yet ripe get official tummy ache.
The commissioner will certainly make the fur fly if anything goes wrong.
And bouquets fly if everything go right.
I'm all ready, Mr. Chan.
Shall we go on?
Please.
- Keep the stage lights full on. We're taking no chances.
- Yes, sir.
If he makes one mis-move-
Dim those lights, you fool.
This scene is played in shadows.
Darker. Darker.
I knew he was hiding in the theater.
He came to my dressing room before the opera.
But I didn't dare warn you, because he said he'd kill me if I told.
Then when I-
I was singing Lilli's aria... and he reached for the knife,
I- I couldn't stand it.
Egg Foo Yong, the guy that pulls rabbits out of the hat-
Sending a woman out there to let a nut stick a knife in her.
Well, Chief, that about closes the case.
Contradiction, please.
Case still wide open like swinging gate.
- What do you mean?
- Gravelle not murderer.
- Not Gravelle?
- Excuse, please.
Will demonstrate hypothesis.
What?
Word of Greek derivation-
"hypo" meaning-
"Hypo." I get it.
He's hitting the pipe again.
Go on, Charlie.
Knife worn by Gravelle.
Observe coating of oil... used by property department to preserve blade from rust still intact.
- So what?
- Prove most elemental fact in deduction.
Could not have been used for murder.
Of course he didn't use his own knife.
He used Barelli's.
Beg to differ. Knife used to murder Barelli... later used to kill Madame Lilli.
If Gravelle guilty... must have had both knives on person while singing aria.
Previous examination of costume... disclose no telltale bloodstains.
Also, madman would not use
Barelli's knife... having one in his own scabbard.
- He was crazy, wasn't he?
- But method devised by real murderer... born in rational mind.
Used presence of maniac in theater... as perfect alibi to cover own guilt.
Concealed murder knife after first crime... fearing fingerprints.
Later, frightened by immediate arrival of police after second crime... was forced to hide same in bouquet of flowers.
Unfortunately, fingerprints obliterated by Mr. Whitely.
- Do you mean to insinuate-
- Pardon, please.
Have special insinuation for your honorable attention.
Can explain presence of your fingerprints... on ghost of card from flower shop... found in Madame Barelli's dressing room?
My fingerprints?
That's impossible.
Fact most definitely established... by comparison with those found on your cigarette case.
- What about it, Whitely?
- I can explain that, Inspector.
I knew Barelli had sent flowers to the theater this afternoon.
I suspected they were for my wife.
I came here to see the card.
Then sent same flowers to wife with threat of death?
Yes, but I swear I never intended-
I only wanted to frighten her away from Barelli.
- You know Gravelle?
- I never heard of him.
You state complete truth about position in wings during entire aria?
Yes, and I can prove it.
Madame Barelli saw me standing there.
- Will corroborate, please?
- Why, I- I don't know.
As I came off the stage,
I was so terrified... at the thought of Gravelle being loose in the theater...
I hurried to my dressing room and locked myself in.
You must have seen me. You were standing in the wings only a few feet from me.
Why, yes. I saw you there,
Madame Barelli.
You left just after
Mephisto began his aria.
Thank you so much.
Fact that Madame Barelli in wings during aria... final link in chain of evidence.
- You are murderess.
- Why, how-
You were only one who knew Gravelle planned to sing Mephisto role tonight.
Later, standing in wings... recognize voice not that of husband.
Instinctive curiosity force you to husband's dressing room to investigate.
You discover him unconscious... so avail self of perfect opportunity... to avenge intrigue which cause you so much humiliation.
Is this some ridiculous attempt to save your face, Mr. Chan?
Humble countenance merely facing facts.
That same belt you wore with costume earlier tonight?
Why, no. The wardrobe department sent me this because the clasp on the other was broken.
Strange.
Have original belt here with clasp in most perfect condition.
- Where did you get that?
- Found hidden in cushion... of chaise longue in your dressing room.
Observe.
Stain of blood on inside lining... prove definitely you conceal knife on person... after murder of husband.
You're right.
And I used it on Lilli when I came back with the smelling salts and found her alone.
You knew what was going on... but you weren't man enough to do anything about it.
That's all.
I'm ready, Inspector.
- May I see you, Mr. Regan?
- Certainly.
That fellow got a lucky break, Inspector.
The bullet never touched the brain.
In fact, it may relieve the condition that's been causing amnesia.
You think Gravelle have happy chance of recovery?
An even chance... if we can keep him quiet till we get him to the hospital.
He's very restless.
Keeps repeating the name, uh, Kitty.
Excuse, please.
Request most charitable act.
Innocent man unfortunately wounded by impetuous marksman... call for daughter not seen for many years.
Would please take place of missing loved one for small moment?
Perhaps save life.
Please?
Much better if relationship not known until recovery certain.
- Well, Charlie-
- Uh-
All I can say is that you have certainly-
Very lucky in finding solution.
Proving, as said before, luck happy combination of foolish accidents.
You're all right, just like chop suey- a mystery but a swell dish.
- Thank you so much.
- By the way, Charlie...
I didn't quite catch that
Chinese lingo you sprung on us... just before you asked
Madame Barelli to sing.
Ancient proverb meaning when fear attack brain, tongue wave distress signal.
I get it. You made her sing with Gravelle just to scare her into talking.
- Yes, you catch quickly.
- Sure.
Hey, Pop!
Pop, I found Madame Barelli's smelling salts in Madame Lilli's room.
- This proves that she-
- Excellent clue.
But, like last rose of summer- bloom too late.
Also fear too late for boat to Honolulu.
Not if we can help it. I'll hold that boat if I have to lock the captain in his own brig.
I knew we were on the right track, Pop.
The first time I saw Madame Barelli,
I was sure she was guilty because-
Case now closed?
A few hours.
He'll get that shyster lawyer of his down here with a writ and be on the street again.
That's fine.
That means that every baby in New York will have to take his sunshine indoors.
Yeah. But what can I do about it, honey?
I'm only a cop.
You and I know that Benny drove that car.
We know that he knows who killed the kid.
But what good is it gonna do us?
Sometime between now and midnight he'll be on the street.
I can put him in, but I can't keep him in.
Want a drink, honey?
No, thanks.
I've got an idea.
I think I can make him talk.
Say, if you can wring a confession out of that guy, you're a miracle man.
A what?
I mean woman.
That's better.
Hello? Yes.
Yeah, this is Kelton.
Hello, boss. Here's a scoop.
Benny Battle just confessed
(ON PHONE) and named
the actual baby killer.
You better headline it.
No. Nobody knows anything about it but me.
Attagirl, Eve.
You're the best reporter in town.
There you are.
What did I tell you?
Habeas corpus.
You'd better let Battle out of here.
Congratulations, Dan.
If that don't get your promotion, kid, nothing will.
What do you mean?
Take a look.
"Benny Battle names baby killers."
Say, what did you do, print this yourself?
Not me. I'm still a cop.
Newspapers do funny things.
It's all Greek to me.
Where am I going now?
I don't know.
They told me to turn you loose.
Makes no difference to me whether you're in or out, but I'd rather see you in.
Now, you don't mean that.
You know you don't.
You got such a kind face.
Yes, you got a kind face, too.
It's the kind I don't like.
Okay.
I hope you'll never have to see it again.
So do I.
But something tells me I will.
Give me my stuff.
CLERK: There you are.
Sign there.
How do you like our hotel?
Hotel? You can have it. Hotel.
Fine joint this is, crummy, filthy dump like this.
Fine way to treat a human being, too.
Why, I wouldn't let a dog sleep in a place like this.
He's liable to catch pneumonia.
You guys ought to be ashamed of yourselves. Hotel.
But you'll never see me here again.
No, sir, never again.
DAN: Oh, now, that don't look like a good picture of Benny, does it?
MALONEY: Well, a little bit, it does.
I guess it's an old picture.
Yeah, when did you have that picture made, Benny?
A little publicity for you.
Well, I don't want no publicity.
And you guys know that I didn't do any squealing.
Oh, what are you worrying about?
People don't believe all they read in the newspapers.
Well, they might.
What kind of a paper is this, anyway?
English.
I know that.
But where did they get this story about making me a stool pigeon?
Well, you know how newspapers are.
They say anything.
Freedom of the press.
Yeah. Freedom.
Too much freedom.
Yeah, just like you.
Oh, yeah?
Well, here goes for a little freedom.
Wait a minute.
That's mine.
Well, well.
What's the matter, Benny?
Afraid to go out?
No. I ain't afraid.
Well, what's keeping you?
Don't let them, Dan.
They're trying to knock me off!
What are you talking about?
They pegged a thousand shots at me.
Oh, yeah? Who?
I don't know, but somebody's trying to kill me.
I want protection.
That's what the cops are for, ain't they?
Lock me up, please.
Put me where I'll be safe.
Oh, you don't want me to lock you up here.
You're liable to get pneumonia.
I don't care what I get.
It's better than being knocked off.
Put me where I'll be safe.
You got to lock me up.
You'd better get out.
This place ain't fit for a dog!
I don't care nothing about that.
I want to be safe.
All right, who pegged the shots at you, do you know?
No. No, I don't know.
But I don't wanna get killed.
All right,
I'll tell you what I'll do.
You squeal, and I'll let you stay.
If you don't,
I'll kick you out in the street.
Squeal?
But I've never squealed in my life!
All right, Tom.
Throw him out.
No, no.
I want to go in here.
Don't throw me out there.
I want to go in here.
No, no, I won't squeal!
Don't throw me out.
Wait a minute, wait a minute.
Wait a minute, wait a minute.
I'll tell!
I'll squeal! I'll squeal!
I said that I'll squeal!
All right, come on in.
He asked me to go for a ride, and I drove the car.
I didn't know where we was going.
And then when we got there, at the park,
Cortig went in and met a couple of guys.
DAN: What was he going to meet them for?
Well, I don't know.
I don't know.
All right, Lee. Throw him out.
No wait, wait, wait!
I'll tell.
They were talking about the diamonds that were stolen, and then I heard a couple of shots and Cortig come running out and away we went.
Yeah, and away you go.
Lock him up.
Come on.
Oh, hello, Eve.
Hello, Dan.
I just saw them dragging
Benny down the hall.
Where are they taking him?
Into a little cage.
And is he glad.
Some of his playmates took a few shots at him, so now he doesn't care much for the great outdoors.
Who did the shooting?
I don't know, but whoever it was did us a good turn.
That is the best break
I've had all year.
Did he name the killers?
Only one. Russ Cortig.
I'm going out to get him now.
And when I nail him, you'll be the first one to hear the news.
I want you to get a scoop for that beloved newspaper.
Thanks.
I'll ask for a raise.
That is, if I'm not fired.
Oh, they won't fire you, honey.
They might,
I get my news too fast.
That's too deep for me.
It was too deep for them.
You see, I reported my news before it happened.
Wait a minute.
You mean that headline about "Benny Battle names baby killers"?
Say, you know
I thought there was something funny about that because he didn't confess until after his mob tried to bump him off.
That wasn't his mob.
Well, who was it?
Want to buy a gun?
Wait, that's mine.
That's right.
Thanks for letting me use it.
Honey, you should have been a detective.
Won't Charlie Chan be mad when he hears about me?
Yeah.
Dan, that Mrs. Cole is on the wire again.
It's the fifth time she's called today.
Why, the dame's crazy about you.
No, no, strictly business.
Yeah? What kind of business?
There you are.
Now you see how it is, honey?
The dame won't let me alone.
Yeah, you mean you won't let her alone.
Oh, listen.
You got it all wrong.
I don't care anything about her.
No, I suppose it's her dog you're stuck on.
Oh, forget it, will you?
Forget about her and forget about the dog.
Well, maybe it's the maid.
Why don't you go and have a cup of tea and take off your coat and make yourself at home?
All right, now, look.
Look, I don't care anything about her.
I don't care anything about the maid, and I don't care anything about the dog.
Yeah? Well, I don't care anything about you.
MAN ON RADIO:
Geraniums can be transplanted
by the cutting.
The geranium is a hardy flower
and will withstand
the severest of weather,
except extreme frost.
They grow either in the shade
or in the sun.
There is a variety of colors
amongst geraniums,
but the red and white
predominate.
Now, my dear botanists,
this is Oliver Tidmarsh,
and I'll be back tomorrow
afternoon and tell you about
the rarest of all flowers,
the beautiful orchid.
ANNOUNCER: And now
we bring you the latest
news topics.
Hello, hello, hello!
How do you do, everybody?
Here are the latest
news flashes.
Heavy rains have impeded
the Italian army and they've
made little progress
into the interior of Ethiopia.
Flash! Benny Battle,
a well-known police character,
has confessed
and he has named the killer
of the baby in Central Park.
The police promise
to make an arrest
within 24 hours.
OPERATOR 1: Cortig not there anymore?
Thank you.
OPERATOR 2:
Changed his address?
Thank you.
OPERATOR 3: You don't know where he moved to?
Thank you.
OPERATOR 4: Cortig checked out last night? Thank you.
OPERATOR 5: Afraid I can't give you any information.
DAN: All right. Thanks, boys.
I'll get it myself.
Who's there?
Where you going?
I'm gonna get out of town.
This place is getting too hot for me.
What's the matter, are you crazy?
You know I always put the fix in.
Yeah, I got a hunch you ain't gonna put the fix on this.
Benny turned rat.
He told the coppers everything.
What if he did?
That's nothing to worry about.
All we need is an alibi.
Alibi.
Sure.
Yeah. That's all we need, it's an alibi.
Let's see, what'll it be?
Who's there?
It's the law. Open up.
CORTIG: All right, just a minute.
I'll open it.
Come on, let's break it in.
Come on.
So this is where you live.
What's the matter?
You been looking for me?
Yeah, in every hotel in town.
What are you doing?
Throwing a party?
All by myself.
I like to be alone.
Alone, eh?
Well, maybe it's a good idea.
The less people know about you, the less they can say.
Do you mind if I look around?
No, go ahead, help yourself.
Well, well, what's this?
The bathroom?
I never take a room without a bath.
I know one room you'll have without a bath.
Without flowers, too.
Nice view you got here,
Central Park.
Yeah, I can see them skating in the winter.
You won't be here this winter.
Nice trees.
Just beginning to leave.
So are you, come on.
Hey, what are you trying to do?
Kill them lilies?
There'll be plenty left for your funeral.
Come on.
All right, Dan, there's what I found on the glass.
Now all you've got to do is to find the guy that belongs to that.
Yeah, that's all.
Here, check this.
I'll be back for it later.
Righto.
Hiya, Captain.
Captain?
Thanks for the promotion.
Grab yourself a chair, honey.
Oh, I'm too excited to sit down.
Yeah?
What are you excited about?
About Cortig's trial.
In a few hours he'll be on his way to Sing Sing.
Oh, I can see the headlines now.
"Russ Cortig convicted of baby killing."
"Detective Daniel Barr promoted to Captain."
So you don't mind if I call you Captain now, do you?
What do you say, Captain?
Say, why don't you answer me?
You've got about as much enthusiasm as a jellyfish.
Don't you want to be a captain?
Sure I do, but I'm not thinking about that now.
What are you thinking about?
I'm not a mind reader.
Well, look.
Here's the fingerprint we found on that drinking glass.
Whose is it?
Well, it belongs to a guy with a scar on his thumb.
Well, who is he?
I don't know.
Well, how're you gonna find out?
I don't know, but when I do,
I think I've got the man I want.
What makes you think so?
I got a hunch.
Hunches are no good.
You got to be sure.
On May 12th, at 2:00 in the afternoon, a little child was killed by an assassin.
The man accused of that crime is sitting right there.
On May the 12th,
I saw Russ Cortig in Philadelphia at 2:00 in the afternoon.
Gentlemen, it is quite evident that the alibi has been manufactured.
I object, Your Honor.
It is for the jury to decide whether this witness is telling the truth or not.
Proceed.
I intend to prove that the prisoner was not in Philadelphia on the day of the shooting.
I was with Russ Cortig in Central Park the day he killed the baby.
Did you see him fire the shot?
Well, it was this way...
Answer yes or no!
Your Honor, I object.
Objection overruled.
Did you see Russ Cortig fire the shot?
Answer yes or no.
No.
That's all.
DEFENSE ATTORNEY:
Gentlemen of the jury,
I ask you not to be misled by the cheap dramatics of an ambitious prosecutor.
The chief witness against the defendant is a convict with a record extending over a period of 10 years.
It is evident that this witness has been coached by the police.
Therefore, I beg of you, gentlemen, to find the prisoner not guilty.
Gentlemen of the jury, you see before you a monster who has committed the unspeakable crime, a wanton killer who has robbed a mother of her dearest possession, her baby.
Gentlemen of the jury, it is your sacred duty to put this man where he belongs, in the electric chair.
He has killed an innocent child and I demand the extreme penalty, death.
Gentlemen of the jury, you will consider carefully the evidence that has been submitted in this case.
If you are firmly convinced that this man is guilty, find him so.
On the other hand, if there is the slightest doubt in your minds as to the prisoner's guilt, you must give him the benefit of that doubt and find him not guilty.
We, the jury, find the defendant not guilty.
WOMAN: Not guilty?
Well, what do you think of that?
Just dandy.
I never knew a courtroom could be so elevating.
You certainly meet some charming people.
So truthful, so honorable.
It's an insult to every man, woman and child in the city.
There you are,
Detective Sergeant Barr.
How do you feel now?
How do you think that poor woman feels?
I know it, honey.
But I can't help it.
I did the best I could.
I don't think so.
When you were in the witness chair, why didn't you stand up and scream?
That's what I'd have done.
You can't do that.
All you can do is answer questions.
Questions.
The kind of questions they ask, they get just the kind of answers they want.
Yeah, but what can I do about it?
You think
I was personally responsible.
I can't run the courtroom, honey.
It's none of my business.
It is your business.
Why didn't you tell them how long you've known Cortig, how rotten he is?
If you can't send a man away for murder, what does he have to do?
I don't know, but I know what I'm gonna do.
What?
I'm gonna quit.
That's what I'm gonna do.
I'm sick of the whole rotten business.
Wait a minute. Dan. Dan!
Russ, that's the first time
I've heard you laugh in months.
Keep laughing, it's good for you.
You're not looking very well.
Why don't you take a run down to the seashore and give yourself a rest?
Yeah, thanks for the tip.
I think I will.
Oh, and you remember when that guy...
When he asked Benny...
CHIEF: Now, don't you worry about that, old man, we know he's one of the men who robbed the bank and we'll send him up the river for a long stretch.
Now this is one case he'll never beat.
Yeah, goodbye.
You know, I've got a clerk out there who announces my visitors.
I couldn't wait that long.
I was afraid I might forget what I want to say.
Well, say it and get it off your chest.
I want to get this off my chest first.
What's my resignation.
What's the matter?
Don't you like the way we run this department?
No, I got nothing against the department.
This city's got the finest police force in the world.
But what good is it if they can't enforce the law?
What law?
Any law.
The more serious the crime, the easier it is to beat.
They never put anyone in jail around this town except beggars and peddlers.
When a criminal with a record as long as your arm kills an innocent baby, what happens? Nothing.
Young man, you're right.
Nobody knows it better than I, but I'm just as helpless as you are.
Well, your stomach's stronger than mine.
When they turned Cortig out of that courtroom today, it made me sick all over.
Just like it did every mother and father in New York.
I know just how you feel about it.
When I was your age,
I thought every criminal was in prison, but it didn't take me long to find out that being a cop meant nothing more than having a job.
Yeah, and that's all it is, a job.
Well, it's a job I don't want.
They paid me to protect life and property, but they wouldn't let me earn my salary.
Now I'm going out to work for nothing.
What are you going to do?
I'm going to find Cortig.
Yeah, you see, when I was an officer of the law,
I couldn't lay my hands on him.
Now I'm a private citizen,
I can kick him all over New York.
You can't expect me to print this.
Cortig was acquitted and that ends it.
What if he was acquitted?
That doesn't make him innocent.
He's innocent so far as the court is concerned.
That washes it up.
All right.
It washes me up, too.
If I can't print the truth,
I don't want to print anything.
The truth? My dear girl, we print what we think is the truth.
If it isn't, well, we can't help it.
Oh, I see.
You're just like everybody else in this town.
They don't care whether a man is innocent or guilty.
Nobody cares about anything or anybody.
My dear Miss Fallon,
I'm an editor, not a reformer.
I've got a job, and what's more,
I'm gonna keep it.
All right, you keep your job and keep mine, too.
Now, wait. Wait!
You wait, you look like a waiter, anyway.
Come in, come in, come in.
Come in, come in, come in, come in.
Oh, hello, come in.
What're you talking about?
I am in.
That's right, you are in.
Don't stand there looking at me.
Come on, help me pack.
Where are you going?
I don't know yet.
I haven't made up my mind.
Can I go with you?
Where?
Wherever you're going.
I just told you
I don't know where I'm going.
Well, when do you leave?
I don't know that either.
Well, why can't you take me along?
Where?
That's what I'm asking you.
I'm asking you that.
Say, who's going, you or me?
Where?
I don't know.
I'm not going, you are.
Now look, what time is it?
What time does your train leave?
How do I know
I'm going by train?
I might be going by boat.
What kind of a boat?
I don't know.
I haven't seen it yet.
Come on, help me with this.
I can't open it.
What's the matter with it?
Is it stuck?
Yeah.
Wait a minute,
I'll do it.
Go on, move over.
Why don't you help me with this thing?
Can't you see that
I can't get it open?
All right, move over.
You take that side and I'll take this.
Okay.
Well, there's nothing in it.
I know.
What did you have me open it for?
Oh, that's the worst of having a woman help you pack.
It's a man's job.
Besides, you shouldn't have come over here until I got back, anyway.
Got back from where?
From where I'm going.
You haven't told me where you're going yet.
How can I tell you where I'm going when
I don't know where?
Well, wherever you're going, here's a sock you left and it's got a hole in it.
All right, stay here and darn it.
Hey, Dan, you forgot your hat.
Darn that, too.
See you soon.
Dan you forgot something.
Yeah, I forgot my hat, didn't I?
Yeah, yeah. My hat.
And what else?
Oh, I know.
Come on, honey...
Now will you marry me?
I'll let you know when you come back.
Okay. While I'm away,
I'll buy you that little farm
I was telling you about.
You know, with the pigs and cows and chickens and ducks.
No boarders?
No boarders.
How about the dame in 408?
No boarders.
Take care of yourself, honey.
That's a pretty tough guy you're going after.
So am I. See you soon.
Danny, telephone!
DAN: You answer it.
Hello.
Is Danny Barr there?
Who is this?
This is Mrs. Cole,
Mrs. Chesley Cole.
Well, this is Mrs. Barr.
Mrs. Chiseler Barr.
Hey, Dan!
What is it?
EVE: Mrs. Cole wants you to come over and have some tea.
I don't want any tea.
Yeah, well,
I don't want any farm!
(BLIND SPINNING AROUND
ITS ROLLER)
I wonder if there was any scandal connected with this.
What do you think?
Was he asked to resign?
He's a hardheaded guy.
I'll bet he quit because
Cortig wasn't convicted.
You can't blame him.
There's one guy that's on the level.
He was a chump to quit.
He ought to know by now you can't get a conviction in this town.
Here's a card
Dan sent from Trenton.
Yeah?
This one's from Philadelphia.
Say...
And here's one from Atlantic City.
Where does he go from there?
Says he's coming home.
Hope he doesn't run out of railroad fare.
Gee, I miss him.
I feel as if everything had gone out of my life.
I hope he's Ionesome.
Lonesome?
How can you be Ionesome in Atlantic City?
Honey, when you're in love, you can be Ionesome anywhere.
This is the biggest city in the world, and I'm Ionesome.
Mmm-hmm.
Well, don't worry about him.
He's having a lot of fun.
I bet he's swimming all the time.
I don't believe it.
I bet he's thinking of me.
Well, can't he be swimming and thinking of you at the same time?
Yes, but I bet he's Ionesome.
Lonesome?
50,000 dames in bathing suits and you think he's Ionesome.
Honey, you're still a peasant.
Eve, one of your customers.
I'll catch it.
All right. Bye-bye.
Why, Miss Fallon.
How is the big newspaperwoman?
That's out.
I'm back where I started.
Why so glum?
Oh, everything's gone haywire.
Want your nails short?
Well, not too short.
I see where Dan has resigned from the force.
Yes, he did.
Why?
Oh, about that Cortig case.
Wasn't that the most terrible thing?
Everyone knows he's guilty and off he goes, scot-free.
Is that why Dan resigned?
Sure. He was all burned up because he couldn't get a conviction, but wait till he gets his hands on Cortig.
What's he going to do, make it a personal issue?
Yeah, he thinks he can do better without his badge.
It's man-to-man now.
He'll make him talk.
Let me have that phone, will you?
Will you excuse me?
I have a call to make.
Hello, get me
Locust 3-6-7-2.
Yes, that's Philadelphia.
No, thank you,
I'll hold the wire.
So Dan's going to take it into his own hands, eh?
That's very interesting, very interesting.
I wonder if he'll ever catch up with Cortig.
Leave it to Dan.
Hello, who do you want?
Hello, is that
Mr. Patterson?
Yeah, this is Patterson.
What's new?
Mr. Patterson, this is Mr. Morey speaking.
Yes. I'm quite interested in that...
In that piece of Chippendale.
And that Gainsborough painting, too.
That is, if the price is right.
Stop stalling.
You know the price.
No. I tell you what you'd better do.
You come over and see me right away.
Oh, yes, I'm interested.
No, I suggest you take a plane.
Yeah. It's faster that way.
Yeah, okay. All right.
What were you saying?
Oh, nothing. I was just saying how mad Dan was at Cortig.
He thinks they should've given him the chair.
Really?
But I don't.
He doesn't deserve a chair.
They ought to fry him standing up.
What are we gonna do, fly over?
Yeah, you ain't afraid, are you?
I ain't stuck on them airplanes.
They're too dangerous.
Go on.
They're safe as they can be.
They'd be a lot safer if you could keep one foot on the ground.
There's nothing to worry about.
They give you a parachute.
Yeah, but suppose it don't open?
It's gotta open, it's guaranteed.
That ain't gonna make it open.
I might have to jump
10,000 feet, and if the parachute don't work, what good's the guarantee?
What good is it?
If the parachute don't work, they gotta give you a second parachute.
You get it?
Yeah, I get it.
I get everything but the second parachute.
What you been doing?
Working on Mr. Morey?
Say, he's fascinating, ain't he?
Mmm-hmm.
Kind of mysterious, don't you think?
Very mysterious.
And handsome, too.
Handsome, yeah.
You know, he's the kind of a guy that you can't figure out.
He's... He's different.
Of course, he's not my type.
I like a fellow like you've got.
Gee, you're lucky to have a fellow like Dan.
A scar on his thumb.
Who, Dan?
Wait here.
I want you to see this.
Notice the touch in that one, and the coloring.
It's by Rubens.
Rubens?
Say, is that the same guy that's got the restaurant on Broadway?
No, no relation.
Now the one next to it is a Velazquez.
Superb, isn't it?
I'm getting sick of this.
Yeah.
The whole of this is superb, but what are we here for?
You know, there's nothing like strolling around an art museum when you're talking business.
Now, this one over here is a Rembrandt.
It's what they call a portrait.
Rembrandt was famous for his portraits.
You say Cortig offered you
40 for those diamonds?
That's right, and we want 70.
Say, that dame's got beautiful eyes.
Uh-huh. That's what made
Rembrandt famous.
Cortig was to have made
$30,000 on that deal, but if he were eliminated, you fellows would get the entire 70.
That guy Rembrandt, he's dead, ain't he?
Oh, yes.
He's been dead for years.
I said, if Cortig were eliminated, you fellows would get the entire 70.
Consider Cortig eliminated.
Hello, Mr. Martin.
Why, Miss Fallon, what are you doing here?
I'm looking for Dan.
Have you seen him?
Not since he quit the force, the big simp.
If he quit the force, he had a good reason, and he's not a big simp.
Oh, isn't he?
No, he isn't he.
You just hate him, don't you?
Now, you needn't tell me.
Actions speak louder than words.
Don't worry, he'll turn up and you'll be the first one to know it.
I might be the last one to care.
Oh, isn't that awful?
I'll bet you never want to see him again.
I don't.
I just want to know that he's safe.
Safe? That guy could fight his way out of a den of lions.
Of course, he might have a little trouble with a wildcat.
Now don't go away mad.
I won't, if you'll do me a favor.
Why, of course I will.
What is it?
There's a fingerprint on this.
Will you photograph it for me?
Sure I will.
Thanks.
And I'll tell Dan you never want to see him again.
You better not.
What are the rates here?
Why, it all depends on who you are and what you got.
Here, hold this a second, will you, till I get my keys out?
You know, I like keys.
They get you in and out of places.
Make yourselves at home.
Well, how do you like the joint?
Not bad, eh?
You know,
I just came back from Atlantic City.
Played some swell golf down there, broke a 98.
Thanks.
You boys will pardon me while I put these flowers in water, won't you?
You know, flowers are funny that way.
You got to put them in water, or else.
Wait till you get a load of this fruit.
Hey, you like them?
American Beauties.
They look like roses.
Well, they are.
Lots of different kinds of roses.
These are American Beauties.
Twenty bucks a dozen.
They're my favorites.
I guess that's because they're so expensive.
There's nothing like getting what you want, no matter how much it costs.
Yeah, ain't it the truth?
Well, I guess these babies go in Papa's bedroom.
CAREY: Hey, do you mind if I turn on the radio?
No, no. Go ahead.
Take a drink while you're at it.
Come on in here while I get a vase.
Now, these daisies is nice, too, but they ain't got no smell to them, you know?
Oh, but I like roses.
I like them because they're red.
Red's my favorite color, you know.
Guess that's why
I like rubies.
Rubies is red, too, you know.
Yeah, I know.
Speaking of rubies and things, how about talking business?
Yeah, sure, sure.
That's what we come up here for.
Well, here's the idea.
You offered us
40 grand for that ice, and we want 70.
That's right.
Yeah, sure it's right.
It's right for you.
The less we get for our share, the more you get for yours.
Oh, no, that ain't right.
Yes, it is.
If we take 40, you'll get the other 30.
What makes you think that?
The big shot tipped it off to me.
If he didn't have to give you that big slice, we could get the whole pot.
Yeah. You don't want it all, do you?
No, but we could get it all if you weren't in the deal.
Yeah, but I am in the deal, ain't I?
Yeah.
But you're making it kind of difficult.
No, I don't think so.
See, I believe a guy is entitled to everything he can get, sure.
But I believe everybody's entitled to something.
Yeah, as long as you're getting more than everybody else.
No, no.
You got me all wrong.
My motto is
"live and let live."
Take these with you, Cortig.
Daisies never tell.
Wait.
What's that?
CAREY: It isn't a window cleaner.
Come on in out of there.
Come on!
Get them up and get in here.
What were you doing out there?
I'm an aviator,
I just fell out of my airplane.
Don't get smart.
All right,
I'll tell you the truth.
I'm Daniel Barr, I'm a cop.
A cop, eh?
I'll tell your mother you died with her name on your lips.
Thanks.
By the way, where's Cortig?
He's resting in the bathroom.
Have you got a partner or do you work alone?
Alone.
I stand on my own feet.
Sit down before you get tired.
Cover him.
If he moves, use your own judgment.
Thank you. Hello.
This is Mr. Patterson.
Just called you up to tell you we eliminated Cortig and we're coming over to eliminate you.
What are you talking about?
You're not dealing with the insurance companies now.
You're doing business with me.
What's the idea of having a copper planted in the room?
I don't get it.
Somebody's made an error.
Yeah.
That's what it is, an error.
You can chalk it up to Dan Barr.
He came over here to knock us off, but we convinced him he was wrong.
Is Dan Barr there with you?
Is he where, with who?
I'll say he's here.
He don't care nothing about leaving, neither.
Put him on.
I think I can take care of everything.
Here.
Hello, Dan. Dan, where are you?
Hold the wire,
I'll put him on.
Somebody wants to talk to you.
If he gives that dame any information, bump him off.
Dan, where are you?
Are you hurt?
No, I'm all right, honey.
I had a little trouble, but I'm all right.
That's enough.
Put that guy on.
Me?
Hello, Mr. Patterson.
Mr. Patterson, you seem to think
I put you on the spot, but you're mistaken.
Now, if you'll do exactly as I tell you to do, everything will end advantageously.
Never mind the big words, what do you want me to do?
Come to the Cosmopolitan
Barber Shop at once.
I'll have my representative meet you there.
She's a pretty blonde, a manicurist.
Say, what is all this?
Just hand her the package and she'll give you the money.
What are you talking about?
What's that?
No, no. Don't do that.
Don't hurt him.
What? No.
Everything will come out all right if you...
But you've got to promise not to hurt him.
What did he say?
What are they doing to him?
All right.
Tell that blonde
I'll be wearing a red carnation.
I'm leaving now.
I'm going over to a barbershop to get that sugar.
Well, Mr. Detective, do you think you'll be here when I get back?
I hope not.
Don't worry.
He'll be here.
You'd better make up your mind.
After all, you don't want anything to happen to Dan.
What do I have to do?
Practically nothing.
When you see a man with a red carnation in his coat, just give him the money, but make sure he gives you the little package first.
What do I do then?
Then bring the little package up here to me.
If everything goes all right,
I'll give you a nice little wedding present.
You are going to marry Dan, aren't you?
Yeah, I think so.
You're sure he's all right, that nothing's gonna happen to him?
I'm positive, you just do as I tell you and leave the rest to me.
There you are now.
Well, what do you say, aren't you going to do it?
All right, give me the money.
Now you're showing some sense.
It's as easy as A, B, C.
When you see that man with a red carnation in his coat, just say, "Good evening,
Mr. Patterson."
That's all there is to it.
Hello. Police headquarters?
This is Richard Morey speaking.
Uh-huh.
The private detective.
Let me speak to Chief Keilly.
Oh, is it?
Hello, Chief.
Look, I got some information for you.
Oh, don't thank me.
I get mine from the insurance company.
But I'm always glad to help you fellows out.
Listen, if you'll go right over to the Cosmopolitan
Barber Shop, you'll find the man you're looking for.
He's wearing a red carnation, but don't make your pinch until you see him hand a package to a blonde manicurist.
That's it.
She's an accomplice, and you can get them both at the same time.
What's that? I'll be there.
I know your eyes are bad, and I'll be there to point him out.
You're a smarter cop than I thought you was.
All you gotta do is sit still and nothing will happen to you.
Yeah. You don't have to be smart when know your life is at stake.
You've got a gun, I haven't.
That settles it.
Yeah, I guess you're right.
I've got a gun and you ain't, so I'm sitting in the driver's seat.
Yeah.
Get me a doctor.
Hear anything from Dan?
Yeah. I mean, no.
Yeah, you mean no?
I don't know what you mean.
What's the matter with you, are you nervous?
Say, is there a guy around here with a flower in his coat?
Several.
What's your favorite flower?
Right now, red carnations.
Here comes a red carnation.
Is that your man?
Yeah, I think so. Thanks.
That's a pretty carnation you have.
I always wear a red carnation when I expect to meet a blonde.
Would you like to smell it?
Sit down at my table and I'll tell you.
My left hand itches.
What's that a sign of?
It's a sign you're going to get some money.
I was expecting some, but I don't know whether I'll get it or not.
I'm quite sure you will.
You act like you're nervous.
I got a headache.
Why don't you take something for it?
What would you suggest,
Mr. Patterson?
Try these pills.
What's the idea?
Who put these on us, you?
Yeah. I'm in the jewelry business, too.
How do you like my bracelets?
Say, is this a joke?
I don't see anybody laughing.
You'd better get them off awful fast or you're gonna get yourself into trouble.
I'm going to get myself in trouble?
What do you think you're in?
Hello, Chief. I hope you don't mind my butting into your business.
I should say not.
You did a fine job.
Not bad for a private citizen.
Private nothing.
I didn't accept your resignation.
You're still a cop.
Say...
Don't get a swelled head.
You didn't make this pinch, she did.
Well, she made the pinch, but I got the evidence. Here.
Say, where'd you get those?
Honey, you'd be surprised what you can do in the dark.
Better take these two guys out of here before they pick somebody's pocket.
MOREY: Oh, you think you're clever.
You got nothing on me.
CHIEF: Oh, we haven't, eh?
A man with a scar on his thumb should never have his nails manicured.
Well, this belongs to you, doesn't it?
Yeah, but you can keep it.
I won't need it anymore.
What do you mean, honey?
You're gonna quit?
Sure, why not?
I'm going to marry the best cop on the force.
Oh, no, you're not.
I am. Here.
Oh, wait a minute, all the people.
Oh, what do you care?
You're quitting anyhow.
Ripped, corrected & synched by Fingersmaster. Enjoy!
Here’s a toast to you, Paul.
You’ve torn my Pierre away from his books and made him enjoy himself for once.
Oh, don’t thank Paul.
It was for you I came.
Then I must drink a toast to Camille.
Oh, no, Paul.
You’ve had four glasses already.
That’s nothing.
For last year’s carnival night, I had 14.
Dupin, Paul!
Look at the Arab dancers.
This way. This way.
See the naughty nautch nymphs.
The adorable Arab angels.
Come, we must continue our studies of anatomy.
Yeah, much nicer than... than visiting a morgue.
...marvelous performance of dancing.
We have Lady Fatima!
Lady Fatima’s snake imitations...
Do they bite?
Oh, yes, but you have to pay extra for that.
Mignette, do you think you could learn to do that dance for me?
No.
No?
Well, then...
I guess I’ll have to join the show.
See, Pierre, how brown they are.
Is that their real color, do you suppose, or have they painted themselves?
Shall I find out for you?
Don’t you dare.
Introducing
Col. Ha-ha from America!
Bloodthirsty savages from the wilds of America!
See the redskins scalp their victim.
First time in Paris.
They are Apaches, my friends,
Apaches.
Like our own waterfront rats.
Just as wild.
That’d be a good name for our bandits.
Apaches.
Ha, Apaches, why, splendid.
Would you like to try whether they are real?
I?
And leave you unprotected?
Never.
Oh, Pierre.
Let’s go in there.
Attention, attention, ladies and gentlemen.
Step closer. Closer.
Behind this curtain is the strangest creature your eyes will ever behold.
Erik, the ape-man!
The monster who walks upright and speaks a language even as you and I.
The ruler of the jungle, whose giant hands can tear a man in half.
Erik, the ape-man.
The beast with a human soul.
More cunning than a man and stronger than a lion.
Step up, ladies and gentlemen.
Step right in.
Shall we go into this one?
All right.
Soldiers and children, half-price!
Step up, ladies and gentlemen.
Don’t miss this opportunity.
That’s good.
Let’s go down there.
Oh! Let’s sit over there, love.
No, mademoiselle, not there.
Take a seat in front so that you can see everything.
This gorilla killed six men, you see.
What a funny-looking man.
He’s a show in himself.
Did you notice his accent?
I wonder where he comes from.
I never heard an accent like it.
Silence.
I’m Dr. Mirakle, messieurs, mesdames.
And I am not the sideshow charlatan.
So if you expect to witness the usual carnival hocus-pocus, just go to the box office and get your money back.
I am not exhibiting a freak, a monstrosity of nature, but a milestone in the development of life.
The shadow of Erik, the ape hangs over us all.
The darkness before the dawn of man.
It’s all right.
Don’t be afraid.
It’s only a baboon.
I-I’m not afraid.
Neither am I.
Listen to him, brothers and sisters.
He is speaking to you.
Can you understand what he says or have you forgotten?
I have re-learned his language.
Listen.
I will translate what he says.
My home is in the African jungle, where I lived with my father and my mother and my brothers and sisters.
But I was captured by a band of hairless white apes and carried away to a strange land.
I’m in the prime of my strength.
And I am lonely.
Here is the story of man.
In the slime of chaos there was the seed that rose and grew into the tree of life.
Life was motion.
Fins changed into wings.
Wings into ears.
Crawling reptiles grew legs.
Eons of ages passed.
There came a time when a four-legged thing walked upright.
Behold, the first man.
Heresy!
Heresy?
Heresy?
Do they still burn men for heresy?
Then burn me, monsieur.
Light the fire.
Do you think your little candle will outshine the flame of truth?
Do you think these boards and curtains are my whole life?
They are only a trap to catch the pennies of fools.
My life is consecrated to a great experiment.
I tell you, I will prove your kinship with the ape.
Erik’s blood shall be mixed with the blood of man.
What does he mean?
I wish I knew.
Mesdames et messieurs if any of you wish to make the acquaintance of Erik, come forward.
There’s no need to be afraid.
He is behind bars and cannot hurt you.
Let’s go up.
Oh, no, Pierre,
I’m afraid.
I’m not afraid.
He likes you, Camille.
Look, he wants your bonnet.
Erik is only human, mademoiselle.
He has an eye for beauty.
You have made a conquest, mademoiselle.
Pierre!
Erik! Erik, get back!
You fool, do you want to be killed?
Oh, but he has ruined your bonnet.
I will replace it, mademoiselle.
I will send you a new bonnet with Erik’s compliments.
Will you tell me where you live and what your name is?
Never mind, monsieur.
It was an accident.
But I insist.
Where do you live, my child?
It is not necessary, monsieur.
Come, dear.
Follow her.
I must know where she lives.
You liked her, didn’t you, Erik?
Sweetheart.
Have I ever told you that I love you?
Camille, I love you.
Let me look at you.
You’re like a flower, soft and fragrant.
Pure and beautiful.
Darling.
And you’re like a star, too.
A white morning star.
And your hair, it’s full of stardust.
You’re like a song the girls of Provence sing on May Day.
And like the dancing in Normandy on May Day.
And like the wine in Burgundy on May Day.
Oh, Camille, I love you.
And I love you, too, Pierre.
No!
No! No!
No!
A lady in distress?
Who are you?
Come with me.
Where?
My carriage.
No! No!
Why are you trembling at my touch?
Your hand is cold.
It chills me.
Come.
I will help you.
No.
Come.
Be patient.
Are you in pain, mademoiselle?
It will only last a little longer.
Ah, you are stubborn. Hush!
It will only last one more minute, then we shall see.
We shall know if you are to be the pride of science!
Oh, hush, hush!
Now, mademoiselle.
Now.
The clots.
The black spots.
Rotten blood!
You.
Your blood is rotten.
Black as your sins.
You cheated me.
Your beauty was a lie.
Dead?
You are...
You’re dead.
Janos, Janos.
Get rid of it.
Get it away.
Will my search ever end?
Three this week.
Three.
Women, all of them.
Life is hard.
The river is kind.
The river is soft.
It rocks them to sleep.
And asks no pay.
Three women.
Always small.
Always young.
A man?
A woman.
Age?
Oh, any, 1,000 or 30.
Cause of death?
Drowning.
Profession?
Yes.
Identification?
None, she was naked.
Number 13.
Well, Monsieur Dupin, what brings you here so late?
The two women.
What about them?
Monsieur, would you be good enough to show them to me once more?
If you wish, Monsieur Dupin,
I will show you three.
Three?
You mean, there’s been another one?
Yes.
Let me see her.
Yes.
There’s the body.
The same marks.
Marks?
See them?
They’re on the others, too.
Monsieur, you must let me take a specimen of this woman’s blood.
Impossible.
Since that whole body disappeared last week, the inspector is very strict about medical students.
Then you bring it to me.
It’s against all regulations.
Tomorrow night, huh?
Good night, monsieur.
The macaroni’s ready.
And the coffee’s getting cold.
Aren’t you going to eat your lunch?
You give five francs to that old ghoul down at the morgue and... and I have to turn magician and pull a loaf of bread out of my nose so we can eat.
Dupin, you might at least have the decency to come to the table.
Pierre?
Why don’t you go down to the morgue and live there, instead of making a morgue out of our home.
Vampire.
Vulture.
Body snatcher.
Say something.
Come in.
Speak of the devil.
Good morning, monsieur.
You’ve got it, eh?
Yes, monsieur, I’ve got it.
But who knows, at the price of my job, perhaps.
I am a married man, monsieur.
I have children.
And if the police should even suspect that I was holding anything back from them,
I should be put behind bars.
No use, no use, we haven’t a centime.
Yes, monsieur.
I must owe you the money.
The morgue must give us credit.
Then, I will trust you.
Monsieur, the Morgue Keeper, perhaps you have an extra slab for my friend here.
Why not take him in?
He eats nothing, he doesn’t talk.
He never changes his position.
I’m sure he’d make you a very fine tenant.
I’ll pack his things and send them down.
You don’t live badly here, monsieur.
I had to hurry myself up here without lunch.
And now you have to hurry back for your lunch.
Boy, that’s too bad.
Good appetite to you and your quiet guests.
Goodbye.
Good day, monsieur.
If you’d pay half as much attention to your studies as you do to this nonsense, what grades you’d get.
What did you find out?
After the carnival last night,
I performed an autopsy.
The victim didn’t die of drowning.
There was no water in her lungs.
Oh, so that’s what you were up to.
I thought you were with Camille.
Hmm?
Of what did the victim die?
Paul, here it is again.
What?
The same foreign substance in the blood of each victim.
Look, Paul.
All three died from the same cause.
Some strange poison perhaps.
Something introduced into the blood streams that caused their death.
What could it be?
I don’t know.
That’s what
I have to find out.
Oh, Pierre, you must pull yourself together.
Why, you’re becoming fanatical.
Look at yourself in the mirror.
Your eyes are getting glassy.
Just like that old charlatan’s.
Dr. Mirakle, eh?
What did you make of him?
Oh, he’s a faker.
Did you pay attention to what he said?
You mean about us being the product of evolution?
Yes.
Hmm.
Has it occurred to you that he might be right?
Eat your lunch.
Dr. Mirakle.
He’s a strange man.
Pierre!
Mother. Mother!
See what the concierge has just brought up.
Mother, come quickly.
I’m coming. I’m coming.
For pity’s sake, what is it?
What are you so excited about?
See what just came.
A new bonnet.
A bonnet!
Oh, it’s lovely.
Are you sure it’s for you?
My name’s on the box.
Isn’t it pretty?
Oh, now, who could have sent it?
Maybe it’s from Pierre.
Oh, where would Pierre get money enough to get a present like that?
Maybe there’s a card inside the box.
It’s from Dr. Mirakle.
And who is Dr. Mirakle?
You know, I told you.
The funny old man at the sideshow who owns the ape.
Oh, I see.
The ape took your bonnet, and the gentleman’s replacing it.
Well, that’s very nice of him.
It’s a beautiful bonnet.
Shall I wear it to the picnic?
Why not?
I wonder how he found out where we lived.
But didn’t you tell him?
He wanted to know.
But Pierre wouldn’t let me tell him.
That’s funny.
Well, anyway, you have a new hat.
Camille? Camille?
There they are.
Hello.
Ah, there she is.
Everybody, ready.
One, two.
♪ Her father wanted her to wed a funny ♪
♪ funny little man ♪
♪ Her mother wanted her to wed a funny ♪
♪ funny little man ♪
♪ My father wanted me to wed a funny ♪
♪ funny little man ♪
♪ But I would not be wed,
I said ♪
♪ to such a funny little man ♪♪
Come, fair maiden.
Yon charger champs at the bit.
Come on, Camille.
Hurry up! Hurry up!
Did you bring the chicken?
My, aren’t you dressed up?
♪ But she would not be seen she said ♪
♪ with such a funny little man ♪
♪ But she would not be seen she said ♪
♪ with such a funny little man ♪♪
Florette,
I am absolutely mad about you.
No, no, no.
Years ago I gave up believing in students.
But, Marie,
I mean what I say.
And here’s to a truthful student, though the animal doesn’t exist.
But, Mignette,
I give you my word.
You will speak to my parents tonight?
But it’s you I love, Susette, not your family.
Whee!
Don’t I look different to you today?
Different? How?
You’re a blind donkey.
Something new I’ve got on.
It’s my bonnet.
Oh, of course, it’s beautiful.
And it’s a gift.
A gift? Well, well.
Who from?
Guess.
Honoré, that poet.
Guess again.
That butterfly collector,
Moreau?
Oh, Pierre, you’d better give up.
It’s from Dr. Mirakle.
Mirakle?
Mirakle.
Yes. Wasn’t it nice of him?
Did he bring it himself?
No, but he sent a note.
So he found out where you live, after all.
And I can’t imagine how.
He must have had us followed.
What did the note say?
He asked me to come to his tent tonight.
That’s strange.
What could he want?
You mustn’t go.
Why not?
I wonder what Dr. Mirakle is up to.
Paul calls him a faker, but he isn’t.
He isn’t an ordinary man.
I’ll go see your Dr. Mirakle tonight.
Very well, Pierre.
Get them poles down to the hallway.
Move this box back.
Come on. Come on.
Come on.
How about a little help here, boss?
Lay that over on the way.
Go on, move it, move it.
Get this box over here.
Get this box over here.
That’s right. Now move it.
What’s the matter, Erik?
Are you restless?
Be quiet.
What is the matter?
So, we have a caller.
Dr. Mirakle...
No show tonight, young man.
The carnival is over.
I’ve already seen your performance
Doctor.
I wanted to talk to you.
First, the young lady to whom you sent the hat wants me to thank you for her.
Then she is not coming?
She sends her regrets.
Very well.
Good night.
Are you going away?
Yes.
We move to Munich in the morning.
Excuse me.
I must attend to my work.
I’m a medical student.
And the things you said in your lecture were very interesting.
Have you experimented,
Doctor?
Yes.
Have you written any papers?
None to be shown.
I had hoped you would let me come to see you.
Have you a house in Paris?
No.
I sleep here.
This tent is my home.
Good night, young man.
No, no.
That’s Dr. Mirakle’s stuff.
He’s not going with us.
He’s going to stay in Paris.
Load off.
Pull ahead.
All right, go in the corner.
Erik. Erik.
Let me get this for you.
He got out with the ape, and I’ll swear they were talking to each other.
They went inside, and after that there was no sign of life.
Not a sound.
So you went home?
Well, I dropped in at the morgue.
Pierre.
Pierre, what will you come to?
Why are you always visiting that horrid old place?
Don’t you worry, darling.
Look.
There’s all of our Paris, spread out before us.
I like to see the little lighted windows, twinkling like stars.
Wouldn’t it be fun to know all that was going on inside those houses?
Perhaps it’s just as well that we don’t know.
Think of what all those walls are hiding.
Broken hopes and bodies and hearts.
Absent dreams.
Starvation, madness.
Crimes of the streets.
And tragedies of the river.
Paris. My city.
I hate to leave you alone tonight.
Hold me tightly, Pierre.
I could hold you forever,
Camille.
Good night, dear.
Good night, Pierre.
By the way, you always keep your door bolted at night, don’t you?
Not always, Pierre.
Be sure and lock it tonight, dear.
Will you promise?
If you say so.
Good night.
Good night, dear.
Good night, mother.
Pierre?
Yes.
Mademoiselle, you will pardon the late hour.
But I had to see you.
What do you want, monsieur?
Don’t be alarmed, mademoiselle.
I’m leaving Paris tonight.
And there is something
I have to tell you.
May I come in?
Oh no, monsieur.
My mother has gone to sleep.
My carriage is downstairs, mademoiselle.
We can drive to a café and talk.
Oh, that’s impossible.
But it is of greatest importance.
Please go away.
Mademoiselle, you must come.
Please. Do me this favor.
Let me close the door, or I’ll call for help.
But I have a message for you from Erik.
He talks only of you.
He can’t forget you.
There is something you must know.
Are you insane, monsieur?
Erik! Erik!
There, Erik.
She’s up there.
Gorilla.
Gorilla.
Paul, Paul, Paul, wake up.
Wake up.
What’s... What’s the matter?
What?
I’ve found it.
It’s the blood of a gorilla.
Gorilla?
Those women, don’t you understand?
They died because a gorilla’s blood was injected into their veins.
Camille!
Camille!
Oh, darling, what is it?
What’s the matter?
Tell me, what happened to you, please?
I’ll get you a glass of water.
Oh, my baby!
Mother. Camille!
Camille!
Camille!
Mother.
Hurry up. Give the man a hand.
Someone help me break it down, please.
Help! Help! Help!
What have you got?
What is it, violence?
What do you think?
Uh.
Money. Jewels.
This is not a robbery.
And there’s no body, so it isn’t a murder.
He’s carried her away.
She’s gone.
Who are you?
Where do you come from?
He’s her sweetheart.
He... He comes here every night.
Ah-ha.
Sweetheart.
You may wait for the prefect.
But we must find Camille.
Let me go, you fool!
It’ll be too late.
You may tell all that to the prefect.
Now, what is your name?
Pierre Dupin.
Now, where do you live?
Oh, don’t you understand?
Her life is in danger.
I understand.
Where do you live?
Oh, you fool.
You stupid fool!
So, your name is
Victor Albert Adolph
Jules Hugo Louis Duborg?
Eh?
Yes, sir.
Why did you not investigate when you heard the first scream?
I... I was afraid.
Stupid, incredibly stupid.
Yes, sir. I...
Stupid.
What is your name and business?
I am Franz Odenheimer.
I own a restaurant.
Odenheimer.
In your own way, tell us what happened.
You see,
I was just going to bed.
Then suddenly,
I heard a scream.
Right away,
I ran across the street.
And I was one of the first ones to enter this room.
On the way upstairs,
I heard a voice.
And that voice was speaking Italian.
Do you speak Italian?
No.
Were you ever in Italy?
No.
How do you know it was Italian?
Because I am sure it was Italian.
Ah.
Thank you, sir.
Alberto Montani.
What do you know of this affair?
Well, I, I also heard the voice.
But it was not Italian.
I’m Italian. I speak Italian.
When I ran up the stairs with the others,
I heard the voice.
It’s not Italian, no.
It was Danish.
Do you speak Danish?
No.
Were you ever in Denmark?
No.
How do you know it was Danish?
My intuition.
It was not Danish.
Oh.
I beg your pardon,
Your Honor.
I am a native of Denmark.
Danish is my native tongue.
I heard the voice, but it was not Danish.
It was German.
Italian, not German.
Danish.
German.
I say it was German.
Silence!
Italian.
Danish.
German.
Silence.
Bring in the young man.
Monsieur, the prefect will question you now.
Now, you might as well come quietly.
Don’t try and make any more trouble.
Young man, what is your name?
My na...
Oh, I can tell you who committed the murder and where you can find him.
Who?
An ape.
He’s out of his mind.
If you don’t listen to me now, you’ll be guilty of the second murder.
Second murder?
So you know there has been one?
Yeah.
If you’ll only listen to me,
I’ll explain.
Very well, tell us what you know.
There were two women in this room.
The only door was locked and bolted.
Everybody heard screams and the sound of a terrible struggle.
Within two minutes, the door was broken down.
No one was here.
One of those women was carried away.
I tell you, the other one was murdered.
And her body must be somewhere in this room.
Mother.
Young man, you know too much.
I arrest you for the murder of...
Yes, and another murder may be happening now.
It’s a confession you wish to make?
No. An accusation.
Dr. Mirakle in the Rue Morgue is guilty of four murders so far this week.
And by now, perhaps a fifth.
Do you accuse this doctor?
Dr. Mirakle has a captive ape.
It committed this crime.
No one man could have done this.
Three men couldn’t have pushed that body up the chimney.
I tell you that ape killed her.
And carried her daughter off through the window.
You’re insane.
Come on.
Wait!
Here is proof.
That is not human.
It’s the hair of an ape.
Ape.
Her blood is perfect.
That’s the house, monsieur.
Open.
This is an empty house.
No one lives here.
But it’s not empty,
I tell you.
We must break in.
There’s another door at the side.
We’ll try it.
Police.
I cannot stop now.
Hold them off, until I am ready.
Come, Erik.
Erik.
Erik.
Back into your cage!
Back to your cage. Erik.
Somebody’s barring it.
Open.
In the name of the law, open!
Hurry!
Camille?
He’s dead.
Why, look! There it goes.
It’s an ape!
You fool!
Pierre! Pierre!
Camille.
Name?
Mirakle, I believe, or something like that.
Number 2.
Number 2.
Age?
Oh, any age.
It doesn’t matter.
Profession?
They say he was a scientist or something.
Death caused by?
An ape.
-- English --
Diana?
Yes, mother rukh.
Janos is still in the laboratory, of course?
Yes, he's checking his equipment before the people from england arrive.
I'm to let him know when I see the lights of the car.
It was on such a night that janos first caught his ray from Andromeda.
Your father worked the guides.
I held the detecting lens, and never saw again.
= dear mother rukh.
My son will not learn until too late, I fear, that the universe is very large, and there are some secrets we are not meant to probe.
Janos says the electricity will help the demonstration.
He is wrong to demonstrate to these people.
Who are they?
Pygmies that scoff at a giant, who have said that he is only a visionary, unscientific, a charlatan, huh.
He's greater than all of them.
He sent for them.
If he had waited, one day they would have begged, begged to come to him.
T see the car now.
I'll tell janos.
Janos?
Janos?
= Diana.
They're coming up the grade.
= sir Francis Stevens and the great Dr. benet from the university of Paris.
What do they know?
What will they ever know?
I'll take them somewhere they've never been.
Back into time.
It will work well tonight.
I'm sure and I'm ready.
They'll never laugh at me again.
= janos.
They'll be here any minute.
You must prepare to meet them.
Come.
Yes, yes.
= I'm Diana rukh.
My husband will be here presently.
I'm lady Stevens.
This is my husband, sir Francis.
How do you do?
= and this is Dr. benet.
Madame.
How do you do?
And this is my nephew, Ronald Drake.
How do you do?
May I present you to my husband's mother, frau rukh.
How do you do?
Oh, what a lovely fire.
I hope you didn't have too bad a time coming up.
It really is rather a terrible trip.
Oh, I don't mind anything, but my poor sit-downish husband minded it.
- Brandy?
- Oh, thanks.
That will help.
Thank you.
Would anyone ever expect to find anything like this on top of the carpathian mountains?
No.
= sir Francis.
To see you again after so many years is interesting.
Dr. benet, we meet at last.
But we already know each other.
True.
You've come to see me fail, but you'll be disappointed.
I have come to see that sir Francis isn't deceived.
Your doubts are very flattering.
They are mutual.
We have never seen eye to eye.
That is because I've always looked 200 years ahead of your theories.
= Dr. rukh?
You haven't met me.
Oh, lady Stevens.
Nor my nephew, Ronald Drake.
And you too are a scientist, sir?
No, I'm afraid not.
He doesn't know a thing about science.
But he's one of the three living men who crossed the mountains of the moon, made maps of the country.
And since that's where we're going, he'll come in useful.
Very commendable work, sir.
Good man.
I've seen him tested in Africa.
I read that you were going to Africa.
That's why I asked you here.
Because what I have to show you after dinner concerns Africa, and the claim I made many years ago.
= all of this makes a man like me feel quite small and useless.
But you've gone into uncharted places, too.
Oh, my explorations have all been on this planet.
They reach into space.
= this is the nebula in Andromeda.
A ray from this nebula will be caught here and electrically transferred to the projector in my laboratory.
There I will recreate what is recorded on that beam of light.
From Andromeda?
From Andromeda.
Three-quarters of a million light-years distant.
= can he do that?
Yes.
He will not fail.
He must not.
It would kill him.
Have you seen it?
= no one has seen it but janos.
= you'll wait here a few minutes.
I'll prepare the projector.
He seems very confident.
Yes.
Of course, the theory of reproducing vibrations from the past is not new.
But if proved, would be. = yes.
This may be very interesting.
Yes, very.
Doesn't all this sort of thing ever affect you?
Oh, no, I'm used to it.
My father was assistant here.
When he died three years ago, I married Dr. rukh.
Oh, I see.
I am ready.
A new development of barium crown glass which will protect you from all dangerous rays.
To reproduce what is written upon the beam from Andromeda, we must travel out into space upon that ray of light until we reach a point at which we turn and look back upon our own planet.
We approach the moon.
Dead ashes, where there is no air or water.
In the shadows, colder than our arctic.
In the sunlight, hotter than any desert of the earth.
Saturn we pass, with its twirling rings.
A vast cloud of tiny movements, each moving in its own orbit.
Another constellation speeds towards us.
The great nebula of Orion.
500 light-years distant.
But we travel at a speed far greater than light, the pace of electric magnification.
Otherwise it would take a million lifetimes to reach our goal.
We move by this chaotic mass and see Andromeda, our nearest neighbor among the island universes of space.
The light which we see left there before man existed, before our earth had cooled.
We speed towards this nebula and stop at a point where we will see our own planet, the earth, as it existed long ago.
Years ago, sir Francis, I voiced a belief that a great meteor bearing an element even more powerful than radium, struck an uncharted spot somewhere in the continent of Africa.
If you will bear with me for a moment,
I'll show you how 1 know this to be a fact.
That is all.
=- a trick?
No.
Reality.
But where has it gone?
Back into space.
What did we see?
What you saw tonight actually occurred a few thousand million years ago.
J see.
A tour in time.
Exactly.
Everything that ever happened has left its record on nature's film.
Every sound since eternity began still vibrates, recorded somewhere in outer space.
The cataclysm you witnessed tonight traveled back to us on the ray from Andromeda.
Well, I'm dazed.
Dazed, that's all I can say.
You have demonstrated something that I have always regarded as an unsupported theory.
I'm at a loss for words.
I congratulate you.
Perhaps you'd all like some Brandy.
Oh, thank you, that would be most acceptable.
I'll join you in a few moments.
Well, I, for one, am just beginning to recover from what we've seen.
= t don't think I ever shall.
It was unbelievable.
Well, sir, your discovery is breathtaking.
When do you plan to release it to the world of science?
Oh, not for some time.
It's not nearly ready yet.
And if there should be this meteoric deposit of an unknown element in Africa...
= there is.
It'd be interesting to discover what it is.
Very.
Will you consider joining forces with us and accompany our expedition?
You ask me to join forces with you?
But you forget I have no standing with your scientific congress.
I believe I have even been called unorthodox.
Oh, nonsense.
Our expedition isn't under the auspices of any association.
You will be doing us an honor.
Yes, I'll go with you.
Why not?
No, janos.
Why?
It will not be wise for you to go.
I'm listening, mother.
Even though you may make a great discovery, you'll not be happy.
You are not used to people, janos.
You never will be.
Your experiments are your friends.
Leave people alone.
Where do you suppose that madman rukh is, anyway?
After all, it is his own business if he wishes to go off on an exploration of his own.
See, Stevens, the little creature is going to live.
See his flesh glow.
He moves his arm with much more strength.
Very interesting.
This proves, I think that human organisms are only part of astrochemistry, controlled by radial forces from the sun.
Oh, I never doubted your theory.
What have you been using?
= zithilium.
One milligram, drawn directly from the spectrum of the sun.
Turn it off.
Interesting.
But I must admit I'm quite ready to leave Africa the moment that your experiments are completed.
After eight weeks of this,
I admit that I'm fed up.
I know every wheeze and every crack of every record.
Glad to see signs of rhino about.
We'll go out after them tomorrow.
Yes, you've only got six to your credit.
Oh, well, they're such nasty-tempered beasts, it's a pleasure to dispose of them.
This must be lonely for Diana.
= of course.
It's your fault.
Why do you say that?
Oh, Ronnie, the way you two avoid each other is most pointed.
Why can't you be pleasantly friendly with her as you were at first?
Well, if you must know, I don't dare to be.
Becoming interested?
Yes.
I thought so.
You're in love.
Well, what could be more natural?
An African moon, two healthy young animals.
Oh, stop it.
We're not animals, and that's just it.
And it isn't too easy, so please don't make us into fiction for your book.
Well, you are interested.
Oh, so you're back, Arabella.
Yes, we got an antelope and a fine leopard.
My ankles are worse.
I tell you, I'm getting heartily sick of Africa.
And I don't see any use in waiting for rukh any longer.
It's evident he has elected to desert us.
Well, we can't go and leave his wife here alone, even though he's forgotten she came along.
After all, she is rukh's affair, not ours.
She is my affair.
I'm fond of her.
Well, I'm not fond enough of anyone to make this my permanent abode.
Temba, more water, please.
Ah, ah!
Choco.
The small package.
Boss, put on hat, very hot here.
Boss found place he look for many days now, maybe?
= there's no doubt of it.
No doubt of it.
Safari boys no like this place, boss.
Why not?
Look in pit, fall in, many devil.
= pick me out a runner.
I want to send a letter to the main camp immediately.
Me do.
This boy go.
He very fast.
= hold box.
How long will he take to reach the main camp?
This time tomorrow night, he get there.
All downhill. =- good.
Boss, wants him to wait, bring back answer paper?
Yes.
Now, give this to the young mistress.
Don't say a word about where we are.
And make sure he understands.
Francis, are you asleep?
No, my dear, I was merely trying to imagine myself at home.
I'd give 10 pounds for...
Antelope stew again.
Take it away.
I'm not up to coping with it.
Oh, stop feeling so sorry for yourself.
What new secrets did you draw from the sun today, Dr. benet?
Proof that the sun is the mother of us all.
Is she?
I wonder why she bothers about us.
What are we all about anyway?
Astrochemistry, my friend.
Astrochemistry.
= it's from janos.
Excuse me.
He says very little.
But we're not to expect him back for some time yet.
Where is he?
He doesn't say.
He hopes he's on the trail of an interesting new discovery.
Runner boy want take paper back.
Yes, tell him to wait.
Will you all excuse me, please?
- But your dinner, dear.
- I'm not really hungry.
I want to see the runner boy in my tent.
You come, too, and talk for me.
I'll be ready in an hour.
I want three boys for safari.
Diana?
What are you going to do?
There's only one thing to do.
I'm going to him tonight.
Tonight?
= it's cooler.
Besides, there's a moon.
You're going alone?
I can't stay here now.
Why?
He's a great man, Ronald.
I'm his wife.
He needs me, and I can't let him down.
No, you wouldn't.
You're not the sort to let any man down, ever.
Goodbye.
Goodbye, Diana.
Power.
More power than man has ever known.
Well, what do you want?
Safari boys want go away this place.
No like him.
So, they want to leave me, do they?
Me wanna go, too.
= indeed.
Do you see that rock?
Yes, boss.
I want you to keep your eyes on that rock.
Tell the boys to do so, too.
Watch.
No, I sorry, boss!
You can all go if you want to, but you won't go far.
All that will be left of you will be like that.
Me stay, boss.
We'll all stay.
All right, then get back to work.
Take the lamp inside.
Draws the pests.
It's poisoned me.
Dead.
Boss house there.
Me take you.
No, I'll go alone.
Janos?
What are you doing here?
You must go away at once.
At once, do you hear?
= but it's Diana.
You shouldn't have come.
I wrote you I had important work to do.
I don't want to be bothered with anyone.
Oh, you must be ill.
What's happened to you?
Nothing's happened to me.
What makes you think anything's happened to me?
It's been weeks since you left.
Don't you want to see me?
I don't want to see you here.
This is no place for you.
You must leave here at once.
My place is where you are.
I won't be a bother.
I suppose you'll have to stay the night.
My headman will find shelter for you.
But I want you out of here the very first thing in the morning, do you understand?
Yes, I understand.
I'm leaving as soon as it's daybreak.
Yes, missy.
Me tell your boys.
Thank you.
Benet.
Benet. - Rukh?
Don't let anybody know I'm here.
You're exhausted.
= don't touch me.
What has happened?
I made the runner guide me here.
I've traveled day and night.
But why?
I found the place where the meteor fell.
I've discovered an element a thousand times more powerful than radium.
But it's done something to me.
Something horrible.
Horrible?
Look at me.
Look at me in the dark.
Why, you're poisoned.
Poisoned.
And everyone I touch is poisoned.
They die.
= die?
Yes, I khow.
Let's get back into the light.
Perhaps the metal cloth did not protect you.
No, no, it gave me complete insulation.
I must have been careless somehow.
Benet, you know more of the chemistry of the body than any man alive.
Something must be done for me so that I can go back and solve the power of this element.
There is a counteractive for radium poisoning derived from radium itself.
Have you a sample of this new element?
Yes, yes.
There.
Do you think I can be helped?
I can't say until I deduce the atomic structure of this.
I've done that.
You'll find my calculations there.
All right.
Then I'll begin at once to work out the counteractive.
No one must know what's happened to me.
Is there any place where I can hide myself?
Oh yes, there's a little tent in back where I store my instruments.
You can keep out of sight there.
I'll show you.
Wake up, rukh.
Wake up.
You've been asleep for an hour.
Look at yourself.
I gave you the counteractive exactly at midnight.
My hands are not glowing.
No, your hands aren't glowing, nor your face.
I can touch people now?
Yes.
But remember what I've told you.
Nothing can ever cure you.
At best, your state of poisoning can only be checked, suspended.
And now that a counteractive has gone into your bloodstream, you can only live if you use a small amount of it at regular intervals each day all the days of your life.
Here's the formula.
And if I exceed the time, what happens?
Your body again becomes the deadly machine it was.
Your touch will kill.
Shortly after that you will become deadly to yourself as well.
If you do not use the counteractive in time, you will literally crumble to an ash.
Remember, I told you all the conditions.
You accepted the risks.
Yes, yes.
But at least after each treatment, I should be immune.
Normal.
As I told you, I don't know enough yet to say what effect the violent surcharge of poison and antidote will have upon the brain.
Yes.
I took that risk.
= this is the counteractive.
Guard it carefully.
And what do you plan to do now?
Go back to my camp, complete my tests, and return here as quickly as possible.
Tell no one of this.
Promise me.
I promise.
There's no use pretending any longer.
You know that I love you.
I've known it for a long time.
That's why I have been afraid.
= of me?
No, of us.
Oh, Diana, why fight something that's so much stronger than we are?
We must.
Do you love him?
My father idolized him.
When he died, I promised him that I would marry janos.
What are we going to do?
= tt don't know.
Dinner.
We must go.
Yes.
- Yes, boss.
- Where's Dr. rukh?
Boss tent there.
Oh, yes, I want to see him.
= Dr. benet.
How did you find this place?
We listened to the drums.
They talked of a white man who made magic in the mountains.
How are you feeling?
No ill effects so far?
So far, none.
You'd better get out of the sun.
= huh?
Oh, ves, yes.
Some water? = there.
They expected you back in camp long before this.
Yes, I khow.
There was always one thing more to do.
Days passed, and before I knew it, weeks.
I have harnessed it at last, benet.
I could crumple up a city a thousand miles away.
I could destroy a nation, all nations.
You have harnessed its power to destroy.
Have you harnessed it to heal?
That will come later, when I devise a filter to curb its power.
But in the meantime, it's mine to experiment with.
Stevens and I felt that would be your attitude.
That was why we decided your discovery was too important to be in the hands of one man.
Just what do you mean?
Stevens is now on his way to the international scientific congress that opened in Paris last month.
He's taking with him the specimen you left with me.
Why, you thieves!
Thieves!
You forget we came to
Africa for a common purpose.
= it discovered it.
= oh, the credit will be given you for the discovery.
Never fear.
Oh, thieves!
Thieves!
We couldn't wait for you forever, rukh.
Besides, your wife has been quite ill, so we decided to break up camp and go.
My wife? = yes.
She is on her way to Europe with Stevens.
I join them at lake nyanza.
Diana gone?
Stevens' wife is looking after her.
She asked me to hand you this letter.
She doesn't believe I love her.
She loves someone else.
Drake?
Yes.
To come like thieves in the night and steal everything from me.
Get out of here, benet!
Get out before I...
Don't move, mother.
Sit quite still.
In a few moments, we will know.
Look.
Hand, hand.
Yes.
Yes.
Yes, I see.
T can see!
You see everything?
More clearly than I ever saw before.
Oh.
I am frightened by what I see.
I have harnessed it, harnessed it.
It's mine at last.
You have work to do that will take you all your life.
Tomorrow I leave for Paris.
No.
No, stay here and work.
I must go, mother.
You will find tragedy there.
I know.
In case I do find tragedy,
I leave my secret with you.
It is all there.
More power than man has ever possessed.
Power to heal, power to destroy.
Guard it for me.
Don't be afraid, my dear.
You will be all right.
= I'm not afraid.
= that is fine.
Load it, please.
I'm Dr. janos rukh.
Come, please.
Baby, baby.
Can you see me?
Yes, mommy, I can see you.
Oh!
My baby.
Where does one find Dr. benet?
I am janos rukh.
= janos rukh?
Dr. benet is in his laboratory.
I will show you there immediately.
Now you must go, make way for the others.
Prepare the next patient.
Thank you.
My baby can see.
My baby can see.
- Yes, mommy, I can see.
- Oh, baby, baby.
= rukh.
I seem to have arrived at an interesting moment.
You have arrived to see what your discovery has done for this little one.
She was blind.
It has made her see.
Thank you.
Oh, thank you.
Thank you, doctor, thank you.
= that's all for now.
It seems, as usual, I am a little late.
No, all Paris is waiting to pile honors on you.
You know, of course, the nobel prize was awarded to you.
Yes, yes, I know, I know.
Everybody considers you and sir Frances Stevens very generous men.
I wondered about your health.
= the counteractive is still effective.
And Diana?
Oh, she is well.
She has become lady Arabella's secretary.
She and Drake plan to marry, of course?
They are in love, but she declares she will do nothing until she hears from you.
She will hear of me, shortly.
I will not stand in the way of their happiness.
This is very fine of you, rukh.
Well, I must leave you to your ministrations.
You see, I was right, rukh.
Your discovery is too great for one man to control.
Some day you will realize that you haven't even scratched the possibilities of radium x.
And I am still the only man to control it fully.
Yes, you'll do.
Same height, same width.
What do I want?
I want to do you a benefit.
Yes.
The greatest benefit one man can do another.
Those who have never seen the moonlight over the African veldt have missed a thrilling vision which can be witnessed in no other land.
A lion caught in the Thorn bush and...
Milady.
Briggs, you have been instructed never to interrupt me when I am at dictation.
- But the paper, milady.
- The papers?
You know I never read them.
This is important.
Oh, very well.
What is it?
With all my worldly goods I thee endow.
With all my worldly goods I thee endow.
Whom god hath joined together, let no man put asunder.
- Goodbye, dear.
- Goodbye, darling.
- Ronnie, dear.
- Goodbye, dear.
I'm sure you'll both be very, very happy.
- Bon voyage.
- Goodbye, my boy.
Goodbye.
Six.
Six of us.
Are you the manager? = yes.
Have you a room vacant?
A front room? - A room?
Providentially, sir, I have.
Step this way, sir.
It's Mrs. legrand, sir, I'm
British to the backbone, though misfortunes and a French husband has brought me to Paris lodgings.
You'll like the room.
It's a lovely fireplace and it don't smoke, and the bed is excellent.
Me poor husband, he died in it so comfortable.
= I'll take the room.
And I'd like the Paris herald every morning.
Yes, sir.
That will be 50 francs a week, sir.
Oh, oh.
Thank you, sir.
Sir Francis Stevens, thief.
Have you ever seen anyone so incredibly happy as Diana and Ronald when they started on their honeymoon?
I hope they will be happy.
We should be late if
Francis doesn't hurry.
Go to sir Francis' room and tell him
Dr. benet and I are waiting.
Poor dear.
When he came from his lecture tonight at the university, he was so utterly exhausted that I told him to lie down.
He is feeling better since we returned from Africa?
Oh, yes.
He has even forgotten to complain about his ankles.
What's that?
Celeste, Celeste.
Speak, you fool.
What is it?
Dr. benet, come up please, at once.
- Pierre.
- Sir Francis.
Sir Francis!
= oh!
Oh.
This is awful.
Look at his eyes.
What hideous thing did he see, do you think?
The police must be sent for at once.
But before they come,
I would like to try an experiment.
It must be done before the eye tissues glaze.
Yes.
= is there an ultraviolet camera here?
Yes, I'll get it for you.
Please.
Rukh.
I knew it.
In New York, in Rome.
= come in.
Good morning, sir.
Good morning, Mrs. legrand.
Oh, there's more excitement.
Yes.
What has happened across the street?
Vandals, sir.
They come in the night and they smashed the entire one of them figures.
They didn't leave nothing but a little pile of melted stuff.
But that's impossible.
That's what everybody says.
But a fact's a fact, sir.
If you'll excuse me, sir,
I'll just pop across and see what the latest is.
Yes, Mrs. legrand.
Do come back and tell me more.
Well, I'll find out, sir.
I won't be a second,
I'll find out all I can.
Lady Stevens, matchmaker.
= radium x claims third victim.
Paris edition of the New York herald.
Radium x claims third victim.
Radium x claims third victim.
Radium x claims third victim.
Radium x claims third victim.
No, please.
It will be better, I think, if you take Diana away.
I will answer any questions.
We'll be downstairs if you do need us.
Now I will explain why I insisted the medical examiner and his assistants wear insulated gloves when they touch the body.
Will you turn out the lights?
Look closely at the neck of the victim.
Lights, please.
You observe those finger marks cannot be seen in the light.
It is phosphorus, possibly?
No.
Radium x.
Inflicted by the grasp of someone contaminated by the poison.
Do you know such a person?
Only one, he is dead.
But there is a story behind all this.
And I am going to ask you to listen to some facts.
= there's some curse.
Diana, my dear, there are no such things as curses.
Well, they needn't look any farther for the murderer.
Here she is. - Stop it!
I won't let you talk like that.
If I hadn't left him, they would all be alive today.
Janos, sir Francis and Arabella.
Stop it.
We loved each other.
We belong to each other.
You never belonged to him.
And no law of nature or man can make it anything but right for us to have done what we did.
He shan't reach out of his grave and spoil our lives.
I'll fight it.
But what are you going to fight?
Something you can't see?
Something you can't reach?
Something you can't touch?
Oh, darling.
Hold me tight.
We're going to need each other so very much.
Yes, I have feared something like this ever since the day he left my laboratory.
And I always doubted his death.
So now you know all I have to tell you.
You believe that the man who was buried as Dr. rukh was not Dr. rukh?
Yes.
I believe that rukh is alive and in Paris.
I believe that this city is at the mercy of a madman whose body is an engine of destruction.
I talked to his mother on the telephone a little while ago, and it is also her belief that rukh is alive.
We will take immediate steps to locate him.
Gentlemen.
A figure melted while a crowd of people watched.
Only one element on earth could have done it.
Diana and I were married at that church, and there were six of us in Africa.
Do you suppose rukh's crazy brain drew some analogy between that fact, and the six figures of the saints on the church?
He killed two of us and destroyed two of the six figures.
= a man and a woman in each case.
You and your wife must go into seclusion immediately.
Also you, Dr. benet, while we comb Paris for this madman.
It might be simpler to get him to come here.
How do you propose this?
Ask him for dinner?
No, not quite.
But that's the general idea.
Let the newspapers give out a story that the three remaining survivors of our African expedition are leaving Paris immediately for an unknown destination.
But before departing, there will be a meeting here.
What sort of meeting?
Well, what do you think would draw him, doctor?
A lecture concerning my recent experiments with radium x, and a chance to reach you and me.
You are both willing to take such risk?
= of course.
Yes.
I will invite a limited number of scientists, to be admitted by card only.
Do you think it's fair to expose them to the danger?
There are only two people he wants to destroy.
Two, or perhaps three.
My men can check the list of invitations at the gate and maybe capture him there.
Also mingle with your guests.
Exactly.
I will set the hour of midnight for the lecture.
At that time his luminosity will be strong as he will delay taking the counteractive, hoping for a chance to use his deadliness upon Drake and me.
If your men fail to capture him at the gate, and darken the entire house.
His face and hands will appear like, like phosphorus, regardless of any disguise.
And if he touches anyone?
They die.
- Professor lemaire.
- Professor lemaire.
- Professor gothe.
- Professor gothe.
- Dr. benet.
- Professor reinhardt.
A very strange hour for such a meeting, don't you think?
Perhaps.
But radium x is a very strange subject.
Benet has his reasons.
Undoubtedly.
He must have something of importance to show us.
Even the president of our congress is here.
Professor meiklejohn, if I am not mistaken?
Yes, I am meiklejohn.
Who are you, sir?
Jones, of the university of wales.
We met once, but perhaps you don't recall me.
= t think I do.
One meets so many people.
I shall never forget your treatise on radiation, sir.
Oh, you remember that, huh?
No doubt you are on your way to Dr. benet's demonstration.
= it should indeed.
I understand that no one is to be admitted without a card.
Yes.
Oh, that reminds me.
Yes, yes, I've got it.
Forgetful sometimes.
Well, under the circumstances.
= of course.
A nasty night.
Most disagreeable indeed.
I think I've caught a chill.
Napoleon Brandy, sir.
I believe a sip or two would help us on our way.
I suggest that we step in here, out of the rain.
I am not very much on spirits, but considering the night, why.
Dr. Reno. = Dr. Reno.
- Dr. Fergie.
- Dr. Fergie.
- Professor meiklejohn.
- Professor meiklejohn.
All are here, except one name.
To be admitted instantly.
Beaudine, you will stand at the main house switch.
It is to be thrown at exactly 12:00 o'clock.
No stranger has tried to come in, and all invitations are accounted for.
Perhaps he won't come.
He will be here.
Probably he's here now.
Monsieur le president.
Oh, Dr. benet.
If you will be patient for just a few minutes longer,
I will make final adjustments in my laboratory and be ready.
We expected you.
T knew that.
Five thieves.
Two are gone, three are left.
Do you intend to kill us all?
Yes.
I felt it was better to let things alone when you were first poisoned.
I warned you about your brain.
It began to affect my brain almost immediately.
I could feel it coming, crawling for cells.
Aren't there ever moments when you think as you used to think, when you were human?
Not often now, not often.
= and because of that we must die.
No, because you are thieves.
Five thieves, all thieves.
It will be easiest just to shake hands.
It will all be over in a second.
My wife?
In her room with Mrs.
Noyer, as you desired.
But she's nervous, sir.
So am I.
Still, it will soon be over, one way or the other.
Yes, sir.
One way or the other.
I know something awful has happened.
Try to compose yourself, madame.
I can't stand this any longer.
Find Mr. Drake and tell him I must see him, if only for a moment.
= t was ordered to remain here.
Oh, please go.
Oh, as you say, madame.
Madame rukh.
It's good of you to come.
It's my duty to be here.
Where is Diana?
Oh, she's upstairs in her room.
= Ronnie.
Ronnie!
= Diana.
= janos!
Strange Dr. benet doesn't return, don't you think?
Yes, very strange.
Dr. benet?
Dr. benet!
He isn't here.
Yes, he is.
And so is rukh.
Don't go any closer!
Max, Louie, the front stairs.
No, I can't kill you, I can't.
But he must die.
No, janos!
Mother.
No.
= t must have time.
I must go on to reach one more.
Drake.
= don't fire.
My son.
You have broken the first law of science.
Yes, you are right.
It's better this way.
Goodbye, mother.
Dianal
Diana.
My darling, you're safe.
Madame rukh, permit me to pay you my homage.
Janos rukh is dead, but part of him will go on eternally working for humanity.
Again now my concert will<font color="#E5E5E5"> demand an</font> explanation for this<font color="#E5E5E5"> they shall have one</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">mingle</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> gun-shy later 200</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> children</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> were</font> started in<font color="#E5E5E5"> the raid on</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">slaughterhouse sector vacation by the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">information madam</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> so in ketosis level</font> through<font color="#CCCCCC"> Airlines</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the volume pedal my</font> three<font color="#CCCCCC"> little sons died in that</font> schoolhouse<font color="#CCCCCC"> check on your mind is open</font> truck unfortunately we have<font color="#CCCCCC"> only small Coggins</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">madam understands why he's some kind is</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to carry my remembrances to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> your fellow</font> conspirators who<font color="#E5E5E5"> have preceded you all</font> it shooting<font color="#E5E5E5"> a woman in half ha ha ha you</font> do sell miracles<font color="#E5E5E5"> mr. Morgan</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> fine</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> all</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Eddie</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> turn off the war there you</font> are<font color="#CCCCCC"> Francoise the best</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> illusion I</font> haven't<font color="#CCCCCC"> stock give me a couple</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of weeks</font> a billion new<font color="#E5E5E5"> and I might do better</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no</font> no no<font color="#E5E5E5"> I buy this one so ok boy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Sonny</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">all right boys know how</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to drop it'll</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">make a perfect finish</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> for your new a you</font> can set it up<font color="#E5E5E5"> in 7</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> minutes and packs</font> neatly into five crates<font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah maybe I can</font> hire the go to to work in<font color="#E5E5E5"> the act uh sir</font>
I'll introduce you<font color="#E5E5E5"> to her brother he</font> acts as her agent when he's not<font color="#E5E5E5"> working</font> as a<font color="#E5E5E5"> prizefighter</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a prizefighter oh yes</font>
I just<font color="#CCCCCC"> remembered I already have a girl</font>
I can use in the<font color="#CCCCCC"> act</font>
I'll have the crates on the boat in a couple<font color="#E5E5E5"> of hours you'll</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> open in Paris in</font> a month with flying colors<font color="#CCCCCC"> oh I see you</font> still have a hunger to return to the stage huh not me<font color="#E5E5E5"> Francois I'm a lucky.</font>
Jan I've traipsed around the<font color="#CCCCCC"> theaters of</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">this world long enough when I'm</font> perfectly happy<font color="#E5E5E5"> to stay at</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> home in</font> private life from<font color="#E5E5E5"> now on the magic</font> business with me is<font color="#CCCCCC"> 50-50</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> fellows do</font> all the work and I collect half the money<font color="#E5E5E5"> wait mr. Morgan</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> this might</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> be for</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">my Paris engagement</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> - no this is already</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">sold I worked on something you for Dave.</font>
Duvall Oh to escape problem<font color="#E5E5E5"> using this</font> tank<font color="#E5E5E5"> Davis chained to this anchor the</font> whole<font color="#E5E5E5"> thing's lowered the water</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> high</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">minute 17 seconds that's too short I'll</font> stall a little<font color="#CCCCCC"> longer they can</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> look</font> harder satisfied sure with everything with<font color="#E5E5E5"> the price yeah</font> oh say by the<font color="#E5E5E5"> way this ignites paper</font> something<font color="#CCCCCC"> very interesting to you</font>
Lynette beautiful<font color="#CCCCCC"> European</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> mystic here</font> for psychic Conclave to make New York
<font color="#CCCCCC">ghost conscious curvaceous madam dead</font> curvaceous<font color="#CCCCCC"> Madame rapport</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> arrives an SS.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Amsterdam to make bid for psychic</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">societies</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> $25,000 prize</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> no that's right</font> up your<font color="#E5E5E5"> alley</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">some of us a couple of phonies</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the.</font>
Association will get meddling you get a nice<font color="#E5E5E5"> patch</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font> publicity<font color="#CCCCCC"> well I</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't do it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> for</font> publicity<font color="#E5E5E5"> Dave</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> huh</font> perhaps someday somebody may look into that<font color="#E5E5E5"> darkroom</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> we</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> call the beyond but</font> these fake mediums are the greatest
<font color="#E5E5E5">obstacle of progress in that direction</font> that's a funny attitude<font color="#E5E5E5"> for garlic you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">two take a guy that sells imitation</font> miracles we're magicians Dave we
<font color="#E5E5E5">entertain the people we tell them at the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">hand is quicker than the eye and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> fool</font> and legitimately<font color="#E5E5E5"> it's fun for them and</font> it's a<font color="#E5E5E5"> living for us but I hate these</font> fakers that trade<font color="#CCCCCC"> on human suffering and</font> get<font color="#E5E5E5"> money from heartbroken widows and</font> mothers if there's any<font color="#E5E5E5"> more</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of this</font> let's go with the<font color="#E5E5E5"> 48 club I'll buy you a</font>
- drink<font color="#E5E5E5"> huh I'm sorry</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> just have</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to be my</font>
- <font color="#CCCCCC">own private little pee pad</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> but thanks.</font>
For the invitation I'll see you there
<font color="#CCCCCC">later</font> hi<font color="#CCCCCC"> right now I'm waiting for my father</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">he just</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> got in town this morning</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> father</font> what'd<font color="#CCCCCC"> you do a dot Punk from the old</font> soldiers home<font color="#E5E5E5"> no but it was only last</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">week I was able to persuade him</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font> abandon the glories of Jefferson to a courthouse Indiana<font color="#CCCCCC"> yeah I know the type</font> within a week<font color="#CCCCCC"> he be claiming</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he's a born.</font>
New Yorker<font color="#CCCCCC"> I'm sure of it I said</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> him our</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">first thing this morning to see</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the town.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Hey</font> and I hope I never<font color="#E5E5E5"> see you again as long</font> as<font color="#E5E5E5"> I live let that be a lesson to you</font> young<font color="#E5E5E5"> man</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> never</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to try to take advantage</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of honest</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> people just because they're</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">strangers in New York</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> bringing you all</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the way</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> out here ought to be worth at</font> least<font color="#E5E5E5"> 50 cents extra</font> says here<font color="#CCCCCC"> all over town for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> one dollar</font> you got my dollar didn't you and this is town beat it he wanted<font color="#E5E5E5"> to drop me in Times Square</font> where we started from<font color="#CCCCCC"> not me where I</font> come from if you hire a hacker takes your home and I want you<font color="#CCCCCC"> to be a friend</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of mine Dave Duvall oh he's an escape</font> artist<font color="#CCCCCC"> now what</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> an escape artist he gets</font> out of things he didn't get<font color="#E5E5E5"> into them</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> wouldn't have to get out of them</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">honey daddy they're so you don't like</font> our town<font color="#E5E5E5"> a New York is</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the only</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> town</font>
I've ever<font color="#E5E5E5"> been in that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you can learn to</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">hate in one day</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">uh-huh well good night</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> took in that</font> sense<font color="#E5E5E5"> of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no nice I met you good night</font>
Mike you know well if you wanted to go in<font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> business<font color="#CCCCCC"> risings</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> open a butcher shop now</font> selling meats a business<font color="#E5E5E5"> but selling</font> miracles<font color="#E5E5E5"> that's monkey business how'd</font> you like see an<font color="#CCCCCC"> active eye opening an</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">item</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> new mind-reading stuff my club yeah</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">no sorry</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> no more fancy joints for me I</font>
- had lunch<font color="#E5E5E5"> today on a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> tea room at eros I</font>
- don't stay up too<font color="#E5E5E5"> late I'm not</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> going</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to.</font>
Go to bed until I've straightened out your<font color="#E5E5E5"> books this morning a fella sent you</font> a bill<font color="#E5E5E5"> for lumber and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I think he added</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">in his weight and his mother-in-law's</font> blood pressure<font color="#E5E5E5"> okay dad</font> oh please<font color="#CCCCCC"> we're gonna hide quick</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well</font> justified<font color="#E5E5E5"> did you see anything of a</font> young lady<font color="#CCCCCC"> why</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> did you lose one</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no but I</font> got a<font color="#E5E5E5"> fare out</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> there promised me 10</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">bucks to follow a dame</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> who knows</font> let's talk to you<font color="#E5E5E5"> fair listen mister</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> girl wants to sneak down a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> cellar</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">hey</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> nobody in there you must have dreamt</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> whole thing there's my 10 bucks I</font> think I'll go<font color="#CCCCCC"> back to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sleep again</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> wait</font> here<font color="#CCCCCC"> for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me a minute yeah all right</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it'll</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Eva the bloodhounds have gone</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> if</font> that was your husband's you're hiding from why pick on me<font color="#E5E5E5"> no no it's nothing</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">like</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> but if you mr. Morgan you've</font> simply got to<font color="#CCCCCC"> do something for me</font> well<font color="#E5E5E5"> young lady you're obviously in some</font> sort of a jam<font color="#E5E5E5"> and I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> don't like J</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> dr.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Morton have used some connection with</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a</font> psychic associations $25,000 prize<font color="#E5E5E5"> well</font> a couple<font color="#E5E5E5"> of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> people tried to collect it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">and I helped put</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> him in jail well I know</font> a certain<font color="#E5E5E5"> medium well she isn't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> really</font> psychic<font color="#E5E5E5"> of course but she's going to try</font> to win<font color="#CCCCCC"> that award</font> wouldn't you be willing<font color="#E5E5E5"> to help her and</font> me no I wouldn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> mr.</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Morgan I haven't</font> very much money<font color="#E5E5E5"> but I saved your money</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">little girl you may need it for</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> jail</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">bond please mr. Morgan I ain't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> your</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">friend</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">248 club in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hurry</font> you must have<font color="#E5E5E5"> been a woman you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> know you</font> did but you're still trying<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> talk</font> ladies and gentlemen<font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> my next little</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">experiment I proposed reverse usual</font> order<font color="#E5E5E5"> of procedure I shall pick a card</font> then you shall tell<font color="#E5E5E5"> me which card I</font> picked
<font color="#E5E5E5">now know which card is this</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> anyone at</font> all<font color="#E5E5E5"> possibly the one you wish you draw</font> last week in the poker game what won't someone<font color="#CCCCCC"> please tell</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me hmm</font>
- I'm so sorry the lady is<font color="#CCCCCC"> always right</font>
- the lady is<font color="#E5E5E5"> also possibly your stooge oh.</font>
Really are you<font color="#E5E5E5"> lie</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> stewed you bet I'm not I</font> called for the<font color="#E5E5E5"> ace of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> spades and what</font> card is<font color="#E5E5E5"> this a jack-up diamond I'm so</font> sorry<font color="#E5E5E5"> it's the ace of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> spades</font> the<font color="#E5E5E5"> Morgan and depending on your being</font> enough for gentlemen<font color="#E5E5E5"> not to have me</font> thrown<font color="#CCCCCC"> out now look nothing you can say</font> and nothing<font color="#CCCCCC"> you can wear will change my</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">mind about mediums in jail but the last</font> thing<font color="#E5E5E5"> I want to do is change your mind</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">you haven't let me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> explain I'm trying to</font> stop a<font color="#E5E5E5"> certain medium</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> from operating</font> please forget I was<font color="#E5E5E5"> a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> rule now starting</font> at the<font color="#CCCCCC"> beginning and I promise to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> listen</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">this time why I can't tell you the whole</font> story<font color="#CCCCCC"> there are</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> reasons the same reasons</font> a man<font color="#E5E5E5"> followed you to my place</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> tonight</font> you can imagine how<font color="#CCCCCC"> desperate I must be</font> to come here<font color="#E5E5E5"> well you've got to help me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">mr. Morgan another cup</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> please</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> now you're</font> all<font color="#CCCCCC"> upset just drink</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> his coffee and</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">relax anything else just remember</font> nothing is ever quite as bad as<font color="#CCCCCC"> it seems</font> not even<font color="#E5E5E5"> that call a waiter some sugar</font> please waiter<font color="#E5E5E5"> some sugar please</font> well I know<font color="#E5E5E5"> I just broke this is some</font> sugar how many lumps<font color="#E5E5E5"> how many lumps no sugar</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">no sugar wait it you can remove the</font> sugar<font color="#E5E5E5"> now</font> it's not my day are you<font color="#E5E5E5"> feeling better yeah now suppose</font> you tell<font color="#CCCCCC"> me your name of course you</font> could<font color="#CCCCCC"> write it on a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> piece of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> paper and</font> swallow and<font color="#E5E5E5"> then I tell you but it might</font> be simpler if<font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> just told</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it to me.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Judy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barkley I live at the hotel Roxbury</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">thanks now what is it you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> want is there</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">any way to get a medium out of a</font> business<font color="#CCCCCC"> without having</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> her arrested</font> well if Ellen Detroit found out I was gonna<font color="#E5E5E5"> prefer police charges for fraud</font> against him he<font color="#CCCCCC"> got scared and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> quit you</font> could do<font color="#E5E5E5"> that she'd be</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> afraid of you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> mr.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Morgan will you go on</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to this woman I</font> mean and prove to her what will happen if<font color="#CCCCCC"> she tries for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> this award</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">well it doesn't sound</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> very complicated</font> is<font color="#CCCCCC"> that all you want till well there's</font> some<font color="#CCCCCC"> things I have to know what's the</font>
- mediums name and where<font color="#E5E5E5"> can I find it</font>
- <font color="#E5E5E5">well she.</font>
Miss Botti<font color="#CCCCCC"> uh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> mr. Morgan doctors back</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">how do you do</font> how'd you doctor says<font color="#CCCCCC"> iris event</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh</font> you're the gentleman who writes the books on demonology<font color="#CCCCCC"> vampires and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> devils</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">our face</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes unless I'm mistaken you're</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">the famous unbeliever</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me I just don't</font> believe in ghosts that's all<font color="#CCCCCC"> so there</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">may I buy you a drink will thank you I</font> haven't<font color="#E5E5E5"> time I came in to leave a</font> message for<font color="#E5E5E5"> mr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Torah you see I got to</font> give a demonstration<font color="#E5E5E5"> tonight of vampires</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">and devils of demons read enough to</font> convince even looms<font color="#CCCCCC"> the Morgan would you</font> like to come how about it no no<font color="#CCCCCC"> thank</font> you
<font color="#CCCCCC">see we don't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> even have to come to your</font> party doctor so that<font color="#CCCCCC"> you've got</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> her</font> scared all<font color="#CCCCCC"> right</font> ladies and<font color="#E5E5E5"> gentlemen LeClair's</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> colette</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">with this extraordinary</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and featuring</font> zelma<font color="#E5E5E5"> the girl with a radial knife</font> ladies and gentlemen scientists<font color="#E5E5E5"> agree</font> that telepathy does exist<font color="#CCCCCC"> but admit</font> their inability to harness it we<font color="#CCCCCC"> holler</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> will transfer thoughts from</font> one mind to another just<font color="#CCCCCC"> at its finest</font> skeptic<font color="#CCCCCC"> I will speak milli</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Madame.</font>
LeClair's name using<font color="#E5E5E5"> no words that could</font> possibly contain a code or<font color="#E5E5E5"> signal to her</font> what is<font color="#E5E5E5"> your name please Madame Mary the</font> lady's name is<font color="#E5E5E5"> Mary no wait</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">will you whisper</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> your last name name and</font> address<font color="#CCCCCC"> Zellman mary w Hodgkinson of</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">brooklyn new york</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">that's right how did</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> she do it excuse me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it takes me some time to get my devils</font> ready<font color="#E5E5E5"> good night miss</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barclay</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sorry you</font> have to<font color="#E5E5E5"> go good night good night as soon</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">as the show</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> is over I'm going</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> let you</font>
- tell me why you're so frightened<font color="#E5E5E5"> of old</font>
- <font color="#E5E5E5">dr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> demon Alan this beat I think has.</font>
Never before<font color="#E5E5E5"> been duplicated in</font> telepathy<font color="#CCCCCC"> any member of the audience</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font> whisper<font color="#E5E5E5"> to me a rapid series of numbers</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">and without one moment's hesitation</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">my wife will repeat them please.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Velma one five nine eleven fifteen</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> was</font> that right sir that's right take<font color="#CCCCCC"> it</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> off your old man's</font> rheumatism<font color="#E5E5E5"> like that it there</font> good evening<font color="#E5E5E5"> doctor</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sorry I'm a little</font> late still<font color="#E5E5E5"> plenty of time</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> or</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> shall</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> we go to</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">your place dr. Sabet all right papa me</font> like les would like to see you in<font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">dressing room</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh excuse me I'll only be</font> a minute<font color="#CCCCCC"> order a sandwich is something</font>
- and don't<font color="#E5E5E5"> worry all your troubles are</font>
- gonna<font color="#E5E5E5"> disappear just like that.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">And then oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> act went over great</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">didn't it slow on the numbers I was out</font> it was his fault if you and your wife<font color="#E5E5E5"> wouldn't fight so</font> much<font color="#E5E5E5"> and rehearse a little bit more you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">wouldn't have so much trouble</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and don't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">forget to send me my check every</font>
Wednesday morning<font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a friend dr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Sabet</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">didn't seem to like the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> eye</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he walked</font> out on<font color="#CCCCCC"> us so that oh he had a date with</font> a ghost funny<font color="#E5E5E5"> said up walking out on you</font>
I didn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> even know he was here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh you</font> didn't I said I didn't you better get some chewing<font color="#E5E5E5"> gum</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> maybe</font> your friend doctor said<font color="#CCCCCC"> that won't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> like</font> the smell of<font color="#CCCCCC"> gym</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">became the young lady what became of the</font> sugar
<font color="#CCCCCC">never mind did she leave a message</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> no</font> message<font color="#E5E5E5"> was left wait for him she said</font> she wasn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> coming back oh that's no</font> message<font color="#E5E5E5"> no well here's no money</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> don't</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">pay the check</font> hello<font color="#CCCCCC"> Hotel Roxbury there's miss Barclay</font> come in yet they'll tell him mr. Morgan<font color="#CCCCCC"> call thank</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Cleveland departments doctor sbatch</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">meeting oh he said he expected people</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">about 12:30</font> not at all<font color="#CCCCCC"> have you a match yeah thank</font> you how old<font color="#E5E5E5"> are you young man 31 really</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you</font> know my friend dr. Sabet tells me<font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">this trick wouldn't deceive a child of</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">12</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> No</font> pick a card<font color="#E5E5E5"> please don't look at it now</font> put<font color="#CCCCCC"> it my hand thank you now which card</font> would<font color="#E5E5E5"> you like it to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> be</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> possibly the one</font> you wish you'd drawn last week in the poker game what<font color="#E5E5E5"> Friday night I'd have</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">given my right eye for the king of clubs</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">six the king of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> clubs</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> gosh almighty</font> hey you see I I am professor<font color="#CCCCCC"> Toro</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> oh yes</font>
I've seen<font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> on the stage Oh have you</font> really<font color="#E5E5E5"> then here's another</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hey I beg</font> your<font color="#CCCCCC"> pardon I like I like</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> see ducks</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> vet</font> please<font color="#CCCCCC"> rule 231</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you can go right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> up</font> thank you.
<font color="#E5E5E5">Oh</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> gel walks there.</font>
Wow<font color="#E5E5E5"> miss Barclay miss Barclay miss.</font>
Barclay miss Barclay you<font color="#E5E5E5"> all right</font> yes I'm all<font color="#E5E5E5"> right are you sure you sure</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">operator</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> operator I am are dot I'm</font> calling<font color="#CCCCCC"> a please</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> please no no</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> please</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">don't call the police that's the last</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">thing in the world</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 1 hey wait a minute</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">doesn't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> make</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sense this isn't a private</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">little mystery about mediums any longer</font> somebody tried<font color="#CCCCCC"> to kill you</font> you need<font color="#CCCCCC"> protect no well if I hadn't</font> decided<font color="#E5E5E5"> to follow you I'm</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> alright he's</font> gone now<font color="#E5E5E5"> you don't by any chance know</font> who he was<font color="#E5E5E5"> no I don't I don't I'm sure</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">you're very good reasons for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> not telling</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">me and it's none of my business I</font> apologize for<font color="#E5E5E5"> having interfere good</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">night funny I've never been able to walk</font> out<font color="#CCCCCC"> on a woman who was crying</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">matter</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of fact is is the first chance</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I've ever had to really try how that's a</font> pretty<font color="#E5E5E5"> good imitation of a smile well</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> do we do now</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you didn't want me to</font> stay and<font color="#CCCCCC"> you don't want me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to go I'm</font> afraid<font color="#E5E5E5"> there's nothing anybody can do</font> can't I<font color="#E5E5E5"> even punch somebody in the nose</font> for<font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it'll be</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> much</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> better if</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you just</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">forget the whole thing</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> what changed your</font> mind<font color="#CCCCCC"> about wanting me to help you I</font> can't tell<font color="#E5E5E5"> you is there anything you can</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">tell me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> not now</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I don't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> there's one</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">thing I can do and I can do it right now.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Christopher</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 7187 - who you calling my</font> father<font color="#E5E5E5"> hello this is Mike listen dad I</font> want you to go to my desk<font color="#E5E5E5"> and get my gun</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">a gun what do I need</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a gun</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> for I haven't</font> seen<font color="#CCCCCC"> the man in New York who looked like</font> he could stand<font color="#E5E5E5"> up in a strong wind come</font> over to the hotel Roxbury right away say when do people<font color="#CCCCCC"> go to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> bed in this town in</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> wintertime ok kid I'll be right over</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">ok dad it wouldn't look very</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> nice to the</font> hotel if I stayed but they<font color="#E5E5E5"> certainly</font>
- can't object to<font color="#E5E5E5"> a 62</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> year old widower</font>
- <font color="#CCCCCC">what are you going</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to do forget the.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Whole</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> business</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I wish I didn't have to seem so horribly</font> ungrateful<font color="#E5E5E5"> well don't take all the blame</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">nobody asked me to follow you</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> like my father he thinks everybody</font> in New York ought to be shot<font color="#E5E5E5"> he's dying</font> to<font color="#CCCCCC"> start the movement oh I'm sorry</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you've had a heck evening and you're all</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">here now you go on</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> start getting</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">ready to hit</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the hay</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dad won't mind</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">meeting you with a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> little cold cream on</font> your face<font color="#E5E5E5"> in fact neither of us</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> alighted</font> have you a<font color="#E5E5E5"> cigarette</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh I'll</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> relax at</font> least you don't<font color="#E5E5E5"> have</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> worry</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> about me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">making things worse for you madam</font> rapport<font color="#E5E5E5"> you're not a reporter</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh I</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> had to say</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> something to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> get in what</font> do you want<font color="#E5E5E5"> I want</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to know a lot of</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">things such</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> as</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> do</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you know a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> young girl</font> by the name<font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Judy Barclay Judy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barclay</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I never heard of her are you sure yes</font>
I'm<font color="#CCCCCC"> sure mr.</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Morgan well I didn't</font> realize<font color="#E5E5E5"> I was so</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> famous</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">every</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> student</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> see a worker in the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> field</font> of psychic research knows about you why
<font color="#E5E5E5">shouldn't we</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a man who's done</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> more than</font> anybody<font color="#CCCCCC"> in America to ridicule</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> our</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">efforts sincere workers I'll gladly</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> help</font> but you're a fake have you ever<font color="#E5E5E5"> heard of.</font>
Colonel Herbert Watrous of the psychic.
Association certainly<font color="#E5E5E5"> I suppose you'd</font> call<font color="#E5E5E5"> him a fake to know the real</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Watt</font>
Rose is an eminent responsible scientist car<font color="#CCCCCC"> washes</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> will you come in here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> please</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">colonel</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Watrous may</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> present mr.</font>
Michael Morgan<font color="#CCCCCC"> cheap</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> trickster who has</font> managed<font color="#CCCCCC"> to secure a lot of publicity by</font> vicious and unwarranted<font color="#E5E5E5"> tax on our cause</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I've heard of the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> gentleman you're not</font> really<font color="#CCCCCC"> Colonel</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Watrous are you would you</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">care to telephone</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the British Consulate</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">and you believe this this woman</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to be</font> genuine<font color="#CCCCCC"> that is why I came to America</font> well I give up.
<font color="#CCCCCC">Madame rapport do you know a certain dr.</font>
Sabet<font color="#CCCCCC"> I suppose you're going to tell the</font> colonel<font color="#E5E5E5"> the dr. Sabet so fakir - oh come</font> now<font color="#E5E5E5"> colonel not demons and vampires</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dr.</font>
Sabet is another reason<font color="#CCCCCC"> for my visit</font> here<font color="#E5E5E5"> if his powers</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of trigger a then</font> he's the cleverest impostor I've ever met<font color="#CCCCCC"> Colonel</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> water shall we go</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I don't</font> want to be late alone please there's only one possible answer<font color="#CCCCCC"> to this I'm</font> going<font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the British</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Consulate</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> find</font> out about you there's another<font color="#E5E5E5"> thing</font> wrong with New York now most towns when they want to<font color="#E5E5E5"> spread out spread out like</font> this<font color="#E5E5E5"> but New York no it's got to spread</font> out like that<font color="#E5E5E5"> so what happens they've</font> got a town<font color="#E5E5E5"> full</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> 88 story buildings</font> and then they have an elevator strike<font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font> other words if it weren't for your son you<font color="#CCCCCC"> wouldn't stay here not in a million</font> years<font color="#CCCCCC"> hey how long</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> have you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> known Mike I</font> met him<font color="#E5E5E5"> today today things do move fast</font> in this town<font color="#CCCCCC"> don't they</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> did Mike tell</font> you where he's going.
<font color="#CCCCCC">Mike stop telling me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> where he was going</font> nights when he was 16 dr. Sabet<font color="#CCCCCC"> separa</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">please well you can go right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> up to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> 31</font> well here we are<font color="#CCCCCC"> get easy I'm not gonna</font> bite you
<font color="#E5E5E5">you're the real</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Colonel Watrous all</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">right I checked</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you didn't have</font> to follow us<font color="#E5E5E5"> to tell me that why I'm a</font> guest<font color="#E5E5E5"> here dr. Sabet invited me why</font> doesn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> answer something</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> must have</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">happened this meetings too important to</font> him<font color="#E5E5E5"> because there is death in that place</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">death from the other world</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">cold</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> luck get keep</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> just a minute well</font> that stumps<font color="#CCCCCC"> even me nobody</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> can get past</font> one of<font color="#E5E5E5"> those chains listen who brings</font> that<font color="#E5E5E5"> dead to life hey what is this</font> returned to<font color="#CCCCCC"> whence you came oh stop it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">this witchcraft nonsense isn't getting</font> us anywhere
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh you stupid</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> fool witchcraft is not</font> dead don't give<font color="#CCCCCC"> me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> any of that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that was</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> baton they're giving us a<font color="#CCCCCC"> build up</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> for a</font> show<font color="#E5E5E5"> that was not the bats voice yeah</font> well we'll soon find out step<font color="#E5E5E5"> over there</font> it's it's<font color="#CCCCCC"> dr. Sabet</font> he's been strangled<font color="#CCCCCC"> no he's dead.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Colonel please good evening</font> really well<font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> isn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the ace of</font> spades<font color="#CCCCCC"> Oh am I late I came to attend dr.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Sabet seance</font> step right<font color="#CCCCCC"> in thank you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> if you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have any</font> sense all of<font color="#CCCCCC"> you you'll stay right</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> where</font> you put death from the other world<font color="#E5E5E5"> but</font>
I'm still gonna get the<font color="#E5E5E5"> police Mike I am</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I didn't expect to see you here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I I was</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">just on my way to dr. Sebastian</font> demonstration wait a minute<font color="#E5E5E5"> where's your</font> husband<font color="#CCCCCC"> Oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> out somewhere I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> suppose</font> getting<font color="#E5E5E5"> drunk as</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> usual there's been an</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">accident man something happened - hey</font> come on down<font color="#CCCCCC"> out let</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me go Mike I just</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">want to catch her in his place easy look.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Clare so that's dead who did</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it I'd like</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> buy him</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a box</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> cigars</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> did you kill</font> him me you told 50 people<font color="#E5E5E5"> you were gonna</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">fix him</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I didn't kill him I swear I</font> didn't I beg your<font color="#CCCCCC"> pardon but would you</font> please<font color="#CCCCCC"> ask the clerk downstairs to call</font>
- the<font color="#E5E5E5"> police department</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and have</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> inspector</font>
- Gavigan come over here right<font color="#E5E5E5"> away</font>
I'll do it<font color="#E5E5E5"> for you Mike you know not</font> coming back<font color="#CCCCCC"> here</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> would be the same</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> as</font> confessing to this murder
<font color="#E5E5E5">well you you've known me a long</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> time</font> haven't you how<font color="#E5E5E5"> is</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that cops name gab</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">again inspector Gavigan inspector it</font> don't make sense<font color="#CCCCCC"> there's another one of</font> them foolproof<font color="#CCCCCC"> chains</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on the kitchen</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">door just like</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the front windows windows</font> are locked<font color="#E5E5E5"> from the inside</font>
I tell you a half-grown microbe couldn't
<font color="#E5E5E5">get out of this joint without using a</font> crowbar<font color="#CCCCCC"> in the grand</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> jury</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> today</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> maybe</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">one of you guys</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> can examine</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> copes in</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the doc but I'm no bat lucky</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> when are</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> we</font> gonna<font color="#E5E5E5"> get some light I'm working on it</font> as fast as I put in new fuses they blow out<font color="#CCCCCC"> where's the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> clerk</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I'll getting a cup</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of java</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> find out</font> where and bring<font color="#E5E5E5"> him back</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> right</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> all right</font>
Mike you're dying to talk what's it all about that<font color="#E5E5E5"> monkey</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> business on the floor</font> there well that presumes<font color="#E5E5E5"> to say that Savannah</font> invoke some demon out<font color="#CCCCCC"> of hell who got</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">sore and wrung his neck more like some</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">hophead with the delirium tremens I</font> wouldn't laugh too loud Gavigan there's an awful lot<font color="#CCCCCC"> of humbug about</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> occult</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">no psychic</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> but</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> plenty</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of things happen</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">that can't be explained by any of the</font> rules<font color="#E5E5E5"> of this world</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I thought you were</font> poison ivy on mediums and fortune
<font color="#CCCCCC">tellers on the fakes yes but don't kid</font> yourself<font color="#E5E5E5"> for several thousand years the</font> human<font color="#E5E5E5"> race has been trying to step</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">across the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> threshold</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> into</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the darkness</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the unknown</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> call it the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Otherworld if</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> like because</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> there's something there</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> once in a while somebody gets pretty</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">close to it Oh</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">boogeyman committed this murder or a</font> human murderer set the stage this way
<font color="#E5E5E5">how did he manipulate those chains</font> nothing was tampered with<font color="#CCCCCC"> well I thought</font>
I knew all<font color="#CCCCCC"> about magic</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> but that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> stun</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> has</font> me guessing<font color="#CCCCCC"> look inspector the murderer</font> left<font color="#CCCCCC"> his courage to valo the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> escaped</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">king nice helpful murder leaves his card</font> to say to the police trouble now the
<font color="#CCCCCC">valla couldn't have escaped</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> from this</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">room unless somebody like me build it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">for him first</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> all</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> right Mike you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> keep</font> your ghosts<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll take mr. Duvall Oh in</font> that room full of human beings enough of this<font color="#E5E5E5"> hey you</font> he claimed<font color="#CCCCCC"> he</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> could not only see here</font> inspector<font color="#CCCCCC"> hey</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> where do you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> think</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you're</font> going that sound right<font color="#E5E5E5"> Bergen well now</font> professor something on your mind and won't wait<font color="#CCCCCC"> I broadcasters della dosa</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">programme</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> coast-to-coast Network</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I go on</font> the air<font color="#E5E5E5"> at one o'clock I've got to get</font> there now<font color="#E5E5E5"> what do you know about this</font> mess that<font color="#CCCCCC"> you haven't told</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> nothing</font>
I left the 48<font color="#CCCCCC"> Club</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> tonight with</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dr.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Sabaton to valo</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> then Devon who left us</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">there on sidewalk</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> then I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> came here with</font> dr. Sabet<font color="#E5E5E5"> he was alive when I left him</font> here at midnight no witnesses of course the hardly incidentally a murder<font color="#E5E5E5"> doesn't walk</font> openly<font color="#E5E5E5"> out through a front door</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no maybe</font> that's<font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> reason you did</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> a murder</font> hardly stopped to talk<font color="#E5E5E5"> to a desk</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> clerk</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">so he'll be sure of who he</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> is we'll ask</font> the clerk<font color="#E5E5E5"> about that really</font> you might<font color="#E5E5E5"> ask the young lady</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to what</font> young lady<font color="#CCCCCC"> the young lady I heard asking</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> dr. Sabet just as I was leaving</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">never</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> seen before</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> yes</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> once tonight</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> with</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> at the 48</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> club</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll explain that.</font>
Gavigan<font color="#CCCCCC"> here's me inspector I'll show</font>
- you where the lights are<font color="#E5E5E5"> not</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> working</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> see</font>
- that<font color="#E5E5E5"> the penny</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hit smart guys there's a.</font>
Copper cent and every socket in the place soon as we<font color="#E5E5E5"> get them on cleaned out</font>
I'll give you the juice okay Blackie<font color="#E5E5E5"> I</font> say see here<font color="#E5E5E5"> inspector um the slightest</font> bit of evidence<font color="#CCCCCC"> on which to hold me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font> you know it I shall be on the<font color="#E5E5E5"> air at</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">what o'clock</font>
I shall return<font color="#E5E5E5"> here later if you so</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">desire</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> all right go ahead my card my</font> home<font color="#CCCCCC"> address</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in case you want me Quinn</font> coming<font color="#E5E5E5"> now what about that girl I'll get</font> her yes sir put a tail on<font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> guitar oh</font> right<font color="#CCCCCC"> I'll be back in 10 minutes</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">mother cat yeah they can told me to</font> string along<font color="#E5E5E5"> with it</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh why I need you because the hand is</font> quicker<font color="#E5E5E5"> than the eye but not my eye look</font> he stopped<font color="#CCCCCC"> I thought he was in such a</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">hurry</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to get to his broadcast</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> keep him</font> aside<font color="#CCCCCC"> team</font> all he did<font color="#CCCCCC"> was to walk around the block</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">he did a lot</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> more</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> than</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that or I'm crazy</font> grab him quick<font color="#E5E5E5"> squeeze him off</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> him</font> this is police well<font color="#CCCCCC"> knock me down how much did the guy</font> pay in a double for him
I<font color="#E5E5E5"> don't know what you're talking about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> didn't do anything<font color="#CCCCCC"> nobody does it</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> crying</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to do 20 miles an hour to 15 mile zone</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">that's right</font> besides now<font color="#CCCCCC"> that I think of it you</font> didn't signal your turns the badge in your<font color="#CCCCCC"> hand is upside down you let</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font> keep on<font color="#E5E5E5"> attending your part too close to</font> a<font color="#E5E5E5"> fire</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> pump you'll love</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> singsing okay</font> buddy<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll talk guy told me if I'd wear</font> this stuff<font color="#CCCCCC"> and walk around the block</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">ahead when you do exactly</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> what Toro</font> wanted you to do follow the hat and cloak<font color="#E5E5E5"> right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> soon as we were around</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> corner<font color="#CCCCCC"> he gets out of the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> cab walks</font> calmly<font color="#E5E5E5"> away laughing and then the</font> excitement<font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> being made a fool</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of if</font> they get all about the mysterious<font color="#CCCCCC"> young</font> lady<font color="#CCCCCC"> we're going to bring</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> back well is</font> it obvious<font color="#E5E5E5"> the Toros the one you want</font> doesn't it disappearance prove that
<font color="#E5E5E5">don't worry</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Glen</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> get a description of.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Toro</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> on the wire to headquarters making</font> a general alarm<font color="#E5E5E5"> teletype and radio pick</font> him up all<font color="#E5E5E5"> right send in that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Clerk</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> now</font> stop stall him like I want<font color="#E5E5E5"> that girl are</font> you the clerk downstairs<font color="#CCCCCC"> yes sir</font> why did you kill somebody<font color="#E5E5E5"> me why I never</font> killed anybody in<font color="#E5E5E5"> my</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> life who came to</font> see dr.<font color="#E5E5E5"> saw that last night first it was.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Professor Toro he came</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> with the doctor</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">oh yeah no it's ro there yes he told me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">who</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he was</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he did a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> card trick for me</font> before<font color="#CCCCCC"> he left</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he seems to have been</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">doing his darkness to identify himself</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what about the girl who came in did she</font> get her name sure<font color="#E5E5E5"> Judi</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barclay anything</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> else</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no</font> that's<font color="#E5E5E5"> all gone downstairs but don't</font> leave<font color="#E5E5E5"> the building</font> miss Barclays apartment please hello Dan bring miss Barclay to dr. Sabet sipar
<font color="#CCCCCC">man right</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> away she knows where Craig's</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> can shall I bring the gun it's</font> against the law to<font color="#E5E5E5"> carry a gun</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in New</font>
York<font color="#E5E5E5"> well it's a fine</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> time to tell</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> me I</font> read with three<font color="#CCCCCC"> photos were found</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">yesterday shot full of holes</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">well they shoot them with saxophones</font> okay<font color="#CCCCCC"> they wrong Mike no he says the</font> doctor said bat has just been found murdered<font color="#CCCCCC"> we've got just one chance the</font> green ghoul at the door is watching us through<font color="#E5E5E5"> the glass</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I may be able</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font> hypnotize him<font color="#E5E5E5"> are you going crazy Mike</font> you told me a guy disappears<font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> out he</font> pops like Peter Rabbit that wasn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> toros</font> voice if you<font color="#E5E5E5"> guys</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Sage's an elaborate</font> disappearing act on<font color="#CCCCCC"> route to a radio</font> station<font color="#CCCCCC"> he's not going</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to show for the</font> radio station<font color="#CCCCCC"> give me the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> information</font> desk<font color="#CCCCCC"> Spectre Gavigan Homicide Bureau</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> is.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Professor</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Toro playing sounded</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> also on</font> your program or isn't he huh you<font color="#E5E5E5"> all</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">right</font> that's an understudy taro didn't show up what did<font color="#CCCCCC"> I tell</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you oh</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> why can't I draw</font> a nice Kleenex murder up in the Bronx
<font color="#CCCCCC">mr. Morgan</font> mr. Morgan<font color="#E5E5E5"> so you can't bust in here</font> like that<font color="#CCCCCC"> that's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> all</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> right I sent for</font> hello Judy I wish you'd said<font color="#CCCCCC"> that to me</font>
I'll be<font color="#E5E5E5"> outside the hall if you want me</font>
Mike<font color="#CCCCCC"> all right there</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm sorry Judy I</font> tried to keep<font color="#CCCCCC"> you out</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of this but they</font> want<font color="#E5E5E5"> to ask you a few</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> questions</font> inspector<font color="#CCCCCC"> Gavigan miss Barkley</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sit down</font> miss pocket
<font color="#E5E5E5">now tell me you knew dr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> cement</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> is it</font> true if he<font color="#E5E5E5"> did it I'm sorry it's true</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how well did you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> know him only slightly</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I I met him several years ago</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Europe</font>
- you saw him tonight<font color="#E5E5E5"> yes the 48 club with</font>
- mr. Morgan<font color="#CCCCCC"> oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I mean here you came here.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">But I didn't see him here know what</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> want to answer the<font color="#CCCCCC"> door why did you want</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">to see him</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> tonight wait his</font> demonstration he invited mr. Morgan me to come<font color="#E5E5E5"> but you didn't come</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> with mr.</font>
Morgan did you no I
<font color="#CCCCCC">I told him I wasn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> going well</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> then I</font> went<font color="#CCCCCC"> home</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and I changed my mind</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">oh my</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dono you didn't tell me this</font> apartment<font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> kill not to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> survive</font> couldn't get I can you<font color="#E5E5E5"> and she couldn't</font> get<font color="#CCCCCC"> out the chain Gavigan the chains</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> do</font> you know a<font color="#E5E5E5"> low</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Selma LeClair LeClair the</font> woman with<font color="#CCCCCC"> a radio mine oh oh yes I saw</font> them doing the<font color="#E5E5E5"> ride tonight but that's</font> all do you know Colonel Herbert Watrous no I
I<font color="#CCCCCC"> don't think I do I'm sure I don't</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how about</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> madam wrap</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> off a medium do you</font> know huh<font color="#CCCCCC"> I never heard her</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in my life</font> you see<font color="#E5E5E5"> Galligan I told you miss Barclay</font> wouldn't know anything<font color="#CCCCCC"> about</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you you saw</font> a<font color="#E5E5E5"> man called Toro in the lobby</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> yes he</font> was doing a card<font color="#CCCCCC"> trick</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> obviously this</font> young lady is in the clear can't you see that Gavigan<font color="#E5E5E5"> nobody's in the clear yet</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">for my dough</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it's playing</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on the Clare.</font>
Dame was playing post office with<font color="#CCCCCC"> sooo</font> bad and her husband didn't like<font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font> makes them<font color="#E5E5E5"> both eligible Toro was here</font> the right time that<font color="#E5E5E5"> lets him in Walter</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">should tell me is a responsible citizen</font> but<font color="#CCCCCC"> madam reports mixed up in this</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and I</font> can't figure<font color="#E5E5E5"> out how and I can't figure</font> out<font color="#CCCCCC"> how any human got past those changed</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">back in the ghost of Hartmann again</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">expected</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that guy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> do valo is out here</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">hello Michael are you doing here hello.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Dave miss</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barkley Dave Duvall</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">ah pleased to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> meet you inspector Gavigan.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Dave Duvall</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> how do you do what are you</font> doing here well that<font color="#CCCCCC"> is killing</font> inspector<font color="#CCCCCC"> I bet all about it in the</font> extra sure they would have<font color="#CCCCCC"> a next route</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">demons and locked doors it's a wonder</font> they didn't print it on red paper<font color="#CCCCCC"> so I</font> came<font color="#CCCCCC"> around to see if I couldn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> be</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> as</font> some professional help<font color="#CCCCCC"> that's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> fine this</font> card of yours was found under the body suppose you start in helping by
<font color="#E5E5E5">explaining</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> my cards</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hey</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> if I kill</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">so bad I wouldn't put Mikado</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Andrews</font> body<font color="#E5E5E5"> would I then</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> unless I wanted</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you to</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">think of some other guy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> would trying</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font> put<font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> bee</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on poor</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> little innocent me</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">huh no I'm sorry</font>
I'm<font color="#E5E5E5"> not that smart</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you said you came up</font> here<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> help</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I did to tell you how the</font> murder could<font color="#E5E5E5"> have got into those chain</font> doors<font color="#E5E5E5"> the old siberian dungeon</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> principle</font> you remember Mike<font color="#CCCCCC"> what's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Siberian</font> principle the same as ledger sentry-box
<font color="#CCCCCC">escape</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> look here mr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Novello the.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Siberian dungeon trick may be the same</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">as a sentry</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> box escape</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> trick or the.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Hungarian</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> baloney fact a trick but I'm</font> not<font color="#E5E5E5"> a magician</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> so I'll be asking too</font> much of you<font color="#E5E5E5"> to explain it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in plain.</font>
United States<font color="#CCCCCC"> I'll do</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> better than</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I'll show you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> how</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> done Gavigan do</font> you mind<font color="#E5E5E5"> if I take miss</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barkley home now</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">okay I'll count on</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you to have her</font> available and I need her<font color="#E5E5E5"> right</font> and I kid<font color="#E5E5E5"> Mon</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Judy let's go I'll be home</font> if you want me Marty<font color="#CCCCCC"> all right professor</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">the Scandinavian</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> ice box trick if you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">please all right they will start right</font> out<font color="#CCCCCC"> here in the hall</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah it can</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> be</font> shown<font color="#CCCCCC"> to be impossible for a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> human being</font> to<font color="#E5E5E5"> get to a locked door</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it is least</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> one</font> answer<font color="#CCCCCC"> doesn't it just make one crack</font>
- about demons<font color="#E5E5E5"> and ghosts it's all I want</font>
- you<font color="#E5E5E5"> to do</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh no no no</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he hung around out.</font>
There<font color="#CCCCCC"> until somebody smashed in the</font> front door then they came<font color="#CCCCCC"> back through</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">here put the chain back</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> on the door and</font>
- made his getaway out through the<font color="#E5E5E5"> front</font>
- door<font color="#CCCCCC"> then actually nobody</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> saw him due to.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Confusion</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> over</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the finding of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sabacc</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">body</font> well that means<font color="#E5E5E5"> Wampus or Mike or</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Madame</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">rapport or total look here inspector I</font> was at the<font color="#E5E5E5"> four th of the net was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sebat.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Montoro but</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I left</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and later on the</font> sidewalk because<font color="#E5E5E5"> they got quarreling it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">sounded to me like a little uh blackmail</font> involved<font color="#CCCCCC"> I assure you I left</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> him I'm</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">positive tolling but being the clear</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">there's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> only one trouble</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Taro's</font> disappeared disappeared<font color="#E5E5E5"> yet makes it</font> kind of bad<font color="#CCCCCC"> for me doesn't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it a total</font> could have given me a complete alibi
Mike I hope<font color="#E5E5E5"> you don't think</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I had</font> anything to do<font color="#CCCCCC"> so that's murder</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">sure</font> and you can depend<font color="#CCCCCC"> on a to dad</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you don't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">have to sell</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> judy to me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> if I were 30</font> years<font color="#E5E5E5"> younger</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you'd be</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> calling a mugger</font> tomorrow<font color="#E5E5E5"> besides was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> night listening at</font> the door<font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> who drew all those funny</font> marks on the floor<font color="#CCCCCC"> ghosts</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> what ghosts</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Oh</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">such a said goats</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> how comes that you</font> don't know that<font color="#CCCCCC"> Siberian</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> dungeon tricks</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> novella does</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he can't be very</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> smart</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">he was born in New York I practically</font> invented that trick<font color="#E5E5E5"> it's based on the</font> principle<font color="#CCCCCC"> that in an unsolvable mystery</font> the real facts<font color="#E5E5E5"> are just the opposite</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">what they seem well I was a little</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">confused</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> before but now that you've</font> explained<font color="#E5E5E5"> it I'm bewildered everything</font> points to<font color="#E5E5E5"> Touro being the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> murderer so I</font> don't<font color="#CCCCCC"> believe it</font> everything points to<font color="#CCCCCC"> Touro being a</font>
- <font color="#E5E5E5">fugitive so I think I know where I can</font>
- <font color="#E5E5E5">find</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> him</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't mind me and I haven't.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Understood what you've been talking</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">about since I struck</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> town</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you take Judy</font> to our place<font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> don't let her out of</font> your sight<font color="#CCCCCC"> no I'm going with you no no</font> you stick with me<font color="#E5E5E5"> Judy he's gonna have</font> his<font color="#E5E5E5"> block marked off where</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you going to</font> find mr.<font color="#CCCCCC"> torille</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the last place anybody</font>
- would<font color="#CCCCCC"> think to look for him in his own</font>
- home.
You.
I am I<font color="#E5E5E5"> follow you and start doing a lot</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of explaining quick he's dead Gavin so I</font> see<font color="#E5E5E5"> the same phony business on the floor</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">-</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> this is incredible</font> yeah and he was gonna give you an<font color="#CCCCCC"> alibi</font> for Saban's murder now he's dead<font color="#CCCCCC"> maybe</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">because he couldn't have cleared you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font> don't<font color="#E5E5E5"> think I can</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> do you I should</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I wait</font> a minute<font color="#CCCCCC"> this doesn't make sense</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and I</font> saw him just<font color="#CCCCCC"> before 1 o'clock broadcast</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">then don't you see I was in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> your</font> presence at the very moment<font color="#E5E5E5"> Toto was</font> being<font color="#E5E5E5"> killed and certainly I wouldn't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">kill the one man who could prove I</font> didn't<font color="#CCCCCC"> kill Sabet</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> as the first time</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font> my life I<font color="#CCCCCC"> ever heard of one</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> murder alibi</font> another but it's all the<font color="#E5E5E5"> same</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to you I</font> think<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll run along now I'll be sure</font> that your<font color="#E5E5E5"> wine no I know you can always</font> find me I've been<font color="#E5E5E5"> a pretty well-known</font>
- figure<font color="#CCCCCC"> around town for about 10 years</font>
- ask Mike he knows certainly is an awful.
<font color="#E5E5E5">Mess inspector</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I hope you get</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it figured</font> out well I had a swell<font color="#CCCCCC"> ferry up to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> now</font> hold on a<font color="#E5E5E5"> minute</font>
Quinn notify the department wake up doc.
<font color="#CCCCCC">Hendricks again hey Doc</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> what time do you</font> figure<font color="#CCCCCC"> Sabac was bumped</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> off</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> solid</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">midnight and round numbers but this man</font> has been dead about about<font color="#CCCCCC"> 4</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> hours</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 4</font> hours<font color="#E5E5E5"> about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 4 hours I said</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it's 3</font> o'clock now that means<font color="#CCCCCC"> Toro was killed</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">around 11 o'clock</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> doc you're crazy while</font> you<font color="#CCCCCC"> yourself saw him alive</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and talking</font> in<font color="#CCCCCC"> Sabbats apartment way after</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> midnight</font> he's been dead<font color="#CCCCCC"> for hours maybe</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> 15</font> minutes one way<font color="#CCCCCC"> or the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> other but I</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">talked to him there can't be any mistake</font>
I followed him when he left the place<font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font> a taxi care and maybe<font color="#E5E5E5"> this is the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">boogeyman you were talking</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> about you</font> figure it out<font color="#CCCCCC"> okay said you've got all I</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">need four</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hours</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> recording of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that tunnel</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">couldn't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have killed Sabet oh he</font> couldn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> apparently he was dead before</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">savate was hello inspector</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the body in</font> here<font color="#E5E5E5"> right over</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> there</font> gone what is this hocus-pocus<font color="#CCCCCC"> I'll take</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">easy Gavigan</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it out</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of the wagon on the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">way Quinn close that door from the</font> outside fine police<font color="#E5E5E5"> department we are even dead</font> guys disappear honest<font color="#E5E5E5"> I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> don't</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> like this</font> magic<font color="#CCCCCC"> stuff</font> don't let anything<font color="#E5E5E5"> funny happen because</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">if you do I'm gonna</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> say a few magic</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">words</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> over you and your job will</font> disappear<font color="#E5E5E5"> listen Mike yeah is there</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">really anything to this demon</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">surrogate stuff</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> well not this</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> time I</font> don't think<font color="#E5E5E5"> let me look around a minute</font>
I'll figure it<font color="#E5E5E5"> out</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> steady</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Gabby</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">deaths will strike the third time</font> huh that stunts got me fooled<font color="#CCCCCC"> Mike you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't</font> cut<font color="#E5E5E5"> it out Gavigan give me a chance to</font> think I've<font color="#E5E5E5"> been a good honest cop in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">new york police force for 19 years and</font> so help<font color="#CCCCCC"> me this is the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> first time</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that I</font> ever Marty I got<font color="#CCCCCC"> it thank you Kevin</font> yeah<font color="#E5E5E5"> again hey Marty</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">get it you all right yeah okay</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">you son on the couch Mike what happened</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">he fell through a trapdoor the place is</font> full<font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> look yeah that's how I</font> disappeared now that's<font color="#E5E5E5"> like right</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> on</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">yeah it shows</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> y'all some you can be the</font> keys of this typewriter we're connected by<font color="#CCCCCC"> these loops of thread through this</font> tube<font color="#E5E5E5"> of the one upstairs</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> press a key</font> down here<font color="#CCCCCC"> Prince</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> letter up there</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Quecha</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">what</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I want any threads on the other</font> typewriter<font color="#CCCCCC"> so</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> when the message was</font> finished he cut the loops with<font color="#E5E5E5"> this pair</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> scissors and pull the threads down</font> through the tube<font color="#CCCCCC"> Hey whoo</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that's what's</font> got<font color="#CCCCCC"> me bothered</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it looks like there's</font> more<font color="#CCCCCC"> than one mixed up in this but</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font> sent the same person committed both murders maybe<font color="#E5E5E5"> there's more</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> than murder</font> involved wait a minute hey where where yes inspector<font color="#E5E5E5"> queer queer where are you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">come over to the couch what do you do</font> down<font color="#E5E5E5"> there</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> never mind</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that come on down</font> and<font color="#E5E5E5"> be</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> careful</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm worried about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> be</font> careful<font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> this joint</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">catch it go a little</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> faster well of</font> course your business<font color="#CCCCCC"> is your business</font> but<font color="#CCCCCC"> if you can at least</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> tell who you</font> think is<font color="#E5E5E5"> trying to kill you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it'll</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> be a</font> great<font color="#E5E5E5"> help</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to me and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Mike</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I was pretty</font> sure it was dr. Sabet<font color="#E5E5E5"> but it happened</font> again after he was dead if they're in a great city for<font color="#E5E5E5"> you at</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> home</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you'd get to</font> be<font color="#CCCCCC"> miss</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Indiana</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> a queen of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the May but</font> here in New York<font color="#CCCCCC"> when they find a pretty</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">girl like you what happens they tried to</font> strangle in New York it's<font color="#E5E5E5"> not just the</font> bad Oh Mike Mike<font color="#CCCCCC"> judy</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> judy take it easy</font> nobody's gonna hurt<font color="#CCCCCC"> you what is it what</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">happened</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it was so bad</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">not just the bad he's not dead he's</font> still alive he tried<font color="#E5E5E5"> to kill me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sober.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Oh nonsense he's in an ice-cold</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> drawer</font> down<font color="#CCCCCC"> at the mall but he</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> was at the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">window with a gun where's that</font> well one<font color="#CCCCCC"> live he was here and the next</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">thing he disappeared in a cloud of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> smoke</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">cloud of smoke</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh it's you Mike oh I</font> thought the<font color="#E5E5E5"> devil</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ghosa</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> grabbed him are</font> you all right<font color="#E5E5E5"> I'm all</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> right ina gotten</font> that<font color="#E5E5E5"> one at the window</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> but I stepped on</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the Egyptian temple mystery</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> out I went</font>
- through the<font color="#CCCCCC"> trapdoor like a tunnel break</font>
- <font color="#CCCCCC">oh that was</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> here</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well is the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> ghost</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> still.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Honoring us with his present</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh there's</font> not<font color="#E5E5E5"> a ghost in sight</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">say maybe I dreamed it oh no I saw it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">too it was so bad Judy that's you and I</font> have<font color="#E5E5E5"> little talk</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Kelly Astro.</font>
Oh<font color="#CCCCCC"> step into</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> my parlor robert-houdin</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> know that<font color="#E5E5E5"> door is</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> just another</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> one of</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">your</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> tricks but what were the words you</font> were using<font color="#CCCCCC"> Kelly Ostrow and</font> robert-houdin<font color="#CCCCCC"> to the greatest magicians</font> that<font color="#E5E5E5"> ever lived</font> place is full of stunts like that<font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font> impresses the customers have you
<font color="#E5E5E5">something you want to tell me Judy yes</font> not much it isn't very nice<font color="#CCCCCC"> well I'm on</font> your side -<font color="#E5E5E5"> no madam rap</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> artist so</font> that's wife<font color="#E5E5E5"> and she's my</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sister</font> mmm<font color="#E5E5E5"> oh I see you knew yes well then you</font> must have<font color="#E5E5E5"> suspected the rest of it that</font> you were<font color="#E5E5E5"> trying to protect your sister</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">from the consequences</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> my exposing her</font> as a faith so that<font color="#E5E5E5"> threatened me if I</font> dared tell anybody<font color="#E5E5E5"> this dr. Sabet was a</font> pretty bad<font color="#CCCCCC"> boy learning one of the worst</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">my sister was doing a harmless</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> spirit</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">act in Budapest when</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sebat got hold of</font> her<font color="#E5E5E5"> since then he's</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> been aiming</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> at that</font>
$25,000 prize<font color="#CCCCCC"> and all the big money</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">could clean up once he seemed to prove.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Madame rapport the real thing this</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> watt.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Rose is on the level isn't it yes</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> he's</font> honest and he's<font color="#E5E5E5"> smart but</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he had a son</font> killed in the war and he<font color="#CCCCCC"> actually</font> believes<font color="#E5E5E5"> madam reports made contact with</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">a dead boy</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Oh Mike</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> most of the time I'm</font> a pretty sensible person but so<font color="#E5E5E5"> many</font> weird<font color="#CCCCCC"> things have been happening lately</font> no sebat used to say that<font color="#E5E5E5"> his soul could</font> leave his body<font color="#E5E5E5"> and people</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> would believe</font> he was<font color="#E5E5E5"> dead</font> well you can gamble the<font color="#CCCCCC"> doc is about his</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">dad he's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> gonna stay dead a long time</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">well what</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> was that the window</font>
I don't know<font color="#E5E5E5"> so that's really dead then</font> and who's been trying to<font color="#E5E5E5"> kill me I don't</font> know that on it why why<font color="#E5E5E5"> does somebody</font> want<font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> kill me well I've told</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you the</font> whole story<font color="#CCCCCC"> well maybe somebody just</font> trying<font color="#E5E5E5"> to frighten you just saying</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">doesn't you the truth is that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> know</font> something<font color="#CCCCCC"> well the murderer thinks</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font> you<font color="#CCCCCC"> know something little hanging but</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I</font> don't<font color="#CCCCCC"> yeah but even</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> check it I called</font> anyone<font color="#E5E5E5"> from all invited spec accountants</font> here to see you excuse<font color="#CCCCCC"> me</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">just a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> minute dad</font>
I don't want you here<font color="#E5E5E5"> when Gavigan comes</font> in so wait in the<font color="#E5E5E5"> bedroom with you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh</font> how<font color="#CCCCCC"> I find it just right down to the end</font>
- <font color="#E5E5E5">the room straight ahead you can't miss</font>
- it.
Now you just<font color="#CCCCCC"> watch me brother</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Herman</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the</font> great Houdini<font color="#E5E5E5"> you're trying to kid</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> me</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> no</font> no<font color="#E5E5E5"> say do you know the names of any</font> magicians the<font color="#E5E5E5"> greatest magician of the</font> malls of<font color="#CCCCCC"> Earth named Kelly Astro</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">hello Marty don't you ever sleep</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dad</font> keep a look out a little<font color="#E5E5E5"> longer</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> will</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">please I'll be sitting right over here</font> with my eye on the door thanks I've got
<font color="#E5E5E5">a wild</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> hunch we're gonna have a visit</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">from madame rapport no I just left oh</font> that's what I came<font color="#E5E5E5"> over to see</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you about</font> your seizure after what's<font color="#CCCCCC"> happened tonight I guess I</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">just</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> can't take</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it anymore</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">I didn't do anything but sit down and</font> all<font color="#E5E5E5"> the sudden</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> they couldn't get up</font> well<font color="#E5E5E5"> it isn't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> finished yet as soon as</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> sat down</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and automatically went</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font> work on you<font color="#E5E5E5"> what do you do to close this</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">fold or</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> sing Yankee Doodle I know</font> robert-houdin so well what's on your mind<font color="#CCCCCC"> Gabby Mike I put an x-ray</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Madame</font> rapport she swears<font color="#CCCCCC"> about isn't dead she</font> says his soul is<font color="#E5E5E5"> gonna come back to his</font> body<font color="#CCCCCC"> well what did you expect her to</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">tell a cop</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that she was a fake and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> how'd</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">you slam her in jail she believes it.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Mike that Dame is on the level about it</font> that's<font color="#E5E5E5"> not all you don't believe so</font> that's not dead
<font color="#CCCCCC">oh no she says she's gonna give a since</font> tomorrow and<font color="#CCCCCC"> callbacks about to tell me</font> who strangled<font color="#CCCCCC"> him</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">oh no let her fool you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> she ain't gonna</font> fool me<font color="#E5E5E5"> you're coming</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to that seeing us</font> if the lady produces<font color="#CCCCCC"> a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> ghost I'll see</font> what he has to<font color="#CCCCCC"> say</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you'll show me</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">how they worked the wires where she can</font> hold<font color="#E5E5E5"> it she's so hopped up she pulling</font> off<font color="#E5E5E5"> a Madison Square Garden</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have her</font> hold it here in my place<font color="#CCCCCC"> then</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> she can't</font>
- pull any tricks on me<font color="#E5E5E5"> now you're talking</font>
- <font color="#E5E5E5">say suppose she digs up a real ghost</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> my.</font>
Old grandmother used to swear they really had him back in Ireland<font color="#CCCCCC"> now you</font> believe in<font color="#E5E5E5"> ghosts Hey</font> not<font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> daytime</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> so long call you</font> tomorrow<font color="#E5E5E5"> Kelly</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> nostril pretty smart</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> for</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">a cop man Robert Houghton Judy I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> want to</font> ask some questions I<font color="#E5E5E5"> want you to tell me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">everything that you can</font> his<font color="#E5E5E5"> madam rapport really believe</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that</font> she has supernatural powers yes<font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font> convinced her she<font color="#E5E5E5"> was actually psychic</font> and<font color="#E5E5E5"> if she gave a seance with Seban out</font> of the way that<font color="#CCCCCC"> he no trick me to it</font> they<font color="#E5E5E5"> couldn't be he</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> had a let end of it</font> hmm no<font color="#E5E5E5"> ghost at all unless they were</font> real ones<font color="#E5E5E5"> what is it Mike we'll find</font> that out tomorrow<font color="#CCCCCC"> hello Mike</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I'll sit</font> down<font color="#E5E5E5"> anywhere Dave</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and lock</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the door</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">with it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> with this</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> partner you sit there</font> please<font color="#E5E5E5"> ladies and gentlemen I didn't</font> bring<font color="#E5E5E5"> you here on the old-fashioned</font> grounds and maybe I can scare one of<font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font> into revealing<font color="#E5E5E5"> himself as a murderer</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> on</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">the contrary I want you to study</font> everything<font color="#E5E5E5"> that happens if anything</font> happens and<font color="#E5E5E5"> try to help the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> police</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">department solve a couple of nasty</font> killings<font color="#CCCCCC"> mr. Morgan I expect you to</font> expose<font color="#CCCCCC"> anytime foolery you discover will</font> you bring in<font color="#CCCCCC"> Madame rapport please mr.</font>
Waters<font color="#E5E5E5"> I charge you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> as an acknowledged</font> scientist for<font color="#E5E5E5"> the responsibility of</font> unmasking any fraud you made it take
- <font color="#CCCCCC">will you sit over there please</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> where you</font>
- can see everything
I'm convinced that<font color="#CCCCCC"> Madame rapport is</font> about to make a<font color="#E5E5E5"> sincere attempt to</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">contact the other</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> world</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I give you my</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">word of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> honor that she brought with her</font> no special effects<font color="#E5E5E5"> trick machinery or</font> devices<font color="#E5E5E5"> of any kind Quinn will you turn</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">off</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the lights please now</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Madame rapport</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">if you please</font> dr. Sabet<font color="#E5E5E5"> Shh Judy does one rap mean yes</font> and two<font color="#E5E5E5"> raps</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> dr. Sabet</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> do you</font> know who strangled you yes<font color="#E5E5E5"> was it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">professor</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Toro</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes no you mean yes and</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">no it was Toro but it wasn't Toro</font> yes but<font color="#CCCCCC"> dr.</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Sabet last night someone who</font> looked like you tried<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> get in a window</font> of<font color="#CCCCCC"> this building</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that you know is</font> miss Barclay connected<font color="#E5E5E5"> with these</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">murders no does she know something about</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">these murders yes</font> something that might expose the mystery yes<font color="#CCCCCC"> then it is our</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> duty to</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> protect</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> miss.</font>
Barclay until<font color="#CCCCCC"> she's able to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> tell</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> us but</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">she just fainted strain was too much for</font> her.
I must be an awful liar<font color="#E5E5E5"> I saw it and I</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">heard it and I still</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> don't</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> believe</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> it it</font> wasn't real I've been working on<font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">ghost</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> illusion for months</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I thought you</font> said on<font color="#CCCCCC"> your word of honor that wasn't</font> gonna<font color="#E5E5E5"> be any phony business I said it</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">about</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Madame rapport not about me</font> well I don't<font color="#CCCCCC"> see</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the sense of it what</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">are</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you trying to do Marty you remember</font> what you told<font color="#CCCCCC"> me once about</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> people once</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">they</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> committed a murder</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> sure they don't</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">care how many more they</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> knocked</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> off they</font> know they can only<font color="#E5E5E5"> go to the electric</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">chair once</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that's just it there's one</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">murder that hasn't been committed</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> yet</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">miss</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Barclay</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I tried to make</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">murder realize that he had</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to get</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Judy.</font>
Barclay out of the way<font color="#CCCCCC"> but</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> aren't you</font> risking the girl's life<font color="#CCCCCC"> no I'm gonna</font> save her instead<font color="#CCCCCC"> of letting the murder</font> decide when he's<font color="#E5E5E5"> going to kill her and</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">take</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> us by surprise</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I wanted him to</font> think<font color="#E5E5E5"> that we got careless and gave him</font> an opportunity<font color="#E5E5E5"> and that's just the time</font>
- that<font color="#CCCCCC"> we</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> be</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> layin for was at it at the</font>
- magician show.
What me inspector just find a<font color="#E5E5E5"> place</font> there<font color="#E5E5E5"> anyway</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you folks find chairs and</font> sit<font color="#CCCCCC"> down</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> with you please Quinn don't let</font> anybody in<font color="#CCCCCC"> that door</font> well now that<font color="#E5E5E5"> you're all here I've had</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">time to check up</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on everybody's story</font> not one<font color="#CCCCCC"> of you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> has a real alibi there's</font> a certain hair<font color="#CCCCCC"> Faldo he missed dr. Sabet</font> was murdered and<font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> mrs.</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> LeClair called</font> on him<font color="#E5E5E5"> during that</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> half hour so that was</font> dead when I got there<font color="#CCCCCC"> Mike knows daddy</font> saw me coming out<font color="#E5E5E5"> of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the elevator how</font> long<font color="#CCCCCC"> were you hiding in that elevator</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">hiding yes hiding</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you walked</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> upstairs</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">past the clerk</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> 30 minutes earlier</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I you</font> get in there and<font color="#E5E5E5"> kill</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Sabet</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> in that 30</font> minutes she was<font color="#E5E5E5"> fighting</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> for me I</font> followed you there<font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah you did that</font> makes you there at the<font color="#E5E5E5"> right time</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> too so</font> you shut up<font color="#CCCCCC"> madam you claim</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Colonel.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Watrous is your alibi</font> oh come<font color="#E5E5E5"> on now Gavigan</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I told you they</font> were both with me when<font color="#E5E5E5"> I</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> broke down</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that</font> chain door sure after sebat was dead where was she
<font color="#E5E5E5">before that before you arrived at her</font> hotel<font color="#CCCCCC"> but</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> now mr.</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Navarro we checked</font> your<font color="#CCCCCC"> story on that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> missing</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> thirty</font> minutes and it means<font color="#E5E5E5"> nothing</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> it's easy</font> but<font color="#E5E5E5"> I see I saw said that last photo in</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">front of the 48</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> Club Joanna mobster</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">prevents you 510 a</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> 15 minutes later</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">going over to Sundance place and that's</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">where you come in</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> miss box</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> make it easy.</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">Carrigan I admit miss Barclay arrived</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> as</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">advance</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> apartment-house during those 30</font> minutes<font color="#CCCCCC"> but she</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> didn't I know what she</font> didn't do and I know what<font color="#CCCCCC"> she did</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> now</font> you and I are<font color="#CCCCCC"> going to sit down</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> go</font> over<font color="#E5E5E5"> again and again every last detail</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">of what you saw</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> can we find</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> out what</font> blunder one of this group<font color="#E5E5E5"> committed that</font> proved him or her guilty<font color="#CCCCCC"> oh that's</font> ridiculous what makes you think any
<font color="#E5E5E5">blunder was committed</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> because someone's</font> trying<font color="#CCCCCC"> to shut her mouth</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> before we can</font> discover<font color="#E5E5E5"> it all right if it'll make you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">any</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> happier but it'll have</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to wait till</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">after the show</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> guy out here says he went</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the class on the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> state's right away</font> okay right here everyone the minute.
Mike's act is<font color="#E5E5E5"> over we're all going down</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to headquarters and stay there we thrash</font> this thing up<font color="#E5E5E5"> that's all till then</font> well how does<font color="#E5E5E5"> it like my acting</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> monk</font> well Barrymore won't lose any sleep over it<font color="#E5E5E5"> was</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> alright</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> Mike if your scheme</font> doesn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> work or if anything should</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> go</font> back we better call<font color="#E5E5E5"> the whole thing off</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">no Mike I want to go through it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> haven't forgotten that<font color="#E5E5E5"> man that came</font> into my<font color="#CCCCCC"> room of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> that horrible face of</font> the room on this<font color="#CCCCCC"> unprecedented program</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> will be</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">the</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> return from private life of</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font> great Morgan who will<font color="#E5E5E5"> perform a new</font> version of one<font color="#E5E5E5"> of the most dangerous</font> tricks<font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> magic the great Morgan thank</font> you<font color="#E5E5E5"> ladies and gentlemen I'd like to</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">have a committee of</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> about eight or nine</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">of you come</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> up on the stage</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> please don't</font> be bashful<font color="#E5E5E5"> come on</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> that's</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> right thank</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you sir</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> thank you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> thank</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> you thank you</font> right up here please will you stand over
<font color="#CCCCCC">by that table</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> thank you</font> don't touch anything<font color="#E5E5E5"> until I tell you do</font> may I have one<font color="#E5E5E5"> or two more please</font> thank you most<font color="#E5E5E5"> of you know the late</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">singling foods magic bullet trick</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> but to</font> those<font color="#E5E5E5"> of you who don't I'll explain it</font> briefly<font color="#CCCCCC"> a rifle is discharged at the</font> subject who catches the bullet<font color="#E5E5E5"> between</font> her teeth captain<font color="#E5E5E5"> please now may I</font> introduce my collaborator<font color="#E5E5E5"> and</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> guests for</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">this</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> one performance only.</font>
Captain Robert Z<font color="#E5E5E5"> storm of the United.</font>
States<font color="#E5E5E5"> Army</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> storm will you</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> presented</font> potentials to the committee<font color="#E5E5E5"> please now</font> may I present<font color="#E5E5E5"> my charming assistant</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">excuse me</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">sure</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> satisfied gentlemen the committee</font> will now examine these weapons which captain storm certifies our regulation
<font color="#E5E5E5">army rifles if you please</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> gentlemen</font> ladies and<font color="#E5E5E5"> gentlemen</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> this</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> is obviously a</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">trip and</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> obviously the solution is</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font> some deception either with the weapons or<font color="#E5E5E5"> the cartridges by version dares you</font> to<font color="#E5E5E5"> find that deception everything</font> legitimate<font color="#E5E5E5"> yeah okay</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well love</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you</font> please<font color="#E5E5E5"> open either box of cartridges now</font> dump the contents<font color="#CCCCCC"> out onto the table</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">well another gentleman select any rifle</font> and hand it<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the captain that's right</font> now<font color="#E5E5E5"> will another gentleman select any</font> cartridge at random and another gentleman place that<font color="#E5E5E5"> cartridge in the</font> right practice shot<font color="#E5E5E5"> captain</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> yes please</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> but</font> one of you<font color="#CCCCCC"> passed me one</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> of those</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">crackers please thank you</font> our one<font color="#CCCCCC"> of the gentlemen any one of you</font> select<font color="#E5E5E5"> another cartridge please settle</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">it among yourselves</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> now will you mark</font> the bullet so you may<font color="#E5E5E5"> be able to</font> identify<font color="#CCCCCC"> it later all watch closely</font> please get ready<font color="#CCCCCC"> keep your eye on</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> those</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">aces</font> now have a<font color="#E5E5E5"> clean this bullet has been</font> marked<font color="#E5E5E5"> in the presence of your committee</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">captain storm will now discharge this</font> bullet at his human target<font color="#E5E5E5"> if we are</font> successful<font color="#CCCCCC"> my charming assistant</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> will</font> catch this same mark bullet<font color="#E5E5E5"> between her</font> teeth will<font color="#E5E5E5"> someone please place the</font> cartridge<font color="#E5E5E5"> and captain storms</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> life all</font> right<font color="#E5E5E5"> captain watch closely gentlemen</font> ready captain's<font color="#E5E5E5"> ready miss Barclay ready</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">aim fire</font> get him Gavigan.
<font color="#CCCCCC">I was right Marty here's my cartridge he</font> fell for the scheme<font color="#CCCCCC"> who is he will soon</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">find out</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">it's Duvall oh yeah all but the eyes</font> look at that Gavigan those new invisible spectacles<font color="#CCCCCC"> yeah doctored</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> up to make him</font> look<font color="#E5E5E5"> like he had blue eyes poor Dave you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">probably have a long story to tell us</font> when he comes to but Marty<font color="#CCCCCC"> don't use handcuffs</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> on him he</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">can escape from a</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> straitjacket here that.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Quinn</font>
- don't worry every<font color="#CCCCCC"> time I sees coming -</font>
- I'll fucking<font color="#E5E5E5"> Lee get Judy what in the.</font>
World<font color="#E5E5E5"> wasn't an invitation blood capture</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">you put in my mouth</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> the usual formula</font> terrible wasn't<font color="#E5E5E5"> it</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> well that's the</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> first</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">time</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I ever had orders to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> miss my target</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">yes he did</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> just miss me captain I I</font> could see you a heater that bottom my cheek<font color="#E5E5E5"> oh no no I miss - at least that</font> far how do you feel<font color="#E5E5E5"> good he oh I'm fine</font> what I never<font color="#E5E5E5"> felt better in my jewelry</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">kestrel robert-houdin</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> boy you should</font> have<font color="#CCCCCC"> seen us coming across town in a</font> police car with<font color="#E5E5E5"> me blowing the siren</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ha</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">I tell you Mike we New Yorkers</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> have got</font> the best police force in the<font color="#E5E5E5"> world we.</font>
New Yorkers<font color="#CCCCCC"> I thought you hated this</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">town me would you</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> ever get that</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> idea</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> no</font> sir tomorrow I'm gonna go out and<font color="#CCCCCC"> buy a</font> pair of spats<font color="#CCCCCC"> in a cane and if I can get</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">away with that I'm gonna try sleeping</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> in</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">the pajamas you haven't started</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">explain that murder mystery yet have you</font> no I made him<font color="#CCCCCC"> wait for</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you blackmail dr.</font>
Sabet was bleeding<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> valo dry some mess</font> they've got himself<font color="#CCCCCC"> into</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> years ago in.</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">Europe when he got the idea</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> he'd killed</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">sabaton make it look like Toro died wait</font> a minute<font color="#CCCCCC"> wait a minute</font> taro<font color="#E5E5E5"> is dead Toro isn't dead explain</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">that first Dave made himself up to look</font> like Toro somewhere along<font color="#E5E5E5"> the line Toro got</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> wise</font> so he had to strangle him first then made up his Toro he went over to<font color="#E5E5E5"> the</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">doctors</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> apartment</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> kill him</font> that's why he fixed<font color="#CCCCCC"> it so</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> the lights</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">wouldn't work</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> till he got away fine</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> I</font> don't<font color="#CCCCCC"> get it well the lights</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> would have</font> shown<font color="#CCCCCC"> up his disguise</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> oh what's that</font> well somebody out<font color="#CCCCCC"> in front</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> dad press the</font> button see what is<font color="#CCCCCC"> Lou but don't you say</font> another<font color="#E5E5E5"> word until I come back</font> listen I can't wait what was it<font color="#CCCCCC"> develop</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">thought I knew to impress the clerk that</font> he was Toro he stopped to do<font color="#CCCCCC"> tourists</font> favorite card trick<font color="#E5E5E5"> unknowingly he</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">fanned the cards from left to right</font> oh yes that's<font color="#CCCCCC"> all</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> I only thought you</font>
<font color="#E5E5E5">noticed didn't you tell me</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> oh then he</font> was the<font color="#E5E5E5"> one that tried</font><font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> get in the</font> window<font color="#CCCCCC"> made up as dr. Sebat that time</font> huh now what I've explained<font color="#CCCCCC"> to</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> you'll</font> cover all the other points you'll just stop to think I don't<font color="#E5E5E5"> want</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">to think and I don't want</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> to hear any</font>
<font color="#CCCCCC">more</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> about it you know Judy with a</font> little training<font color="#E5E5E5"> you'd have made a</font> marvelous<font color="#CCCCCC"> mind</font><font color="#E5E5E5"> reader why even a</font> half-wit could tell what you're<font color="#CCCCCC"> thinking</font> about.
<font color="#CCCCCC">Oh</font>
Here I come!
Here I come!
I beat you!
We want to do it again.
Come on.
Well, they seem to have you down, Mr. Chan.
- Sixty summers young. Sixty winters old.
- Come on.
Come on, Charlie.
We wanna do it again.
What'd you say?
You want song about
Princess Ming Lo Fu?
All right.
- Come on.
- Thank you so much.
Come on, Charlie. Come on.
You conduct mission long here in China?
Yes. In Yangtze Valley.
Very interesting.
Taking a vacation, eh?
Staying in Shanghai long?
A holiday mood like fickle girl... privilege to change mind.
Now then, play fair. This is your first visit to Shanghai in many years, isn't it?
Yes. Most anxious to renew acquaintance... with land of honorable ancestors.
Oh, there he is, Diana.
- Mr. Charlie Chan?
- Humbly acknowledge name.
I'm Philip Nash,
Sir Stanley Woodland's secretary.
Most happy to make acquaintance.
This is Sir Stanley's niece,
Miss Diana Woodland from Canada.
- How do you do, Mr. Chan?
- So pleased.
Sir Stanley asked me to apologize for not meeting you himself... but he was detained on business.
You will see him, of course, at the banquet tonight.
- There is banquet?
- Oh, why of course.
The arrival in Shanghai of so distinguished a visitor can't go unnoticed.
Much flattered... by unexpected acknowledgement of humble efforts.
You'll have to make a speech, you know.
Idea of making speech bring goose pimples.
Much scared.
Hi, Pop!
Hi.
Joy equals astonishment... at seeing offspring in Shanghai.
- Explanation, please.
- Mom cabled you were coming to Shanghai... so the firm sent me here to look into the trade situation.
Yes? Selling oil for lamps of China?
Pocketbook, of course, left in other suit?
- Believe it or not.
- Old excuse... like ancient billy goat has whiskers.
Ladies and gentlemen, it is a great pleasure for me... as president of the chamber of commerce... to welcome our illustrious guest, the famous Charlie Chan.
And now I have a bit of good news for you.
We are not making speeches tonight.
Just a few words of welcome to Shanghai.
I call on Colonel Watkins, our commissioner of police.
I count myself lucky to have known
Charlie Chan for quite a few years.
Charlie is a splendid friend...
but I'd hate to be his enemy.
Here's to our friendship,
Charlie.
- When did the commissioner of police meet Mr. Chan?
Scotland Yard, at the time of Sir Lionel Bashford's murder.
I call on Mr. Sun Wong.
I made an important discovery this afternoon.
That's what prevented me from meeting you.
We can get together after this is over.
Two ears for every tongue.
What does all that mean?
He said,
"Thank you so much."
And now we are fortunate in having with us our old friend...
Sir Stanley Woodland, who has a few words to say in our behalf.
It is a great pleasure to me to perform this friendly ceremony.
I am certain I can think of no better words... to voice our sentiments, Charlie... than are inscribed on the scroll contained in this jade box... fashioned, who knows...
by the hands of your ancestors.
- May I read it to you?
- Please.
Uncle Stanley!
Uncle Stanley!
Murderer most ingenious.
But the motive, Charlie?
The motive?
Motive like end of string... tied in many knots.
End may be in sight, but hard to unravel.
Sir Stanley had so many friends but few enemies.
Only one enemy necessary to commit murder.
Box was in hands of, uh,
Sir Stanley's secretary?
Yes. But he...
Let's hear what he has to say.
- Diana, how is she?
- She is taking it pretty hard.
Hmm. That box, Philip, you were looking after it, weren't you?
Yes. It was in my room all afternoon.
I brought it here myself.
You look in box before coming here?
When Sir Stanley first gave it to me, I did.
It was all right this afternoon.
- Did not look before starting for banquet?
- No.
Someone could have changed box during afternoon?
Well, yes, I suppose it could have been done.
Too bad you let it out of your sight.
- But how could I know anything like this would happen?
- Yes, yes, yes.
Perhaps home better than here for young lady.
She'll appreciate it.
May I, Colonel Watkins?
- Yes, yes, of course.
- Thank you.
Sir Stanley very good friend.
With your permission, would like to help on case.
I was hoping you'd say that.
My whole department is at your service.
For present, would prefer to work alone.
Yes, yes, of course, if you wish.
Thank you.
- Will say good night now.
- Good night, Charlie.
Thank you.
- Find fingerprints?
- Now listen, Pop.
If you and Sir Stanley had business together... it's a cinch that whoever sent you this note killed him... and is after you too.
Very clever deduction.
Instincts of detective father... inherited by noble offspring.
- But what's it all about?
- Talk cannot cook rice.
You mean you don't know what it's all about yourself?
Silence best answer when uncertain.
- You go to bed now.
- All right.
But don't say
I didn't warn you.
Thank you.
Distance no hindrance to fond thoughts.
Good night.
Good night, Pop.
Good night.
Do not forget your prayers.
May need them.
Hey, Pop. What was that?
Pop!
Dad. Dad.
Dad!
Operator, get the police, quick!
- Can relax.
- Dad!
- I thought they'd got you.
- Have idea someone make attack... so come into your room to watch on sofa.
So sorry fall asleep.
Hello. Hello. Police department.
Police department.
Charlie Chan speaking.
Is anything wrong, Mr. Chan?
May tell commissioner that desire of my son to report murder... based on hasty conclusion and devotion to father.
Yes.
Safe now to sleep.
Sleep?
Insignificant man has never improved on nature's tonic.
But you can't sleep with this sort of thing going on!
Contradiction, please.
Murderer believed
Charlie Chan dead.
Second attack unlikely.
- Gee, Pop, you gave me the scare of my life.
- Yes?
Wake up, Charlie!
Thank you so much.
Office.
Good morning.
Have wish to order breakfast.
Room service is busy, Mr. Chan.
Will you wait a moment, please?
Marloff, something went wrong last night.
What do you mean?
I'll connect you on this line.
Listen carefully.
And don't say anything until I speak again.
You may have room service now, Mr. Chan.
Will have coffee, rolls... marmalade and very large omelet.
You see?
All right, you stay there and keep your eyes open.
I'll let you know what to do later.
Oh, it's you, Pop. I dreamt that
I was facing a firing squad.
Dreams like good liars... distort facts.
One fact very clear... have much hearty hunger.
- Now you dress.
- Okay.
Grant favor, please?
Omit song in bathroom.
Gee, Pop,
I sure miss my radio.
~ The bear went over the mountain ~
~ The bear went over the mountain ~
~ The bear went over the mountain ~
~ To see what he could see ~
Hurry, Lee.
Cold omelet like fish out of sea... does not improve with age.
Where you going, Pop?
To visit very charming young lady.
You stay here and look after telephone.
I will inform my most august lady of your exalted presence.
Thank you so much.
May your honorable ancestors rest in peace.
- Good morning, Mr. Chan.
- Good morning.
So sorry to disturb.
Have come to offer sympathy.
Thank you.
Am trying to help police.
Have necessary questions.
- Perhaps you have answers.
- Ask anything you wish, please.
Sir Stanley appear nervous.
As if afraid of attack?
Why, I...
I never thought of it before, but... for the last few weeks
Uncle Stanley has been rather... oh, how shall I describe it... rather cautious.
Can be more definite?
Well, now that I think of it, he never wished to be left alone.
Was to have assisted honorable uncle in important matter.
- You know nature of his business?
- No.
Someone made very certain
Sir Stanley did not talk to me.
Perhaps search among uncle's papers... disclose important communication for me?
Mr, Chan, last night after Philip left me... someone broke into
Uncle Stan's library.
- There were papers all over the floor this morning.
- May I see, please?
Yes, this way.
Nothing has been touched?
Philip was here for a few moments this morning. Then he called the police.
And Colonel Watkins said to leave things untouched until he arrived.
Young man Philip is here?
No. He went to the docks to meet a Mr. Andrews.
- From Washington?
- I believe so.
Uncle Stanley was expecting him, I know.
- You like young man very much?
- Yes, very much.
Most fortunate young man.
If papers found for
Mr. Andrews or self... will take good care?
- Most important.
- I will, Mr. Chan.
Thank you so much.
Aw, listen, baby.
What have I been doing for the last 30 minutes but listen?
On the boat you said you wanted to see me every night.
- Have you changed your mind?
- Sure, I want to see you.
Do we meet tonight or do we not?
I'm trying to tell you that
I can't say for certain, you see.
Hello! Hello!
Hello!
Yes. This is his room, but he's not in.
Sure, I'll tell him just as soon as he comes in.
Am in.
- That was...
- Sir Stanley's secretary?
Yes, and he said...
That Mr. Andrews has arrived?
How do you do it, Pop?
With mirrors?
Good for seeing backwards.
Well, here's one. Do you know that this Mr. Andrews wants to see you?
Well, now that you tell me, I know.
- Mr. Chan?
- Am Charlie Chan.
I'm from the commissioner of police.
He sent this note.
You talked to girl on telephone all morning or many girls?
Only one, Pop.
I tried to shake her, but I couldn't.
Will wait one moment, please?
Certainly, sir.
Get, uh, commissioner of police.
Operator? Get me 15380.
Say, Pop, you don't think this is phony, do you?
Phony? Translate into English, please.
You know, is there something fishy about it?
Slight odor, perhaps.
Will see.
Yes?
The old boy's pretty cagey.
He's checking up on us.
Put him on.
Police department.
What name, please?
Oh, Mr. Chan.
Just a moment.
I'll put you through to his private secretary.
Good morning, Mr. Chan.
I've been trying to get you for an hour, but the line has been busy.
Humbly apologize for... telephone flirtation by my son.
The commissioner wants you to come at once to the address he has given the chauffeur.
- He's one of our men.
- Thank you so much.
Where do we go from here?
I go. You stay here.
And please make note.
You pay bill for all female telephone calls.
Well, I got here just as soon as I could.
You seem to be in an awful rush, if you ask me.
Hello. Who wants him?
This is Colonel Watkins, commissioner of police.
Oh, good morning, sir.
Pop got your note all right.
- He's on his way to meet you now.
- On his way to meet me?
I never sent him a note.
You didn't?
Charlie Chan's son said that his father's just left the hotel... in answer to a note
I'm supposed to have sent him.
- That's odd, sir.
- It's more than odd.
Send over a couple of men at once.
- I want an immediate report.
- Very good, sir.
- Do you want to buy flower?
- Oh.
Thank you, sir.
- I've got to get a taxi! I'm in a hurry!
- Taxi!
Catch that car!
Double fare if you make it!
Hey, step on it, will you?
We've got to catch that car!
Hurry!
Here, let me drive this thing!
Well, here we are.
Sit down.
So much reception.
Most flattering.
Charlie Chan often see enemies in shadow box.
Now enemies see Charlie Chan.
Just a little taste of your own medicine.
Medicine very bitter.
What are you doing in Shanghai?
Think perhaps you have made answer impossible.
- Here's another one, Chief.
- Lee!
Listen, Pop.
The commissioner rang up...
Let capture be good lesson of virtue of silence.
Silence won't help you.
You came here to meet
Sir Stanley Woodland!
If answer known, question seem unnecessary.
Are you trying to tell me that you don't know why...
Sir Stanley Woodland summoned you to Shanghai?
Answer to question veiled in death.
Yes, Mr. Chan.
For you and for your son.
Hasty conclusion like, uh, hind leg of mule... kick backward.
What do you mean?
- If we die, you also die.
- Yeah?
Have ace in hole.
Suggest view through window.
Very interesting.
Look for beggar.
Not very good beggar, but very good detective.
- Detective?
- Sure, he's a detective.
A second after you left, the commissioner rang up... and when I told him what had happened, he said to tell a cop to follow us.
By now, this whole joint is surrounded by cops.
That's right, he did say something to a cop as he came out of the hotel.
That is ace in hole.
Come on, Pop!
Let's get a move on!
Go.
Very proud of athletic offspring.
As you say, scram!
And you're certain
Sir Stanley left no message for me?
- None that I know of, Mr. Andrews.
- Hmm.
Have a cigarette?
Thank you.
Well, make yourself at home, Nash.
I'll go freshen up bit and see if I can get rid of these sea legs.
Rough trip.
I beg pardon, sir.
The laundry on the boat fairly ruined the master's shirts, sir.
Do you happen to know where
I could purchase a new supply?
There's a little shop about two blocks down the street... Soo Low Gow's.
Thank you, sir.
- Is this Mr. Andrews's apartment?
- Yes, miss.
- Name, please?
- Miss Diana Woodland and Colonel Watkins.
- Is Mr. Nash with Mr. Andrews?
- Mr. Nash is in the study.
- Shall I announce you, miss?
- All right.
- Yes.
- Diana thought we'd find you here, Philip.
I found this in Uncle Stanley's desk.
Colonel Watkins thought we ought to bring it over. It's addressed to Mr. Andrews.
Oh, Mr. Andrews.
Miss Woodland.
- May I extend my deepest sympathy, Miss Woodland.
- Thank you so much.
This is Colonel Watkins, commissioner of the police department.
- A pleasure to meet you.
- Thank you, sir. You have something for me?
Yes, I found this in my uncle's desk.
We thought it might contain information... that would throw some light on Sir Stanley's death.
Will you pardon me, please?
Why, no, there's nothing in this to help us, Colonel.
Pardon me, please.
Hello.
Yes, have him come up.
I hope you won't think me rude... but I've a most important visitor whom I must see immediately.
Yes, of course, certainly.
Well, we'll see you soon, I hope.
No, no. Don't go, please.
There's a pleasant breeze out on the balcony... and I'll join you shortly for a gin rickey.
- Splendid idea, eh, Philip?
- Why, yes.
- Mr. Andrews?
- Yes. Come in.
- Just came from...
- Visitors.
This way, sir.
This matter is of such enormous importance
I don't trust anyone.
- Most wise.
- Will you sit down?
- Thank you.
- Young Nash tells me that you and Sir Woodland... had no opportunity for a private talk.
- Most unfortunate.
- You know, of course, why he sent for you?
Sir Woodland's letter very vague.
Await explanation, please.
Well, as you know, Sir Stanley was a secret agent of the British government.
I'm in the same service, representing the United States.
Cooperating with the Opium Committee of the League of Nations... and certain officials in the Chinese government...
we were planning a campaign to round up a group of smugglers... who've been using Shanghai as a clearinghouse for their goods.
It's a grave situation,
Mr. Chan.
The terrific toll of life taken yearly by this insidious traffic is beyond belief.
Beauty of poppy conceals sting of death.
In more ways than one,
I'm afraid.
Sir Stanley was murdered because he knew too much.
- He left report?
- Apparently not.
Oh, I've an important phone call
I must make for Mr. Andrews.
- You won't mind?
- You go right ahead, my boy.
I'll see that she's here when you come back.
So, without a doubt, it was Sir Stanley's idea that you, knowing the language... and customs of the country, would succeed where we might fail.
Confidence most flattering.
- Not misplaced.
- Thank you so much.
Uh, commissioner of police assisting?
No, we thought it best to limit the knowledge of our work to just us three.
Kidnap plot and attempt to kill humble self... indicate that many others share knowledge.
They tried to kill you too?
Spider does not spin web for single fly.
Sir Stanley's secretary now work for you?
I think so. Sir Stanley apparently had great confidence in him.
- He might identify men we seek.
- No.
Sir Stanley confided in no one.
I don't know where to begin.
Long journey always start with one short step.
- Are you all right?
- Yes.
No, don't risk it.
- No! Now don't be a fool!
- It's quite safe.
- Did you see anyone in here?
- Why, no.
Are Colonel Watkins and Miss Woodland safe?
- What's all the excitement?
- Why, someone shot at Mr. Chan from this room.
- Charlie, are you hurt?
- No.
- I rang up and your son said...
- Please, talk later.
- Did you just come in?
- Yes, sir.
- See anyone in the hall?
- No, sir, and no one in here either.
Except Mr. Nash. He was just coming from the bedroom, I think.
- He stepped in to make the phone call for you.
- Phone call? What phone call?
Hello, operator.
Operator.
Was any call made from this room during the last 10 minutes?
Thank you.
Well, young man?
Charlie, do you mind looking in the bedroom?
Oh, Philip.
What were you looking for in my bags? Search him.
- Oh, Philip, don't let them.
- Please, dear.
Here.
The note to you from Sir Stanley.
But why should he have taken that?
It's of no importance.
- May see?
- Yes.
- Stand by that door.
- Yes, sir.
Perhaps fingerprints.
Probably. We'll have them compared at headquarters.
Waiting not necessary.
- Have powder puff, please?
- Why, yes.
Observe.
Scar on thumb.
Hmm.
Your right hand, please.
That scar settles it.
Nash, you're under arrest for attempted murder of Mr. Chan.
Philip! Oh, he couldn't have done it, Colonel.
Please, Diana.
You have nothing to say?
It's my duty to warn you that anything you say may be used in evidence against you.
You're making a great mistake, Colonel.
I'm sorry, Diana, but that's for a jury to decide.
He's the only one at the time of the shooting whose movements are not explained.
Your man was coming in at that door.
He saw no one in the hall.
I was on the balcony with Miss Woodland... and you and Mr. Chan were in the study and you were found near the spot... from which the shot was fired.
No one could've gone out of that window because it's locked on the inside.
And finally, there's an identifying fingerprint...
found on the butt of this gun.
Now I call that a pretty clear case, wouldn't you, Charlie?
Charlie!
See who that is.
Charlie, where on earth did you get to?
Made most interesting discovery.
But, Charlie, the evidence is as clear as the nose on your face.
Owner of face cannot always see nose.
All right, what's the big discovery?
Very possible someone leave apartment through this window.
Huh. It's fastened on the inside.
Most humble apologies for exhibiting commonplace match as clue.
Examine, please.
Well, I don't see anything unusual.
- Notice spot of oil?
- Yes.
Note handle.
Maybe it squeaked and someone oiled it.
Maybe someone have better reason.
Will demonstrate.
Now listen, baby. Nothing would please me more than to take you out tonight... but how many more times have I got to tell you that I can't say for certain yet...
I'm very sorry, but that's absolutely all I can say!
Mr. Chan has nothing for publication.
Hello, Pop!
Oh, all right.
Here's your dime.
Cash on the line for one female telephone call.
Thank you so much.
- Tired?
- No.
Just had refreshing ride on fire escape.
Got a clue, Pop?
Shot in dark sometime find eye of bull.
- Have read?
- It sounds reasonable enough.
Observe envelope.
I don't get it.
Unimportant letter in envelope marked "important."
Get it?
I'm sorry, Pop.
I missed it.
Look, Pop!
"Have made important discovery involving one Ivan Marloff.
"A m closely watched.
Use this means for communication as agreed. 'W'. "
Gee, Pop, you don't think that's the man who kidnapped you?
Most elementary conclusion.
Well, I'll be...
- Got something?
- Something very strange.
Mr. Andrews did not think letter important.
I get it.
And he should have... because if he and Sir Stanley were working together... he would have known about the invisible writing.
Most excellent conclusion.
Very proud.
- What you going to do now?
- Ask Mr. Andrews questions.
I'm Mr. Andrews.
Is Mr. Chan in?
Come in, please.
Been trying to reach you for the past hour,
Mr. Chan, but your line's been busy.
- So sorry. Romantic offspring.
- Oh, I see.
- Will you sit down, please?
- Thanks.
Very great honor to receive visit in humble hotel.
- May offer refreshment, please?
- Yes, thanks. Scotch.
Soothing drink like summer shower... bring grateful relief.
Oh, you're not joining me?
Preserve appetite for less potent Chinese tea.
Cigarette?
Thanks.
You're very hospitable, Mr. Chan, but not always polite.
- Hmm?
- When you walked out on me today...
I naturally expected you to return after the others left.
So sorry for delay.
A very casual letter from Sir Woodland... in an envelope marked "important" was not sent to me for nothing...
Mr. Chan, and you took it with you.
Apologies.
Very bad habit of collecting clues.
I was right.
Must look for man named Marloff.
You brought this up too?
Principle of trusting no one make me doubt even you. So very sorry.
Well, in view of what's happened
I can't say that I blame you.
But you must understand I couldn't have exposed the secret message before the others.
Very excellent precaution.
This gives us a good lead.
We can start work on this at once.
Suggest first search kidnap house.
May find clue there.
- You know where they took you?
- Have very excellent reason to remember.
Well, let's go then.
- I'm going with you, Pop.
- Contradiction, please. You stay here.
And keep away from telephone!
If our friend Marloff was the man behind the lights... he and his gang left here in a hurry.
Smart rats know when to leave ship.
Recognize fingerprint with scar?
Well, let's see.
It's Nash's all right.
Who's there?
Give us most hearty fright.
Hands up, please!
- What you do here?
- To help you.
Huh?
I didn't know what you and Mr. Andrews might run into... so I came along, just in case.
Got idea of disguise from detective book?
Yeah, and it's a pip too.
May borrow book sometime?
Sure. Ah, you're kidding me, Pop.
On contrary, greatly appreciate, just in case.
- Suggest we now take police into confidence.
- I think it wise.
Any orders, Pop?
Four. Return to hotel, burn disguise... study detective book, watch telephone...
- and, uh, take bath.
- Okay.
You say you'd recognize these men if you saw them again?
Except man behind lights.
Recognize accent.
- What about the switchboard girl at the hotel?
- Very pretty brunette.
Hmm. I suppose you remember her, hey, Charlie?
Make very good impression.
You're fighting a desperate gang.
My department is yours if you need it, you know.
Secrecy in our operations is most important, Colonel.
Offer greatly appreciated.
All right, gentlemen, it's your funeral.
Hope not.
Excuse me.
- Yes?
- Miss Woodland is here, sir.
- Oh. Ask her to wait.
- Yes, sir.
It's Miss Woodland.
She wants to see young Nash.
You know, it's difficult to believe... that a decent young fellow like Nash would try to murder anyone.
- You've questioned him?
- Can't get a word.
Perhaps young lady can make him talk.
If anyone can.
- Dakin.
- Yes, sir.
- Send in Miss Woodland at once.
- Yes, sir.
Colonel, you know very well
Philip didn't try to kill Mr. Chan.
But, Diana, my dear, the facts are very clear.
- Mr. Andrews...
- I'm sorry, Miss Woodland.
You believe in him, don't you?
Situation for young man very bad.
But you said someone else used the window. You proved it.
Correction, please.
Only proved someone could have used.
Oh, I thought
I understood you, Mr. Chan.
I see I'm mistaken.
- May I see Philip?
- I needn't tell you, Diana... that Philip is in really a desperate predicament.
And a few words of explanation at this time would be of great help to him.
- Get him to talk.
- I'll try.
- Dakin.
- Yes, sir?
Have Nash sent into the anteroom at once.
- At once, sir.
- In here, Diana.
Thank you.
Now we'll hear what he has to say.
Five minutes, Miss Woodland.
Diana, you shouldn't have come here.
But I had to, Philip.
Haven't you anything you can say that will clear up this terrible misunderstanding?
There's nothing to be said.
What I've done I've done.
If I have to stay here, well, there's nothing I can do about it.
But surely there's something you can say.
Sorry, gentlemen.
I say, Nash!
I'll have the motor going in a second.
Get over there, all of you!
Stay where you are!
One moment.
Only foolish dog pursue flying bird.
The young upstart.
Dakin! Dakin!
Imagine a girl like Miss Woodland... trying to help a would-be murderer to escape from prison.
There's no question, Mr. Chan, he's the man we're looking for.
Innocent man does not run away.
Yes, sir.
What's happened?
Dakin, send out every available man.
Search the settlement.
The whole city if necessary.
Find him! Bring him back!
Mr. Nash, sir, has he escaped?
Has he escaped?
Of course he's escaped!
- What do you think?
- Yes, sir.
Lee.
Lee.
Hey, Pop, tell these mugs to lay off me, will ya?
We caught him as he was coming through the fire escape.
Please.
Clothes of disrupted beggar conceal dearly beloved son.
- Ah, phooey!
- Son.
Now wait a minute, before you bawl me out, Pop...
I was on my way back here when I saw the taxi driver that knocked me out.
- You follow?
- I'll say I did.
He went into a cheap joint on the waterfront... the Versailles Café.
- Did not notify police?
- Of course I didn't.
- I beat it back here to tell you.
- That is good.
Hello? Yes, sir.
It's Mr. Andrews.
Charlie Chan speaking.
Get over here just as quickly as you can.
I think we've cracked this case wide open.
Will make immediate haste.
What's the matter? Has something happened?
Can I go with you?
Only little time to talk.
Have important business for you.
- Must act quickly.
- Okay, Pop.
So sorry for delay.
- Caught in traffic.
- In the study, Mr. Chan.
Most happy to renew acquaintance.
Gentleman who make abduction.
Oh, so he's one of them, is he?
I caught him going through my papers.
- Now then, you're gonna talk. Where's Marloff?
- I don't know any Marloff.
- Come on! Where's Marloff?
- I don't know!
Well, we'll see about that.
- Now then, you gonna talk?
- Yeah, I'll talk. He's at the Versailles Café.
- You ever hear of that place?
- Can easily find.
53, reporting on secret assignment file 457 M.
Have a squad of men surround the Versailles Café.
Keep them in reserve until something breaks.
Right.
It'd be foolish for us to move in on that mob alone.
One man cannot move a mountain, you know.
But two men can start digging.
Keep your eye on that fella.
If he gives you any trouble, call the police.
- Quite right, sir.
- Are you ready?
As son Lee would say,
"Let's go."
Say, he'd like to knock my teeth out.
You'll have a chance to get even when they walk into that nice reception... at the Versailles Café.
Come on.
That Oriental girl certainly knows her stuff, doesn't she?
They're trained, these dancers, since childhood.
See what it says here in the guidebook?
Yeah. You read it.
Whiskey.
Well, if it ain't my old pal from Chan-king.
Come on, Bo.
We've got a lot to talk about.
Turn around.
All right, down those stairs.
- Where did you find him?
- Snoopin' around upstairs.
- You're Marloff, aren't you?
- Yes.
I'm in a jam.
The police are after me... and I've gotta get away from Shanghai.
Listen, Marloff, you've got a boat out there on the river. I wanna go on it, to America.
You know a lot, don't you?
I know you're in a spot if you don't get out of Shanghai tonight.
I can tell you every move Charlie Chan has planned. That oughta be worth something.
- Sure it ought to.
- Not here, you fool.
Do you want the crowd upstairs to find out what we're doing down here?
Listen, you spy.
That break of yours from jail was just a trick... arranged by your friend
Charlie Chan.
And we've just been waiting for you.
Sure, we'll take you to America.
- They're on their way now.
- Fine.
Now you go upstairs and let them see you.
And when they follow you down here, we'll be ready for them.
- Okay.
- Get that stuff below.
- What about this guy?
- We'll take him with us.
When we get out to sea, we'll drop him overboard.
- Gentlemen?
- Scotch. Yours?
- Sarsaparilla.
- What you say?
- Sarsaparilla.
- No catch you.
I'm afraid you'd better follow a bad example.
Scotch, two. Chop-chop.
You don't have to drink it, you know.
Bottle of whiskey and two glasses.
Taxi driver who assist in abduction.
Looks like we're too late,
Mr. Chan.
Careful. Remember you never drink anything stronger than tea.
Appearances sometimes deceiving.
Like a wolf in lamb's clothing.
Oh, so that's it.
Shipping it in wine cases.
Shipping place not far off.
River runs nearby.
Which means they've a way of getting to the water.
Very clever deduction.
Trapdoor.
Possibly leads to river.
Right again.
Got a flashlight?
Throw it down there.
We'll have a look.
See? Loaded boat at the dock.
Nobody around it.
Let's investigate.
All right, Mr. Chan, you go ahead with the light... and we'll signal my men from down below... and then we'll run the boat around to the government dock.
- Greatly admire efficiency of G-men.
- Yeah.
Insignificant offspring of searchlight... seems to have internal trouble.
Let me have it.
It's all right.
Motorboat.
Must be police you telephone for to surround the place.
Keep 'em down there.
Grab those guns.
Stand over there.
- Come on, come on. Get over there.
- Keep those hands up.
- Upstairs, boys, come on.
- You all right, Charlie?
A little late, Charlie, but we got here.
Sorry I couldn't have been of more help, Mr. Chan... but Marloff saw through our jailbreak scheme.
Thank you so much for able assistance already rendered.
Why, what's Forest doing here?
No one knows less about servants than the master.
Forest one of gang.
He made attempt on my life in your apartment... escape through window and appear to have just entered by door.
Well, I can believe that now.
Well, what about
Nash's fingerprints on the gun?
Marloff think young man know too much... because of position with Sir Stanley.
So use fake fingerprint on gun to create impression... he try to kill me.
Rubber stamp pad in fireplace at kidnap house... with the sample fingerprints on paper.
Very clever device.
Then Marloff was also responsible for the concealed gun... that killed Sir Stanley at the banquet.
And it was one of his gang who tried to get you at your hotel.
Very probable.
Mr. Chan, you deserve the thanks of the United States Government... for the help that you've been on this case.
Believe government owe you debt also.
Without able guidance, could never have located storehouse of opium.
We'll share that honor, Mr. Chan.
I'll be very happy to assist in taking charge of these men.
I'll remove them to the government dock in their own boat.
Certainly. I'd appreciate it.
Our police boat is very small.
- All right, take these men below.
- Uh, pardon, please.
- One more prisoner to be accounted for.
- Who's that?
Real head of dope smuggling ring.
Reach for ceiling.
Let's have our laugh later, after this business is finished.
- Come on. Get started.
- Put up your hands.
Take gun away from gentleman, please.
Hey, Pop, here's your wire photo of Andrews and a cable from Washington.
That man isn't Mr. Andrews.
Read cablegram, please.
"Andrews, Bureau of Investigation.
"Agent 53, assigned to opium smuggling detail in Shanghai...
"murdered in San Francisco three weeks ago.
Murderer not apprehended."
Corroboration of evidence most gratifying.
You pretend to be G-man.
Now turn out to be
N.G.-man.
Young Mr. Nash, when going through
Sir Stanley's private correspondence... from Department of Justice at Washington... discover that real Mr. Andrews did not smoke or drink.
When you come to reclaim... private letter of Sir Stanley to real Mr. Andrews... you make smart guess about secret writing.
But very foolish to accept scotch and cigarette.
Also foolish to fake telephone call for police.
Fortunately, humble self took precaution to notify same.
You very clever though.
- Thank you.
- You're welcome.
Gave you plenty rope.
You make excellent noose for neck.
Now we go in boat to government dock.
Suggest you go to young lady.
Will find her waiting at home.
Charlie, you're all right.
Thank you so much.
Go home. Okay now for one female telephone call.
Thank you so much.
